{'Title': 'Introduction of Police Chief Cynthia Renaud', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Proclamation: Municipal Clerks Week May 6-12, 2018', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Proclamation declaring May 2018 as Mental Health Awareness Month', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Proclamation designating May 2018 as Older Americans Month', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Contractual Services Agreement for Citywide HVAC Maintenance and Repair', 'Department': 'Public Works, Facilities Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with ACCO Engineered Systems for maintenance of City heating, ventilation and air conditioning (HVAC) systems and large-scale repairs. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080(b) and is for a total amount not to exceed $1,499,064 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Facilities Maintenance Division contracts out heating, ventilation and air conditioning (HVAC) work for various City facilities including City Hall, the Public Safety Facility, City libraries and City fire stations. This contracted work augments the City’s in-house HVAC staff and generally focuses on large scale repairs and maintenance of intricate HVAC systems. Staff recommends piggybacking off of a competitive bid completed by the Big Blue Bus (BBB) last year and awarding the contract to ACCO Engineered Systems for an amount not to exceed $1,499,064 over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'In June 2017, Facilities Maintenance staff awarded informal bid 53907-OG to ACCO Engineered Systems. Staff executed a contractual services agreement, CT-4395, for a total amount not to exceed $175,000 over a two-year period. Upon the execution of CT-4395, it became apparent that the total not to exceed amount would be exhausted in less than two years as the City’s demand for HVAC contractual services has increased due to the addition of facilities at the Santa Monica Municipal Airport and aging HVAC systems citywide.', 'Discussion', 'The City employs five permanent in-house staff to provide various HVAC services at City facilities. Typical services provided by City staff include adjusting air controls, changing fan belts and providing basic preventative maintenance. Due to the large size and complexity of some City HVAC systems, in-house staff cannot meet all citywide HVAC needs. To ensure efficient operation and safe temperature-controlled environments for the public and staff, additional services are contracted out for:', '· the larger and more complex HVAC systems located at facilities such as the Santa Monica Municipal Airport, Santa Monica Main Library and the City’s fire stations;', '· large-scale projects that are often long-term and require specialized licensing and equipment; and', '· addressing equipment failures and emergency repair work in a timely manner to prevent shutdowns.', 'Immediate contracted services are needed to address a backlog of deferred maintenance which will require significant repairs and replacements to various City HVAC systems. Internal staff will then be able to take on most preventative maintenance throughout the City. The installation of new equipment will also reduce the demand for contractors to complete repairs.', 'Staff expects to complete the large-scale projects during the first two years of the contract in an amount not to exceed $850,000, for a total amount not to exceed $1,075,000 over a five-year period. Citywide routine preventative maintenance will be performed during the first two years of the contract in an amount not to exceed $164,350, for a total amount not to exceed $424,064 over a five-year period.', 'Staff recommends piggybacking on BBB’s bid award with ACCO Engineered Systems, at the same hourly rate, in an amount not to exceed $1,014,350 for two years, with one additional three-year renewal option, for a total amount not to exceed $1,499,064 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On March 21, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide maintenance and repair services for BBB’s HVAC and Air Movement systems in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-seven vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on April 6, 2017 (Attachment A). ACCO Engineered Systems and Richardson Technologies, Inc. submitted bids, and highlights from each are as follows:', 'Bids were evaluated based on criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. ACCO Engineered Systems, the lowest bidder, was recommended as the best bidder.', 'On June 13, 2017 Council awarded bid #4266 for the maintenance and repair of HVAC systems to ACCO Engineered Systems (Attachment A). Staff recommends piggybacking on BBB’s bid award with ACCO Engineered Systems, at the same hourly rate. The proposed agreement with ACCO Engineered Systems fully complies with the exceptions to competitive bidding, pursuant to Section 2.24.080(b) of the Santa Monica Municipal Code.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to ACCO Engineered Systems is for an amount not to exceed $1,499,064. Funds of $506,330 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Public Works Department. The contract will be charged to account 01274.570060 and expenditures will be transferred to departments incurring the contracting services. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Cost-Sharing Memorandum of Agreements with the City of Los Angeles for Two Coordinated Integrated Monitoring Plans for Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute two Memorandum of Agreements (MOA) with the City of Los Angeles to implement cost-sharing Coordinated Integrated Monitoring Plans (CIMPs) to comply with the Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board's National Pollution Discharge Elimination Systems (NPDES) permit requirements. One MOA is for the Santa Monica Bay and one MOA is for Ballona Creek.", 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City is obligated to comply with the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination Systems (NPDES) permit requirements to reduce pollution from runoff into the Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek. NPDES requirements include coordinated integrated monitoring plans to collect data and demonstrate compliance with water quality objectives specified in the permit. As a jurisdiction that drains into the Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek watersheds, the City is obligated to share the costs associated with implementing the coordinated integrated monitoring plans. The costs for the five-year monitoring period (FY 18/19 through FY 22/23) of the Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek MOAs would not exceed $572,027 and $16,946, respectively.', 'Background', 'The Federal Clean Water Act (CWA) requires the California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region (Board), to develop water quality standards that protect beneficial uses for each water body found within its region. Beneficial uses include swimming, fishing, drinking water, navigability, and wildlife habitats and reproduction. Section 303(d) of the CWA requires states to prepare a list of water bodies that do not meet water quality standards and establish Total Maximum Daily Loads (TMDLs) for each of these water bodies. A TMDL represents an amount of pollution that can be released by human activity and natural sources into a specific water body without causing a decline in water quality and beneficial uses.', 'The Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek watersheds have been included on California’s Section 303(d) list since 1998 due to impairments by bacteria, trash, organic chemicals and metals. The Board has adopted multiple TMDLs for these pollutants since 2003 in order to address these impairments.', 'The City Council approved an initial Santa Monica Bay MOA for cost-sharing bacterial monitoring on July 8, 2003. The City Council approved the Ballona Creek MOAs for cost-sharing monitoring for bacteria, metals and toxics on July 14, 2009.', 'In accordance with these TMDLs, the City of Los Angeles submitted a Coordinated Integrated Monitoring Plan (CIMP) for compliance with the TMDLs on behalf of the agencies within these watersheds. The City of Los Angeles is responsible for performing all required monitoring and reporting to the Board. The City of Los Angeles invoices the City of Santa Monica annually for its share of monitoring costs for Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek. The City Council approved the most recent three-year renewal of both MOAs on February 23, 2016, which end on June 30, 2018 (Attachment A).', 'Discussion', 'On November 28, 2012, the Board approved a new NDPES permit with more extensive monitoring requirements. The expanded CIMPs require the City to enter into new MOAs with the City of Los Angeles to reflect the additional monitoring protocols and requirements. Under the terms of the MOAs, the City of Los Angeles would continue to be responsible for all monitoring and reporting activities to the Board.', 'The new MOAs include additional costs associated with tasks that the City of Los Angeles performed at its own expense, in previous years, on behalf of other cities to meet the NPDES permit requirements. However, these costs have increased and the City of Los Angeles is proposing to include these additional costs in the updated MOAs. Costs reflect the following responsibilities:', '· Annual Reporting: As the principal reporting agency, the City of Los Angeles performs a number of tasks related to the annual report, such as water quality monitoring, annual rainfall tracking, and hydrology reporting.', '· Report of Waste Discharge:  Prepare application reporting on discharge locations that could affect urban runoff. Reapplication of the permit every five years.', '· Adaptive Management: Biannual reporting stating how cities have modified their stormwater program to better meet the permit requirements.', '· Reasonable Assurance Analysis: Per the permit, this analysis was performed during the 2012 permit period to complete Enhanced Watershed Management Plans (EWMPs). It must be performed again for the renewed permit. This analysis is a computer model simulation that predicts if the stormwater harvesting projects to be built within each watershed by cities will achieve EWMP requirements. The analysis demonstrates to the Board that cities will meet EWMP requirements and water quality standards.', '· Enhanced Watershed Management Plan (EWMP) Time Extension: There is an interim EWMP Implementation milestone set for April 11, 2018. Under the terms of the EWMP, the City of Los Angeles plans to submit a time extension on behalf of the cities in these watersheds to give cities more time to comply with the EWMP. This will allow for additional work to meet some of the water quality standards that will not likely be met before the 2018 compliance milestone.', '· Time Schedule Orders (Santa Monica Bay Bacterial TMDL):The final compliance milestone for the wet-weather bacterial TMDL is July 15, 2021. Under the terms of the EWMP, the City of Los Angeles plans to submit a Time Schedule Order, on behalf of the cities in these watersheds to give cities more time to comply with the TMDL. This will allow for additional work to meet some of the water quality standards that will not likely be met before the 2021 compliance milestone.', 'The additional cost to the City of Santa Monica associated with the above administrative (non-CIMP) tasks totals $181,780 for Santa Monica Bay and $2,543 for Ballona Creek watersheds.', 'The MOA five-year budgets for the CIMP and additional permit costs are listed below by fiscal year for each watershed.', 'Santa Monica Bay', 'Fiscal Year', 'Budget', '18/19', '$93,821', '19/20', '$116,324', '20/21', '$128,205', '21/22', '$85,396', '22/23', '$96,279', 'Contingency', '$52,002', 'Total', '$572,027', 'Ballona Creek', 'Fiscal Year', 'Budget', '18/19', '$6,096', '19/20', '$2,394', '20/21', '$2,920', '21/22', '$2,075', '22/23', '$2,284', 'Contingency', '$1,177', 'Total', '$16,946', 'The budgetary difference between the two watersheds is due to the difference in drainage area of the City: Santa Monica Bay – 19.76%; Ballona Creek – 0.28%.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'Santa Monica Bay', 'The MOA cost share for the Santa Monica Bay is for an amount not to exceed $572,027 over a five-year period through FY 2022-23. Funds of $93,821 are available in the Proposed FY 2018-19 budget in the Public Works Department. The MOA will be charged to account 06402.555170.', 'Ballona Creek', 'The MOA cost share for the Ballona Creek is for an amount not to exceed $16,946 over a five-year period through FY 2022-23. Funds of $6,096 are available in the Proposed FY 2018-19 budget in the Public Works Department. The MOA will be charged to account 06402.555170.', 'Future year funding for both agreements is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Accept Funding for the Green Business Certification Program', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Adopt the attached resolution authorizing the City to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $20,000 from the California Green Business Network for the Santa Monica Green Business Certification Program, and to accept all grant renewals.2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant and all grant renewals.3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City of Santa Monica’s Office of Sustainability and the Environment administers the Green Business Certification Program in order to increase the adoption of sustainable practices in the local business community. Santa Monica has operated this program since 2007, but recently became eligible for $20,000 in grant funds through the California Environmental Protection Agency. Since this is the first year State funding has become available, a resolution authorizing acceptance of $20,000 in year one, plus any future allocations, if awarded, is required.', 'Background', 'Assembly Bill No. 913 (Feuer) requires CalEPA to develop a California Green Business Program and provide support and assistance to local governments that provide voluntary green business certification programs for small- and medium-sized businesses. In 2017, the State budgeted $1,000,000 to continue these certification programs. The California Green Business Network (CAGBN) entered into Agreement 17EPA014 with CalEPA to manage the funds for existing and new programs as well as report on usage and deliverables. CAGBN is allocating $20,000 to each network jurisdiction to reach new small- and medium-sized businesses locally. In February 2018, CAGBN informed the Office of Sustainability and Environment that $20,000 would be allocated for the Santa Monica Green Business Certification Program upon entering into an agreement with CAGBN.', 'Discussion', 'Santa Monica’s Sustainable City Plan identifies a Sustainable Local Economy as one of its nine goal areas. Participation in the Santa Monica Green Business Certification Program (Program) is one of the indicators associated with this goal area. The Program recognizes businesses that voluntarily adopt sustainable business practices into their operations. These practices include energy efficiency, reductions in greenhouse gas emissions, water conservation, and waste reduction. The Program was introduced in 2007 and to date the City has certified approximately 170 businesses.', 'Santa Monica is one of 27 jurisdictions throughout California that operate local green business certification programs that make up the CAGBN. In 2017, State funding was established within the California Environmental Protection Agency’s budget to continue and expand the network model to serve 40,000 California businesses by 2040. CAGBN is allocating $20,000 to each of the 27 jurisdictions in the network. Since this is the first year State funding has become available, a resolution authorizing acceptance of $20,000 in year one, plus any future allocations, if awarded, is required.', 'Upon agreement execution with CAGBN, the City would receive $10,000 for the Program. The remaining $10,000 would be contingent upon certification or re-certification of eight businesses by October 1, 2018. The City has certified approximately 20 businesses per year through the Program since 2010.', 'The City would be required to commit matching funds, in the amount of $20,000, which may be met in any of the following ways:', '· staff and/or consultant time to assist and track businesses through the program;', '· staff and/or consultant marketing efforts;', '· business rebates for purchases that help businesses meet Program standards; and/or', '· staff and/or consultant travel expenses for events.', 'Average Program spending over fiscal years 2015-16 and 2016-17 amounted to $39,850, and this year program costs are expected to be $38,000. No additional staff time or budget enhancement would be required to meet the matching fund requirements because the existing program budget and staff allocations exceed the match requirement.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Award of a $20,000 grant from the California Green Business Network requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', '1. Establish revenue budget at account 20426.410410 in the amount of $20,000.', '2. Appropriate $20,000 to account 20426.579998 to reflect receipt of the Green Business Certification grant.', 'If renewals are awarded, budget changes will be included in subsequent year budgets, contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award Bid for Re-manufacturing, Overhaul, Troubleshooting, and Repair Services for Allison Transmission', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #4320 to Western States Converters & Transmission, a California-based company, for remanufacturing, overhaul, troubleshooting, and repair of Allison automatic transmissions;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Western States Converters & Transmission, in an amount not to exceed $101,676, which includes a $9,243 contingency, for one year, with four-additional contract years in the amount of $406,703, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $508,379 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends award of Bid #4320 to Western States Converters and Transmission Inc., to provide remanufacture, overhaul, troubleshooting, and repair of transmissions for transit buses and fire vehicles, at specified unit prices plus labor and applicable sales taxes for a five-year period with successive years at the same price, terms and conditions as the first contract year. Under normal operating conditions, these transmissions need to be overhauled or replaced approximately every 250,000 miles, or at least once during the life cycle of these vehicles. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $508,379, which includes a 10% contingency, over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'On August 25, 2015, City Council awarded Bid #4191 to Western States Converters and Transmissions for an amount not to exceed $450,000 over a three-year period. This contract ensured that transmission that have reached their useful life cycle or have prematurely failed would be remanufactured to Original Equipment Manufacturer (OEM) specifications and returned to service in an efficient and timely manner. The existing contract ends on June 30, 2018 requiring BBB to solicit bids for Allison transmission remanufacture and overhaul services for its fleet of transit buses and Fire Department vehicles.', 'Discussion', 'BBB requires Allison transmission remanufacturing services for transit coaches and Fire Department apparatus that are equipped with Allison transmissions. These are heavy-duty transmissions with internal hydraulic retarders that supplement the braking system and allow for a smooth down shift and bus stop approach. Under normal operating conditions, transmissions have a useful life of approximately 250,000 miles. It is essential that a transmission be remanufactured approximately every 250,000 miles, as failure to do so could cause catastrophic failure of major internal transmission parts as well as impact service reliability of the bus system as a whole. BBB staff performs troubleshooting and repairs of the transmissions as well as the removal and replacement of the transmissions. However, the requirements for remanufacturing of the transmissions exceed current in-house capabilities. The award of this bid would ensure that Allison transmissions that have reached their useful life or have prematurely failed would be remanufactured to OEM specifications and that the vehicles would return to service in a timely manner.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014, Council directed staff to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” transmission repair services were identified as meeting criteria for contractual services under the categories of specialized expertise, and capital equipment requirements.', 'The remanufacture of transmissions requires specialized expertise as well as capital equipment needed to conduct dynamometer tests in-house. Bringing this service in-house would require the purchase and storage of additional capital equipment, one additional full-time employee, and in-depth training of staff on the method and process of remanufacturing an Allison transmission. Bid #4320 requires the vendor to provide all necessary tooling and equipment to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment as well as personnel and training.', 'Based on the recommendations of the January 13, 2015 staff report, staff solicited bids for outside contracting of Allison transmission remanufacture, overhaul, troubleshooting, and repair services, for BBB transit buses and fire vehicles.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On February 15, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide transit bus and fire vehicle Allison transmission remanufacture, overhaul, troubleshooting, and repair services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fourteen (14) vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publically opened on March 6, 2018, per the table below:', 'Cost Estimate', 'Performance Truck & Trailer', 'Western States Converters & Transmission', 'Estimate 5-year Period', '$571,226', '$462,163', '10% Contingency', '$57,123', '$46,216', 'Contract 5-year Total', '$628,348', '$508,379', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Western States Converters & Transmission has had a positive history of performing Allison transmission remanufacture services for BBB and Fire Department during the course of its previous contract with the City and is able to meet all of the City’s requirements in addition to being the lowest bidder. Based on these criteria, Western States Converters & Transmission is recommended as the best bidder and staff recommends that Council award Bid #4320 to Western States Converters & Transmission for Allison transmission remanufacture, overhaul, troubleshooting and repair services. The total expenditure for the five-year period is not to exceed $508,379.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Western States Converters & Transmission is for an amount not to exceed $508,379, which includes a 10% contingency. Funds of $70,201 are included in in BBB’s proposed FY 2018-19 Budget Plan and funds of $31,474 are included in the Fire Department’s proposed budget. The contract will be charged to accounts C6004750.689000 and 01190001.529470, respectively.  FY 2018-19 and future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Approval of the Proposed FY 2018-19 One-Year Action Plan Allocating Federal Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and HOME Investment Partnerships Act Program (HOME) Entitlement Grant Funds', 'Department': 'Community & Cultural Services', 'Sponsors': 'Director Andy Agle', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Approve the Proposed FY2018-19 One-Year CDBG and HOME Action Plan (Attachments A and A1). Authorize the City Manager to submit all documents required to receive the City’s annual Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnerships Act (HOME) entitlement grant funds to the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD).', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Santa Monica is a longtime recipient of Federal block grant funding through the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD). The Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) dates to the Ford Administration and is designed to benefit the residents of eligible low and moderate income neighborhoods. The HOME Investment Partnerships Program (HOME)  was enacted in 1990 and is the largest Federal block grant to state and local governments designed exclusively to create affordable housing for low-income households. To be eligible for these program’s grant funds for FY 2018-19, the City must submit a Council-approved One-Year Action Plan to HUD within sixty days of notification of FY 2018-19 funding allocations, and no later than August 15, 2018. The purpose of the Action Plan is to outline how funds will be expended and to confirm that the funded activities are consistent with the City’s Five-Year Consolidated Plan adopted by Council on May 12, 2015 (Attachment B). The Proposed FY 2018-19 One-Year Action Plan (Attachments A and A1) allocates an estimated $1.8M in CDBG and HOME funds for capital projects, residential rehabilitation, public service programs, tenant-based rental assistance and program administration. Proposed FY 2018-19 CDBG and HOME funding allocations remain level with FY 2017-18 allocations. Specific appropriations of these funds will be included in the Proposed FY 2018-19 Exception Based Budget and the Proposed FY 2018-20 CIP Biennial Budget.', 'Background', 'In order to receive federal entitlement funds from the CDBG and HOME programs, the City must submit a five-year Consolidated Plan to HUD. The Consolidated Plan is implemented through five one-year Action Plans, prepared and adopted annually, which outline projects and activities to achieve the goals established therein. The City’s current 2015-2019 Consolidated Plan, submitted to HUD in May 2015, identifies high priority needs and the associated goals, strategies, and resources anticipated over a five-year period. Priority needs are identified through the Consolidated Plan Needs Assessment, which incorporates data from the Census and the American Community Survey; local information from the City of Santa Monica’s Housing Element, Analysis of Impediments to Fair Housing, and Rent Control Board Annual Report; and input from the public, City staff, partner organizations, and community stakeholders. The following identified priority needs align with the City’s Framework outcome areas for Community, Place & Planet, Health, and Economic Opportunity as well as strategic goals for Homelessness and Inclusive and Diverse Community.', '· Safe, Affordable Housing (Rehabilitation, Emergency Repairs)', '· Public Facilities and Infrastructure', '· Supportive Housing for Persons with Special Needs', '· Economic Development', '· Fair Housing', '· Homeless Activities (Prevention, Emergency Shelters, Supportive Housing)', '· Public Services (Seniors, Youth, Homelessness, Persons with Disabilities)', 'The Proposed FY 2018-19 Action Plan is part of the City’s broader efforts to advance its strategic goals and support its most vulnerable populations through local and regional programs. All proposed projects directly advance strategic goals for Homelessness and Inclusive and Diverse Community. Specific goal outcomes and strategies addressed include expanding affordable housing opportunities, raising incomes for low-moderate income families, helping Santa Monica residents stay in their homes, preventing homelessness, and enhancing the City’s efforts with regional partnerships to transition those experiencing homelessness into housing.', 'Santa Monica also partners with outreach staff at LA County and local service providers to engage, stabilize, and connect homeless individuals to housing through the Homeless Multidisciplinary Street Team (HMST) and Los Angeles County C3 teams. City efforts are leveraged with County-funded outreach teams such as the Integrated Mobile Health Team (IMHT) and Street Medicine teams. The City coordinates housing and services for the most vulnerable homeless individuals through the Chronic Homeless Project (CHP), a partnership between the Santa Monica Housing Authority, Santa Monica Police Department, SM Fire, Community and Cultural Services Department, City-funded homeless providers, and the County. Additional City efforts include the Preserving our Diversity (POD) program to help rent-burdened residents retain housing, the Senior Housing Task Force, a collaborative of City and County departments and non-profit agencies serving older adults at risk of losing their housing, and the wide variety of services funded through the Human Services Grants Program.', 'Regionally, the City coordinates its efforts with the Los Angeles Continuum of Care (CoC) by participating in the Los Angeles County Homeless Initiative, led by the Los Angeles Homeless Services Authority (LAHSA). The City also participates in the Continuum of Care Coordinated Entry System (CES) along with county departments, housing authorities, the Veterans Administration (VA), and service providers to match people who are homeless to appropriate housing options.', 'Discussion', 'The Proposed FY 2018-19 One-Year Action Plan represents the fourth year of the City’s 2015-19 Consolidated Plan and details program allocations for CDBG and HOME funds to address the high-priority needs identified in the City’s 2015-19 Consolidated Plan.', 'Both programs benefit residents with special needs and incomes at or below 80% of area median income (low and moderate income). The City’s estimated CDBG and HOME allocations reflect level funding from FY2017-18. The $1.8M FY 2018-19 estimated funding allocations include:', '· CDBG: $1,031,923 in new federal funds, $109,000 in prior year unallocated funds and $100,000 in projected program income funds for capital projects, public service, and administration.', '· HOME: $431,177 in new federal funds and $100,000 in program income for tenant-based rental assistance and administration.', 'CDBG and HOME programs provide funding to support affordable housing, capital improvements, and administrative reimbursement. In accordance with federal regulations, a maximum of 15 percent of current year CDBG funding may be allocated for public service to nonprofit organizations. Public service allocations support Human Services Grants Program agencies working to address and prevent homelessness by providing support services to low-income households, including people who are experiencing homelessness or at high risk of homelessness, people with disabilities, and the frail elderly.', 'Proposed projects for the FY 2018-19 funding period include:', '· Residential Rehabilitation (CDBG, $570,000): Repair or rehabilitation of housing units occupied by low-income households.', '· Public Infrastructure (CDBG, $246,703): Complete infrastructure improvements in low/moderate income areas.', '· Disability Community Resource Center/Home Access Program (CDBG, $36,644): Provide minor home modifications for low-income persons with disabilities.', '· St. Joseph Center/Chronic Homeless Program (CDBG, $44,624): Provide assertive outreach and intensive case management to chronically homeless persons.', '· Chrysalis/Employment Program (CDBG, $40,000): Assist low-income and homeless persons in developing job skills and securing and retaining employment.', '· Legal Aid Foundation of Los Angeles/Legal Services (CDBG, $80,000): Provide legal services to low-income residents, including tenant harassment and eviction prevention.', '· Tenant-Based Rental Assistance (HOME, $413,382): Rental subsidies for qualifying low-income households who may be at risk of losing housing.', '· Planning, Administration, CHDO Reserve (CDBG, $222,952; HOME $117,795)', 'The Proposed FY 2018-19 One-Year Action Plan assumes level funding for CDBG and HOME. Although HUD has yet to formally announce FY 2018-19 CDBG and HOME allocations, Congressional agreement on the FY 2018 omnibus spending bill on March 21, 2018 included a 7.8% overall increase to CDBG funding and a 43.4% overall increase to HOME funding. City staff anticipates the formal release of HUD’s FY 2018-19 CDBG and HOME allocations and will incorporate those figures into the final draft of the FY 2018-19 Action Plan. Any cuts to future allocations will erode the City’s social safety net and limit capital improvements to low-income areas and public facilities.', 'To that end, staff will continue to monitor federal budget developments in order to identify any potential impacts to HUD’s future allocations.', 'Public Outreach', 'The Proposed FY 2018-19 One-Year Action Plan was made available for a 30-day public review period from March 22, 2018 to April 20, 2018. The Plan was also presented to the Housing Commission on April 19, 2018 and to the Social Services Commission on April 23, 2018. Staff will incorporate any input received through the public review process into the final version. The Council approved Action Plan must be submitted to HUD within sixty days of notification of FY 2018-19 funding allocations, and no later than August 15, 2018.', 'Public Hearing', 'Pursuant to Municipal Code Section 2.68.050, the City has adopted a public comment process which requires two public hearings prior to the adoption of a Consolidated Plan and Action Plan. The public hearings held on February 13, 2018 at the Council Meeting and March 15, 2018 at the Housing Commission satisfy the two meeting requirement to receive public input and recommendations for the Proposed FY2018-19 Action Plan.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Staff projections for these awards will be included in various account numbers as part of the City’s Proposed FY 2018-19 Exception Based Budget and the Proposed FY 2018-20 CIP Biennial Budget. HUD’s submission requirements for the CDBG and HOME Action Plan precede the City Council’s approval of the City’s Budget.']}
{'Title': 'Memorandum of Understanding for 2018 Soulstice Event', 'Department': 'Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Memorandum of Understanding with the Main Street Business Improvement Association to co-produce the 2018 Summer Soulstice event.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Summer Soulstice festival is an annual community event that the Main Street Business Improvement Association (MSBIA) has held since 2001 to showcase the Main Street commercial district. The event attracts approximately 7,000 to 10,000 local and regional attendees to hear live music and to experience the businesses along the one-mile business corridor. Beginning in 2011, the City has provided funding and staffing assistance to MSBIA for the event’s production. Staff recommends a memorandum of understanding to define the roles, responsibilities, and contributions of each party.', 'For the first time in its history, the 2018 Soulstice festival proposes to close a portion of Main Street to vehicle traffic. Starting at Pico Boulevard and extending south to Ocean Park Boulevard, the street would be closed from 10:00 AM to 9:00 PM. The street closure would not only expand the capacity for public participation in the event, it would also allow for additional activation of the area. The proposed street closure also increases the costs for staging the event, especially in the areas of public safety and traffic control. While MSBIA is working to raise additional funding for the event through increased sponsorships and vendors, a funding gap is anticipated. At its April 10, 2018 meeting, Council allocated an additional $14,000 of its discretionary funds to MSBIA to help offset the additional public safety expense.', 'Background', 'The Main Street Business Improvement Association (MSBIA) has produced the Summer Soulstice festival (Soulstice), an annual, free, one-day, live-music event, since2001. The event features bands on stages located on several closed side streets along Main Street, as well as an accompanying sidewalk sale by Main Street merchants, and, in some years, an entertainment area for children. The summer event was organized to celebrate Main Street’s businesses, attract residents and visitors to the area, and expand the entertainment offerings provided at the Sunday Main Street Farmers Market. The event brings vitality to the street, offers the community an opportunity to enjoy free, live musical entertainment in an outdoor setting, and provides an economic boost to the retailers and restaurants on Main Street. The Main Street commercial district begins at Pico Boulevard to the north and extends to the southern City boundary, just south of Marine Street.', 'For many years, MSBIA’s Executive Director and the organization’s board members solely produced and financed the one-day Summer Soulstice event. As production costs and administrative responsibilities have risen over time, MSBIA has sought participants to help with the administrative duties, as well as sponsors and vendors to help offset the expense.', 'Beginning in FY 2011-12 and annually thereafter, Council has allocated discretionary funds to support events organized by the business improvement districts (BIDs) that include MSBIA, as well as the Pico Boulevard and Montana Avenue districts. Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. does not participate in the discretionary funding allocation since it is primarily organized as a property-based assessment district. MSBIA has used the discretionary funds to cover the City’s fees related to the production of the Soulstice event. The amount of Council discretionary funds allocated to MSBIA has varied each year. The City provided $2,500 in FY 2011-12; $3,750 in FY 2012-13, and $7,000 in FY 2013-14. In FY 2014-15, the amount of discretionary funding was reduced to $4,000 because the City was able to reduce Police and Fire staffing costs associated with the event. In FY 2015-16 and FY 2016-17, Council provided $7,000 in discretionary funds to MSBIA and to each of the other BIDs. For FY 2017-18, the City has increased the amount each of the three BIDs receives to $8,000.', 'In 2011, the City’s Buy Local program began providing partnership grant funds to the three BIDs of up to $1,500 annually. MSBIA has primarily used the Buy Local grant to help fund some of the Summer Soulstice marketing and promotion costs, as the event helps promote the Buy Local program.', 'In 2015, the City established an Event Partnership Administrative Instruction (AI) that specified conditions and requirements for City sponsorship and co-production of community events. The AI authorizes the City to partner with organizations to provide funds, fee waivers, and use of City staff time for planning and implementation of qualified events. The value of the sponsorship or co-production varies. The City co-produced the 2015 Summer Soulstice event and MSBIA received approximately $13,604 in City support, comprised of Council discretionary funds, Buy Local funds, fee waivers, fee reductions, and in-kind staff time to contribute to the event’s total expense of approximately $32,000. The City also co-produced the 2016 Soulstice festival, and MSBIA received $16,823 in City support, which included allowing for an over-the-street banner, promotion of the event via the City’s social media outlets, fee waivers, fee reductions, and additional City fees associated with public safety staffing requirements, to help offset the total event expense of approximately $40,000. The value of the City resources provided to MSBIA is based on the actual cost of City fees, as well as staff time. While the City was considered a co-producer for both the 2015 and 2016 Soulstice events, both events were processed by the Community and Cultural Service events program and no MOU was executed.', 'At its February 28, 2017 meeting, Council authorized staff to enter into a MOU with MSBIA to co-produce the 2017 Soulstice festival (Attachment A). MSBIA received $19,313 of City support in the form of expense reimbursement, in-kind staff assistance, and some fee waivers to contribute towards the total event expense of approximately $66,000. The City’s increased support in 2017 was primarily due to a change in the City’s parking-rate structure for reserving spaces in the City parking lots.', 'The Soulstice festival is a signature event for MSBIA and the Main Street commercial district. The City has historically welcomed the opportunity to co-produce the event because it aligns with several City’s goals. For example, the event draws a broad audience that includes both locals and regional visitors of all ages. The festival also brings the community together and creates a sense of connection where attendees can gather and socialize. In addition, the event allows attendees to explore Main Street stores and restaurants, and encourages spending locally, thereby supporting Economic Opportunity.', 'Discussion', 'For several years, MSBIA has been interested in the closure of Main Street in conjunction with Soulstice in order to expand the event program area and increase pedestrian circulation. Due to the success of COAST, the open-streets event the City produced in 2016 and 2017, MSBIA requested the closure of Main Street for the 2017 Soulstice. Staff determined that a variety of internal policies and requirements would need to be addressed in order to permit the closure of Main Street and that there was insufficient time to do so prior to the 2017 event. While evaluating the closure of Main Street from Pico Boulevard to the southern City boundary for the 2018 Soulstice, aclosure of Main Street from Pico to Ocean Park Boulevard was agreed upon between staff and MSBIA. The 2018 Soulstice festival will be held on June 24, 2018. Main Street will be closed to vehicle traffic beginning at Pico Boulevard, and extending south to Ocean Park Boulevard from 10:00AM to 9:00PM. The street closure allows for additional activations, and it will provide attendees a new way to interact and experience the businesses along Main Street. The Ocean Park Association expressed their support for the closure of Main Street as part of the 2018 Soulstice.', 'The street closure also increases the costs for staging the event because of the increased requirements for public safety and traffic control. For 2018’s Soulstice, water barricades will be required at a cost of approximately $15,000; the costs for fire and medical personnel is estimated at $7,800, an increase of $6,500 from the 2017 Soulstice; and additional traffic control and police cost is estimated at $5,100, an increase of $2,200 from 2017. The public safety expenses add up to a total of $27,900 in production costs, an increase of $23,700 over 2017’s costs.', 'While MSBIA has been working to offset the increased costs by increasing the number of sponsors and vendors, at its April 10, 2018 meeting, Council allocated an additional $14,000 in discretionary funds to help with the additional public safety and traffic control expenses. For FY 2017-18, MSBIA will receive a total of $22,000 in Council discretionary funds, reflecting $14,000 allocated on April 10, 2018 and $8,000 allocated for FY 2017-18.', 'Staff recommends that the City enter into a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with MSBIA to co-produce the 2018 Soulstice festival being held on June 24, 2018. This is the second year the City will formalize its co-production of the event by entering into an MOU with MSBIA that would outline the scope of the event, responsibilities of each party, and City support. Staff anticipates that the amount of City support for the 2018 Soulstice will be higher than what was provided in 2017 due to the increased expenses associated with the street closure. The MOU would assign MSBIA with the responsibility for obtaining all appropriate permits, as well as organizing and managing the event. The City would be responsible for providing oversight and coordination of the City’s permitting process, access to the street banner on Main Street, coordination of the City’s social media promotion of the event, fee waivers, fee reductions, and $23,500 in direct financial assistance to support the event. MSBIA would be responsible for contracting with an event promoter, musical acts, securing the event space on private property, contracting with vendors and sponsors, and managing the event expenses, which are estimated at $71,500.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Funds in the amount of $23,500 to support the event are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the City Council and Housing and Economic Development Departments at accounts 01201.579002 ($22,000) and 012681.522340 ($1,500), respectively. The indirect costs associated with the event, including fee waivers, fee reductions, and in-kind staff time, are funded from the various City department budgets, including Housing and Economic Development, Community and Cultural Services, Police, and Fire.']}
{'Title': 'Contract Approval for Design Services for 4th Street Pedestrian and Bicycle Improvements Phase II', 'Department': 'Mobility (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP #142 to Cannon Corporation, a California based company, to provide design services for the 4th Street Pedestrian and Bicycle Improvements Phase II Project.Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Cannon Corporation in an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 10% contingency) for an initial two-year term and a one-year renewal option.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City’s Downtown Community Plan emphasizes the need to adequately serve riders who will benefit from direct, clear, and improved routes to and from the Expo terminus station at 4th Street and Colorado Avenue. The 4th Street Pedestrian and Bicycle Improvements Project is a phased, grant-funded implementation effort for walking and biking enhancements on 4th Street between Broadway and Olympic Drive. Phase I improved the east side of 4th Street between Broadway and Colorado Avenue, and was completed in June 2017. Phase II extends Phase I improvements from Colorado Avenue to Olympic Drive including the Caltrans bridge structure over the I-10 Freeway. Staff recommends Cannon Corporation (Cannon), a planning and engineering consultant, to provide the design services for the 4th Street Phase II Project in an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 10% contingency). Staff anticipates up to 12 months for the design phase of the project with public outreach beginning fall 2018 and construction beginning fall 2019.', 'Background', 'The 4th Street Pedestrian and Bicycle Improvements Project is being developed as part of an overall phased implementation effort for enhanced north-south connections to the Expo terminus station that complements the Colorado Esplanade east-west connections, completed in June 2016. The 4th Street Phase I Project was completed in June 2017, providing an improved connection north of the station between Colorado Avenue and Broadway. Phase I improvements included new pedestrian scale lighting, new trees and grates, and pavement etching along the east side of the roadway. Sharrow lane markings were also added between Broadway and Olympic Drive.', 'Phases I and II are funded through a combination of Active Transportation Program (ATP) state grant funds and local matching funds. The purpose of ATP is to encourage increased use of active modes of transportation, such as walking and biking. On January 26, 2016 (Attachment A), Council authorized the City Manager to accept $1,613,000 in ATP funding for the design and construction of Phase II improvements.', 'On June 19, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposal (RFP) for professional design services for the Project and one (1) proposal was received. Due to the bid amount exceeding the available budget and the consultant team’s limited experience with public streetscape within Caltrans ROW, Council approved the staff recommendation to reject the single proposal and re-advertise on September 12, 2017 (Attachment B). To engage prospective consulting firms and achieve a better result, staff implemented the following modifications to the RFP to be re-advertised:', '· Listing available budget for design services;', '· Refining scope of work to emphasize public streetscape, Caltrans ROW, and Caltrans bridge structure experience; and', '· Increasing the duration of the bid posting from 3 weeks to 1 month.', 'Discussion', 'The opening of the Downtown Santa Monica Expo terminus station at 4th Street and Colorado Avenue is increasing the number of people walking in the Downtown and Civic Center. In recognition of this catalyst transit investment and the opportunities for improved mobility, the City’s Downtown Community Plan calls for direct, clear, and improved walking and biking routes to and from the station.', 'Improved station connections on 4th Street are being implemented in grant-funded phases, with Phase 1 completed in June 2017. This Phase II Project (Project) extends improvements south of the station between Colorado Avenue and Olympic Drive including the Caltrans bridge structure over the freeway. The Project will develop a final design that integrates with the existing improvements on the 4th Street Phase I and Colorado Esplanade projects. By doing so, a pedestrian-oriented connection is created in every direction, helping people to interpret their surroundings and orient themselves to final destinations. Improvements include:', '· Pedestrian-oriented lighting to enhance visibility, increase safety, and accommodate increased pedestrian volumes.', '· Shade trees (Gingko biloba) to improve pedestrian comfort and Date Palm trees (Phoenix dactylifera) to reinforce wayfinding.', '· Enhanced freeway bridge guardrail and/or fencing to buffer pedestrians from freeway noise and improve pedestrian comfort/sense of safety while preserving view corridors. Elements could include uplighting, planters, and lighting.', '· Tightened curb radii to reduce vehicle turning speeds and improve pedestrian safety.', '· Reconstructed accessible ramps (dual directional ramps preferred).', '· New north-leg crosswalk with accessible curb ramps, advance stop-bars, and bike boxes at the 4th Street/Olympic Drive intersection.', '· Widen sidewalk at the northeast corner of the 4th Street/Olympic Drive intersection to improve the pedestrian travel path and provide an enlarged pedestrian waiting area.', '· Enhanced crosswalk markings.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On October 18, 2017, the City issued Request for Proposals (RFP) #142 to obtain design services for the 4th Street Phase II Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 113 vendors downloaded the RFP request and one (1) proposal from Cannon Corporation (Cannon) was received on November 20, 2017. Based on the combined distribution of the original RFP advertised in July and the modified RFP re-advertised in October, staff is satisfied that advertising the RFP a third time would not necessarily attract additional responses. Following a review of submittal requirements, Cannon’s proposal was accepted and evaluated based on the criteria outlined in the RFP, which included project understanding, relevant experience, quality of staff, familiarity with state and federal procedures, and demonstrated technical project success. On December 14, 2017, the Cannon consultant team was interviewed by project staff from Planning and Community Development and Public Works.', 'On December 15, 2017, following a comprehensive review of Cannon’s proposal and interview with the consultant team, the evaluation team selected Cannon to provide the design services for the Project based on its team composition and proven experience in designing and advancing public streetscape enhancements, particularly where Caltrans bridge structures are involved; project approach and understanding; and commitment to deliver the project to the City on schedule and within budget. Based on Section 2.24.073 of the Municipal Code and these criteria, Cannon is recommended as the sole and best qualified firm.', 'For state and/or federal funded consultant contracts greater than $150,000, Caltrans requires submittal and approval of their Local Assistance Procedures Manual Exhibit 10-C form prior to contract award. Exhibit 10-C identifies critical elements of the consultant procurement process to ensure local agency compliance with state and/or federal consultant procurement requirements. Staff received Caltrans Exhibit 10-C approval on April 26, 2018.', 'Next Steps', 'Cannon would develop and deliver a City approved, community supported, and technically vetted final design and construction documents. Due to the grant funding component of this Project and required Caltrans involvement, staff anticipates 9-12 months for the design phase of the project depending on Caltrans coordination, with public outreach beginning fall 2018 and construction beginning fall 2019.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The professional services agreement to be awarded to Cannon for the 4th Street Phase II Project is for an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 10% contingency) for an initial two-year term and a one-year renewal option. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:', 'Account   _FY 17/18', 'C209097.589300 $252,000', 'C019097.589000  $63,000', 'Total   $315,000']}
{'Title': 'Professional Service Agreement and Modification to Maintenance Agreement for Selectron Technologies IVR/IWR system', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Selectron Technologies, an Oregon-based company, for professional services to upgrade the City’s Building Inspection Scheduling System and Integrated Voice and Web Response systems. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (d), as competition does not exist because Selectron Technologies is the only vendor qualified to provide support for its proprietary software.  The total contract amount would not exceed $25,000. Future year funding would be contingent on Council budget approval.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to agreement No. 9745 (CCS) in the amount of $162,845 with Selectron Technologies, an Oregon-based company, for software maintenance and support of services over a period of five years. This would result in a ten-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $251,905, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City strives to offer outstanding customer service and uses the Selectron Technologies Integrated Voice Response (IVR) and Integrated Web Response (IWR) systems to enable the public to schedule building and safety inspections via phone or online. The system is integrated with the City’s permitting system, Accela Automation, and shares important inspection data between the two systems without requiring redundant manual data entry. Some of the system components are outdated and fail to function properly.  A system upgrade is required.  Along with upgrade services, staff also seeks approval to extend the software maintenance and support services to continue to receive software updates and technical support.  At this time, staff recommends executing a professional service agreement with Selectron Technologies (Selectron) for a one-time system upgrade in an amount not to exceed $25,000 and to extend the software maintenance and support agreement for an additional five years in an amount not to exceed $162,845, for a combined total not to exceed $187,845. This would result in total cost not to exceed $276,905 over a ten-year period.', 'Background', 'On October 14, 1997 (Attachment A), following a solicitation process, Council approved the purchase of the IVR system with Selectron. In 2006, the City upgraded the Selectron software, including IWR. On June 11, 2013 (Attachment B), Council approved a sole source agreement with Selectron in the amount of $89,060 to cover software maintenance and support for an additional five years, extending the term to June 30, 2018.', 'Discussion', 'Recently, integration between Accela Automation and Selectron has failed to function properly due to the installed software version, which is outdated. This issue has resulted in an increasing number of complaints from the public, as well as from City staff who utilize the software and assist the public in resolving issues. Currently, customers receive an outbound call from the IVR system to notify them of the inspector’s estimated arrival time, as well as updates on inspections. Sometimes, these outbound calls are cut-off due to the outdated software. As a result, customers could miss their inspection window and feel negative about their service experience. Many industries now utilize text messaging technology for notification purposes. Having the ability to use text messaging instead of outbound calls is vital to improving customer service. Upgrading the system would resolve all functionality issues, as well as enable new features and system functionality, which would improve overall user experience.', 'Additionally, the current software maintenance and support agreement expires in June 2018. It is critical that the City extend the maintenance and support services to ensure business continuity and to ensure that the City continues to receive system updates and product support.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'Originally purchased in 1998 and upgraded in 2006, the software licenses purchased by the City for the Selectron IVR and IWR systems are perpetual and require no renewal.', 'In 2018, staff began to review other IVR and IWR systems. Staff researched the market and found the only other competitive IVR and IWR system that would integrate with the City’s Land Based Management System, Accela Automation, and determined that the system would cost twice as much as the Selectron system. The City has made significant investments in capital and dedicated considerable time in training staff and the public to use the Selectron system.  In addition, the additional cost to implement a new system at this time would not be cost efficient.', 'The advanced technology and features that Selectron has developed for its IVR and IWR systems are only supported and can only be maintained by Selectron. Therefore, staff recommends that the award for the upgrade services be approved as an exception to the competitive bidding process, as specified in SMMC 2.24.080 (d), as Selectron is the only vendor qualified to provide support and enhancements of its proprietary software.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The professional services agreement and modification to be awarded to Selectron is for an amount not to exceed $187,845.  Funds in the amount of $54,445 for the upgrade services and year 1 software maintenance and support are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department at account 01321.533580.  Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Second Modification to WaterSmart Professional Services Agreement for continued development, licensing and maintenance of WaterSmart Software', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to Professional Service Agreement #9878 in the amount of $104,500 with WaterSmart Software, Inc. (WSI), a California-based company, for the continued development, licensing and maintenance of WaterSmart, a web-based customer engagement and data analytics software platform to track, compare and provide water use analysis and efficiency reports. This will result in a six-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed of $294,500, with future funding contingent upon Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In the face of the recent severe drought and future limitations on imported water availability, Santa Monica has set an ambitious goal of water self-sufficiency by 2020. To help meet the goal of reducing water demand, WaterSmart is a web-based customer engagement and data analytics software platform for customers and staff to track, compare, analyze, and communicate on water use. Staff extensively utilizes WaterSmart to communicate with customers and promote the City’s water conservation programs. WaterSmart is also used in the City’s Automated Metering Infrastructure (AMI) Pilot Program to analyze real-time water consumption data, quickly detect leaks, and send alerts. Staff requests a second modification to the agreement with WaterSmart Software, Inc. in the amount of $104,500, for a new total amount not to exceed $294,500 over a six-year period, and to extend the contract by two years with a new expiration date of June 30, 2020.', 'Background', 'Council approved the Sustainable Water Master Plan (SWMP), which includes a list of water conservation programs and projects to help the City meet its water self-sufficiency goal by 2020. This list includes the purchase of WaterSmart. Following a competitive request for proposals (RFP) process, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional service agreement with WaterSmart Software, Inc. for the licensing, development and maintenance of WaterSmart for a total amount not to exceed $190,000 over a four-year period on February 25, 2014 (Attachment A). Staff subsequently executed a first modification to this agreement to extend the contract expiration to June 30, 2018.', 'Discussion', 'WaterSmart provides a user-friendly dashboard for water customers and staff to track and compare water usage.', 'Over 6,000 single-family water customers use the system to supplement their bimonthly utility bill with:', '· Easy-to-understand graphs and charts to show water customers their usage compared to their Water Use Allowance', '· Customized suggestions to conserve water', '· Comparisons of their water use to similar size homes in the City', '· High-usage alerts and tools to communicate with staff', 'A May 2017 survey of the City’s single-family water customers conducted by WaterSmart Software, Inc. showed 70% of respondents were more water efficient as a result of the WaterSmart reports and that satisfaction with City water services increased from 65% to 73%.', 'The system allows water staff to:', '· View and analyze consumption for all water accounts citywide. Data can be viewed and analyzed by customer class, consumption, geography, and individual account.', '· Identify potential leaks and generate leak reports used by staff to notify customers', '· Notify customers via text and voice alerts to potential leaks', '· Engage customers on ongoing water-saving measures such as conservation programs and rebates through email and group messaging', 'In addition, WaterSmart is a critical tool used to track water usage and evaluate savings for the Advanced Metering Infrastructure (AMI) Pilot Program. The initial pilot phase of the program replaced approximately 700, or 4%, of the City’s meters with new, AMI-enabled units. The first phase of the pilot program concluded in March 2018 and successfully demonstrated the technical feasibility and reliability of AMI within the City. Now staff are using WaterSmart to assess water usage savings, view and analyze AMI data, immediately identify leaks and high usage patterns, and send customer alerts and notifications. Continued access to WaterSmart would allow data collection to include all seasonal fluctuations in water use and would provide time for staff to complete an analysis of the AMI water savings by the end of FY 2018-19.', 'A second modification to the agreement with WaterSmart Software, Inc. through June 30, 2020, would allow staff to continue using the software for water conservation promotion, finalize a study to accurately determine water conservation from WaterSmart and conduct a full water savings analysis of the AMI Pilot Project.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to WaterSmart Software, Inc. is $104,500 for an amended contract total not to exceed $294,500. Funds in the amount of $36,377 are included in the Proposed FY 2018-19 Capital Improvement Program budget. Funds in the amount of $15,873 are included and in the Proposed FY 2018-19 operating budget in the Public Works Department. The contract will be charged to the following accounts:', 'C250388.589000 $36,377', '25671.533580  $15,873', 'TOTAL   $52,250 (covering the first year of the two year extension totaling $104,500)', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Fifth Modification to  Agreement 9210 (CCS) with Conduent State & Local Solutions, Inc. to add the Installment Payment Plans Software Module to Process Payment Plans for Parking Citations', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fifth modification to agreement #9210 (CCS) in an estimated amount of $61,250 with Conduent State & Local Solutions, Inc., a New Jersey-based company, to add the Installment Payment Plans software module to process payment plans for parking citations in compliance with Assembly Bill 503. The nine-year term of the contract will remain unchanged. This will result in a nine-year amended agreement with a new estimated total amount of $14,561,250, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City currently contracts with Conduent State & Local Solutions, Inc. (Conduent) for parking citation processing, parking permit fulfillment, and payment processing services. On October 13, 2017, the State of California approved Assembly Bill No. 503 (AB 503), which mandates that cities provide payment plans for any unpaid parking citations for qualified indigent individuals who request it. Staff recommends a fifth modification to agreement #9210 with Conduent to add the Installment Payment Plans (IPP) software module to process payment plans in compliance with AB 503. The amended contract would be for an estimated additional amount of $61,250 for the remainder of the contract, for an estimated amended total of $14,561,250. The nine-year term of the contract would remain unchanged.', 'Background', 'On November 23, 2009, the three Westside cities of Santa Monica, West Hollywood, and Beverly Hills jointly issued a RFP for citation processing, handheld devices, license plate readers, and permit processing systems. A selection committee of representatives from all three cities reviewed the proposals and unanimously selected Xerox (then ACS State & Local Solutions, Inc.) as the best bidder based on price, range of products and services offered, ability to address the Westside cities’ issues, and commitment to implement an integrated parking solution.', 'On May 11, 2010 (Attachment A), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute agreement #9210 (CCS) with ACS State & Local Solutions, Inc. in an estimated amount of $1,400,000 per year for a period of five years, with two additional two-year renewal options, to provide parking citation processing, parking permit fulfillment, and payment processing services. In April 2012 agreement #9210 (CCS) was assigned to Xerox following the name change as a result of ACS State & Local Solutions, Inc. being acquired by Xerox. Xerox later separated its parking operations under Conduent. The City’s agreement to maintain the software is now with Conduent.', 'The most recent contract modification was approved by Council on May 9, 2017 (Attachment B) to increase the contract amount by an estimated $1.9 million (including a 10% contingency) and extend the contract term to June 30, 2018, with one remaining one-year renewal option. This modification resulted in a nine-year amended agreement with an estimated agreement amount of $14.5 million, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. As stipulated in the fourth modification, the City is currently in the process of extending the contract for an additional one-year term through June 30, 2019.', 'Discussion', 'On October 13, 2017, the State of California approved AB 503 which mandates that cities offer payment plans for unpaid parking citation(s) to all qualified indigent individuals who request it. The City has not offered payment plans for parking citations in the past, and the current contract with the company providing parking citation processing services (Conduent) does not include an IPP software module or pricing information. The implementation deadline for AB 503 is July 1, 2018. To aid in this implementation, staff recommends acquiring Conduent’s IPP software module.', 'In concert with AB 503 implementation, staff also recommends offering payment plans for parking citations to all people issued citations. This option has been requested many times in the past and would enhance customer service levels by offering a new payment option and reducing the number of Department of Motor Vehicles registration holds on cited vehicles. In addition, this service could potentially reduce the City’s parking citation collections costs as it could lead to fewer delinquent citations.', 'Staff estimates the cost to provide these services will be approximately $61,250.', 'Staff examined whether to only offer payment plans to indigent people as required by AB 503 or to offer the option to all citation recipients. Staff recommends offering the option to everyone because it provides operational efficiency and reduces the average cost per payment plan. Since the cost of the service would be an estimated amount of $61,250 regardless of the number of participants, offering this option to the general public would lower the average cost per payment plan and enhance the level of customer service.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Since the City has not offered payment plans to the public in the past, no historical data is available. The contract modification to be awarded to Conduent State & Local Solutions, Inc. is for an estimated agreement amount of $61,250. Funds for the one-time payment are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Finance Department account number S010130.589000 (expenditure control savings) for the initial setup costs and account number 012241.555010 (Contractual Services) for ongoing costs (mailing expenses). Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award RFP #132 to RSI Security to provide Payment Card Industry Audit and Compliance Services', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #132 to RSI Security, a San Diego based company, to provide Payment Card Industry (PCI) audit and compliance services.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with RSI Security for five years in an estimated total amount of $346,000 (including a 10% contingency), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'All merchants that accept credit cards for payments must comply with the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) compliance requirements. The City has been categorized as a Level 1 merchant under the PCI industry standards and must conduct annual security assessments. In order to continue to accept credit/debit card payments and ensure no fines are assessed for noncompliance, the City must receive a Report of Certification from a PCI Council approved vendor. Staff recommends RSI Security (RSI) to conduct these audits and provide necessary certifications under a five-year contract in an estimated amount of $346,000 (including 10% contingency).', 'Discussion', 'The City maintains multiple websites and currently allows credit card payments for various services throughout the City. Credit card payments are accepted over the internet, via Point of Sale (POS) devices, over the phone, and with card swipe devices through a multitude of systems and vendors.  The City processed 9.34 million transactions during fiscal year 2016-17.  With the increased use of credit cards and growing number of services available to pay by debit or credit card, the City recently was reclassified to a Level 1 merchant (defined as merchants that process over 6 million transactions per year), requiring additional security and compliance monitoring.', 'PCI Compliance Requirements', 'PCI DSS are a set of security standards designed to ensure all companies that accept, process, store, or transmit credit card information maintain a secure environment. These are universally accepted standards that help protect the safety of customer data. PCI DSS set the operational and technical requirements for both organizations accepting or processing payment transactions and the software developers and manufacturers of the applications and devices used in those transactions. Based on the standards, all merchants will fall into one of the four merchant levels that have been established and are based on the annual volume of transactions. The validation requirements for Level 1 merchants are as follows:', '1) Annual Report on Compliance (“ROC”) by Qualified Security Assessor (“QSA”) – also commonly known as a Level 1 onsite assessment – or internal auditor if signed by officer of the company.', '2) Quarterly network scan by Approved Scan Vendor (“ASV”).', '3) Attestation of Compliance Form (annual).', '4) Security training and consulting services.', '5) Development and review of security policies and procedures.', '6) Additional Consulting, as needed.', 'Santa Monica and PCI Compliance', 'To ensure that the City has taken the safety measures to minimize any security risk, PCI audit and compliance services are required.', 'The City currently does not have a consultant that provides PCI audit and compliance services. However, with the expansion of online payment options, the credit/debit card transactions are an integral part of today’s payment channels. Due to the volume of credit card transactions, PCI audit and compliance services are needed to manage payment account security throughout the transaction process. Newly reclassified to a Level 1 merchant, this will be the first time the City undergoes PCI DSS compliance certification.', 'The City currently contracts with TransFirst Health and Government Solutions, LLC, (Transfirst), American Express Travel Related Services, ActiveNet, and PayPal for merchant processing services. The City is in the process of transferring parking related meter transactions from Transfirst to IPS Group, Inc. to reduce processing costs and potentially change the merchant level categorization from Level 1 to Level 2, which would reduce the PCI compliance requirements. PCI DSS sets the security standards and requirements for credit card merchants.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On May 19, 2017, the City published a Request for Proposals (RFP #132) for PCI audit and compliance services. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding website and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fifty-four vendors downloaded the RFP. Proposals were received from the following five firms:', '· Trustwave', '· Coalfire Sytems, Inc.', '· RSI Security', '· CampusGuard', '· Online Business Systems', 'An evaluation panel composed of representatives from the Finance, Planning and Community Development, and Information Systems departments reviewed and ranked the proposals using the criteria set out in the RFP. The panel short-listed three firms to participate in an interview process: Trustwave; Coalfire Systems, Inc.; and RSI Security. Based on the selection criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends RSI as the best qualified firm to provide PCI audit and compliance services for a five-year period in an estimated amount of $346,000. RSI was selected based on the firm’s ability to assist with quality control measures to minimize risk, experienced and qualified staff, technology solutions, ability to provide required services and availability of optional services and/or additional services, creative solutions that can reduce the cost of services while improving operational efficiencies and effectiveness, pricing, and compliance with the City scope of work. RSI would provide audit, security, and compliance solutions to establish, assess and validate Information Technology (IT) compliance.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Fees for PCI audit and compliance services are based on the scope of the work determined by the amount of credit card transactions performed annually. Based on the current number of transactions, staff estimates cost of services over the five-year life of the contract to be $346,000 including a 10% contingency ($69,200 per year). Funds for the initial assessment and the first year of funding for on-going costs are available in the FY 2017-19 Biennial budget in account number S010130.589000 (expenditure control savings). Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award Agreements for Construction Management Services and Deputy and Material Testing Inspection Services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #2235 to Cumming Corporation, a California-based company, to provide construction management services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project; 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Cumming Corporation, in an amount not to exceed $636,350 (including a 10% contingency) over a three-year period; 3. Award RFP #2235 to Koury Engineering, a California-based company, to provide deputy and material testing inspection services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project; and 4. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Koury Engineering, in an amount not to exceed $262,364 (including a 20% contingency) over a three-year period.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project will build a new fire station located at 1337-45 7th Street to replace the existing Fire Station No. 1 at 1444 7th Street. Bernards Bros, Inc. will construct Fire Station No. 1. In preparation for the construction project, staff recommends that Council approve two agreements to provide 1) construction management services to Cumming Corporation and 2) deputy and material testing inspection services to Koury Engineering. Both vendors would provide services to assist the City in monitoring the work of the contractor and to ensure that the special inspection requirements for the project are met. Staff anticipates the project will be completed in early 2020.  The agreements recommended by staff to be awarded are within budget limits and do not add costs to the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project.', 'Discussion', 'As part of approving the second-year budget for the City’s FY 2016-18 Biennial Capital Budget, Council appropriated $41.6 million to the Fire Station No. 1 Project. This budget included funding for project costs including construction, construction management, deputy and material testing inspection services, technology infrastructure, furniture and equipment, and unforeseen conditions (site hazardous material).', 'Construction Management and deputy and materials testing inspection services are industry best practices in large scale construction projects, especially those with unique safety and technology requirements such as Fire Station 1. Deputy inspection services are those performed by a third-party done on behalf of the client to ensure compliance with specifications. Subsequent to awarding the construction contract to Bernards Bros, staff solicited two consultant services required and budgeted for this major project: 1) construction management services and 2) deputy and material testing inspection services.', 'Construction management services are required to assist staff with project planning, cost management, quality management, contract administration, and safety management. The consultant providing construction management services would be located at the project construction site for the duration of the project. Staff recommends Cumming Corporation to provide construction management services at a cost not to exceed $636,350.', 'As noted, deputy and material testing inspection services are performed by a third-party vendor (not the contractor) to ensure long-lasting and high quality construction materials are used during the construction phase. This vendor monitors construction activities to ensure proper installation practices are followed throughout the duration of the construction project. The vendor uses the design specifications for structural steel, masonry, concrete, welding, and bolted components, along with City standards, specifications, and applicable building codes, to compare and test against the real-time constructed elements. Staff recommends Koury Engineering to provide deputy and material testing inspection services at a cost not to exceed $262,364.', 'The Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project is expected to be complete in early 2020.', 'Consultant Selection – Construction Management Services', 'On October 10, 2017, the City issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQ) #2507 to provide on-call construction management services for two categories of projects: various building and park construction projects. The RFQ was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fifty-one vendors downloaded the RFQ. Thirteen firms responded. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Staff selected 10 firms as pre-qualified in each category and eligible to compete in future bids over a three-year period; the pre-qualified list will expire on November 28, 2020.', 'On February 6, 2018, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) #2235 to provide construction management services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project. The RFP was sent to the 10 pre-qualified vendors to provide on-call construction management services. The following nine firms responded.', '· Cumming Corporation', '· GKK Works', '· Griffin Structures, Incorporated', '· KDG Construction Consulting', '· Kitchell', '· PMCS', '· PSOMAS', '· Simplus', '· Simpson & Simpson', 'Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: technical competence, staffing capability, project approach and planning, past performance, dispute resolution, quality control, cost control, customer service, and cost of services. Staff then shortlisted three firms and on February 23, 2018 conducted interviews. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Cumming Corporation, the lowest bidder, as the best qualified firm to provide construction management services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project.', 'Cumming Corporation’s team has extensive knowledge and experience working on numerous municipal projects to construct new fire stations. Cumming Corporation has successfully managed projects that included essential services buildings, LEED projects, large excavations, and complex projects in dense urban settings. Their proposed team would provide on-site project management planning, which involves planning the entire project and documentation, cost management to ensure the expenses of the project are efficiently managed and to account for any unexpected issues or difficulties, quality management to ensure the contractor completes the project at a high-quality standard, contract administration to ensure the needs of the City are being satisfied, and safety management to ensure that work meets all legal requirements and building regulations. Cumming Corporation would also provide in-house project schedule analysis and cost estimating resources to augment the on-site construction manager on an as-needed basis.', 'Vendor Selection – Deputy and Material Testing Inspection Services', 'On October 10, 2017, the City issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQ) #2327 to provide on-call deputy and material testing inspection services for various construction projects. The RFQ was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirty-eight vendors downloaded the RFQ. Twelve firms responded. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Staff selected 11 firms as pre-qualified and eligible to compete in future bids over a three-year period; the pre-qualified list will expire on November 14, 2020.', 'On February 12, 2018, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) #2235 to provide deputy and material testing inspection services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project. The RFP was sent to the 11 pre-qualified vendors to provide on-call geotechnical, deputy and material testing inspection services. The following seven firms responded:', '· AECOM', '· California Testing & Inspections', '· Koury Engineering', '· MTG', '· Ninyo & Moore', '· United-Heider', '· Willdan Geotechnical', 'Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: quality of proposal, competitive pricing, experience, references, and qualifications of the proposed project inspection team. Koury Engineering’s proposal included wide-ranging experience and demonstrated the competency, of their team of registered Civil and Geotechnical Engineers and numerous inspectors holding multiple certifications. Koury Engineering’s proposal also included their reputable corporate structure and excellent references on prior completion of similar projects. The proposed inspection team would include one project manager to provide general work plan oversight; one deputy inspector to monitor and inspect all structural concrete, masonry, steel, welding, and bolted elements; one field technician to assist the deputy inspector in proving field testing services; and one laboratory technician for elements requiring laboratory testing. The deputy inspector would join the project full-time from mid-2018 to early-2020, while the other project team members would be on the project as-needed. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Koury Engineering as the best qualified firm to provide deputy and material testing inspection services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to Cumming Corporation is for an amount not to exceed $636,350. Funds are available in the FY 2017-2018 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C014063.589000.', 'The agreement to be awarded to Koury Engineering is for an amount not to exceed $262,364. Funds are available in the FY 2017-2018 Capital Improvement Program Budget in account C014063.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Resolution to Rectify a Posting Error Related to Judicial Council Parking Rate Extension Included in the Recently Adopted Parking Rates Resolution', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution (Attachment A) to correct an error in the parking rates resolution establishing transient parking rates and permit parking fees for various City parking facilities adopted by Council on April 24, 2018.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'This report corrects an error in the parking rates resolution that was approved by Council on April 24, 2018. The April 24, 2018 staff report recommended, as part of the overall parking rates resolution, an extension to the California Judicial Council’s bulk parking fee for one more year to June 30, 2019. The correction will not impact the implementation of the updated parking policies on July 1, 2018.', 'Discussion', 'On April 24, 2018 Council adopted a resolution (Attachment B) establishing new parking rates for off-street parking. The staff report included the following section:', 'Judicial Council Parking', 'The fee resolution also extends the bulk parking fee for the California Judicial Council fortwelve months from July 2018 to June 2019 in anticipation of the multipurpose sports field, with a possible request for a six month extension if construction demands allow.The Council has made progress in promoting alternative options for its employees, customers, and jurors; however, the Council requires additional time to address budget impacts and to develop programs to address its minimum parking needs, particularly for members of the public who utilize the court’s services.', 'City staff discovered that the resolution posted with the staff report did not include the updated and correct end date of June 30, 2019 for the California Judicial Council due to an error with the version of the resolution posted, and instead contained the original deadline of June 30, 2018. The proposed resolution provides the corrected resolution extending the bulk parking fee to June 30, 2019. The resolution contains no changes, only this one correction.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Second Reading and Adoption of Ordinance Amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Sections 3.04.035 and 3.16.170 Regulating Parking Meter Zones, Meter Rates, Parking Fees, Permit Fees and Hours of Operation', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance amending sections 3.04.035 and 3.16.170 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'At its meeting of April 24, 2018, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Sections 3.04.035 and 3.16.170 regulating parking meter zones, meter rates, parking fees, permit fees and hours of operation.', 'The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption.']}
{'Title': 'Introduction and First Reading of an Ordinance Making Clerical Clarifications To Tenant Protection Provisions In The Santa Monica Municipal Code and Adding Section 4.27.050 Limiting No-Fault Evictions Against Students and Educators During the School Year', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached proposed ordinance providing a substantive defense to any no-fault eviction of an educator or a family with a school-age child during the school year and making certain clerical clarifications to the Santa Monica Municipal Code.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City of Santa Monica is committed to maintaining an inclusive and diverse community, as well as a community where all children can learn and thrive. Studies have shown that evictions are on the rise, and that evictions of students in the middle of the school year disrupt relationships that are important to children, interfere with the learning process, and place an administrative burden on schools. The proposed ordinance would reduce harmful effects of evictions and promote continuity in education by preventing no-fault evictions of families with children and educators during the school year.  The proposed ordinance also makes clerical changes to Article 4 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code by moving certain existing tenant protection provisions in Article 4 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code to a new chapter titled Tenant Protection. These clerical changes are intended to promote transparency and ease access to the law.', 'Background', 'On February 27, 2018, the City Council directed staff to prepare an ordinance to limit no-fault evictions against students and educators during the school year. The request was made in the context of a continuing affordable housing crisis in the City, concern for housing-related disruptions to children’s education, and guidance from a recent U.S. Court of Appeal decision affirming a similar law in San Francisco. As detailed below, no-fault evictions occur when tenants are evicted based on no fault of their own but due to a landlord’s decision to, for example, occupy the property or exit the rental market.', 'Discussion', 'No-fault evictions occur year-round, but those occurring for families during the school year are of particular concern due to the adverse effect on children. Studies demonstrate that moving or changing schools in the middle of the school year can be harmful for children. See, for example, “Moving Matters: The Causal Effect of Moving Schools on Student Performance” (2017) The MIT Press, Vol. 12, Issue 4, p. 419-446 (citing twenty-seven previous studies and articles); Veronique Dupere’s “School Mobility and school-age children’s social adjustment”,Developmental Psychology 51(2): 197-210 (2015).', "Mid-year moves are more likely to disrupt children's peer networks and interfere with the learning process; and school year mobility is also linked to decreased proficiency rates on standardized test performances.", 'The impact of no-fault evictions during the school year on school staff, especially teachers, also raises serious concern. School staff tend to be especially vulnerable to displacement due to salary limitations that can make it difficult to quickly or easily locate replacement housing. Moreover, the eviction of school staff during the school year can cause significant harm to a child’s education. Children need strong mentoring relationships to succeed and often turn to school staff, particularly when they cannot find stability in their homes or in their communities. Academic performance suffers when teachers and other significant staff leave or are repeatedly absent during the school year. Thus, mid-year evictions of teachers and staff disrupt relationships that are important to children, interfere with the learning process, and burden our schools.', "The proposed ordinance draws on and is based upon significant work done by the City and County of San Francisco to study the effects of and take steps to mitigate the harm of school-year evictions of children and educators. In April 2016, following extensive study and findings, San Francisco adopted Ordinance No. 55-16 to create a substantive defense to no-fault evictions of students and educators. On February 14, 2018, the California Court of Appeal upheld that Ordinance in a published opinion; on April 25, 2018, the California Supreme Court declined to review this decision. See San Francisco Apartment Association et al. v City and County of San Francisco (2018) 20 Cal. App. 5th 510. See also, Birkenfeld v. City of Berkeley (1976) 17 Cal.3d 129, 149 (city's exercise of the police power creating a substantive eviction defense does not conflict with the state's unlawful detainer statutory scheme).", 'The proposed ordinance is modeled after Ordinance No. 55-16 and based on similar and many of the same findings. It would create a new substantive defense to the following categories of no-fault evictions:', '(1) Owner-occupancy evictions pursuant to Charter Sections 1806(a)(8) and 2304(a)(8);', '(2) Evictions pursuant to properly obtained demolition and removal permits under Charter Section 1806(a)(9) and 2304(a)(9); and', '(3) Ellis Act removals of units from the rental market pursuant to Charter Section 1806(a)(10).', 'The defense would be available in the event of a no-fault eviction when:', '(a) a child under the age of 18 or any educator resides in the unit,', '(b) the child or educator is a tenant in the unit or has a custodial or family relationship with a tenant in the unit,', '(c) the tenant has resided in the unit for 12 months or more, and', '(d) the effective date of the notice of termination of tenancy falls during the school year.', 'The proposed ordinance defines “educators” to include any person who works in Santa Monica at a state-licensed child care center, state-licensed family day care, and/or any public, private, or parochial institution that provides educational instruction for students in any or all of the grades from kindergarten through twelfth grade. The school year is defined based on the Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District school year.', 'The City of Santa Monica has a long history of dedicating public resources to benefit students and to stabilize housing for families. The City Attorney’s Office, Consumer Protection Division, enforces tenant harassment and antidiscrimination laws and also provides community education related to tenants’ and consumers’ rights. These efforts, and the proposed ordinance, support the City’s goals, articulated in its Strategic Goals and Framework, of maintaining an inclusive and diverse community, helping Santa Monica residents stay in their homes and build community, and strengthening youth connectedness and emotional health.', 'Should Council adopt the proposed ordinance, the Consumer Protection Division would initiate education efforts to inform families, educators, tenants, landlords, and legal aid providers about the availability of this defense. The affirmative defense would be cited by tenants to avoid initiation of eviction during the school year and raised by tenants on a case-by-case basis in unlawful detainer cases.', 'Finally, the proposed ordinance makes clerical changes to the Santa Monica Municipal Code by moving certain existing tenant protection provisions in Article 4 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code to a new chapter titled Tenant Protection. The proposed ordinance renumbers these provisions within the SMMC but makes no substantive changes or amendments to the provisions. The clerical changes are intended to promote transparency of the law and ensure that interested community members are able to find relevant provisions with ease.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Introduction and First Reading of an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 10.08.560 (Municipal Pier—Vehicle Weight Restrictions) authorizing the City Engineer to set updated vehicle weight limitations for Municipal Pier and Newcomb Pier', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Introduce for first reading the attached ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 10.08.560 (Municipal Pier—Vehicle Weight Restrictions) authorizing the City Engineer to set updated vehicle weight limitations for the Municipal Pier and Newcomb Pier.2. Conduct a public hearing, on behalf of Los Angeles County and at the County’s request, to determine the appropriate load limitation for the Pier Bridge.3. Direct staff to seek authorization from the County of Los Angeles to set the Pier Bridge load limit.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Following a recent inspection, the Los Angeles County Department of Public Works (LACDPW) recommended posting a weight limit sign for the Pier Bridge. Currently, weight limit signs are posted only for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and Newcomb Pier, both of which are entirely under the City’s jurisdiction. Upon receiving this recommendation, staff conducted a review and developed revised weight limits for the piers and the bridge. Staff recommends amending local law to authorize the City Engineer to set updated vehicle weight limits based on study and assessment. Based on the City Engineer’s most recent study and assessment, staff recommends increasing the posted weight limit for the Santa Monica Pier to 15 tons and setting a weight limit of 3 tons for the Newcomb Pier. Staff further recommends that Council conduct a public hearing, on behalf of Los Angeles County and at the County’s request, to determine the weight limit for the Pier Bridge. At the conclusion of the hearing, staff would forward the City’s weight recommendation to the County and seek authorization from the County to set the bridge weight limit, as required by state law.', 'Background', 'On September 19, 2017, the LACDPW contacted the City requesting a copy of the load limit ordinance for the Pier Bridge. Staff clarified that load limits are not currently posted for the Pier Bridge structure. Load limits are posted only for the Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier to protect the pier structures from the wear and tear brought about by heavy vehicles. The signs are posted at both the top and bottom approaches to the Pier Bridge and, by inference, limited the loads for the Pier Bridge. The photo to the left shows the sign located at the top of the Pier Bridge. Notwithstanding the load limits posted for the Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier, the LACDPW noted that their structural analysis required a load limit to be posted for the Pier Bridge itself. In order to legally post a load limit for a bridge, the California Vehicle Code requires that a public hearing be held and an ordinance be adopted under the County’s direction.', 'Discussion', 'The LACDPW performed load rating calculations for the Pier Bridge, which indicated the safe load capacity of the structure to be:', '· 22 tons per truck', '· 22 tons per truck and semi-trailer combination', '· 30 tons per truck and full trailer combination', 'The LACDPW recommends that the bridge be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 22 tons. However, this exceeds the load capacities of the Municipal Pier (outlined in blue below in Figure 1) and the Newcomb Pier (outlined in orange below in Figure 1). The sole purpose of the Pier Bridge is to provide vehicle and pedestrian access to the Municipal and Newcomb Piers. There are no other adjoining structures or access points to the Pier Bridge. Despite the bridge’s 22-ton structural capacity as determined by LACDPW, it is the 15-ton structural capacity of the Municipal Pier that would dictate the operational weight limit for the Pier Bridge.', 'Vehicle Weight Restrictions', 'Traffic flows through the different sections of the piers, and the lowest rated section of each pier is the controlling limit for allowable vehicle weights. The Municipal and Newcomb Piers have had signs posted for maximum weights of 10 and 3 tons, respectively, for nearly a decade or longer. Staff researched as-built plans and records for past upgrade and maintenance projects for the Municipal Pier and concluded that the lowest rated section, a 200-foot-long concrete waffle structure at the west end, could support a 15-ton vehicle. The rest of the structure is rated for a 20-ton vehicle. Based on the controlling capacity of the waffle structure, staff recommends that the Municipal Pier and the adjoining Pier Bridge be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 15 tons.', 'The 2008 Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study by Moffatt & Nichol (Study) examined the Newcomb Pier and subdivided it into sections based on the varying substructure types and corresponding load limits. The Study further identified that the lowest rated section can support a 3-ton vehicle. Therefore, staff recommends the Newcomb Pier, where the pier deck parking lot is located, be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 3 tons.', 'The City has exclusive jurisdiction to regulate Pier weight limitations. Accordingly, the proposed amendment updates the previously codified weight limit for the Municipal Pier and codifies the weight limit for the Newcomb Pier.', 'Community Events', 'For many years, the Newcomb Pier has served as a venue for community events and will likely continue to accommodate events moving forward, as reflected in the Pier Corporation’s calendar (santamonicapier.org/events). A community event permit is required for these events. Many of these events require the use of vehicles that exceed the 3-ton weight limit during setup and takedown. To this point, heavy vehicle activity historically has been coordinated with harbor guards, who ensured heavy vehicles did not enter the weaker sections of the Newcomb Pier. Codifying the 3-ton weight limit would make it illegal for a vehicle exceeding 3-tons to enter the Newcomb Pier for any reason other than an emergency, subsequently precluding many community events. To continue accommodating community events, the proposed amendment includes an exemption for vehicles that are issued a permit, and a permit would be required for events that utilize vehicles heavier than 3 tons. Heavy vehicle activity would continue to be monitored by harbor guards.', 'Pier Bridge', 'Unlike the Piers, which are under the City’s exclusive jurisdiction, California Vehicle Code Section 35751(a) grants only Los Angeles County the authority to set weight limitations on the Pier Bridge. Consistent with Section 35751 and longstanding practice, the County has cooperated with Santa Monica and other cities within the County to set bridge load limits. Additionally, Section 35751 requires a public hearing be held before the Pier Bridge’s weight limit could be reduced beyond what the Vehicle Code otherwise requires. The County has requested that the City conduct this hearing on the County’s behalf. Upon conclusion of the hearing, staff would transmit the City’s weight recommendations to the County and work with the County to set the correct weight limit. Once that limit is set by the County, staff would return to the Council to codify the new limit.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. The removal of existing signs and installation of the new signs will be performed by Public Works staff within the existing operating budget.']}
{'Title': 'Receive Compensation and Staffing Review and Approve Implementation Plan Responding to Recommendations', 'Department': 'Finance Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Receive and consider the Compensation and Staffing Review completed by Moss Adams, LLP; 2. Provide feedback on the proposed Implementation Plan responding to Review recommendations; and3. Direct staff to proceed with the Implementation Plan, and provide Council with reports on the progress of implementation after six months and annually thereafter until implementation plan actions are deemed complete.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In response to community and broader concerns raised by media reports, the City of Santa Monica commissioned an independent compensation study to collect and analyze pay, benefits and workload data from comparable cities and, where appropriate, the private sector to identify opportunities for improvement of policies and practices related to City employee compensation, as well as analyze use of overtime by public safety staff. The report represents one of the most comprehensive local government analyses of compensation practices done in recent years in Southern California, comparing not only pay, benefits and public safety overtime usage, but benchmarking workload data and other factors among cities comparable to Santa Monica. The report documents that overall, Santa Monica’s pay and benefits are comparable to peer cities, albeit on the higher end of the scale. Also noted is the large scope and high level of City services. The report also identifies areas for improvement, many of which are already in progress. Implementation of these improvements will play a significant role in the City’s efforts to maintain fiscal sustainability as it faces future statewide threats from rising pension costs.', 'The Compensation and Staffing Review report (Attachment A) was conducted by the City’s internal auditor, Moss Adams, LLP, under the oversight of the Audit Subcommittee of the City Council, with advisory support from a limited-term, seven‑member ad hoc committee of residents, the Compensation Study Advisory Committee (CSAC). The report provides 13 observations and recommendations organized in the following categories: wage and benefits packages, drivers of compensation, and public safety overtime.', 'The report was informed by interviews of eleven peer cities, published data and surveys and interviews of staff and labor unions.', 'Background', 'On January 17, 2017, in response to concerns raised by a number of community groups related to news stories about City of Santa Monica staff compensation, and calls by these groups that an “independent” audit be conducted, the Audit Subcommittee discussed a proposed scope of work for a compensation audit to be completed by the independent firm that acts as the City’s Internal Auditor, Moss Adams, LLP.', "After initial discussions both in the Audit Subcommittee and among community members and the City Manager, staff returned to the Audit Subcommittee on April 20, 2017 with an amended and expanded scope of work, along with the recommendation to create an ad hoc advisory committee, composed of up to 7 community members. According to the resolution establishing this ad-hoc community committee would act “in an advisory capacity to the Audit Subcommittee in matters pertaining to critically reviewing and objectively considering the City's methodologies related to compensation.” The ad-hoc community committee was to join Subcommittee discussions specifically related to the scope, findings, and final report of the compensation review. At its May 9, 2017 meeting (Attachment B), Council directed the City Manager to seek applications from members of the public who would be interested in serving on the ad hoc committee, named the Compensation Study Advisory Committee (CSAC), and then make appointments.On August 23, the Audit Subcommittee, informed by its discussion with members of CSAC, approved the scope of work for the Compensation and Staffing Review. The Audit Subcommittee and CSAC reviewed data and an initial draft of the report, asked questions and discussed additional information that would be useful to incorporate into the report on November 21, 2017 and February 28, 2018. The final report was received and reviewed by the Audit Subcommittee at its meeting on April 17, 2018. Also received and filed at the April 17, 2018 meeting was an implementation plan proposing steps that staff could take to address report recommendations.", 'Discussion', 'The report provides observations and recommendations organized in the following categories: wage and benefits packages, drivers of compensation, and public safety overtime.', 'The report was informed by interviews of eleven peer cities: Anaheim, Beverly Hills, Burbank, Culver City, El Segundo, Glendale, Inglewood, Pasadena, Redondo Beach, Santa Barbara and Torrance. Berkeley and Palo Alto also participated in interviews to provide perspectives on leading practices in other innovative, progressive cities published data and surveys and interviews. This was in addition to interviews with staff and labor unions.  After discussions between the Audit Subcommittee and the CSAC the scope and peer cities were approved by the Audit Subcommittee.', 'While the report indicates that every effort was made to obtain comparable data, not all information can be compared equally. Factors that contribute to this include differences in operating budgets, performance measurements, community priorities, level of outsourcing, geography, and departmental organization. Additionally, a large part of the peer information used in this report is self-reported and un-audited. Cities do not, as a general practice, gather and make public easily comparable data on compensation, workload and service levels on a consistent basis.', 'The study documents that overall, Santa Monica’s pay and benefits are comparable to peer cities, albeit on the higher end of the scale. Also noted is the large scope and level of City services. The study also identifies areas for improvement, many of which are already in progress. Implementation of these improvements will play a significant role in the City’s efforts to maintain fiscal sustainability as it faces future statewide threats from rising pension costs. There are 13 observations and corresponding recommendations in the report that will help the City to improve its fiscal sustainability.', 'O BSER VAT I O N S AN D R EC O MME N D A T IO N S', 'WAGE AND BENEFIT PACKAGES', '1', 'Observation', 'In relation to peer cities, Santa Monica exhibits the same distribution of personnel costs as peers across wages, health benefits, and retirement.', 'Recommendation', 'Enhance awareness and understanding of personnel costs by making this information readily accessible to the general public and provide explanations of each component of total compensation.', '2', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica’s average cash compensation for employees is comparable to the average of peer cities, although the City’s median senior leadership compensation is the highest among peers. When Santa Monica’s median cash compensation was compared to peers, it was the third lowest, likely due to the City’s strong preference to insource services that require a large number of relatively low paid workers. For individual positions, Santa Monica met or fell below the peer median for 40% of the positions included in the benchmarking study, while the remaining 60% of positions were compensated at levels exceeding the peer median. Santa Monica lacks a formal philosophy to guide how compensation is determined.', 'Recommendation', 'Develop and implement a formal compensation philosophy, including, but not limited to, compensation and benefits components, levels, and market competitiveness, to guide labor negotiations and set employee expectations with respect to compensation.', 'O BSER VAT I O N S AN D R EC O MME N D A T IO N S', '3', 'Observation', 'The City uses peer city compensation averages for individual positions during its market analysis prior to negotiations. Best practice is to expand the dataset used to include the median (midpoint) and calculate percentiles when benchmarking position wages.', 'Recommendations', 'Evolve the in-house position-level compensation market study methodology to include medians and percentiles in accordance with best practices, accounting for labor relation requirements.', '4', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica has taken steps to reduce unfunded liability, including introducing an additional retirement tier prior to the Public Employee Pension Reform Act and making', '$76 M in lump sum payments. Similar to peer cities, the City’s overall unfunded pension liability remains high.', 'Recommendation', 'Continue to take steps whenever possible to mitigate the financial threat that pension liability places on the City.', '5', 'Observation', 'Similar to peers, Santa Monica’s employee medical insurance costs have risen steeply in recent years. The City’s cash contribution to monthly individual employee medical insurance, which varies by plan, is consistent with that of peers.', 'Recommendation', 'Evaluate options to stabilize per-employee health care costs.', 'DRIVERS OF COMPENSATION', '6', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica is a highly unionized municipality that typically negotiates multiple labor contracts lasting one to three years. Frequently, all 11 contracts expire simultaneously, requiring a significant amount of work to negotiate.', 'Recommendations', 'Consider negotiating labor contracts in the next cycle to expire at different times and cover longer durations to reduce the burden of negotiations on the City.', '7', 'Observation', 'Like most municipalities, Santa Monica operates a civil service system that is governed by state law and the City’s charter, municipal code, and civil service rules. As a result, it is difficult to change personnel practices as business needs evolve.', 'Recommendation', 'Regularly assess the City’s charter, municipal code, and civil service rules to ensure they are aligned with contemporary personnel practices and meet the evolving business needs of the City.', '8', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica largely operated as usual during the 2008 recession and did not need to reduce staffing levels, while most peer cities had to significantly cut costs by increasing efficiency, outsourcing services, and reducing staffing levels.', 'Recommendation', 'Develop financial and operational strategies to prepare for possible future recessions, since the City may not be able to absorb a future recession as easily.', '9', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica has the highest number of employees among peers. Similar to peers, tenure at the City tends to be long with 77.3% of employees being paid within 10% of the top salary step for the position.', 'Recommendation', 'Explore strategies for mitigating personnel costs, such as hiring personnel at lower steps, and leveraging training programs to equip personnel to take on greater responsibility earlier in their career.', '10', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica employs more personnel than peers, in part, because it operates a variety of unique service offerings and responds to the service needs of a significant tourist population.', 'Recommendation', 'Implement an evaluation framework to assess the lifecycle costs of proposed new programs and services, and evaluate outsourcing options, where applicable.', 'O BSER VAT I O N S AN D R EC O MME N D A T IO N S', '11', 'Observation', 'In general, Santa Monica has a higher workload and higher costs than peer cities. Citywide, productivity is comparable to peers, although productivity varies by program and service, and a comprehensive service level study was not conducted. The City could more strategically utilize key performance indicators to measure and communicate operational and individual efficiency and effectiveness.', 'Recommendation', 'Continue initiatives already underway to develop a strategic plan, comprehensive performance indicators, and leverage the City’s data for decision-making.', 'PUBLIC SAFETY OVERTIME', '12', 'Observation', 'Although SMPD’s overtime expenditures increased by $1.2 million between FY 2014 and FY 2016, the overtime rate for an existing employee costs an estimated 7.1 to 14.6% less than the hourly rate of a new employee, suggesting that the use of overtime provides cost savings to the department.', 'Recommendation', 'In accordance with best practice, continue to evaluate police staffing levels and use of overtime.', '13', 'Observation', 'Although SMFD’s overtime expenditures increased by approximately $800,000 between FY 2014 and FY 2016, the overtime rate for an existing employee costs an estimated 9.3% less to 6.5% more than the hourly rate of a new employee, suggesting that the use of overtime may provide cost savings to the department.', 'Recommendation', 'In accordance with best practice, conduct a staffing study to evaluate on-duty staffing demand, staffing levels, and use of overtime.', 'Some key points emerged from the study that highlight the unique landscape in which Santa Monica functions. According to the study, “Santa Monica’s community has a number of unique characteristics compared to the average municipality.” Specifically, the population fluctuates substantially from day to night, seasonally, and during the holidays. These fluctuations impact the City’s public safety, public landscape and transit services. It has more complex processes for planning and development due to its “unique environmental considerations and community development priorities. Overall, the City delivers programs and services beyond a typical full-service city, including infrastructure (airport, pier, cemetery, public Wi-Fi, community broadband, beach, regional bus service) and community programs (arts and community non-profit grant programs, housing assistance, public interest law, mobility).” (p. 8)', 'Additionally, among peers, Santa Monica shares a reputation, with Palo Alto and Berkeley, as “‘innovation labs’ of local government in California, because they have the employees, culture and resources to explore innovative programming and services.” As noted in the study, “Both cities reported that, similar to Santa Monica, the culture of high levels of service was driven by the community, elected officials and employees… City leadership reported that new hires typically have more experience and education than a typical new hire.” These cities “noted their highly engaged and educated communities, with long public meetings and significant effort made to quickly respond to citizen requests. Several peer cities reported a perception that their public meetings are not as long as Santa Monica’s, nor do they require as much staff time to support.” (p.46)', 'Comparison to Peers', 'Santa Monica’s cash compensation is comparable to the average of peer cities. (pp. 17, 21) By virtue of the fact that Santa Monica shares a regional economy and statewide structures (such as being a member of the California Public Employee Retirement System - CalPERS) with its peers, its compensation is driven by many of the same factors and is for the most part comparable. As noted in the study, the region has a high cost of living (the study refers to Santa Monica’s over $1 million median home price as the second highest among the peer group and far above the $465,000 of the Los Angeles metro area (p.8), high commute times, and high job competition, including with the private sector).', 'Overall, the City’s median cash compensation for individual positions met or fell below the peer median for 40% of positions analyzed, while 60% of the positions were above the peer median. Like all but one peer city, Santa Monica’s employees are hired, promoted and compensated according to the statutes of the City’s civil service system as defined in the City Charter and Municipal Code and overseen by a Personnel Board whose members are appointed by the City Council. Nine of the eleven peers, including Santa Monica, showed high employee tenure. According to the study, the Bureau of Labor Statistics shows that local government employee tenure is 8.3 years, while the private sector median is 3.7 years. Longer tenure is noted as a factor in higher total compensation costs. (p. 44)', 'The proportional mix of salaries, medical and retirement benefit costs is similar across the peer cities, with Santa Monica having slightly higher (1-3%) medical costs. (pp. 12-13) All cities have seen steep increases in medical insurance costs in recent years. Most peer cities face the challenge of large unfunded pension liabilities. While some cities seem to have lower liability burdens as a percent of their operating budget, four of these cities operate electrical utilities and their budgets include large contracts for electrical purchases, which affects the proportional distribution of these costs.', 'Facing the same fiscal challenges related to medical and retirement costs, Santa Monica and its peers are requiring employees to increase their cost sharing of retirement and medical contributions. Santa Monica, like four peers, has added additional, lower levels of retirement benefits for non-sworn new hires that go beyond the legislatively-mandated reduced levels (commonly referred to as tiers). The following chart shows the different level of pension benefits and the percentage of the City’s workforce in these tiers of retirement:', 'Pension benefit (Tier)', 'Percentage of staff in tier as of April 30, 2018', 'Miscellaneous 2.7% at 55', '53.0%', 'Miscellaneous 2.0% at 55 (Hired on/after July 1, 2012)', '5.1%', 'Miscellaneous 2.0% at 62 (New to PERS hired on/after Jan 1, 2013)', '27.1%', 'Sworn Police 3.0% at 50', '8.2%', 'Sworn Police 2.7% at 57 (New to PERS hired on/after Jan 1, 2013)', '1.3%', 'Sworn Fire 3.0% at 55', '4.2%', 'Sworn Fire 2.7% at 57 (New to PERS hired on/after Jan 1, 2013)', '1.1%', 'Regular pension contributions are established by CalPERS and are set based on the assumption that unfunded liabilities will be paid off within a 30-year amortization period. Santa Monica has gone a step further than its peers, in accordance with its Council-adopted policy, to pay down at least $1.2 million of its unfunded liability each year in addition to making its regular pension contribution payments. Additionally, the City has taken the bold step to aggressively pay down the unfunded liability by making significant lump sum payments. To date, the City has made $76 million in additional payments to lower its unfunded pension liability.', 'The study found a number of areas where Santa Monica differs from peers. The report indicates these differences are often the result of the unique circumstances of Santa Monica and can represent areas for improvement.', '· Santa Monica has the highest median cash compensation for management positions.', 'The data and anecdotal research suggests that the higher median is due, in part, to Santa Monica’s desire to take on complex issues and to be a leader in local government innovation, similar to the cities of Palo Alto and Berkeley, requiring staff with more experience and education. (p.46)', '· Santa Monica has the largest staff of peer cities, and often has a higher workload.', 'The report indicates that Santa Monica has unique services including a cemetery, pier, airport, public Wi-Fi, community broadband, beach, regional bus line, Office of Sustainability, Office of Civic Wellbeing, as well as social services and arts grant programs. Santa Monica has a population that fluctuates from 92,289 to 250,000 on a daily and seasonal basis and this larger population directly impacts public safety, public landscape/beach, and transit services. Also factoring into the larger staff is Council’s policy of insourcing and keeping a low level of as-needed positions, rather than contracting out. Examples of areas that other cities contract out are solid waste, custodial, and workers’ compensation.', '· Some trade and frontline positions are paid less than peers.', 'The difference in cash compensation is likely due to the City’s in-sourcing of many services, which may lower the minimum value of the range. (p. 17)', '· Staff increased 5% in 9 years, while peer cities, whose revenues were more impacted during the Great Recession, laid off or furloughed staff or froze salaries.', 'The majority of recent position increases in Santa Monica were related to the introduction of EXPO light rail service (specifically additional Police and Fire personnel, and additional positions in BBB as part of the Evolution of Blue enhancements), changing service structures at the Santa Monica Airport (these positions have not been filled), as well as the conversion of as-needed positions to permanent positions.', 'Implementation Plan', 'Staff has developed an implementation plan to ensure that the recommendations of the Internal Auditor are addressed in a timely manner. The Implementation Plan (Attachment C) categorizes each recommendation based on level of difficulty to address, develops a timeline, and describes the steps that staff will take to make improvements to the compensation and staffing process as another one of the ways that the City is working to achieve long term fiscal sustainability. Many of the proposed actions are already in progress, including the development of a framework, based on performance measures, to inform staff and council on the most efficient and effective way to allocate scarce resources. The table below provides a summary of each recommendation’s priority, effort level and assigned responsibility. Staff will report back to Council on initial progress made after every six months and annually thereafter until the implementation actions are deemed complete.', '#', 'Recommendation', 'Priority', 'Effort Level', 'Responsibility', '1', 'Enhance awareness and understanding of personnel costs by making this information readily accessible to the general public and provide explanations of each component of total compensation.', 'High', 'Moderate', 'HR, Finance, CMO', '2', 'Develop and implement a formal compensation philosophy, including, but not limited to, compensation and benefits components, levels, and market competitiveness, to guide labor negotiations and set employee expectations with respect to compensation.', 'High', 'High', 'HR, CMO, and City Council', '3', 'Evolve the in-house position-level compensation market study methodology to include medians and percentiles in accordance with best practices, accounting for labor relation requirements.', 'High', 'Moderate', 'HR', '4', 'Continue to take steps whenever possible to mitigate the financial threat that pension liability places on the City.', 'High', 'Moderate', 'Finance', '5', 'Evaluate options to stabilize per-employee health care costs.', 'High', 'High', 'HR, Finance', '6', 'Consider negotiating labor contracts in the next cycle to expire at different times and cover longer durations to reduce the burden of negotiations on the City.', 'Medium', 'Moderate', 'HR', '7', 'Regularly assess the City’s charter, municipal code, and civil service rules to ensure they are aligned with contemporary personnel practices and meet the evolving business needs of the City.', 'Medium', 'Moderate', 'HR and CMO', '8', 'Develop financial and operational strategies to prepare for possible future recessions, since the City may not be able to absorb a future recession as easily.', 'High', 'High', 'Finance and CMO', '9', 'Explore strategies for mitigating personnel costs, such as hiring personnel at lower steps and leveraging training programs to equip personnel to take on greater responsibility earlier in their careers.', 'High', 'High', 'HR', '10', 'Implement an evaluation framework to assess the lifecycle costs of proposed new programs and services, and evaluate outsourcing options where applicable.', 'High', 'High', 'Finance and CMO', '11', 'Continue initiatives already underway to develop a strategic plan, comprehensive performance indicators, and leverage the City’s data for decision-making.', 'Medium', 'High', 'CMO and Finance', '12', 'In accordance with best practices, continue to evaluate police staffing levels and use of overtime.', 'Medium', 'Moderate', 'Police and HR', '13', 'In accordance with best practices, conduct a staffing study to evaluate on-duty staffing demand, staffing levels, and use of overtime.', 'Medium', 'Moderate', 'Fire and HR']}
{'Title': 'Possible Ballot Measure to Protect Against Development Exceeding the Adopted General Plan or Zoning Code Limits on Height or Floor Area Ratio, By Requiring Super-Majority Council Approval or Other Means', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council review the proposed options and adopt the recommendation not to proceed with a ballot measure for the November 2018 Election to require a super-majority Council approval for projects that exceed the Land Use Element, Specific Plans or the Zoning Ordinance that would result in an increase in allowed height or floor area ratio (FAR) as unnecessary due to the protections already built into those adopted plans to preclude such approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'At the City Council meeting on December 12, 2017, the Council directed staff to “explore a possible 2018 ballot measure that would protect against development exceeding the adopted General Plan or Zoning Code limits on height or Floor Area Ratio, by requiring super-majority Council approval, or by other means, and return to Council with options.”', 'In response to Council direction to explore a possible ballot measure to protect against development exceeding the General Plan or Zoning Ordinance, staff has developed three options. The recommended first option is to not place a measure on the ballot and continue to rely on the existing General Plan, the Downtown Community Plan and Zoning Ordinance which sets out clear rules for maximum height and floor-area ratios (FAR) for the vast majority of the City based on plans adopted after robust public input. Option 2 would allow projects to exceed the zoning ordinance standards through a Development Agreement without a super-majority, but only if the project is consistent with the LUCE and any applicable Specific Plan. Option 3 would require a super-majority for any project that exceeds the height and FAR allowance contained in the zoning ordinance.', 'Having completed the implementation of the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) in 2010 with the adoption of the citywide Zoning Ordinance and the Downtown Community Plan, the flexibility utilized for development agreements is no longer either necessary or desirable. Predictability for both property owners and residents outweighs the perceived benefits that came from negotiating heights and density on a project by project basis. Having put enormous resources of time, debate and financial resources into establishing specific height and density limitations for the entire city, Council has clearly indicated a commitment to enforce those limits by applying them consistently to all future projects and that has been the established practice without deviation since the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and the Downtown Community Plan.', 'Discussion', 'Development in Santa Monica is governed by a Tier system, which is contained in the LUCE and establishes up to three tiers of development in most land use districts. Tier 1 development is limited to a relatively low height and FAR with a very predictable entitlement process. Tier 2 development allows greater height and FAR in exchange for increased, but prescribed community benefits. Tier 3 development allows the most height and FAR in exchange for community benefits beyond what is required for Tier 2 projects.', 'Under current requirements, development can only exceed height or FAR requirements established in the Zoning Ordinance, LUCE and/or any Specific Plan if the relevant governing document is amended, or, in limited circumstances, if a Development Agreement is obtained. Any such amendment or Development Agreement must be adopted by ordinance and is subject to referendum and reversal by the voters.', 'Prior to adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and associated amendments to the LUCE in 2015 and the Downtown Community Plan last year, most projects proceeded by Development Agreement, which allowed increased height and FAR in exchange for community benefits. The Zoning Ordinance and the Downtown Community Plan, however, implemented prescribed development standards and community benefits for Tier 2 projects; and the Downtown Community Plan includes prescribed development standards and community benefits for most Tier 3 housing projects.', 'Today, there are only limited areas in the City where Tier 3 projects with negotiated height and FAR are still allowed. These include Broadway and Colorado Avenue between Lincoln and 20th Street, the area bounded by Broadway to the north, Colorado to the south, Cloverfield to the east and 20th Street to the west, and any project in the Mixed Use Boulevard Low District that includes 100% affordable housing or a designated Landmark. Tier 3 projects are also allowed by Development Agreement in portions of the Bergamot Transit Village. However, while these projects could exceed the height and FAR limits in the zoning ordinance, they must be consistent with the height and FAR maximums contained in the LUCE.', 'Option 1', 'Option 1 would retain and reinforce existing legally adopted development rules and requirements. With the adoption of the Downtown Community Plan in 2016 and the citywide Zoning Ordinance in 2015, Council clearly established height and FAR ratios to guide future development throughout the City with the intent of providing certainty about the rules for property owners, residents and potential developers. Under existing rules, development may not exceed established height or FAR requirements. Deviating from those standards would require amending the governing document ordinance (or the governing document permits a Development Agreement, also adopted by ordinance). In either case, any such ordinance adopted by Council would be subject to referendum by the voters. Council may therefore conclude that an additional super-majority requirement is not necessary given that the Council has intentionally adopted the prescribed development requirements set forth in recent years and shown a clear commitment to regulating development within those standards. The availability of referendum for any change to height or FAR requirements in the Zoning Ordinance or area specific plan or any Development Agreement allowing development in excess of prescribed height and FAR limits provides strong protection that these rules will be enforced and not set on a project by project basis. It should be noted that the City is not required to even process a proposal for a development agreement that exceeds zoning standards. Staff believes that adhering to the established zoning standards makes enacting a charter amendment unnecessary to ensure consistent compliance with established height and FAR standards.', 'Options 2 and 3', 'In response to Council direction to explore options to require a super-majority, or other process, for development exceeding the adopted General Plan or Zoning Ordinance height or FAR allowances, staff has developed two additional options for Council consideration.', 'Option 2', 'Option 2 would require a super-majority for an amendment to the LUCE or any specific plan where that amendment would increase the maximum height limit or floor area ratio applicable to any zoning district. This option would add the underlined language to Section 615 of the City Charter to read as follows:', 'Option 2 - limits height and FAR increases in the LUCE and Specific Plans', '615. Adoption of ordinances and resolutions. With the sole exception of ordinances which take effect upon adoption, hereinafter referred to, no ordinance shall be adopted by the City Council on the day of its introduction, nor within five days thereafter, nor at any time other than at a regular or adjourned regular meeting. At the time of adoption of an ordinance or resolution it shall be read in full, unless, after the reading of the title thereof, the further reading thereof is waived by unanimous consent of the City Councilmembers present. In the event that any ordinance is altered after its introduction, the same shall not be finally adopted except at a regular or adjourned regular meeting, held not less than five days after the date upon which such ordinance was so altered. The correction of typographical or clerical errors shall not constitute the making of an alteration within the meaning of the foregoing sentence.', 'No order for the payment of money shall be adopted or made at any other than a regular or adjourned regular meeting.', 'The affirmative votes of at least four members of the City Council shall be required for the enactment of any ordinance or resolution, or for the making or approving of any order for the payment of money.', 'The affirmative votes of at least five members of the City Council shall be required for the adoption of any amendment to the (a) the Land Use and Circulation Element or (b) any specific plan adopted pursuant to Chapter 9.45 of the Municipal Code, where that amendment would increase the maximum height limit or floor area ratio applicable to any zoning district.', 'Emergency Ordinances. Any ordinance declared by the City Council to be necessary as an emergency measure for preserving the public peace, health or safety and containing a statement of the reasons for its urgency, may be introduced and adopted at one and the same meeting if passed by at least five affirmative votes.', 'The language contained in this option would allow projects to exceed the zoning ordinance standards through a Development Agreement without a super-majority, but only if the project is consistent with the LUCE and any applicable Specific Plan. In other words, changes to the governing rules and regulations would require super-majority approval, but, in situations where the LUCE allows Tier 3 projects through the approval of a Development Agreement, a super-majority would not be required.', 'Option 3', 'Option 3 would require a super-majority for any project that requires an amendment to the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE), any specific plan adopted pursuant to Chapter 9.45 of the Municipal Code, or the City of Santa Monica Comprehensive Zoning Ordinance as set forth in Article 9 of the Municipal Code, where that amendment would increase the maximum height limit or floor area ratio applicable to any zoning district. However, this super-majority provision would not apply to any Established Large Sites Overlay project that complies with Section 9.10.080 of the Downtown Community Plan. This option would add the underlined language to Section 615 of the City Charter to read as follows:', 'Option 3 - limits height and FAR increases in the LUCE, Specific Plan or the Zoning Code', '615. Adoption of ordinances and resolutions.', 'With the sole exception of ordinances which take effect upon adoption, hereinafter referred to, no ordinance shall be adopted by the City Council on the day of its introduction, nor within five days thereafter, nor at any time other than at a regular or adjourned regular meeting. At the time of adoption of an ordinance or resolution it shall be read in full, unless, after the reading of the title thereof, the further reading thereof is waived by unanimous consent of the City Councilmembers present. In the event that any ordinance is altered after its introduction, the same shall not be finally adopted except at a regular or adjourned regular meeting, held not less than five days after the date upon which such ordinance was so altered. The correction of typographical or clerical errors shall not constitute the making of an alteration within the meaning of the foregoing sentence.', 'No order for the payment of money shall be adopted or made at any other than a regular or adjourned regular meeting.', 'The affirmative votes of at least four members of the City Council shall be required for the enactment of any ordinance or resolution, or for the making or approving of any order for the payment of money.', 'The affirmative votes of at least five members of the City Council shall be required for the adoption of any amendment to (a) the Land Use and Circulation Element, (b) any specific plan adopted pursuant to Chapter 9.45 of the Municipal Code, or (c) the City of Santa Monica Comprehensive Zoning Ordinance as set forth in Article 9 of the Municipal Code, where that amendment would increase the maximum height limit or floor area ratio applicable to any zoning district; provided, however, that this super-majority provision would not apply to any Established Large Sites Overlay project that complies with Section 9.10.080 of the Downtown Community Plan.', 'Emergency Ordinances. Any ordinance declared by the City Council to be necessary as an emergency measure for preserving the public peace, health or safety and containing a statement of the reasons for its urgency, may be introduced and adopted at one and the same meeting if passed by at least five affirmative votes.', 'The language contained in this option would require a super-majority for any project that exceeds the height and FAR allowance contained in the Zoning Ordinance. Therefore, Tier 3 projects located in the few areas that still allow Tier 3 development would be required to obtain a Development Agreement and achieve a super-majority vote from City Council.', 'The proposed language in this option specifically exempts the Established Large Sites contained in the Downtown Community Plan area because the determination to allow projects on these sites to reach a height up to 130’ through the approval of a Development Agreement was thoroughly vetted during the Downtown Community Plan outreach process and the requirement for a Development Agreement allows the approvals to be brought before the voters through the referendum process.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'If the Council were to choose to place a measure on the ballot, the cost of the ballot measure would be incurred as part of the elections budget of $513,981 in the Records & Election Services (City Clerk) Department.']}
{'Title': 'Public Hearing and Issuance of Lease Revenue Bonds, Series 2018 to Finance Fire Station No. 1', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '09. Public Hearings', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council: Hold a public hearing, receive public comment, and adopt the attached Resolution Authorizing Issuance of Series 2018 Bonds (Attachment A), and approve the related documents required for the Issuance of Lease Revenue Bonds, Series 2018 (Attachments C, D, E, F, G and H).Staff recommends that the Public Financing Authority:1. Hold a public hearing, receive public comment, and adopt the attached Resolution Authorizing Issuance of Series 2018 Bonds (Attachment B), and approve the related documents required for the Issuance of Lease Revenue Bonds, Series 2018 (Attachments C, D, E, F, G and H).', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'After extensive planning and public approval milestones, construction is set to commence on a replacement for the City’s downtown fire station which does not meet current seismic and other contemporary operating standards. Staff recommends that the City Council and Public Financing Authority (PFA) approve documents required for the issuance of Lease Revenue Bonds, Series 2018 to finance Fire Station No. 1 and a Fire Training Facility at the City Yards. The determination to issue lease revenue bonds is made based on the City’s intent to distribute the cost of building an essential facility over its useful life, the City’s access to low-cost financing, and the City’s low level of existing debt.', 'The Bonds will be secured by a lease agreement between the City and the PFA that will include the right to use the City’s Public Safety Facility during Fire Station No. 1 construction, following which lease payments will be for Fire Station No. 1 use and occupancy only. Bond proceeds will also cover bond issuance costs. The proposed Series 2018 bonds will be for a maximum principal amount of $38,000,000, with a final maturity date of July 1, 2048 and a maximum true interest cost of 5.00%.', 'Background', 'The FY 2016-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget includes $41.6 million for Fire Station No. 1 and the Proposed FY 2018-20 Capital Improvement Program Budget will include $2.2 million for the Fire Training Facility.', 'On March 27, 2018 (Attachment I), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Bernards Bros., Inc. in the amount of $29.2 million for construction of Fire Station No. 1. Additionally, the Fire Station No. 1 project will include approximately $12.4 million in direct owner costs for technology equipment, testing and inspections, construction management services, permits, fees, furniture, fixtures and equipment, LEED certification costs, and project contingency. The cost of the Fire Training Facility is estimated to be approximately $2.2 million.', 'Discussion', 'Staff is recommending that the City issue lease revenue bonds in an amount not to exceed $38.0 million to fund the Fire Station No. 1 and Fire Training Facility projects. The remaining costs will be paid for by $6.5 million in reserves previously set aside for the projects. When determining whether to issue bonds to cover this capital cost, the City has considered a number of factors. First, the City’s adopted financial policies assert the prudence of using debt financing to distribute the cost of a facility over its useful life. Also, owing to its sound financial health and resulting high credit ratings, the City is able to benefit from low-cost financing. This allows for greater flexibility in allocating existing resources. Finally, the City is able to take advantage of favorable conditions in the municipal bond market due to its very low level of debt. With regard to the last factor, the City’s indebtedness is limited by Article VI of the City Charter, which states that the bonded indebtedness of the City may not exceed the sum of 10% of the total assessed valuation of property within the City. With this bond issuance, staff estimates that this indicator would reach 0.50%.', 'A breakdown of the total costs of the projects to be funded by the Bonds is shown in the table below.', 'Description', 'Fire Station No. 1', '(in millions)', 'Fire Training Facility TI', '(in millions)', 'Total', '(in millions)', 'Design Contract', 'N/A*', '$ 0.2', '$  0.2', 'Construction', '$ 29.2', '$  1.4', '$  30.6', 'Direct Owner Costs', '$ 12.4', '$ 0.6', '$  13.0', '$   41.6', '$  2.2', '$  43.8', '*Not included in bond issuance; approximately $2.0 million in General Funds was included in prior CIP Budgets for Fire Station 1 Design.', 'The bonds would be secured by a lease agreement between the City as lessee and the Santa Monica Public Financing Authority (PFA) as lessor. The lease agreement is based on use of the Public Safety Facility during Fire Station No. 1 construction. Once Fire Station No. 1 is completed and occupied by the City, expected early in 2020, the Public Safety Facility will be removed from security for the lease and payments will be solely for Fire Station No. 1 use and occupancy. This arrangement means that the City will not need to include interest due on the bonds during construction in the bond amount (capitalized interest).', 'Staff is proposing to sell the Series 2018 Bonds through a negotiated sale whereby the bond underwriter is predetermined and the Bond interest rates are set through a process of negotiation. A negotiated sale, as compared to an open competitive bid, is the best way to ensure the bond underwriter is in compliance with the City’s banking services Resolution (Resolution No. 11025). Upon Council approval of the Series 2018 Bond issuance, the City’s financial advisor will assist staff in determining the fair market value for the Bond interest rates.', 'To select a bond underwriter, the City’s financial advisor distributed a Request for Qualifications (“RFQ”) to 12 commercial and investment banking institutions active in the California tax-exempt bond market. The RFQ required respondents to certify the firm was in compliance with the City’s banking services Resolution. Nine firms responded to the RFQ.  The financial advisor rated the firms based on a combination of factors including their recommended approach to the bond sale, relevant experience with similar financings, methodology to execute the bond sale, compensation, and compliance with City social responsibility guidelines per Resolution 11025.  The recommendations were then presented to Finance Department staff who made the final selection of Stifel, Nicolaus & Co. as lead manager and UBS as co-manager. The lead manager serves as the representative of the underwriting group and manages the process of soliciting orders for the bonds from individual and institutional investors. The co-manager assumes underwriting liability and consults with the lead manager prior to and during the financing process.', 'In preparation for issuance of the bonds, credit ratings were requested from three credit rating agencies that currently maintain credit ratings on the City and Authority bonds.  The credit rating agencies – Fitch Ratings, Moody’s Investors Service, and Standard & Poors.  Staff anticipates the credit rating agencies will assign the highest possible lease revenue bond ratings to the bonds (AA+, Aa1, and AA+, respectively) and affirm the City’s AAA/Aaa/AAA general obligation bond credit ratings.', 'The attached resolutions and documents permit the City and PFA to proceed with all steps necessary for the issuance of the Series 2018 Bonds.  The resolutions approve the attached documents and authorize their execution and delivery by the specified agency’s officials and employees.  The resolutions also approve the preparation, execution, and delivery of a Final Official Statement; the execution and delivery of any additional documents and certificates; and the performance of such acts or related actions as may be necessary or desirable to effect the offering, sale, and issuance of the Series 2018 Bonds.  The resolutions authorize the issuance of the Series 2018 Bonds with a maximum principal amount of $38,000,000 with a final maturity date of July 1, 2048 and a maximum true interest cost of 5.00%.', 'This May 8, 2018 meeting serves as a public hearing relating to the public benefits of financing the Fire Station No. 1 and Fire Training Facility improvements through the PFA.  Staff published this public hearing notice in the Santa Monica Daily Press on April 26, 2018; at least five days prior to the hearing date as the Joint Exercise of Powers Agreement (JPA) law requires.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'Approving the recommended actions will result in the PFA issuing up to $38,000,000 in tax-exempt Lease Revenue Bonds. The estimated annual debt service, to be paid from the City’s annual base rental payments pursuant to the Lease Agreement, would be approximately $1.7 million (interest only) through fiscal year 2020 and rise to approximately $2.3 million between fiscal years 2021 and 2048.', 'The FY 2016-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget includes $41.6 million for design and construction of Fire Station No. 1 in account C014063.589000 and the Proposed FY 2018-20 Capital Improvement Program Budget will include $2.2 million for the Fire Training Facility.', 'Other accounts required to record transactions related to the bond issuance and debt service payments are listed in the table below. Any necessary budget changes will be made as part of the Year-End Budget Review in October 2018 after the bonds are issued and exact amounts are known.', 'Account', 'Amount', 'Other Financing Sources (proceeds from the sale of the Series 2018 Bonds, net of any original issue discount or premium)', '01990.601001', '$35,000,000', 'Other Financing Uses – Original issue Discount/Premium', '01990.602001', '$2,600,000', 'Series 2018 Bond Issue Costs (costs of issuance, underwriter’s discount and bond insurance)', '01274.567250', '$400,000', 'Fire Station #1 lease payment (debt service on Series 2018 Series Bonds (first year is interest only)', '01274.567251', '$1,720,000']}
{'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer, Mayor Pro Tem Davis and Councilmember McKeown that the Council allocate $20,000 as a matching grant to Elemental Music, a 501 ( c ) 3 non-profit that was created to inspire, train and nurture young musicians in Santa Monica. The organization serves over 200 elementary and middle school students each year and funds will be used to provide instruments and lessons to children from low-income households. Additionally, this action is in furtherance of the Council’s Learn &Thrive; Strategic goal which reflects Santa Monica’s long-standing commitment to provide equitable access to quality, affordable opportunities for lifelong learning and growth for community members of all ages.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'Proclamation declaring April 25, 2018 as Denim Day in the City of Santa Monica', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Proclamation recognizing April 2018 as Community College Month', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Bid Award for Local Electrical Supplies via In-Store Purchases', 'Department': 'Public Works, Facilities Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4306 to Electric Supply Connection, a California-based company, to furnish electrical supplies via in-store purchases as required by the Public Works Department; and2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue the Public Works Department a purchase order with Electric Supply Connection for the purchase of electrical supplies in an amount not to exceed $100,000 for one year, with two additional two-year renewal options, with an annual increase of 2%, for a total amount not to exceed $520,405 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Public Works Department purchases a variety of electrical supplies to maintain City facilities and street lighting. While the City receives a large majority of its planned electrical supplies via delivery, in-store purchases are still necessary for any work orders that require immediate attention and are urgent in nature. Staff recommends Electric Supply Connection to provide electrical supplies to the Public Works Department for a total amount not to exceed $520,405 over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'On July 25, 2017, Council rejected Bid #4284 to furnish electrical supplies via in-store purchases and required that bidders have a physical location within a 10-mile radius of Santa Monica (Attachment A). The only bidder, One Source Distributors, is located in Garden Grove, CA, over 40 miles away from the City.', 'Discussion', 'Staff from the Facilities Maintenance Division and Street & Fleet Services Division of the Public Works Department complete approximately 2,500 electrical-related work orders per year, including electrical repairs in City offices, public parks, various City facilities and the maintenance and repair of street lighting. Electrical supplies are obtained through a combination of delivery and in-store purchases. Planned projects, large purchases, and standard shop stock items are purchased through a separate contract. Even with this process, staff still currently average over 12 in-store electrical supply purchases per week for urgent and unplanned incidents.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On January 18, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide electrical supplies via in-store purchases in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal code provisions. A total of 21 vendors downloaded the bid. Three bids were received and publicly opened on February 1, 2018, per Attachment B. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, quality of products quoted and compliance with City specifications. There were 16 sample items quoted for bid and each vendor had multiple items for which they were the lowest bidder. Electric Supply Connection is the lowest bidder on 5 of the items and second lowest on an additional 5 items. Its store location is less than two miles from the City Yards (2500 Michigan Avenue), where the Facilities Maintenance and Street and Fleet Services workshops are located. The other two bidders’ closest store locations are 32 miles (Summers Group) and 17 miles (Wesco Distribution) from the City Yards, which would effectively prohibit the necessary in-store purchases. Moreover, Electric Supply Connection is the only bidder to offer four renewal options. If taken as an average across all bid line items, there was a 13% increase in the prices quoted above those of Summers Group, but staff determined that this offset was justified given the staff time required to travel to Santa Fe Springs for supplies. Based on these criteria, staff recommends Electric Supply Connection as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The purchase order to be awarded to Electric Supply Connection, for the Facilities Maintenance Division, is for an amount not to exceed $416,324. Funds of $80,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in various departments. The purchase order will be charged to account 014523.544010, and expenditures will be transferred to departments incurring maintenance services. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.', 'The purchase order to be awarded to Electric Supply Connection, for the Street & Fleet Services Division, is for an amount not to exceed $104,081. Funds of $20,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Public Works Department. The purchase order will be charged to accounts 014212.544010. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award Construction Management Services Agreement for Citywide Facilities Renewal Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Facilities Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staffrecommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #SP2507_FRPto PMCS Group, a California-based company, for construction management services; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreementwithPMCS Groupin an amount not to exceed $317,680(including a 10% contingency) for one year with no additional renewal options.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Citywide Facilities Renewal Project funds a broad variety of large-scale renovations, deferred maintenance, emergency repairs, and upgrade projects at City facilities including construction and remodeling, carpentry, plumbing and electrical, painting, as well as heating ventilation and air conditioning (HVAC) repairs. This ongoing project plays a key role in maximizing the lifespan of City facilities and ensuring that the public and City staff receive the most benefit from their usage. Due to a backlog of deferred, large-scale projects, staff is requesting one year of construction management services to help complete the work. Facilities Maintenance staff does not have the capacity to manage these large-scale projects in addition to the ongoing preventative maintenance and minor projects they regularly oversee. Staff recommendsPMCS Groupto provide construction management servicesfor this project inan amount not to exceed $317,680(including a 10% contingency).', 'Background', 'The City operates and maintains over 140 facilities ranging in complexity from simple park concession buildings to the complicated Public Safety Facility. The ongoing Citywide Facilities Renewal Project allows the City to invest in this facility infrastructure by ensuring that larger maintenance needs are completed in a manner which:', '· maximizes the lifespan of City facilities;', '· lowers operational costs where possible;', '· provides maximum functionality, safety, efficiency and accessibility for the public and City staff;', '· promotes a clean and attractive appearance;', '· promotes green building practices/sustainability; and', '· provides flexibility for staff to respond to unforeseen circumstances and requests.', 'Using information gathered from planned facility condition assessments performed by outside vendors, regular staff inspections, and feedback from facility users, the Facilities Maintenance Division allocates the capital funding for the repair and replacement projects that are most needed.', 'Discussion', 'The main priority of Facilities Maintenance Division staff is to focus on smaller preventative maintenance and as-needed repairs. Because of this, it is necessary to contract out construction management services to complete larger capital replacement projects. To complete these larger projects in a prompt and effective manner, staff requests approval to enter an agreement with construction management firm PMCS Group.', 'PMCS Group would manage construction work that would be completed by various contractors throughout the year. Staff would return to Council for approval as necessary for the various contractors it would hire to complete the construction activities that would be managed by PMCS Group. As part of its construction management services, PMCS would complete quality assurance inspections of the contractors’ work, verify and manage field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitor and mitigate impacts as a result of the construction activities, attend the construction contractors’ safety meetings, attend periodic progress meetings, keep record of all necessary documentation relevant to the work performed during construction, and conduct public outreach as necessary.', 'A sample of the larger projects scheduled to be completed over the course of the next year are:', '· The upgrade and expansion of the City’s building management system, which allows the City to remotely control HVAC and energy usage', '· The replacement of major mechanical components at the Public Safety Facility', '· The replacement of failing exterior windows at the Public Safety Facility', '· The replacement of major mechanical components at Fire Station 2', '· The repair and overhaul of the heating, ventilation and air conditioning (HVAC) units at City Hall', '· Interior improvements to the Joslyn and Reed Park community buildings', '· Interior improvements to the Main Library', 'Consultant Selection - Construction Management', 'On October 10, 2017, the City issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQ) for construction management on-call services for various building and park construction projects. The RFQ was posted on the City’s online bidding website, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Forty-four vendors downloaded the RFQ, and thirteen firms responded. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Evaluation was based on the selection criteria set forth in SMMC Section 2.24.073, with the specific review of the following: technical competence, staffing capability, project approach, past performance, dispute resolution, quality control, and cost control. The top 10 firms were placed on a pre-qualified list of construction management firms in the Building category:', 'Arcadis', 'Kitchell', 'Cumming Corporation', 'PMCS Group', 'GKK', 'Psomas', 'Griffin Structures', 'Simplus', 'KDG Construction Consulting', 'Simpson & Simpson Management Consulting', 'From that list, KDG Construction Consulting, Kitchell, PMCS Group, Psomas, and Simpson & Simpson Management Consulting were found to have the most direct and relevant previous experience to this specific project and were invited to participate in a Request for Proposal (RFP) phase on January 16, 2018.', 'On February 5, 2018, KDG Construction Consulting, PMCS Group, and Simpson & Simpson Management Consulting submitted proposals. The City’s three-person review committee from the Facilities Maintenance Division reviewed and graded the firms and proposals based on the selection criteria set forth in SMMC 2.24.073. Staff recommends PMCS Group as the best qualified firm to provide construction management services, for an amount not to exceed $317,680 (including 10% contingency). PMCS Groupdemonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with similar projects in the cities of Santa Monica and Los Angeles, and the Los Angeles and Montebello unified school districts. Through past projects, PMCS Groupalso demonstrated its ability to offer experiencedconstruction management teams that couldconducthigh qualityconstructionmanagement at competitive hourly rates.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Thecontract to be awarded toPMCS Groupis for an amount not to exceed$317,680(including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 CapitalImprovement Program budgetin accountM010085.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Award Construction Contract for Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2395 to PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company, a California-based company, for the Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company, in an amount not to exceed $610,468 (including a 10% contingency);3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority; and4. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project would enhance pedestrian and cyclist safety and access. The project would also upgrade a stretch of the Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway (MANGo) Final Concept Plan, which was adopted by City Council in February 2014. The project would improve the visibility of pedestrians and cyclists at four pedestrian crossings near the Edison Language Academy located at 2402 Virginia Avenue, via new landscaped curb extensions that would shorten crossing distances. These changes will provide safer conditions for students traveling to school and will encourage more walking and biking, both objectives of the August 2015, Council identified goal to “Create a new model of mobility." Signing, striping, and pavement markings would also be upgraded at the project locations. Staff recommends PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company, to construct these improvements in an amount not to exceed $610,468 (including a 10% contingency). The total project cost of $610,468 will consist of $549,421 of grant funds and $61,047 of project readiness grant match funds.', 'Background', 'The Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project is funded by a Safe Routes to School (SRTS) grant that was competitively awarded to the City by the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans). The original The City received a notice to proceed from Caltrans in August 2013, and subsequently advertised for, and selected a designer. On February 11, 2014, Council approved the adoption of the MANGo conceptual plan which describes the community’s vision for a neighborhood greenway that traverses the Pico Neighborhood from the Bergamot area to the beach (Attachment A). The MANGo plan identifies four primary segments to be improved, and this project would make improvements along the segment referred to in the plan as the “The Neighborhood Wiggle.” This segment was selected because of its proximity to the Edison Language Academy, which makes the project locations eligible for Safe Routes to School grant funds. On April 12, 2016, Council approved a design contract with Alta Planning and Design to move forward with improvements near the Edison Language Academy (Attachment B). On February 28, 2017, Council approved the refined concept designs (Attachment C).', 'Discussion', 'The Edison Language Academy is in the Pico neighborhood between Interstate 10 and Pico Boulevard. Much of the MANGo corridor traverses a densely populated area that is home to approximately 22,500 residents and significant vehicular traffic. The major challenges facing pedestrians and cyclists within the project area include navigating the high traffic volume on streets that surround the Edison Language Academy campus, and obstructed visibility from motorists at intersections due to on-street parking. The proposed curb extensions would help to slow traffic and place pedestrians waiting to cross the street in locations that are more visible to motorists. The improvements are planned for:', '· Delaware Avenue and 22nd Street,', '· Kansas Avenue (mid-block) near the Edison Language Academy,', '· 27th Street and Kansas Avenue, and', '· Stewart Street and Kansas Avenue', 'These intersections are all part of MANGo’s “Neighborhood Wiggle” segment and would enhance pedestrian and cyclist safety for those commuting to the Edison Language Academy and the surrounding area.', 'Contractor Selection – Construction', 'On February 14, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirty-nine vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on March 8, 2018:', 'Bidder', 'Bid Amount', 'All American Asphalt', '$698,765', 'PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company', '$554,971', 'Engineer’s Estimate: $530,000', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City specifications. PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company has completed similar projects for the City, including the Annual Paving and Sidewalk Repair Project in Fiscal Year 2011-12 and improvements to Ocean Park Boulevard in 2013. PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company has also completed similar projects for the cities of Glendale, Whittier, Lomita, and Laguna Niguel. Staff contacted references listed in the bid package, and all respondents reported that work performed by PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company was completed according to project requirements. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company’s license is current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company, the lower bidder, is recommended as the best bidder for the Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project.', 'SRTS grant funds were programmed by Caltrans in the amount of $502,055 prior to the City beginning the bid procurement process. Caltrans Office of Local Assistance advised the City that additional funding would be available if necessary. Upon opening and evaluating the bids, staff determined an additional $47,366 of SRTS funds would be required and subsequently revised the grant finance letter accordingly. The project funding is explained in detail below in the Financial Impacts and Budget Section.', 'Construction Schedule and Management', 'Due to vehicular circulation congestion around the Edison Language Academy during the regular school year, construction of the project would take place during summer break when school is not in session. Construction work would begin on or around June 12, 2018, (the first day after the school year ends) and would conclude on or around August 17, 2018 (the last day before the new school year begins). Staff would continue to coordinate with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD) before and throughout the duration of the construction period to minimize impacts to the surrounding community. City staff would provide construction management for this project, which includes inspecting the contractor’s work during construction, verifying and documenting field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts due to construction activities, attending the contractor’s safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings, and maintaining all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work conducted during construction.', 'Public Outreach', 'Due to the nature of this project, staff anticipates interruptions to vehicular circulation around the Edison Language Academy. To mitigate these temporary public impacts, staff would conduct comprehensive outreach with SMMUSD, and include weekly updates on the City’s “Know Before You Go” (KBUG) web page and in the Santa Monica Daily Press. For work requiring temporary or partial closures to streets or access ways and detour plans, traffic control and highly visible signs would be placed at key locations to notify the public. Staff would also mail notices to nearby businesses and residents, post information on social media, and update the City’s website to inform the community. The construction has been scheduled during summer break to minimize impacts to students, parents, staff and the school facility. Additionally, recognizing that there may be some activity at the school during the summer break, the construction management team will work with the school and its principal to ensure that students and their parents are notified about the project. Following project construction, the City will utilize an additional $30,400 in Caltrans grant funds to aid in raising awareness about the infrastructure changes implemented near and around Edison Language Academy and promote a travel plan for school access.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The project is categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15301(c) and Section 15302 of the CEQA Guidelines. Class 1 exempt projects include the "operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination." Class 2 exempt projects include the “replacement or reconstruction of existing structures and facilities where the new structure would be located on the same site as the structure replaced and would have substantially the same purpose and capacity as the structure replaced.” The project qualifies as a Class 1 and Class 2 project exempt from CEQA. In addition, none of the exceptions specified in Section 15300.2 of CEQA Guidelines would apply that would preclude the use of this CEQA exemption: the project site is not located in a sensitive environment, the project would not have a significant effect on the environment, the project would not damage scenic resources, the project would not be located on a hazardous waste site, nor would the project cause a change to a historical resource. Therefore, this project is categorically exempt from CEQA.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company is for an amount not to exceed $610,468 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget in the following accounts:', 'Account No.', 'Description', 'FY 2017-18', 'C209102.589000', 'Edison Language Academy Safe Routes', '$ 502,055', 'C014073.589000', 'Bicycle Project Readiness & Grant Match', '$  36,748', 'C459094.589000', 'Pedestrian Action Plan Implementation Readiness & Grant Match', '$ 24,299', 'Total Funds Available', '$ 563,102', 'Award of this construction contract will require the following budget changes:', '1. Increase revenue budget at account 20267.404041 to receive additional grant funds in the amount of $47,366.', '2. Increase expenditure budget at account C209102.589000 in the amount of $47,366 to reflect receipt of the additional Caltrans Edison Safe Routes to', 'School grant funds. This will increase the grant amount to $549,421.', 'The total project cost of $610,468 will consist of $549,421 of grant funds and $61,047 of project readiness grant match funds.']}
{'Title': 'Bus Body Repairs and Painting Services', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4318 to Carlos Guzman Inc., a California-based company, to provide body repair and painting of transit coaches;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Carlos Guzman Inc., in an amount not to exceed $703,098 for one year, with four (4) additional contract years, in the amount of $2,812,392 on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $3,515,490 over a five-year period which includes a $319,590 10% contingency with future year funding contingent on City Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends the award of Bid #4318 to Carlos Guzman Inc. to provide bus body repairs and painting services as required by Big Blue Bus (BBB). The award is for a specified hourly labor rate and materials price plus applicable sales taxes for a five-year period with successive contract years at the same price, terms, and conditions as the first contract year. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $3,515,490 which includes a 10% contingency, over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'The body repair and painting of transit buses are necessary to address normal wear and tear and accident damage during the 12-year useful life of a bus. This service ensures that buses with damaged exteriors can be repaired and returned to service in a timely manner. On June 23, 2015, Council awarded bid #4183 to Carlos Guzman for an amount not to exceed $1,950,000 over a three-year period. The resulting agreement expires on June 30, 2018, requiring BBB to solicit bids for body repairs and painting services for its fleet of transit buses.', 'Discussion', 'The City’s fleet of transit buses require body repair and painting services for buses that become damaged through normal wear and tear or accidents. It is essential that repairs be made promptly to preserve acceptable customer service levels. BBB staff performs minor body repairs in-house; however, repairs and painting resulting from major accidents exceeds BBB’s capabilities, workspace, and staffing levels. The amount of work needed to keep the fleet in an as-new condition is equivalent to nine Full Time Employee’s (FTE’s) time.', 'BBB currently has one full time employee performing minor body repairs. Transit buses requiring extensive repairs and painting are sent to an outside body shop that can repair multiple buses simultaneously. In addition, the outside body shop has a drive-in paint booth that can accommodate 30’, 40’, and 60’ buses. Per Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) regulations, extensive painting must be performed in a paint booth. BBB’s facility does not have a paint booth because of its close proximity to a school.', 'Due to the number of buses requiring body repair and paint services to keep BBB’s fleet in an as-new condition, the space required, and the EPA requirement of a paint booth staff recommends that overflow body repair and painting services be awarded under Bid #4318.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014 staff was directed by Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” Transit Bus Body Painting and Repair services were identified as meeting the criteria for contractual services due to specialized technology and expertise, space requirements, capital equipment requirements, and excessive risk associated with painting buses.', 'Based on the number of buses requiring body repair and paint services to keep the fleet in an as-new condition, bringing this service in-house would require a minimum of nine (9) additional FTEs, two additional work bays and a paint booth to accommodate 30’, 40’, and 60’ coaches. Bid #4318 requires vendors to have a fully enclosed paint booth in their facility in accordance with Federal, State, and Local rules and regulations, and requires vendors to have certified painters and technicians on staff. The bid also requires vendors to have their own repair facility, which may be subject to approval by BBB staff.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On February 1, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide bus body repairs and painting services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Seven (7) vendors downloaded the bid. Proposals from Carlos Guzman Inc. and McCray Enterprises were received and publicly opened on February 21 2018.', 'Cost Estimate', 'Carlos Guzman', 'McCray Enterprises', 'Estimate - 5- year period', '$ 3,195,900.00', '$ 3,467,750.00', '10% Contingency', '$ 319,590.00', '$ 346,775.00', 'Contract 5yr Total', '$ 3,515,490.00', '$ 3,814,525.00', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, which include price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product and compliance with City specifications. In evaluating the bids, BBB staff requested two paint samples from each vendor, and performed three tests to gauge quality of paint work: a gloss test, an orange peel test, and a pull test. Both vendors met BBB’s expectations on all tests, though Carlos Guzman Inc.’s sample scored higher on the gloss test. BBB staff reviewed the cost proposal submitted by Carlos Guzman and compared it to the previous agreement and found the cost increase to be reasonable. Carlos Guzman Inc. has had a positive history of providing bus body repairs and painting services for Big Blue Bus and is able to meet all of the City’s requirements in addition to being the lowest bidder. Based on these criteria, Carlos Guzman Inc. is recommended as the best bidder and staff recommends that Council award Bid #4318 to Carlos Guzman Inc. for bus body repair and painting services. The total expenditure for the five-year period is not to exceed $3,515,490.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Carlos Guzman Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $3,515,490 which includes a 10% contingency. Funds of $703,098 are available in the FY 2018-19 Approved Budget in the Big Blue Bus Department. The contract will be charged to 60600008.550012. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Pilot-Program License Agreement with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. for the Third Street Promenade to provide public-serving programs and amenities', 'Department': 'Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a pilot-program license agreement with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. for the Third Street Promenade to provide public-serving programs and amenities for an initial term of one year with four, one-year renewal options with no license fee.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Changing consumer preferences and increased competition in the retail environment are impacting the iconic Third Street Promenade (Promenade) in Downtown Santa Monica, as reflected by increased store vacancies and the closing of many retail operations, including the Barnes & Noble store, which was an anchor on the north end of the Promenade. To promote community, encourage public visitation and use, and help ensure that the Promenade (including in particular its northernmost block) remains vibrant, inviting, and safe, staff recommends that the City enter into a pilot-program license agreement with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) to provide public-serving programs and amenities on the Promenade, with a focus on its 1200 block between Arizona Avenue and Wilshire Boulevard. The duration of the pilot-program license agreement would be for an initial term of one year with up to four one-year renewal options on the same terms and conditions, for a total license term of up to five years, without a license fee.', 'Background', 'The Third Street Promenade’s public spaces have become important community gathering places and a significant contributor to the success of the Promenade and Santa Monica’s Downtown. In 1989, the City and downtown property owners had the foresight to invest in creating enhanced public spaces, which included the renovation of the public right-of-way and the addition of a variety of streetscape elements. Residents and visitors have been drawn to the Promenade’s unique urban setting, which features street performers, restaurants and outdoor dining, specialty merchandise, entertainment venues, flexible plazas, welcoming ambassadors, and enhanced maintenance services. The bustling, colorful scene along the Promenade provides a safe place for community gathering that encourages repeat visitation and supports a healthy mix of retail, restaurant, and entertainment uses. Research and experience in Santa Monica and nationally demonstrate the value of “placemaking” to promote community gathering spaces that are shared and welcoming, and that as a result are also safer.', 'The most northern of the three blocks, the 1200 block of the Promenade located between Arizona Avenue and Wilshire Boulevard, has traditionally not generated the same level of visitation and pedestrian activity as the Promenade’s other two blocks for a variety of reasons, including its distance from the Santa Monica Pier, Santa Monica Place, and key transportation access points such as the I-10 Freeway and more recently, the Expo light-rail terminus. Additionally, the Barnes & Noble bookstore at the southeast corner of Third Street and Wilshire Boulevard, which served as an anchor for the 1200 block of the Promenade for over 20 years, closed in January 2018, citing the need to downsize their store space and seek a more affordable location. Given the recent trends in retail and increasing competition from online retailers, the closing was unfortunate for downtown, though not unexpected. Other retail closings have occurred throughout the Promenade, and these, coupled with a growing movement towards e-commerce, have contributed to decreased visitation and pedestrian activity in the Promenade as a whole.', 'DTSM has prioritized business retention and recruitment to address changing consumer preferences and the continued competition of online sales. DTSM’s Board of Directors created the Promenade Tenancy Committee in 2017 for the purpose of vetting proposed programs, strategies, and tactics designed to support downtown’s retail, restaurant, entertainment, and other active uses. DTSM has also identified the need to expand the level of public-serving amenities to increase visitation and pedestrian activity and attract patrons to support the area’s businesses. As Promenade businesses compete with internet commerce, as well as other retail destinations like The Grove and the newly renovated Westfield Century City, DTSM has sought to differentiate Downtown Santa Monica and the Promenade. One element of differentiation is creating interactive, people-focused experiences that are not available elsewhere, and which buttress the Promenade’s identification by the public as a safe and entertaining community gathering space. DTSM has enhanced the Promenade’s public spaces by creating engaging activities and installations, such as the Picnic on the Promenade summer activities and December’s holiday pop-up art installation.', 'The City has a history of sensitivity to concerns about privatizing public space. While traditional malls and newer “lifestyle centers” like the Grove exert private property rights over their circulation and gathering spaces, historic commercial areas in revitalized urban areas are genuinely public spaces. Working in partnership with a non-profit, stakeholder-based organization like DTSM offers an opportunity to animate and manage public spaces while ensuring public access and, indeed, increasing their attractiveness as community gathering spaces. DTSM has been granted other licenses to activate the City’s public spaces such as the very successful ice rink at 5th Street and Arizona Avenue. DTSM has also entered into pilot-program license agreements to provide public-serving amenities along Ocean Avenue near Tongva Park and public art installations at Triangle Square adjacent to the Colorado Esplanade.', 'The Ocean Avenue activation is being permitted and is expected to begin by early summer. The downtown public art installation programming, in partnership with Community and Cultural Services, is planned to continue through Labor Day 2018. The City also entered into a pilot program to establish DTSM ambassador services in Tongva and Palisades Parks to provide hospitality services, assist with monitoring and maintenance of the spaces, and address quality of life issues. The initial success of these programs have created a positive impact on visitors’ perception of safety and cleanliness, and demonstrated the value of “placemaking” to promote shared, welcoming environments, which in turn enhances safety and helps to create more vibrant public spaces.', 'Discussion', 'With the continued growth of online shopping, customers who have traditionally been lured by brand names and new products are seeking more of an "experience" in a commercial district, rather than simply a place to shop. In an effort to keep the Promenade competitive and fresh in the public’s perception, to continue to offer a unique and attractive public community experience to both residents and visitors in one of the City’s key public spaces, and to help sustain one of the City’s economic engines, DTSM proposes to activate the Promenade (particularly its 1200 block) by offering public-serving amenities and other interactive experiences that enhance the sense of place and engage the community. The City has initiated the process of developing a strategy to sustain Santa Monica’s vibrant economy as technology and globalism rapidly change the way we live and work. One possible focus of the strategy is to address how e-commerce is impacting the retail environment. Even though the full extent of the impact to the retail environment is unknown at this time, studies and experiential efforts have shown that consumers are increasingly adopting the convenience of online shopping while seeking personal experiences such as dining or interactive retail experiences. To curate a great downtown environment and to continue to support a vibrant public space for community engagement, there is a growing need to provide an engaging environment that heightens the public’s experience.', 'Based on DTSM’s experience and success with programming activities and events, staff recommends entering into a pilot-program license agreement with DTSM to assist with increasing pedestrian experiences on the Promenade, with a focus on its north block. The proposed pilot-program license agreement would allow DTSM to provide pedestrian-oriented services and amenities within the Promenade, with a focus on the approximately 4,800-square-foot public plaza of the 1200 block of the Promenade, exclusive of any existing outdoor-dining license areas. Activation of the area with pedestrian-oriented amenities, experiential activities, and event programming is intended to help create connections between the north and south ends of the Promenade, increase overall public visitation (including in particular increased pedestrian activity at the north end of the Promenade), develop a greater sense of place, and build community. The goals and objectives align with the guiding principles of the Downtown Community Plan.', 'The terms of the license agreement are recommended to allow DTSM to program the Promenade daily from approximately 7 AM until 10 PM. DTSM staff and ambassadors would be allowed to set up the following, all of which would be available to the public for use:', '· Tables, chairs, umbrellas, and other moveable furniture', '· Games and interactive displays such as pianos and ping-pong tables', '· Dog treats and water bowls', '· Audio system and staging (for use by musicians, DJs, and performers who have obtained required permits, with scheduling as necessary by DTSM)', '· Additional trashcans and recycle bins', 'The terms of the recommended license agreement would also permit DTSM, during the same hours and in the same space, to have ambassadors or staff available to assist public use of the provided amenities. DTSM would also be allowed to post signage, bearing both DTSM’s and the City’s logos, promoting the Promenade as a public gathering space.', 'As part of the pilot program, staff recommends that DTSM be provided with the flexibility and creativity to adjust the types of programs and uses within the license area that are most impactful to enhancing the public’s experience and attracting increased public visitation. In turn, DTSM would provide regular reports to the City detailing the success of various programs and uses in increasing foot traffic and community engagement. DTSM would also study the use of temporary seating by observing the way people interact with moveable furniture. Staff seeks administrative discretion to modify the scope of DTSM services within the license agreement to respond to the success of programs and uses in enhancing community engagement and promoting a unique downtown public environment.', 'DTSM will also continue to obtain event permits pursuant to the generally applicable events permitting process to provide additional public community engagement activities, at times co-sponsored by local businesses. As DTSM learns the relative success of various programs, DTSM may seek to enter into a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with the City to present additional events outside of that process to further the City’s goals. Staff anticipates presenting any such MOU to the Council for approval.', 'General License Agreement Terms', 'The proposed terms of the license agreement are as follows:', '· A one-year term with up to four one-year renewal options for a total license term of up to five years, without a license fee.', '· Either party may terminate the license agreement with 30 days’ notice.', '· Tentative hours for the license area would be daily from approximately 7 AM to 10 PM, with an ability to adjust the hours based on seasonality and program activity.', '· Rules and regulations may be developed, posted, and enforced by the City.', '· DTSM would be responsible for providing adequate staffing to ensure consistent monitoring within the license area while maintaining public access.', '· DTSM would ensure that any sub-licensee or subcontracted vendors maintain and provide adequate insurance coverage and comply with all rules, regulations, and laws, while maintaining public access.', '· DTSM would be responsible for providing, maintaining, and securing any tables, chairs, or other furniture or improvements installed within the license area.', '· At the termination of the license agreement, DTSM would be responsible for the removal of any improvements installed and any repairs required to the license areas as a result of the installation of improvements.', '· All improvements or installations within the license area would be coordinated in advance with Public Works, Planning, and Building and Safety to ensure adherence with administrative policies and municipal code requirements.', '· Commencement of the services is estimated to occur in early summer 2018, following execution of the license agreement.', '· The City would continue to provide the same level of routine maintenance services and repairs for the licensed right-of-way area.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Upholstery Services for Transit Buses and Fire Vehicles', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #4321 to Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe, a California-based company, to provide upholstery service for Big Blue Bus and Fire Department Vehicles;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe, in an amount not to exceed $106,028 for one year, with four (4)additional contract years, in the amount of $513,179 which includes a 3% annual cost escalator and a 10% contingency, for an amount not to exceed $619,206 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on City Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends the award of Bid #4321 to Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe to provide re-upholstery and installation of transit bus passenger seats, bus operator seats, and Fire vehicles, at specified unit prices plus applicable sales taxes for a five-year period with successive years at 3% price increase. Due to the high volume of passengers who ride Big Blue Bus (BBB), seat replacement is an ongoing maintenance program. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $619,206 which includes a 10% contingency, over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'Upholstery services for BBB’s transit buses, passenger seats and operator seats are necessary to repair any seating damage that may occur during the normal operation of transit buses and fire vehicles. BBB has historically contracted out this service which ensures that seating standards are maintained, offering a clean and pleasant environment for Big Blue Bus passengers. On July 14, 2015, City Council awarded Bid #4180 to Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe for an amount not to exceed $306,900 over a three-year period. The existing contract ends on June 30, 2018 requiring BBB to solicit bids for upholstery services for its fleet of transit buses and Fire Department vehicles.', 'Discussion', 'The City’s fleet of transit buses requires routine seat re-upholstery to maintain seating standards and offer a clean surface, free of gum, excessive grease, dirt and unsightly graffiti. Due to the high volume of passengers who ride BBB buses, an average of one hundred six-teen (116) seat cushions, and sixty-six (66) seat back rests are replaced every week. The upholstery service provider would conduct a weekly inspection of all bus passenger and operator seats, re-upholster seat inserts, and remove and replace worn seats as needed. The upholstery service would also re-upholster the original equipment manufacturer’s bus operator and fire vehicles seats to ensure that operators of these vehicles have safe, comfortable seats after the original seats have worn out. The award of this bid would enable BBB to maintain the seating in its fleet of transit buses and fire vehicles to BBB standards, providing a safe and clean environment for its passengers and operators.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014 staff was directed by Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” seven criteria were established to determine proper use of contracted staff. Of these, “Specialized/Technical expertise,” “Space Requirements,” and “Capital/Equipment Requirements” are relevant to BBB’s decision to contract the transit bus and Fire vehicle re-upholstery service.', 'Bid #4321 requires the vendor to provide all necessary tooling and equipment to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment. Staff has evaluated the feasibility of conducting the re-upholstery service in–house. It was found that current staff does not have the technical expertise to perform this service. Two full-time employees with upholstery expertise would have to be hired to perform the services provided by the contractor. The current facility does not have sufficient space to house required staff and equipment necessary to provide the upholstery service. It is estimated that approximately 1,000 square ft. of space would be needed to house the two FTE’s and equipment.', 'Based on the criteria outlined in the January 13, 2015 staff report, and the added costs associated with bring this service in-house, staff recommends that City Council award Bid #4321 to Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe for bus and fire vehicle re-upholstery services. The total expense for the five-year term is not to exceed $619,206.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On February 15, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide transit bus and fire vehicle upholstery services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twelve (12) vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on March 6, 2018 per the table below:', 'Cost Estimate', 'Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe', 'Estimate 5-year Period', '$562,914', '10% Contingency', '$ 56,291', 'Contract 5-year Total', '$619,206', 'The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. There were no “No Bid” responses and procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid. Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe has had a positive history of providing re-upholstery services for transit buses and Fire vehicles to the Big Blue Bus and is able to meet all of the City’s requirements. In addition, staff compared the bid pricing to the previous price submitted by Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe and determined the new bid pricing to be reasonable. Based on these criteria, Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe is for an amount not to exceed $619,206 which includes a 3% annual cost escalator and a 10% contingency. Funds of $106,028 are available in the FY 2018-19 Approved Budget in the Big Blue Bus and Fire departments. The contract will be charged to accounts 60600008.550012 ($99,278) and 01190001.529470 ($6,750). Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award Bid for Unleaded Fuel', 'Department': 'Public Works, Street & Fleet Services', 'Sponsors': 'Fire Chief Bill Walker, Director Edward F. King', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4296 to Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc., a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of Top-Tier unleaded gasoline;Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue purchase orders with Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc. for the purchase and delivery of Top-Tier unleaded gasoline in the amount not to exceed $864,946 (includes a 20% contingency) for one full year, with five-additional one-year renewal options to extend on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $5,189,676 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City utilizes unleaded gasoline for emergency response vehicles in the Fire and Police departments, as well as hybrid vehicles in the Big Blue Bus (BBB) Department. The use of Top-Tier unleaded gasoline supports the City’s Sustainable City Plan goals for reduced emissions and sustainability by increasing engine performance, which enhances the ability of vehicles to maintain the Environmental Protection Agency’s Tier 2 emission standards. Staff recommends issuing purchase orders with Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc. for the purchase and delivery of Top-Tier unleaded gasoline for a total amount not exceed $5,189,676 (includes a 20% contingency) over a six-year period.', 'Background', 'On April 24, 2012, the City Council awarded bid #3087 to IPC, Inc. to supply and deliver unleaded fuel for a period of five years and two months, through June 30, 2017 (Attachment A).  The City has continued to purchase unleaded fuel through IPC, Inc. on interim purchase orders until a formal bid for unleaded fuel could be completed. The vendor agreed to extend the price, terms, and conditions for an additional nine months. The City currently has emergency response and hybrid vehicles that operate on unleaded gasoline. These vehicles include Police motorcycles, patrol and detective cars, Big Blue Bus gas/electric hybrid vehicles, and various Fire emergency response vehicles. The City’s reduced emissions fuel policy currently allows an exception for the use of unleaded gasoline for the operation of emergency response vehicles, and for hybrid vehicles still in service. The Big Blue Bus, Fire, and Public Works departments maintain fuel storage tanks at their locations, including the Big Blue Bus corporate yard, Fire Stations 1, 3, and 5, and the City Yards facilities, where these vehicles obtain fuel.', 'Discussion', 'City vehicles use approximately 263,500 gallons of fuel annually and the bid was based on this amount. In this bid, staff provided the Oil Price Information Service (OPIS) rate from January 29, 2018 as the baseline for vendors to bid a percentage above or below (+/-) the OPIS rate provided, and the City required Top-Tier detergent unleaded gasoline in an effort to improve engine performance in those vehicles that use unleaded fuel. The Top-Tier detergent fuel additive helps to control and minimize deposits on engine components, which helps to increase engine performance. As a result, the ability of a vehicle to maintain the Environmental Protection Agency’s Tier 2 emission standards is enhanced.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On January 29, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver 263,500 gallons of Top-Tier unleaded fuel in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-one vendors downloaded the bid. Six bids were received and publicly opened on February 15, 2018.', 'Total Price', 'Per Gallon Price', 'Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc.', '$720,788.44', '$2.73554', 'Falcon Fuels, Inc.', '$725,067.68', '$2.75168', 'Merrimac Petroleum, Inc.', '$745,705.00', '$2.83000', 'IPC (USA) -', '$747,681.25', '$2.83750', 'Southern Counties Oil Co.', '$751,735.20', '$2.85289', 'Petroleum Traders Corporation', '$760,250.20', '$2.88520', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc. offered a product consistent with City specifications, as well as a lower fixed price adjustment and fixed freight charges over the life of the agreement, providing a level of price security in the outer years of the agreement. Based on these criteria, staff recommends that the City Council award bid #4296 to Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc., as required by the Street and Fleet Services Division, Fire Department, and Big Blue Bus, in an amount of $864,946, including $223,229 for the remainder of FY 2017-18, for a total amount not to exceed $5,189,676.', 'The annual costs are based on the estimated usage of 263,500 gallons of fuel annually.  The total price noted in the table above is the price per gallon based on the January 29, 2018 OPIS price. The price per gallon will vary throughout the agreement term, based on the percent discount on the OPIS price, which fluctuates. As this award would run from April 24, 2018 through April 23, 2024, funding of $223,229 is being requested for the remainder of FY 2017-18, from April 24, 2018 to June 30, 2018 for the initial purchase order, as noted in the Financial impacts section. The not to exceed amount includes a 20% contingency for anticipated fluctuations in unleaded gasoline prices. Per market research, it is anticipated that an annualized average of 3.1% increase in gasoline prices will occur over the next three years, as well as possible changes in consumption over the next six years.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The purchase orders to be awarded to Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc. are for an amount not to exceed $5,189,676. Funds of $223,229 are included in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Big Blue Bus, Fire, and Public Works departments. The purchase orders will be charged to the following accounts:', '54459.522910', '“Vehicles-Fuels/Lubrication”', '$ 83,710', '01312.522910', '“Vehicles-Fuels/Lubrication”', '$ 13,951', '41654.522961', '“Fuel - Service Vehicles”', '$125,568', 'Total', '$223,229', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Contract Modification for Design Services for Safe Routes to School Pedestrian Improvements at Four Schools', 'Department': 'Mobility (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement #10551 (CCS) in the amount of $59,263 with Anderson Penna, a California-based company, for engineering design services for pedestrian safety improvements. This will result in a 3 year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $208,389.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'As part of the Council’s Strategic Goal of “creating a new model for mobility,” Santa Monica is pursuing a comprehensive approach to making walking, biking and transit safer and more attractive options. A key element of this effort is the commitment to Vision Zero, the goal of eliminating deaths and severe injuries from traffic collisions. This contract modification facilitates expedited implementation of Vision Zero “jump start” projects. Anderson Penna is presently providing engineering design services for the Safe Routes to School Pedestrian Improvements at Four Schools project, which includes curb extensions, and improved signing, striping and pavement markings at multiple locations to facilitate pedestrian safety and comfort. Staff recommends modifying the professional services agreement with Anderson Penna for engineering design services for the same types of improvements at a limited number of additional locations in order to efficiently and expeditiously deliver critical safety enhancements. Doing so will further expedite project delivery, as it will enable the construction bid package for both projects to be combined.', 'Background', '“Creating a new model for Mobility” is one of Council’s top five Strategic Goals. A central tenet of this goal, along with the Pedestrian Action Plan, is to achieve Vision Zero, which calls for the elimination of all fatal and severe injury collisions through data-driven design, engineering, enforcement, and educational interventions. On May 9, 2017 (Attachment A), Council gave direction regarding creation of a Vision Zero action strategy and on June 27, 2017 (Attachment B), Council allocated $500,000 toward Vision Zero jump start projects to occur within two years. The Vision Zero jump start projects, which would be designed under this contract modification, include the installation of targeted physical improvements to be complemented with other education, encouragement and enforcement efforts.', 'On September 26, 2017 (Attachment C) Council authorized a professional services agreement with Anderson Penna, a California-based company, in an amount not to exceed $149,126 to provide engineering design services for the Safe Routes to School Pedestrian Improvements for John Adams and Lincoln Middle Schools, Roosevelt Elementary School and the Will Rogers Learning Community.', 'Discussion', 'On November 17, 2017, the City entered into a professional services agreement with Anderson Penna to design pedestrian safety improvements, which include installing curb extensions and flashing beacons, and improving pavement markings and crossings around four schools in Santa Monica:John Adams and Lincoln Middle Schools, Roosevelt Elementary School, and Will Rogers Learning Community. The purpose of the project is to increase visibility of pedestrians, shorten crossing distances, and improve overall pedestrian safety, especially for students, parents, and faculty.', 'On June 27, 2017, Council allocated funds to the Vision Zero program to complete six “jump start” projects, three of which, like the Pedestrian Improvements at Four Schools projects, also aim to reduce pedestrian exposure to automobiles, shorten crossing distances, and enhance overall pedestrian safety through the following targeted physical improvements:', '1. Improve the Pico Boulevard and Stewart Street/28th Street crossing with a curb extension and leading pedestrian interval to increase pedestrian visibility and reduce pedestrian exposure,', '2. Improve either the Santa Monica Boulevard and 6th Street or Broadway and 5th Street intersection with two curb extensions and leading pedestrian intervals to increase pedestrian visibility and reduce pedestrian exposure,', '3. Pilot pedestrian and cyclist protections on Arizona Avenue at McKinley Elementary School or similar location.', 'Staff has completed field observations and refined the scope of the projects based on initial feasibility assessment. Due to the presence of storm drains and existing curb heights, building permanent curb extensions at Santa Monica Boulevard and 6th Street or Broadway and 5th Street would require extensive hydrological and civil engineering work that would exceed the available budget. Other Vision Zero communities, including Los Angeles, Austin, and New York City, have had success with piloting treatments to reduce pedestrian exposure that do not modify the existing curb design or height, thereby achieving safety improvements at a fraction of the cost. The kit of parts for these types of treatments includes reflective delineators, paint, thermoplastic, and portable planters or other attractive vehicle safety barriers.', 'By making use of this type of treatment, sufficient budget will be available in the Vision Zero jump start allocation for curb extensions at both downtown intersections (Santa Monica Boulevard and 6th Street and Broadway and 5th Street), as well as an additional location prioritized by parents at Franklin Elementary School‒a new crosswalk and curb extensions at Washington Avenue and 25th Street near Franklin Elementary. Finally, through conversations with school parents and administration, staff has identified the intersection of Arizona Avenue and Chelsea Avenue for curb extensions and cyclist protections at McKinley Elementary School. These improvements will advance Safe Routes to School Efforts in the Northeast Neighborhood for both McKinley and Franklin Elementary Schools.', 'Like the Pedestrian Improvements at Four Schools project, the Vision Zero jump start projects aim to increase pedestrian safety by installing curb extensions and crosswalks, and enhance signing and striping, which will limit pedestrian exposure to automobiles, shorten crossings, increase pedestrian visibility and overall safety.', 'To complete the design and construction of the Vision Zero jump start projects in an expeditious manner, staff recommends modifying the existing contract with  Anderson Penna to design pedestrian improvements near four schools, to include design work for the additional pedestrian improvements near Franklin Elementary and McKinley Elementary, and the intersections of Pico Boulevard and 28th Street, Santa Monica Boulevard and 6th Street, and Broadway and 5th Street). The firm is well positioned to fit this work into the existing contract schedule without delaying the ongoing work. Furthermore, doing so would allow for the construction phase of both projects to be bid collectively, thereby expediting project delivery and the safety enhancement of these critical locations.', 'Next Steps', 'Upon execution of a contract modification, Anderson Penna would begin design work and staff would conduct community outreach as necessary. Construction is anticipated to begin in early 2019.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On July 24th, 2017 the City published Notices Inviting Bids to obtain design services for the Safe Routes to School – Pedestrian Improvements at Four Schools project. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 68 vendors downloaded the bid request and three proposals were received on August 14th, 2017. Based on the RFP criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommended Anderson Penna as the best qualified firm to provide design services for this project. Anderson Penna demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with regard to pedestrian safety projects, and similar capital improvement projects in the Cities of Anaheim, Downey, and Laguna Beach. Through these projects, Anderson Penna also demonstrated its ability to offer project design on schedule and at a competitive price.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Anderson Penna is $59,263, for an amended contract total not to exceed $208,389. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019214.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Execute Agreement for Food Waste Prevention and Rescue Grant Program', 'Department': 'Public Works, Resource Recovery & Recycling', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $100,000 from the California Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery (CalRecycle) Food Waste Prevention and Rescue Grant Program for a Santa Monica food recovery and donation program, and to accept all grant renewals;2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant and all grant renewals; andAuthorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In pursuing a sustainable city of wellbeing, the Council in 2014 adopted a policy of “Zero Waste” with the goal of achieving 95% diversion by 2030.Every year, Santa Monica residents and businesses throw away close to 6,000 tons of food that could potentially be redistributed and consumed. The City has been awarded a $100,000 grant from the California Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery (CalRecycle) Food Waste Prevention and Rescue Grant Program to address this issue. With the grant funding, the City would develop a food recovery and donation pilot program to organize food forums, raise awareness on food waste prevention and reduction, identify interested partners and stakeholders, provide program participants with access to equipment, supplies, and technology to facilitate donation storage and delivery, and collect data to measure results. If successful, this program could be a resource for vulnerable local populations and help the City achieve its sustainability goals. Staff recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to accept the $100,000 CalRecycle Grant and execute all necessary documents to accept the grant and all grant renewals.', 'Background', 'On August 8, 2017, the City Council adopted resolution number 11073 (CCS) authorizing staff to apply for all CalRecycle grants and the City Manager to execute all related grant documents over five years through August 2022 (Attachment A). Subsequently, staff applied for the CalRecycle Food Waste Prevention and Rescue Grant Program. The first of its kind in CalRecycle history, the program aims to lower statewide greenhouse gas emissions by supporting food waste prevention projects to reduce the amount of food discarded in landfills.', 'On March 8, 2018, the State notified the City that it has been awarded $100,000 in grant funding to develop a food recovery and donation program. The grant requires that the funded program results in reductions in greenhouse gas emissions related to food materials and increases in food materials diverted from landfill. There is no City match, but costs must be incurred prior to April 2020 to be eligible for reimbursement.', 'Discussion', 'The latest data from CalRecycle estimated that approximately 32,513 tons of food waste is generated in Santa Monica annually. Up to 18%, or 5,852 tons, is potentially edible and could be recovered and redistributed. Restaurants are the largest producers of food waste. One estimate indicated food service operations throw away up to 10% of the food ingredients purchased before they reach consumers.', 'Accordingly, Santa Monica’s food recovery and donation pilot program funded by this grant would focus on reducing food waste from the commercial sector. First, staff from the Resource Recovery and Recycling Division and the Human Services Division would connect to identify food donation and collection organizations that may be interested in participating in the program. Concurrently, the City would also hire a non-profit organization via a competitive bidding process to help coordinate and facilitate the program. The non-profit would assist the City with hosting food forums by bringing together stakeholders from local restaurants, grocery stores, businesses, and human services organizations to begin a dialog on food waste prevention and donation. The goal of these conversations is to raise awareness, educate local constituents, gauge interest and share ideas, identify potential partners, and develop a network of businesses that generate food waste and organizations that could beneficially reuse that food.', 'Once participating businesses who are interested in donating food as well as human services organizations who are interested in receiving food have been identified, the City may elect to enter into agreements with these stakeholders to ensure that they meet the City’s and CalRecycle’s terms and conditions associated with program. Staff from the Resource Recovery and Recycling Division and the non-profit would conduct pre-waste audits at the participating business locations to benchmark the percentage of edible versus non-edible food waste generated by these establishments. After the preliminary audit, the City would provide program partners with necessary supplies and equipment, such as containers and potentially refrigerators, for the safe storage and delivery of the surplus food.', 'The partnered food donation and collection organizations would assist with identifying local disadvantaged demographics that may benefit from receiving food donations. Utilizing an existing mobile application, food donation and collection would be made as convenient and on-demand as possible for participants. The edible food collected would be donated to the populations in need throughout the City; the remaining non-edible food waste, including food-soiled paper, would be diverted from the landfill through composting programs.', 'The pilot program would include periodic waste audits at each participating food establishment to measure effectiveness, evaluate benchmarks, and set new goals. The City would continue to track food donation and food waste reduction data to analyze program success. The pilot program is anticipated to last up to two years, during which time the City will be required to report periodic program updates to CalRecycle.', 'This pilot program intends to achieve multiple goals:', '· raise awareness about food waste prevention and reduction;', '· provides an outlet, managed by the City, to redirect surplus food to the local vulnerable populations;', '· aligns with the State’s Senate Bill 1383 requirements of recovering 20% of food waste for human consumption by 2025; and', '· helps the City achieve its Council-adopted Zero Waste Goal by 2030.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Award of a $100,000 grant from the CalRecycle Food Waste Prevention and Rescue Grant Program requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', 'If renewals are awarded, budget changes will be included in subsequent year budgets, contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Contractual Services Agreement for Facility Security Equipment and Services', 'Department': 'Information Services Department', 'Sponsors': 'Director Susan Cline', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Siemens Industry, Inc. (Siemens), a California-based company, facility security equipment, systems and services, including related equipment and supplies in an amount not to exceed $1,500,000 over five years, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; andAuthorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Siemens for building automation system upgrades and expansion in an amount not to exceed $1,215,847 (including a 10% contingency).These recommended awards are made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (b), in a total amount not to exceed $2,715,847.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City utilizes access control and building automation system (BAS) equipment installed at various City facilities to control facility access, mechanical systems, and energy use. These systems require regular maintenance, upgrades, and enhancements to both hardware and software components. To accommodate the necessary repairs and expansion of the facility access control and BAS systems throughout City facilities, staff recommends entering into contracts with Siemens in an amount not to exceed $1,500,000 over five years for access control and in an amount not to exceed $1,215,847 (including a 10% contingency) for building automation systems, which would result in a total amount not to exceed of $2,715,847. For the first year, staff anticipates spending a total of $300,000 on access control and the entire $1,215,847 on BAS equipment and services, for a total first year amount of $1,515,847.', 'Background', 'The need for facility access control (both internally and externally as needed) and BAS improvements and modifications at City buildings such as the Library, City Hall, Public Safety Facility, and other locations, has grown over the years. The access control requests are the result of retrofits to various areas of City Hall stemming from the construction of the City Services Building and the need to enhance security at City locations. The BAS requests are largely the result of needing additional monitoring and control of additional systems or sites throughout the City. Installation and maintenance of both of these types of systems require the services of certified service experts, such as Siemens, that specialize in such control systems.', 'Discussion', 'Facility Access Control', 'Awarding a multi-year purchase order to Siemens will give staff the flexibility to schedule service calls and projects as needed to complete a significant backlog of pending projects and address new installation requests.', 'Staff is currently working to implement a comprehensive security and access strategy and has identified six priority locations as well as 20 to 30 additional locations where access control should be installed and standardized before the City Services Building (CSB) opens in 2020.', 'Facility Building Automation System', 'The City currently uses a proprietary Siemens Industry BAS to monitor and control the mechanical systems and energy usage at six existing facilities (Public Safety Facility, City Hall, Ken Edwards Center, Parking Structure 6, Annenberg Beach House, Pico Library) and is scheduled to add two additional sites as part of their new construction (City Services Building and Fire Station 1). A portion of the hardware and software from the existing system has reached the end of its useful life, is no longer supported by Siemens, and must be replaced. In addition to these necessary repairs, staff recommends expansion of the system by installing and equipping four additional sites with Siemens BAS controls (Main Library, Virgina Avenue Park Teen and Park Centers, Fire Station 2, Airport Administration Building).', 'Siemens BAS provides computerized controls and real time graphics to let staff see what is happening with the heating, ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC) equipment in a building without multiple trips to the site, thereby saving on costly problem determination visits and simplifying maintenance operations. Computerized controls monitor HVAC equipment status and helps in heading off unexpected problems. They also help to maintain even temperatures and humidity levels within the facilities in order to provide measured comfort, which then leads to reduction of overrunning the equipment and hence saving energy. Moreover, running the equipment less and controlling it more efficiently reduces wear and tear, keeps maintenance costs down, and extends equipment life expectancy. The automated fault detection and diagnostics of these newer systems have been found to help reduce downtime and operations and maintenance costs by as much as 30%.', 'Vendor Selection', 'In 2017,National Joint Powers Alliance (NJPA)solicited and issued request for proposals (RFP) #031517 for the procurement of facility security equipment, systems, and services with related equipment and supplies. Upon completion of the RFP process, a contract was established with Siemens, which includes manufacturer volume discounts and rebates forNJPAmembers, a multi-year contract term, and price verification mechanisms to assure pricing compliance and accuracy. NJPA contracts are supported and widely used by government agencies throughout theUnited States. As a member, the City of Santa Monica can participate inNJPAcontracts. By entering into a contract with Siemens, all pricing would be based on NJPA contract # 031517-SIE.', 'Section 2.24.080 (b) of the Municipal Code allows exception to competitive bid procedures when such competitive bid procedures have already been utilized, such as in purchasing from Federal, State, County, City or special district government agencies, or from cooperative purchasing agencies consisting of such agencies.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be issued toSiemens for access control is for an amount not to exceed $1,500,000over five years.Funds for access control related equipment and services are included in the proposed FY 2017-18 budget within departments’ budgets.Budget authority for subsequent years will be requested in each budget for Council approval.Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.', 'The agreement to be issued to Siemens for BAS improvements is for an amount not to exceed $1,215,847 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the Public Works Department. The agreement will be charged to the following account: M010085.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Fleet Composition Study', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Finance & Administrative Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '04. Study Sessions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Review, and provide guidance to staff on the future implementation of a BBB vehicle propulsion technology for the BBB fleet to achieve a goal of Zero Emissions;2) Provide feedback regarding a proof of concept program for evaluating the operational effectiveness and efficiency of a sub-fleet of electric buses which shall consist of up to 10 battery electric buses and requisite infrastructure at the BBB yard; and3) Authorize staff to work with the Federal Transit Administration (FTA) Office of Innovation, FTA Region 9 Office, and Gillig, LLC for the procurement of one 40-foot electric propelled bus from Gillig, LLC under the FTA’s Prototype Waiver Program that would be produced in December 2018, and placed into revenue service in January 2019.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Big Blue Bus provides regional transit service for 13.6 million passengers a year, serving an area covering 58 square miles. Since the 1990’s, Big Blue Bus (BBB) has been a leader in using cost efficient environmentally-friendly vehicle propulsion technology for its fixed route bus fleet. With the advent of new propulsion technology being tested and evaluated at many California transit agencies and the potential that the California Air Resources Board (ARB) proposed Innovative Clean Transit (ICT) regulation being finalized later this year, staff initiated an analysis to compare the economic and environmental benefits for future vehicle procurements under two propulsion scenarios: 1)transitioning BBB’s existing fleet to near-zero NOx emission (NZE) natural gas engines that would continue to be fueled by renewable natural gas (RNG); and, 2)transitioning BBB’s existing fleet to battery electric buses (BEB).', 'Staff is committed to providing an objective and unbiased approach to help guide Council, and while the GNA report summary and cost implications for each fuel path are provided in the staff report, there are inherent tradeoffs with each fuel path scenario, upsides to each, and unknowns with Scenario Number 2, (transition the fleet to BEBs) due to how new this technology is in the transit industry. At the end of the day, BBB is committed to consistently provide financially sustainable, efficient, effective and safe mobility services to our customers and the community on a daily basis.', 'Understanding that this technology is new in the transit industry, staff recommends a responsible approach to first prototyping the application of electric bus operation on the BBB system, and moving forward with the implementation of a proof of concept program with measurable outcomes for success with a small fleet of electric buses over the next 2 years to lay the groundwork for a transition to a 100% zero-emissions fleet.', 'Background', 'BBB operates twenty fixed routes that include traditional local transit service, commuter transit, express service, and community-based circulators. The urban area serviced by BBB’s transit fleet includes the entire Westside region of Los Angeles. The BBB fleet provides service to approximately 13.6 million passengers annually in an urban service area of 58 square miles. The fleet’s service area is vastly larger than the City’s municipal service boundary of 8.4 square miles.', 'To provide these services, BBB operates a fleet of 200 natural gas urban transit buses which include nineteen (19) 30-35 foot buses, (153) 40-foot buses, and twenty-eight (28) 60-foot articulated buses. Approximately 60% of the fleet is model year 2011 or newer buses. The entire fleet is powered by natural gas engines fueled with renewable natural gas. Today, 62½ percent of the fleet operates on compressed natural gas (CNG) and 37.5% operates on liquefied natural gas (LNG). However, all LNG buses within the fleet would be retired by 2019.', "Figure 1 - BBB's Current Revenue Vehicles (Note: ISLG refers to a Cummins Engine model)", 'The transit facility consists of a maintenance facility, administrative buildings, fueling infrastructure, wash bays, bus yard, and a maintenance parking lot for staff vehicles. The maintenance facility was remodeled in 2009 and there are currently no plans to expand the facility.', 'Two fueling stations are physically located on BBB’s property. A private on-site station is located within the fenced boundary of the transit facility, while a public access station is located outside of the fenced boundary but still on BBB’s property. BBB’s transit fleet is supplied with CNG (via the LCNG station) and LNG from renewable liquefied natural gas (RLNG) that is procured from Clean Energy. On average, Clean Energy delivers one load of RLNG each day which is transported via tanker truck from Clean Energy’s Boron LNG plant. An onsite storage tank supplies the RLNG to the LCNG and LNG dispensers that are co-located within the drive-through wash bays.', 'Southern California Edison (SCE) provides electricity to the transit facility. On average, BBB’s electricity cost is higher than that of surrounding utility customers because the City procures a higher fraction of renewable electricity in its electricity mix than SCE’s average delivered electricity mix. The low carbon electricity is purchased via a third party energy service provider (ESP) but is delivered through SCE’s distribution system.', 'During peak service days, which occur Monday through Friday, BBB’s fleet operates 240 daily weekday assignments which require 162 transit buses during peak weekday service. The average distance of an assignment is 71 miles; however, individual assignments range from 13 miles up to 181 miles. Some transit buses receive more than one assignment during a peak day. The majority of route operations occur on primarily flat surfaces, however, there are a small number of route assignments, such as those travelling to and from the Pacific Palisades area, that entail a significant amount of elevation change.', 'Discussion', 'Fuel Path Analysis', 'To help staff better understand the issues surrounding vehicle propulsion systems, the consulting firm of Gladstein, Neandross & Associates/Ramboll prepared a detailed analysis looking at the different fuel paths. For each of the vehicle deployment scenarios, cost and emissions profiles were developed on a per-mile, annual, and lifecycle basis using fleet composition, operational, and procedural data provided by BBB, as well as assumptions where necessary in order to characterize the recently commercialized alternative technologies. The operational cost for each transit bus technology is an aggregate of individual cost factors that include bus capital, fuel, operations and maintenance (O&M), midlife overhaul, fuelling infrastructure, and facility modification costs. Data provided by BBB and assumptions were evaluated to quantify the individual cost factors as a component of the overall cost. The emissions evaluated as part of the analysis include greenhouse gases (GHGs), oxides of nitrogen (NOx), and particulate matter (PM10).', 'The analysis found the total per-mile operational cost for BBB’s existing transit buses to be $2.789/mi compared to $2.829/mi for near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit buses and $4.054/mi for battery electric transit buses if purchased in 2017. While significant operating cost reductions are not expected for BBB’s existing buses or for NZE natural gas buses over the next 20 years, it is widely projected that operating costs for battery electric buses will fall over time.', 'The analysis projects that battery electric buses purchased in 2030 would have an average operating cost of $3.382/mi. Over a 12-year lifecycle, the operational cost of BBB’s existing transit bus is approximately $1,079,343/bus compared to $1,094,823/bus for near-zero NOx emission transit buses, $1,568,898/bus for battery electric transit buses purchased in 2017, and $1,308,834/bus for battery electric buses purchased in 2030. This represents an incremental cost of $15,480/bus for near-zero NOx emission transit buses, $489,555/bus for battery electric transit buses purchased in 2017, and $229,491/bus for battery electric transit buses purchased in 2030. Estimated costs for battery electric transit buses take into account significant reductions in battery costs over time and are net of projected credits that BBB could generate under California’s Low Carbon Fuel Standard (LCFS).', 'The emissions analysis found well-to-wheel (WTW) GHG emissions of BBB’s existing transit bus to be 1,475 grams per mile (g/mi) compared to 1,213 g/mi emitted from near-zero NOx transit buses, and 8.88 g/mi for battery electric transit buses purchased in 2017 and in 2030. Well-to-tank (WTT) NOx emissions were found to be 4.53 g/mi for BBB’s existing transit buses, 4.55 g/mi for near-zero NOx transit buses, and 0.0653 g/mi for battery electric transit buses purchased in 2017 and in 2030. Tank-to-wheel (TTW) NOx emissions were found to be 0.581 g/mi emitted by BBB’s existing transit buses compared to 0.045 g/mi emitted from near-zero NOx transit buses and 0.00 g/mi emitted from battery electric transit buses purchased in 2017 and in 2030.', 'Transit Bus Emissions Profiles', 'BBB Existing Transit Bus', 'NZE NOx CNG Transit Bus', '2017 Battery Electric Transit Bus', '2030 Battery Electric Transit Bus', 'WTW GHG Emissions', '1,475 g/mi', '1,213 g/mi', '8.88 g/mi', '8.88 g/mi', 'WTT NOx Emissions', '4.53 g/mi', '4.55 g/mi', '0.0653 g/mi', '0.0653 g/mi', 'TTW NOx Emissions', '0.581 g/mi', '0.045 g/mi', '0.000 g/mi', '0.000 g/mi', 'WTW NOx Emissions', '5.111 g/mi', '4.600 g/mi', '0.065 g/mi', '0.065 g/mi', 'In addition to evaluating the cost and emissions performance of the individual transit bus technologies, BBB’s fleet-wide costs and emissions were evaluated over the proposed ICT regulatory timeframe that is currently under development by the ARB. The figure below displays BBB’s existing fleet transitioning to near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit buses according BBB’s planned replacement schedule.', 'During the 23-year implementation timeframe of the ICT regulation, BBB would incur a cost of approximately $414 million as a result of continuing to procure and operate their existing transit bus technology. The analysis found that BBB would incur a cost of approximately $418 million as a result of transitioning the existing fleet to a near-zero NOx emission natural gas fleet, representing an incremental cost of approximately $4 million. The analysis also found that BBB would incur a cost of approximately $492 million (an incremental cost of $78 million) as a result of transitioning to a battery electric fleet assuming expected reductions in battery costs and net of projected LCFS credits generated across the timeframe.', 'BBB Fleet Costs – 2018-2040', 'BBB Existing Transit Fleet', 'NZE NOx CNG Transit Fleet', 'Battery Electric Transit Fleet', 'Fleet Operational Costs', '$ 413,748,150', '$ 417,803,910', '$ 492,001,711', 'Incremental Cost Relative to Baseline Scenario', '$ -', '↑ $ 4,055,760', '↑ $ 78,253,561', 'Transitioning BBB’s fleet to near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit buses would reduce the fleet’s WTW GHG emissions by 26,724 MT (metric tons) during the timeframe. Transitioning BBB’s existing fleet to a battery electric fleet would significantly reduce fleet-wide GHG emissions by approximately 150,000 MT during the timeframe. However, the reductions provided by the transition to battery electric transit buses come at a cost of approximately $78 million or approximately $526/MT. The majority (approximately 99%) of WTW GHGs emitted during the transition to a battery electric fleet are the emissions from BBB’s existing transit buses as they operate for the remainder of their useful lives.', 'The analysis found that transitioning to either of the alternative scenarios technologies would yield significant TTW NOx reductions. During the timeframe, transitioning to a near zero NOx emission natural gas transit fleet yields a 63% reduction from the baseline scenario while the transition to a battery electric transit fleet buses yields a 68% reduction from the baseline scenario.', 'Though the reductions achieved by each scenario are comparable, there is a significant difference in the costs that would be incurred. At an incremental cost of approximately $4 million, the 60.1 tons of NOx reduced as a result of transitioning to a near-zero NOx natural gas fleet would cost approximately $67,484/ton. In contrast, the 65.1 tons of NOx reduced as a result of transitioning to a battery electric transit fleet would cost approximately $1,202,052/ton (approximately 1800% more than the cost of the reductions that would result from transitioning to an NZE NOx fleet) because the incremental cost of transitioning to a battery electric transit fleet is approximately $78 million.', 'BBB Fleet Emissions – 2018-2040', 'BBB Existing Transit Fleet', 'NZE NOx CNG Transit Fleet', 'Battery Electric Transit Fleet', 'TTW NOx Emissions', '95.2 tons', '35.1 tons', '30.1 tons', 'Reductions Relative to Baseline Scenario', '0.0', '↓ 60.1 tons', '↓ 65.1 tons', 'Cost of TTW NOx Emissions Reductions', '0.0', '$67,484/ton', '$1,202,052/ton', 'The analysis also found that transitioning to a near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit fleet would not yield any significant PM10 (particulate matter) reductions. The reason is the Cummins ISL G Near-Zero (NZ) and the Cummins ISL G (equipped in BBB’s existing transit buses) have the same certified PM10 emissions values. In contrast, transitioning to a battery electric transit fleet yields a 68% reduction from the baseline scenario. While this is a significant percent reduction, the PM emissions from each of the scenarios is very small because natural gas engines have extremely low PM10 emissions.', 'In summary, the analysis found that, at an incremental cost of approximately $4 million, the transition of BBB’s existing fleet to a fleet of near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit buses would result in a small decrease in GHG emissions and a significant reduction in TTW NOx emissions. At an incremental cost of approximately $78 million, the transition of BBB’s existing fleet to battery electric transit buses would result in GHG and TTW NOx emissions reductions that are more costly compared to those achieved from the deployment of near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit buses.', 'The results of the analysis are based on projections of significant operating cost reductions for battery electric buses over time. These reductions are based on large reductions in battery storage costs and projections of revenue from the LCFS program. Changes in these assumptions would have a dramatic impact on the total estimated project costs. Were battery storage costs to remain constant (and not fall over time as they almost certainly will based on history), the incremental cost of converting the entire fleet to battery electric buses would increase to approximately $130 million as opposed to approximately $78 million.', 'The LCFS program works with other programs in California, such as the Cap-and-Trade Program, to reduce transportation-related GHG emissions. Credits are generated from the use of low carbon fuels in the transportation sector. Regulated entities, such as petroleum refiners, are required to purchase credits to offset the GHG emissions associated with the higher carbon fuels that they produce. It is the demand for these credits by regulated entities that sets the credit price. Though the credit price has remained stable in recent years, future credit prices would be established in an open market environment and any fluctuations in the price of the credit would directly impact BBB’s cost of operating battery electric buses.', 'Funding Opportunities', 'With the proposed 23-year length of a transition to a zero emission fleet, it is impossible to accurately predict what the funding landscape would look like. However, this section describes existing federal, state, and county programs and incentives outside of BBB’s ongoing funding streams that could help pay for alternatively-fuelled buses.', 'The Federal Transit Administration (FTA) offers two relatively small funding pots for the purchase of zero-emission transit buses. The Low or No Emission Competitive Program (LoNo) provides funding to state and local governmental authorities for the purchase or lease of zero-emission and low-emission transit buses as well as acquisition, construction, and leasing of required supporting facilities. The LoNo Program distributes $55 million nationwide. Big Blue Bus applied for funding for battery electric buses in the FTA’s last funding cycle but was not selected.', 'The FTA also offers the Bus & Bus Facilities Infrastructure Investment Program which allows agencies to replace, rehabilitate and purchase buses and related equipment and to construct bus-related facilities including technological changes or innovations to modify low or no emission vehicles or facilities. The Bus and Bus Facilities Program distributes $226 million nationally. BBB currently submitted an application for the purchase of seven battery electric vehicles through this program but was not selected.', 'The state’s funding opportunities for zero and near zero engines have been increasing in recent years. For example, the Hybrid and Zero-Emission Truck and Bus Voucher Incentive Project (HVIP) provides vouchers to help California fleets purchase advanced technology trucks and buses. HVIP provides vouchers for California purchasers and lessees of hybrid and zero-emission trucks and buses on a first-come, first-served basis. Purchasers of fixed route zero emission buses receive $110,000 per vehicle while using near zero engines receive $10,000 to offset costs. BBB would utilize these vouchers regardless of the fuel path chosen.', 'To help with the implementation costs of the ICT regulation, the ARB has recently proposed to invest one-third of the VW Mitigation Trust in zero-emission buses. The program would create a maximum incentive of up to $180,000 for a new battery electric transit bus, up to $400,000 for a new fuel cell electric transit bus, and up to $100,000 for a new battery electric shuttle bus. These maximum funding amounts exceed the maximum funding amounts allowed under HVIP. Unfortunately, no funding is proposed for charging infrastructure.', 'In January, the California Public Utility Commission (CPUC) approved the first transportation electrification applications under SB 350 from the three large investor-owned utilities. The decision approves 15 projects with combined budgets of $42 million statewide. One approved project in Southern California Edison’s (SCE) area is $3.9million for “Electric Transit Bus Make-Ready.” SCE would deploy make-ready infrastructure at bus depots and along bus routes to serve electric commuter buses operating in SCE’s service territory. SCE would also provide a rebate to participating customers to cover the cost of the charging equipment and installation. SCE would maximize the electric transit bus routes it supports in disadvantaged communities.', 'The California State Transportation Agency has recently finished accepting applications for the next round of Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program (TIRCP). The TIRCP aims to increase ridership on the state-wide transit and rail network and reduce greenhouse gas emissions. The five-year program is anticipated to distribute $2.4 billion. Big Blue Bus recently submitted a grant application to CALSTA asking for $3.05 million to pay for the incremental cost of ten 40-foot battery electric buses. The total cost of the ten vehicle program would be $9.7 million. Associated infrastructure costs were not included in the request in order to make the application more competitive.', 'At the County level, BBB’s participation in Metro’s Bus Operations Subcommittee (BOS) allows it to apply for bus replacements and facility improvements. The BOS distributes 15% of Los Angeles County’s Federal 5307 Capital funds on an annual basis. Typically, the fund source spreads approximately $17 million among the sixteen Municipal Operators. The funds are allocated based on a competitive process.', 'Context for All-Electric Fleet Conversion', 'With over 200 public transit systems operating about 14,000 buses, the State of California is leading the way nationally in making the commitment to an all zero-emission fleet. Within the state, seven transit agencies have committed to making full transition to an all-electric fleet by the year 2030. LA Metro currently has 100 zero-emission vehicles on order, and has committed to the conversion if their new vehicles comply with performance benchmarks. Foothill Transit and the City of Los Angeles Department of Transportation (LADOT) have also made the same commitment to have an all zero-emission fleet by 2030. Foothill Transit has 30 zero-emission buses on the road; Long Beach Transit has 10. LADOT has four vehicles on the road and recently ordered 25 more zero emission vehicles. Antelope Valley Transit Authority (AVTA) has eight buses on the street and an order placed for all 85 of their buses to be battery electric by the end of 2019. Elsewhere in the United States, King County Metro in Seattle has committed to purchasing 120 all electric battery buses by 2020 with the goal of having a 100% zero emission fleet between 2034 and 2040.', 'The number of manufacturers currently providing battery electric buses is limited but the number is growing as more transit systems commit to the new technology. Two battery electric only bus manufacturers - Proterra and BYD - currently sell most of the battery electric buses across the United States. Other legacy bus manufacturers such as New Flyer and Gillig are also entering the battery electric marketplace.', "The most exhaustive study of battery electric bus performance was completed in June 2017 by the US Department of Energy's National Renewable Energy Laboratory on twelve Foothill Transit buses. The study compared the performance of Proterra battery electric buses versus Foothill's NABI CNG vehicles as a baseline. Highlights of the study include: the twelve battery electric buses accumulating more than 900,000 miles during the study period; the buses surpassed their target of 4,000 miles between road calls with more than 6,000 miles during the evaluation period; the on-route chargers operated reliably with minimal issues; and the high voltage batteries showed little to no sign of capacity degradation during the study period.", 'Conversely, the short-range on-route charged buses are inflexible and cannot be deployed to other routes; the higher use of air conditioning lowers the effective range in hotter months; charger availability is needed for successful vehicle deployment; and the CNG buses did significantly outperform the battery electric bus in many of the evaluation areas. For comparison, BBB’s miles between road failures on the CNG and LNG fleets are more than 18,000 miles. Additionally, systems in Albuquerque, NM, and Long Beach have experienced significant delays in BEB deliveries from vendors, delaying new projects that both systems had intended to launch in early 2017.', 'Based upon proactive discussions with Southern California Edison, and through staff evaluation of the proposed SCE medium- and heavy-duty vehicle charging infrastructure that includes transit agencies, staff has identified up to 23 potential charging unit locations within the maintenance/parking yard where BEBs could be charged overnight.', 'BBB all-Electric Fleet Challenges', 'One of the many challenges with converting the fleet to electric is operational and maintenance continuity of operations. As buses become eligible for replacement under the FTA funding regulations that BBB follows, transitioning and operating a dual fueled fleet becomes complex. During the conversion, more space would be needed for infrastructure required to support charging the BBB electric fleet, while still maintaining RNG fueling facilities for the CNG fleet including giving consideration to back-up power and energy storage. As BBB is already constrained by the size of the yard and facilities from which it operates, a feasibility and transition analysis would need to be conducted to inform staff and stakeholders on best practices and how to ensure that service delivery to BBB’s 54,000 daily customers remains consistent.', 'Other challenges and critical areas that need to be reviewed prior to transition to an all-electric fleet include: training of mechanic staff on new fleet propulsion technology; route specific energy analysis; impacts of a replacement analysis greater that one-to-one for electric buses; and the evaluation of electric bus technology advancements and reduced battery costs that are hard to accurately predict. While these challenges exist, there are many opportunities for growth of BBB’s understanding of electric bus technology.', 'BBB Transition Plan', 'Understanding the unknowns, benefits, costs, tradeoffs, and the City’s desire to move toward an all-electric fleet, staff continues to responsibly and conscientiously prepare and plan for that transition.', 'To address the electric bus fleet and new infrastructure costs, staff continues to seek additional funding for both, applying for new federal and state programs for this technology, as well as meeting with SCE to learn about their new programs. As mentioned earlier, a TIRCP grant has been submitted to partially fund up to ten new electric vehicles. BBB anticipates announcement of successful grant applications by May 2018. Previous grant submittals for FTA LoNo funding and Bus and Bus Infrastructure Program funding were not successful. Staff has scheduled a conference call with FTA staff on 4/20/18 to discuss our recent grant submittals and how to improve future grant applications.', 'Staff continues to work with American Public Transportation Association, California Transit Association and sister agencies to maintain the pulse and knowledge of the market. Locally, staff has joined the LA Regional Electric Bus Working Group to collaboratively work with our peers to find solutions for implementation and to the increased costs of this technology. Staff is also working on the Zero Emission Bus Procurement Committee to provide input to the State Department of General Services (DGS) for the creation of a statewide electric bus procurement, giving us options to buy our buses as funding comes in. Additionally, we are in dialogue with Southern California Edison (SCE) to layout plans and estimate costs for converting our property to support a 100% electric fleet. In those conversations, we have learned of SCE’s work with the CPUC for potential funding for infrastructure. We would continue to monitor all funding possibilities.', 'Finally, BBB has initiated a collaborative effort with FTA, Gillig and the Honolulu Transit System to test one of Gillig’s five total prototype battery electric buses that they are building at the end of this calendar year. In June or early July 2018, staff will recommend to council procurement of one prototype electric bus. This pilot project would help BBB immediately begin to evaluate the technology and the application of operating an electric bus within our service area and how it would impact our operations as we transition to an electric fleet.', 'Following best practices, we would perform route, charge and rate modeling to better prepare for a future implementation plan. This process would ultimately help staff understand the differences of this technology and how best to procure, deploy and operate electric buses into the BBB fleet mix. Staff would continue efforts with our funding partners to apply for grants to fund electric bus purchases.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action associated with conducting the study session. Depending on the direction given, costs associated with purchasing new vehicles and accompanying infrastructure may be affected.']}
{'Title': "Appeal of the Planning Commission's decision to approve Development Review Permit (16ENT-0034) to allow a new four-story (36 feet) 59,319 square-foot mixed-use project consisting of 47 residential units, 16,755 square feet of ground floor commercial space, and 151 automobile parking spaces within a two-level subterranean parking garage.", 'Department': 'Development Review 1', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '06. Administrative Proceedings', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council deny the appeal and uphold the Planning Commission’s approval by taking the following actions:1. Approve Development Review Permit 16ENT-0034; and 2. Adopt the Statement of Official Action, pursuant to the draft findings and conditions.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On January 10, 2018, the Planning Commission approved Development Review Permit (DRP) 16ENT-0034 to allow a new four-story (36 feet) 59,319 square-foot mixed-use housing project consisting of 47 residential units, 16,755 square feet of ground floor commercial space, and 151 automobile parking spaces within a two-level subterranean parking garage.  The Planning Commission staff report, Statement of Official Action (STOA), and additional attachments to this report are hereby incorporated herein. On January 24, 2018, the appellant, Rachel Kelley, filed an appeal (18ENT-0012) of the Planning Commission’s decision to approve the DRP. The appeal statement raises concerns regarding (1) the public comment and hearing process, (2) consistency with the LUCE, (3) compliance with the Zoning Ordinance, (4) application of the Housing Accountability Act (HAA), (5) compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act, (6) traffic impacts, (7) construction impacts, and (8) concerns about CIM Group.', 'Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.37.130, Council’s review of the DRP approval is de novo. Council may review and take action on all determinations, interpretations, decisions, judgments, or similar actions that were in the purview of the Planning Commission. This report describes the proposed project scope, provides relevant background information, and analyzes the issues of appeal raised by the appellant. The staff report concludes by recommending that Council approve the DRP based upon the findings set forth in the Draft Statement of Official Action (Draft STOA).', 'Background', 'Existing Conditions and Setting', 'The following table provides a brief summary of the project location, existing conditions and setting.', 'Site Location Map', 'Zoning District:', 'General Commercial (GC)', 'Land Use Element Designation:', 'General Commercial', 'Parcel Area:', '32,277 square feet', 'Parcel Dimensions:', 'Irregular shaped lot', 'Existing On-Site Improvements (Year Built):', 'Auto Repair and Sales one-story buildings (1932-1971)', 'Rent Control Status:', 'Commercial (Exempt)', 'Adjacent Zoning Districts and Land Uses:', 'North:GC&R2 (Multi-Family Residential) East: R2 & R1 (Multi-Family and Single Family) South: GC (Restaurant) West: GC (Retail and Restaurant)', 'Historic Resource Inventory', 'Not listed on HRI.', 'Affordable Housing', 'Per SMMC Section 9.23.030(A)(1)(a) of the Zoning Ordinance: 5% of total units as affordable 50% more affordable housing units than would be required pursuant to Section 9.64.050 Providing 8.5% residential units (4) as affordable at 30% income level (extremely low)', 'The subject site is approximately 32,277 square feet in size and is located on the east side of Lincoln Boulevard between Ashland Avenue and Wilson Place. The site has an upward slope from the Lincoln Boulevard street frontage to the rear of the site of approximately 12.5% average. The existing building improvements consist of multiple one-story vacant auto repair commercial buildings. A majority of the existing neighborhood context is modest in height. Adjacent uses along Lincoln Boulevard include retail, service, and restaurant uses with structures that are primarily one-story in height. Ashland Avenue contains R2 Multi-Unit properties while Wilson Place consists of R1 Single-Unit properties.', 'Project Description', 'The project is a four-story building with a maximum height of 36 feet that includes 16,755 square feet of ground floor commercial space, 47 residential units totaling 42,564 square-feet of residential area, and a floor area ratio of 1.81. Additionally, the project includes 11,548 square feet of open space consisting of 7,219 square feet of common open space and 4,329 square feet of private open space. The project includes 151 vehicle parking spaces and 28 motorcycle parking spaces in a two-level subterranean parking garage for the commercial users, residential tenant, and guests of the building. Bicycle parking spaces are proposed at grade and within the subterranean garage totaling 98 spaces (13 short-term spaces, 85 long-term spaces).', 'Figure 1: Project Rendering (Lincoln Boulevard elevation)', 'As shown in Figure 2 below, the ground floor is comprised of a commercial tenant space at the building frontage totaling approximately 16,755 square feet in size with a 1,494 square-foot plaza area adjacent to Lincoln Boulevard. A residential lobby is also directly accessed from the building frontage along Lincoln Boulevard next to the driveway and site access that leads to an elevator and stairwell to the units above. The upper floors consist entirely of residential units. The placement and orientation of the commercial and residential land uses in the project is consistent with the surrounding commercial area along Lincoln Boulevard and other recently approved mixed-use projects.', 'Figure 2: Site Plan', 'Architectural Review Board Concept Review', 'Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.40.040 (Development Review Permit - Procedures), a DRP requires Architectural Review Board (ARB) review and recommendation on the design of the proposal. The project was presented to the ARB at its November 21, 2016 meeting. The project design was generally well-received with the ARB expressing support of the project massing and acknowledging that the location of the new mixed-use project is challenging due to the site configuration and topography. While the ARB was positive regarding the overall direction of the project, there were some concerns expressed regarding certain aspects of the design. Staff expressed similar concerns with the overall project design and met with the applicant to convey these concerns. While the applicant responded to some of the ARB and staff comments, there were several other substantive design comments provided by the Architectural Review Board that were not addressed. In particular, the design strategy along the Lincoln Boulevard frontage is one of a repetition of forms and the pedestrian orientation of the Wilson and Ashland elevations should be improved. The project site combines six parcels and the design strategy results in a dramatic difference with the context and existing development pattern. Some variation along the length of Lincoln Boulevard is essential for the project’s compatibility with the surrounding neighborhood.', 'In approving the project, the Planning Commission included the ARB’s recommendations with respect to modulation, pedestrian orientation, and materiality as conditions of approval. These are areas that will be of particular focus in the ARB’s formal design review should Council approve the DRP.', 'Planning Commission Action', 'On January 10, 2018, a public hearing was held by the Planning Commission to consider the DRP. Public testimony was generally in opposition to the project, citing traffic related impacts, size and scale of the project and overall compatibility with surrounding neighborhood. In approving the project, the Commission noted the following:', '· The project is consistent with the vision set forth in the LUCE and Zoning Ordinance for housing projects that are located on Commercial Boulevard corridors but that also protect neighborhood character.', '· The project adds critical uses to the site and the proposed housing is of appropriate size and scale.', '· The project fails to address the context and compatibility of massing along Lincoln and that the façade needs to provide more visual breaks and separating the facades into different volumes; and', '· The irregular shape and size of the project site pose challenges for site design.', 'The Commission took formal action on the DRP on January 10, 2018. A majority of the Planning Commission initially considered recommending that the project be continued to allow further work by the developer on design-related issues prior to approval. However, due to Permit Streamlining Act timelines and the applicant’s unwillingness to grant an extension of time for the Planning Commission to act, the Planning Commission voted 5-2 to approve the project, with amendments to Condition #1 in the Planning Commission’s Statement of Official Action (Attachment B).', 'Condition #1(a-f) required the ARB to pay particular attention to the following design elements:', '· Building façade along Lincoln appears monotonous. The design should be revised to provide additional variation and visual breaks in the building volume, especially on the upper levels throughout the project, with particular attention to variation along the Lincoln Boulevard frontage without lowering the housing density and unit mix to extent possible;', '· Street elevations along Ashland and Wilson should be revised for improved pedestrian-orientation by bringing the unit floor lines closer to the street elevation, more modulation and openness to the street;', '· Introduction of more materials and color in reference ranges which could lead to better granularity;', '· Provide a pedestrian-oriented design along Lincoln by, for example, providing a canopy above the door that can provide a place for retail signage and help differentiate the ground floor commercial from the residential units above and the ground floor residential entrance;', '· Revise the planting areas to provide more usable space and space for gathering; and', '· Minimize upper level circulation to increase light and air into courtyard', 'The City Council Draft Statement of Official Action (STOA) (Attachment A) includes this recommendation as Condition #1(a-f).', 'Discussion', 'The proposed project is 4-story (36 feet) in height and has a 1.81 floor area ratio (FAR). The project exceeds the maximum Tier 1 limits (3 stories (36 feet) / 1.5 FAR) for the GC zoning district for projects consisting of 100% residential uses above the ground floor that include on-site affordable housing in compliance with the minimum requirements of the Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP). The project complies with all development standards applicable to the site and is within the established maximums to qualify as a Tier 2 project (36 feet / 2.0 FAR) with on-site affordable housing provided.', 'Development Review Permit', 'Pursuant to SMMC 9.40.050, in order to approve a DRP, Council on appeal must make the following findings in an affirmative manner:', 'A.The physical location, size, massing, setbacks, pedestrian orientation, and placement of proposed structures on the site and the location of proposed uses within the project are consistent with applicable standards and are both compatible and relate harmoniously to surrounding sites and neighborhoods;', 'B.The rights-of-way can accommodate autos, bicycles, pedestrians, and multi-modal transportation methods, including adequate parking and access;', 'C.The health and safety services (police, fire etc.) and public infrastructure (e.g., utilities) are sufficient to accommodate the new development;', 'D.The project is generally consistent with the Municipal Code, General Plan, and any applicable Specific Plan;', 'E.Based on environmental review, the proposed project has no potentially significant environmental impacts or any potentially significant environmental impacts have been reduced to less than significant levels because of mitigation measures incorporated in the project or a Statement of Overriding Considerations has been adopted;', 'F.The project promotes the general welfare of the community;', 'G.The project has no unacceptable adverse effects on public health or safety; and', 'H.The project provides Community Benefits consistent with Chapter 9.23.', 'Tier 2 Community Benefits', 'According to Chapter 9.23 of the Zoning Ordinance, projects that exceed the maximum height or FAR allowed for Tier 1 projects are required to provide the community benefits outlined in subsection 9.23.030 of the Chapter. The purpose of the community benefits is to ensure that projects are allowed to exceed the base height and FAR of a respective zoning district, and in return provide community benefits that enhance the City’s community character.', 'The project provides the required community benefits identified in Chapter 9.23 (Community Benefits) of the Zoning Ordinance for Tier 2 projects. This includes at least 50% more affordable housing units than would be required by Section 9.64.050 (Affordable Housing Production Program) of the Zoning Ordinance, and a unit mix of at least 15% 3-BR units, at least 20% 2-BR units, and no more than 15% Studio units. Also, the average number of bedrooms for all of the affordable housing units in a Tier 2 project shall be equal to or greater than the average number of bedrooms for all of the market rate units in the project. Further, the project provides the augmented fees and TDM requirements established in Chapter 9.23 of the Zoning Ordinance.', 'The project is located in the General Commercial land use designation in the LUCE. The development parameters in the LUCE are implemented in the Zoning Ordinance for Tier 2 projects. The proposed project complies with all of the development standards outlined in the Zoning Ordinance.', 'The proposed development is also consistent with the goals, objectives and policies in the LUCE. Specifically, Goal B25 (Lincoln Boulevard Goals and Policies) seeks redevelopment of Lincoln Boulevard as a district and visually-cohesive mixed-use commercial boulevard. Specifically, Policy B25.5 encourages a lively streetscape with places for people to socialize, where gathering spaces and plazas are encouraged and Policy B25.9 encourages that new mixed-use buildings adjacent to residential districts are contained within a prescribed building envelope that steps down toward the residential district to maintain access to light and air. Additionally, the project is consistent with Policy B25.10, which seeks to limit ground floor uses to mostly active retail with generally continuous, transparent (non-tinted) display windows facing the sidewalks and Policy B25.11 which encourages mixed-use projects to have active ground floor uses that face the boulevard with residential uses located on the upper floors.', 'The proposed project complies with these goals and policies in that it is a mixed-use building with ground floor commercial that is inviting for pedestrians and activated by the transparent storefront glazing system and plaza along Lincoln Boulevard, while also providing and maintaining access to light and air to the neighboring residential properties by having the building step down from the rear (east) to the street facing side (west). Additionally, the project consists of active retail on the ground floor and residential uses on the upper floors that feature significant common and private outdoor areas.', 'Housing Accountability Act (HAA)', "Under the Housing Accountability Act (Government Code section 65589.5(j)), when a proposed housing development project complies with applicable, objective general plan, zoning, and subdivision standards and criteria, including design review standards, in effect at the time that the housing development project's application is determined to be complete, but a local agency proposes to disapprove the project or to impose a condition that the project be developed at a lower density, the local agency must base its decision upon written findings supported by evidence on the record that both of the following conditions exist:", '“(A) The housing development project would have a specific, adverse impact upon the public health or safety unless the project is disapproved or approved upon the condition that the project be developed at a lower density. As used in this paragraph, a “specific, adverse impact” means a significant, quantifiable, direct, and unavoidable impact, based on objective, identified written public health or safety standards, policies, or conditions as they existed on the date the application was deemed complete.', '(B) There is no feasible method to satisfactorily mitigate or avoid the adverse impact identified, other than the disapproval of the housing development project or the approval of the project upon the condition that it be developed at a lower density.”', 'Therefore, if after consideration of all written and oral evidence presented to the City Council at the public hearing for the Project, the Council desires to either disapprove or impose a condition that the Project be developed at a lower density, Council must make the above referenced findings and direct staff to incorporate such findings and/or conditions into the STOA. The term “lower density” includes any conditions that have the same effect or impact on the ability of the project to provide housing.', 'The Housing Accountability Act does not prevent Council from imposing conditions of approval that do not result in lower density; however, if Council imposes conditions of approval that it believes does not result in lower density, it should clarify on the record (i) the factual basis for imposing the conditions and (ii) why Council believes these conditions will not result in lower density.', 'As explained in the body of the Planning Commission staff report for 16ENT-0034 (Attachment D), staff has recommended approval of the Project based upon its determination that the Project is consistent with objective zoning and General Plan standards, subject to the applicant\'s compliance with all conditions in the City Council Statement of Official Action ("STOA"), which is attached to the staff report (Attachment A). The Planning Commission approved the project because no oral or written evidence was presented at the public hearing, identifying “specific, adverse impacts” as defined in the Housing Accountability Act.', 'Appeal Summary', 'The appellant filed a timely appeal on January 24, 2018. The appellant’s appeal statement (Attachment G) raises many specific points as to why the appeal should be approved and DRP 16ENT-0034 denied by Council. In summary, the appeal statement raises concerns regarding: (1) the public comment and hearing process, (2) consistency with the LUCE, (3) compliance with the Zoning Ordinance, (4) application of the Housing Accountability Act (HAA), (5) compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act, (6) traffic impacts, (7) construction impacts, and (8) concerns about CIM Group.', 'Appeal Analysis', 'Staff has reviewed the issues raised by the appellant’s Statement of Appeal and provides the following analysis and responses:', '1. Public Hearing Process', 'A. The appellant states that the Brown Act was violated because the supplemental staff report was posted the day of the public hearing.', 'The agenda for the January 10, 2018 Planning Commission meeting was posted at least 72 hours in advance of the meeting. The Brown Act does not require posting of staff reports (or supplemental staff reports); however, the City provides staff reports for the public’s benefit along with the posting of the agenda and did so for this meeting. The supplemental Planning Commission staff report was provided in direct response to a request received from a Planning Commissioner prior to the hearing. The Commissioners requested that staff explain the applicability of the Housing Accountability Act (HAA) to the review of the project. As a result, the supplemental staff report was issued providing background on the HAA.', 'B. The appellant states that the staff report contained errors and that the project should have been denied based on oral and written testimony.', 'The Planning Commission approved the DRP based on the findings set forth in the Planning Commission STOA as well as the oral and written testimony presented prior to or during the public hearing. Council reviews the project de novo. Staff recommends approval of the DRP based on the findings set forth in the draft STOA.', 'C. The appellant states that the public was not sufficiently apprised of the project or offered sufficient opportunity for public comment. Specifically: the “Santa Monica system of neighbors meeting with developers is deeply flawed” and “Planning staff did not subsequently advise neighbors about the ramifications of possible design changes.”', 'Although not required as part of the application review process, staff strongly encourages project applicants to conduct neighborhood meetings with affected neighborhood groups and to keep them up to date on project revisions and status. The applicant stated that they presented the project to the Friends of Sunset Park Association on September 15, 2016 and July 10, 2017 and to the Ocean Park Association on November 11, 2016 and June 12, 2017. The applicant further stated that they conducted a full design presentation (including updates) at both meetings. The circulation change to move primary access to Lincoln Boulevard instead of Ashland Avenue was informed predominantly by staff’s review of existing conditions in addition to concerns expressed by residents early in the process. Staff worked extensively with the applicant to re-design the project’s circulation and access in order to minimize impacts on Ashland Avenue.', 'D. The Planning Commission staff report erroneously stated that "staff had not received any comments or concerns from the public at the time the staff report was being drafted."', 'At the time the Planning Commission staff report was drafted, staff had not received any comments from the public regarding the project. Staff did not receive any written correspondence from either Friends of Sunset Park Association or Ocean Park Association until after the required public notices were delivered. Once received, all written correspondence was presented to the Planning Commission prior to the public hearing. The Planning Commission also received public testimony during the hearing. Staff accepts public input at any time during the project review process and if requested will provide updates to nearby neighborhood groups and residents.', '2. Consistency with the LUCE', 'A. Appellant states that the project is inconsistent with LUCE guidelines related to General Commercial, Quality of Life, Design Compatibility, Building Articulation, and Building Facades and Step Backs, as well as LUCE goals and policies.', 'The project complies with all of the LUCE goals and policies listed by the appellant:', '· LUCE, pg. 2.1-42-(General Commercial): This appears to be a typo and should read 2.1-39. The building complies with the maximum allowable height of 36 feet adjacent to the property line along the boulevard or the intersecting side street as measured from the midpoint of Segmented Average Natural Grade (SANG).', '· LU 1.3 Quality of Life; Goal LU 1: This goal and land use policy states to preserve neighborhood quality of life and protect neighborhoods against potential impacts related to development, traffic, noise, air quality, and encroachment of commercial activities and establish standards that transition down the building envelope of commercial buildings adjacent to residential properties. The proposed building and project site complies with all Tier 2 development standards as outlines in SMMC Section 9.11.030. Additionally, it will also have to comply with all conditions of approval, which address traffic, noise and air quality. Lastly, the building envelope complies with the Daylight Plane Adjacent to Residential Districts (SMMC Section 9.11.030(D)).', '· LU 1.5 Design Compatibility; Goal LU1: This goal requires that all new infill development be compatible with existing scale, mass and character of the residential neighborhood. New buildings should transition in size, height, and scale toward adjacent residential structures. As stated previously, the project has imposed conditions of approval for the ARB to review (Condition #1) in that it requires the applicant to revise the size, massing and placement of the proposed structure as well as determining whether the proposed siting and design is compatible to the surrounding area.', '· LU 15.8 Building Articulation and LU 15.11 Building Façades and Step Backs:  The buildings articulation and façades provide additional setbacks and stepbacks on the upper floors and provides a 5 foot average on the street facing façade on Lincoln consistent with SMMC 9.11.030. Further, any other articulation required will be reviewed by the ARB as well as ensuring that highly reflective materials will be avoided and that the building massing and design as viewed form the public sidewalks and roadways will allow enough light, air and sense of openness along all facades.', 'Further, staff has identified additional LUCE goals and policies, specifically, Goal B25 (Lincoln Boulevard Goals and Policies) seeks redevelopment of Lincoln Boulevard as a district and visually-cohesive mixed-use commercial boulevard. In addition, Policy B25.5 encourages a lively streetscape with places for people to socialize, where gathering spaces and plazas are encouraged and Policy B25.9 encourages that new mixed-use buildings adjacent to residential districts are contained within a prescribed building envelope that steps down toward the residential district to maintain access to light and air. The project is consistent with Policy B25.10, which seeks to limit ground floor uses to mostly active retail with generally continuous, transparent (non-tinted) display windows facing the sidewalks and Policy B25.11 which encourages mixed-use projects to have active ground floor uses that face the boulevard with residential uses located on the upper floors.', '3. Compliance with the Zoning Ordinance', 'A. The appellant states, “Setbacks are inaccurately defined in the staff report: Page 24 states “No (required) interior side yard setback.” The appellant references Section 9.11.030 Development Standards, Height limit 32’ (36’ if on-site affordable housing provided); Minimum Interior Side and Rear-Adjacent to Residential District, 10’.”', 'The Planning Commission staff report erroneously stated that no interior setback is required. Notwithstanding this typographical error, the project was fully reviewed and found to be compliant with all applicable Zoning Ordinance development standards. The project provides a 10’ setback at both the interior side and rear yards. Further, the building height does not exceed 36’ as measured from SANG.', 'B. The appellant states, “The maximum height for Tier 2 projects in the GC zone is clear: 36 feet. There is not a special condition allowing building on sloped lots to exceed that height through creative grade calculations. The staff report refers to the project as a 36-foot four story building (pg.1) a five story building (pgs.28 and 30) and a 3 story building (pg.1 CEQA Exemption checklist). Front to rear yard is shown in the staff report using the segmented average natural grade calculation. The side yard grade is steep, yet there is no indication of the side yard slope formulation to prove its inapplicability. Additionally, the sites steep east/west grade is possibly compromised due to the adjacent 10 unit CIM Group project under construction which is virtually unmentioned in the staff report. Lastly, the actual height of the building at the corner of Ashland and Lincoln is 45’-8” (as stated by the applicant upon questioned by the Planning Commission) which is not mentioned in the text body of the staff report. However, pages 1, 8, 12, 16, 20, 23, 24 and 28 refer to (either/both) a 4-story building with a maximum height of 36 feet. There is one instance where the building is referred to as approximately 36 feet.” The appellant references Section 9.04.050(B)(2) Measuring Building Height on Sloped Parcels, Sloped Parcels, Side to Side.', 'The reference to a five-story building in the Planning Commission STOA was a typographical error. Staff has revised the STOA accordingly to reflect the project as a 36-feet, four story building. Further, staff determined the building height to be in compliance utilizing the SANG height methodology (SMMC 9.04.050 (A)(2)). SANG is measured from the elevation levels of three equal segments between the front setback line and rear setback line. As shown in Figure 3, the three equal segments shall be created by drawing imaginary lines connecting opposite side setback lines (or parcel lines if no setbacks are required) at 1/3 increments of the depth of the parcel from the front setback line to the rear setback line (or parcel lines if no setbacks are required). The elevation for the front 1/3 segment shall be equal to the elevation of the midpoint of the front setback line (or parcel line if no setback is required). The elevation for the rear 1/3 segment shall be equal to the elevation of the midpoint of the rear setback line (or parcel line if no setback is required). The elevation of the middle 1/3 segment shall equal the halfway elevation between the front and rear 1/3 segments.', 'Figure 3: Segmented Average Natural Grade Height Methodology', 'On sheet A1 of the project plans (Attachment C), the SANG diagrams are provided to show compliance with the determined building height methodology. All elevation points used are derived from the survey prepared on February 14, 2016, prior to the adjacent 10-unit project commencing construction in September of 2016. The height of the building (45’-8”) stated by the appellant is measured from finished ground floor elevation. However, pursuant to the SANG height measurement methodology in the Zoning Ordinance, building height is measured from the mid-point front yard elevation, which is fully compliant at a height of 36 feet.', 'C. The appellant references Section 9.11.010(D) Purpose. Establish design standards that improve the visual quality of development and create a unified, distinctive, and attractive character along commercial and mixed-use corridors. The appellant states, “This is subjective and therefore a legally vulnerable directive under HAA. The city will lose control of "look" without more specificity in the code if they continue to set HAA ahead of our General Plan and Zoning Ordinance in the review process. Based on the majority of responses of the public and the Planning Commissioners at the hearing on January 10th, 2018, and also members of the ARB at the "float-up", this project doesn\'t meet the bar due to mass, density, and design relevance to the surrounding neighborhoods (even bordering R1), as well as increasing traffic through the neighborhood.”', 'The appellant is referencing one of the purposes of the Mixed-Use and Commercial Districts in the zoning ordinance. The City is required by state law to comply with the provisions of the HAA. In accordance with recently adopted state legislation, which became effective on January 1, 2018, a local agency’s failure to comply with the HAA may result in civil penalties in the minimum amount of $10,000 per housing unit in the development project (multiplied by a factor with potentially higher penalties for “bad faith” determinations). The recent changes to state law also modified the judicial standard of review to be less deferential to local agency determinations as well as expedited judicial review. Notwithstanding these recent changes to the HAA, the HAA does not define or set the standards for development and therefore, does not impose any independent development standards that would supersede the General Plan and Zoning Ordinance and the LUCE. Any new housing development project must still comply with all City standards and criteria as established by the City’s Municipal Code and the LUCE. The project complies with all applicable development standards in the zoning ordinance and meets the required Development Review Permit findings. Particular design concerns have been included as conditions for the ARB to review as part of its formal design review of the project.', 'D. The appellant references Section 9.11.030(E) Purpose. Provide appropriate buffers and transition standards between commercial and residential uses to preserve both commercial and mixed-use feasibility and residential quality and provide a sensitive transition between the commercial uses and neighboring residences. The appellant states, “Despite the minimal setbacks imposed on the project, the applicant and planning staff feel comfortable placing a large transformer (a rear yard use) on Wilson Place in what should be the buffering setback to an R1 district where all other uses on that street are beautiful street frontage of single family residences. While this has been constructed by planning staff to be the "rear yard" of the site, its effect is as a side yard. This placement conflicts with the intention of…Item #24 in Conditions of Approval (pg. 38 of the Staff Report) under Final Design: No gas or electric meters shall be located within the required front or street side yard setback areas. This project fails lot size (lot depth) conformity standards if the front yard were Lincoln. However, the Staff report refers to the Lincoln "side yard" as frontage. Can this project have a front yard on Ashland, but a Lincoln address and driveway access? Making Wilson Place the "rear yard" isn\'t consistent with how the rest of that street is developed. Planning staff "cherry picks" the code to advantage the developer, and to the detriment of the surrounding R1 and R2 neighborhoods and streets.”', 'Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.04.110, the project site is defined as a corner lot. As a result, the narrowest dimension of the parcel with street front is considered the front, which is Ashland Avenue. The rear is opposite the front (Wilson Place) and the remainder of the parcel lines are considered sides (Lincoln Boulevard and interior side). Due to the site’s configuration and placement along Lincoln Boulevard, the defined front yard is Ashland, street side yard is Lincoln and rear yard is Wilson Place. This is consistent with the prevailing streetscape along Ashland and Wilson where either front yards or rear yards of neighboring properties are located. The address of the property is not relevant in determining the front of a parcel.', 'The placement of the proposed transformer is within the required rear yard setback which is permitted by Code. The transformer pad will be screened by a masonry wall and also be landscaped to provide additional buffering subject to the review and approval of the ARB. Further, per Condition #24, there are no utility meters proposed in either the front or street side yard setback areas.', 'E. The appellant references Section 9.40.010 (A and D) Purpose: A Development Review Permit is intended to allow the construction of certain projects for which the design and siting could result in an adverse impact on the surrounding area. The permit allows for: A) Review of the location, size, massing, and placement of the proposed structure on the site; D) A determination of whether the proposed siting and design should be permitted by weighing the public need for the benefit to be derived from the proposed site plan use against the impact which it may cause. The appellant states, “Again, the original Staff Report suggested topics and design strategies for discussion; the Supplemental Staff Report effectively annihilated that option.”', 'The Supplemental Staff Report was provided for clarification/informational purposes and to explain the applicability of the Housing Accountability Act. It did not change any of the analysis of the Development Review Permit in the original staff report, background on design comments, and the staff recommendation. Before voting to approve the project, the Commission held a public hearing including opportunity for public testimony and deliberations on the project. All of the information presented in the original and supplemental staff report was considered. In its approval of the project, the Planning Commission included project specific conditions (Condition #1) for the ARB to pay particular attention in its review of the project. These conditions addressed both SMMC Sections 9.40.010(A) and (D) in that it requires the applicant to revise the design of the proposed structure for additional variation, pedestrian orientation, and materiality. The ARB has purview to review the design of the project, including the areas highlighted by the Commission’s design conditions.', '3. Application of the Housing Accountability Act (HAA)', 'A. Appellant states that the HAA should not have been applied to this project and that application of the HAA dissuaded consideration of public comment.', 'The HAA is a state law, applicable to charter cities, that precludes the Planning Commission or Council from denying, reducing the density of, or making infeasible any housing development project that complies with objective general plan, zoning, and subdivision standards and criteria (collectively, “Objective Standards”) in effect at the time that the project application is deemed complete unless specific findings of adverse impact are made. Amendments to the HAA, effective January 1, 2018, significantly increased the burden of proof for local agencies to disapprove housing projects or approve projects at lower densities and added civil penalties and other punitive measures to ensure compliance with the HAA.', 'As explained in the body of the Planning Commission staff report for 16ENT-0034 (Attachment D), staff has recommended approval of the Project based upon its determination that the Project is consistent with objective zoning and General Plan standards, subject to the applicant\'s compliance with all conditions in the City Council Statement of Official Action ("STOA"), which is attached to the staff report (Attachment A). The Planning Commission approved the project because no oral or written evidence was presented at the public hearing identifying “specific, adverse impacts” as defined in the HAA.', 'Appellant states that the Planning Commission should have determined whether the project met the criteria for a Development Review Permit before applying the provisions of the HAA. In accordance with the most recent HAA amendments, however, “a housing development project . . . shall be deemed consistent, compliant, and in conformity with an applicable plan, policy, ordinance, standard, requirement, or other similar provision if there is substantial evidence that would allow a reasonable person to conclude that the housing development project is consistent, compliant, or in conformity.” [Government Code Section 65589.5(f)(4)] Staff’s determination is that this Tier 2 Project is consistent with “Objective Standards” as defined by the HAA.', 'As discussed above, Council may approve this project pursuant to the staff recommendation by making the affirmative findings set forth in the STOA without consideration of the HAA. Should Council choose to deny or reduce density of this project, findings of “specific, adverse impacts” as set forth in the HAA would be required.', '5.  Compliance with California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA)', 'A. Appellant states that streamlining CEQA conditions for housing amplifies the detrimental effects of traffic; that the CEQA exemption criteria set forth in Section 21155.1 were not met; that the Planning Commission did not conduct a public hearing regarding the CEQA exemption as required by Section 21155.1; and that the draft EIR for the LUCE should have been consulted before an exemption was claimed.', 'CEQA and its streamlining provisions established in Public Resources Code (PRC) 21155.1 were enacted by the State Legislature (specifically SB 375 effective January 1, 2009). As a lead agency, the City must review discretionary projects in compliance with the regulatory provisions of CEQA. The full text of PRC 21155.1 is attached (Attachment F).', 'On January 10, 2018, the Planning Commission held a public hearing to consider approval of the project and determined that the Project met the applicable requirements of PRC 21155.1 and is considered a project to be statutorily exempt from CEQA. Public input given at the public hearing was considered by the Planning Commission in their decision-making.', 'The Project meets the applicable requirements of a Transit Priority Project under PRC 21155.1 and is considered a project to be statutorily exempt from CEQA. No EIR, either project-level or program level, is required. CEQA Guidelines Section 15168 establishes the guidelines for when a Program EIR is being prepared for a project and for when a subsequent project may rely on the use of a Program EIR for CEQA compliance. CEQA Guidelines Section 15168 does not apply to the 2903 Lincoln Boulevard Project since a Program EIR is not required for the project - nor is a Program EIR being relied on for CEQA compliance.', '6. Traffic Impacts', 'A. Appellant states that traffic impacts of the project should have been further studied pursuant to CEQA and in conjunction with the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Plan (LiNC).', 'As detailed in the CEQA Exemption Checklist prepared for the project, the Project meets the applicable requirements of Public Resources Code Section 21155.1 and is considered a Transit Priority Project to be statutorily exempt from CEQA. Unlike categorical exemptions the statutory exemption for a transit priority project is absolute. A statutory exemption applies to any given project that falls under its definition. Therefore, since the 2903 Lincoln Blvd Project qualifies for a statutory exemption, a traffic study is not required. Further, the appellant raises concerns regarding existing traffic conditions, which have not been created by the proposed project. Based on staff’s review of existing conditions that were raised early in the project review process, the project’s circulation design was substantially revised to minimize potential impacts to Ashland Avenue.', 'Regarding existing conditions, the City is currently undertaking efforts to address existing traffic conditions through the Sunset Park Neighborhood Traffic Management Program. Several options are being studied as part of this program but generally, any Sunset Park street that is not signalized and intersects with Lincoln will be evaluated to possible changes to restrict either commute period flows or permanent directional (one-way) closures.', 'Staff was aware of the potential traffic impacts on Lincoln and ensured the project plans were fully reviewed for compliance with the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Plan (LiNC). At the Planning Commission public hearing, staff further discussed and clarified to the Planning Commission how the proposed LiNC plans will coordinate with the project and discussed potential ramifications for circulation and ingress/egress to the site. The applicant is fully aware of the existing conditions, including the peak hour bus lanes, and will have to accommodate for these conditions as well as planned future improvements adjacent to the project site. It was presented at the meeting that the planned medians in the LiNC plan will limit (or restrict) the ability for southbound drivers to turn east across Lincoln into the project site. Instead, southbound drivers will be able to U-turn at Marine in order to access the project. Northbound drivers exiting the project wanting to go southbound will be able to U-turn at Ashland or further north, if necessary. Staff is also aware of the existing conditions on both Ashland Avenue and Wilson Place. Ashland has parking on both sides of the street with the streetscape interrupted by multiple driveways. Wilson has restricted access from Lincoln with only northbound right turns permitted from Wilson Place. Due to the number of curb cuts already existing on Ashland Avenue and concerns regarding existing traffic conditions voiced by residents, it was determined that the proposed site access from Lincoln Boulevard would help off-load traffic and minimize the project’s impacts on Ashland Avenue.', '7.  Construction Impacts', 'A. Appellant states that construction impacts of the project should have been studied further.', 'The project will be required to submit a construction mitigation plan in accordance with Condition #88 of the City Council STOA (Attachment A). As part of this plan the applicant will be required to indicate the location of staging of equipment, anticipated truck routes, number of trucks, and a construction period parking plan, which shall not be permitted to use public streets. The approved mitigation plan shall be posted on the site for the duration of the project construction and shall be produced upon request. This plan has not yet been submitted since it is required prior the issuance of a building permit.', 'As stated prior, the 2903 Lincoln Boulevard Project meets the applicable requirements of PRC 21155.1 and is considered a project to be statutorily exempt from CEQA. Statutory exemptions are projects specifically excluded from CEQA consideration as defined by the State Legislature. Therefore, no traffic study was required.', '8. Concerns About CIM Group', 'A. The appellant states that the project should not have been approved because Planning Director David Martin was Vice President of the CIM Group from 1999 to 2009.', 'Planning Director David Martin has not worked for or received income from CIM Group since he left the company in 2009 and therefore does not have financial interest in CIM Group.', 'B. The appellant states that CIM Group is presently constructing its 10-unit 2919 Lincoln/802 Ashland project on the hill behind the 2903 Lincoln site. They do not follow the rules, and they disrespect neighbors.', 'The City takes seriously all complaints about rule violations. Concerns about construction at another site, however, are not properly the subject of this appeal but rather should be referred by concerned community members to the City’s Building and Safety Division, which handles all on-going construction projects for compliance with construction rules and regulations.', 'Environmental Status', 'The proposed four-story mixed use building is exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 21155.1 of the CEQA Guidelines, which exempts a special class of Transit Priority Project (TPP) determined to be a Sustainable Communities Project (SCP) by the local jurisdiction. As provided, the proposed project meets all of the following requirements set forth in Section 21155.1 as a Sustainable Communities Project:', '1. The project is consistent with the general land use designation, density, building, intensity, and policies in the Southern California Association of Governments’ adopted Sustainable Communities Strategy.', '2. The project is at least 50 percent residential use based on area and greater than 0.75 FAR.', '3. The project is at least 20 units/acre.', '4. The project is located within ½ mile of a major transit stop or high quality transit corridor included in SCAG’s Regional Transportation Plan.', '5. The project can be adequately served by existing utilities and the project applicant will pay in-lieu or development fees.', '6. The project will not impact wetlands or other biological species.', '7. The project site is not located on a list of hazardous waste sites compiled pursuant to Section 65962.25 of Government Code.', '8. The project site has been subject to a preliminary endangerment assessment to determine the existence of any release of hazardous substance on the site and to determine the potential for exposure to significant health hazards.', '9. The project will not have an impact on historical resources.', '10. The project site is not subject to wildland fire hazards, high fire risk or explosion, risk of a public health exposure, seismic risk, or landslide or flood hazard.', '11. The project site is not located on developed open space.', '12. The project is 15 percent more efficient than Title 24 standards and using 25 percent less water than the regional average household.', '13. The project site is less than 8 acres.', '14. The project is less than 200 units.', '15. The project will not result in any net loss in the number of affordable housing units.', '16. The project does not include any single level building exceeding 75,000 sf.', '17. The project will incorporate any applicable mitigation measure or performance standards adopted in the prior LUCE EIR.', '18. The project would not conflict with nearby operating industrial uses, as the operations of existing industrial uses nearby will not be impacted.', '19. The project site is located within ½ mile of a rail station included in the RTP or within ¼ mile of a High Quality Transit Corridor included in the RTP.', '20. The project meet the requirement that at least five percent of the housing will be available to very-low-income households for at least 55 years.', 'Therefore, based on the above, the proposed project is considered a Sustainable Communities Project that is exempt from CEQA pursuant to Section 21155.1.', 'Alternative Actions', 'As an alternative to the staff recommendation, Council may choose to approve the appeal based on revised findings and deny the DRP (16ENT-0034). However, in order to do so, Council would be required to make additional findings under the Housing Accountability Act, as stated in this report.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action required as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Introduction and First Reading of an Ordinance Modifying Sections of the Santa Monica Municipal Code Related to the Management of Parking and Adoption of a Resolution Revising Public Parking Rates', 'Department': 'Parking Operations (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Introduce for first reading an ordinance (Attachment A) modifying the Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) Section 3.16 related to on-street parking management and 3.04 related to off-street parking management; and2. Adopt the attached resolution (Attachment B) establishing new transient parking rates and permit parking fees for various City parking facilities.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'This report presents information and requests actions necessary to adopt the revised Downtown transient parking rates and permit fees following the public hearing held last month.', 'On March 6, 2018, staff proposed various demand-responsive parking pricing strategies options for Council consideration to further manage congestion, improve public parking services, address Santa Monica residents’ parking desires, and encourage shifts towards more sustainable modes of transportation. Council heard from the public and various stakeholders within the City, and directed staff to return to Council with modifications to the recommended pricing strategy that, in the short term, take into account input from Council and the community, and in the long-term, strategically address the reduction of subsidized parking by providing increased investments in diverse mobility options.', 'Background', 'On May 11, 2010, Council adopted a resolution (Attachment C) establishing new parking rates for off-street parking as a first phase in implementing the 2009 Walker Parking Study recommendations. The Walker Parking Study found that there was an imbalance in pricing between the different parking facilities within Downtown resulting in the unintended consequence of putting visitors, employees, and transient and monthly parkers in competition for the most convenient and often least expensive spaces while other spaces in the City remained largely unoccupied. Walker Parking consultants provided recommendations consistent with the LUCE to better manage parking demand and maximize efficiency of the public parking supply in Downtown Santa Monica.', 'On July 10, 2012, Council adopted a resolution (Attachment D) establishing new parking fees at citywide on-street parking meters, off-street parking facilities, and beach parking lots, including a reduction in the Downtown free parking “grace” period from two hours to 90 minutes. These changes were informed by a parking rate study conducted by Walker Parking Consultants in 2012, consistent with the LUCE and the 2009 Walker Parking Study.', 'On May 10, 2016, Council adopted a resolution (Attachment E) establishing revised parking rates for the Civic Center and Downtown parking facilities to address increased high weekday occupancies and discourage potential “park and ride” activity due to the arrival of the Expo Light Rail.', 'Discussion', 'On March 6, 2018, staff conducted a study session (Attachment F) with City Council that included various demand-responsive parking pricing strategy options for Council consideration. Staff sought Council direction on the concept of implementing a demand-responsive parking pricing strategy that sets different parking rate structures on weekdays and weekends based on their different demand patterns. The proposed parking strategies were based on a detailed analysis of parking transactions and occupancies in each Downtown parking facility, and were designed to:', '· Facilitate at least 15% parking availability in all facilities at all times', '· Redirect long-term parking sessions to less expensive parking facilities outside of the Downtown core', '· Maximize the use of existing public parking inventory', '· Address occupancy, traffic, access and circulation challenges', '· Encourage consideration of travel mode shift', '· Reduce subsidized parking for monthly permit holders', 'Prior to developing the parking pricing strategies for Council consideration, staff conducted study sessions with various stakeholders throughout the City to ensure that the needs of the communities represented by the respective stakeholders were considered and included in the overall proposal to Council. During this thorough six month outreach process, staff received verbal and written comments from residents and stakeholders in the City that supported staff’s overall proposal to address traffic congestion and excessively high parking facility peak occupancies. However, the feedback on how to address these challenges varied amongst stakeholders. For example, there was unequivocal support from Santa Monica Travel and Tourism, which promotes the City of Santa Monica as a travel destination as well as local employment opportunities in the City, on all of the staff proposed pricing strategies (Attachment G). There were other stakeholders in the City who also supported the overall goals, but recommended addressing the current challenges with varied pricing alternatives, primarily being the preservation of the free parking for the first 90 minutes in the Downtown core parking facilities. Attachment H includes formal written comments from these stakeholders, community members and residents.', 'In light of the comprehensive discussion and feedback, Council directed staff to return to Council promptly with the necessary ordinance and resolution to adopt the proposed parking rate increases with the following modifications:', 'Immediate Parking Pricing Strategies', '· Maintain first 90 minutes free parking period in PS 1-9 and KEC', '· Increase parking rates; however maintain a uniform parking rate structure across Downtown core facilities, PS 1-8 and KEC, to avoid customer confusion', '· Eliminate monthly parking in PS 1 and PS 3, providing alternative parking options, if necessary, in PS 9 and PS 10 based on availability', '· Draft an ordinance that streamlines the process and modernizes the municipal code to reflect the current practice of setting on-street and off-street parking rates based on goals outlined in the LUCE and DCP', '· Continue subsidizing parking for Ken Edwards Center and Santa Monica Emeritus College program users', '· Develop new subsidized parking options for Main Library program users', '· Continue to invest incremental parking revenues over the FY 2009-10 base year into parking traffic, access, and circulation programs, including transit subsidy options', 'Staff recommends that Council adopt the attached resolution that includes the immediate parking pricing strategies as submitted for implementation by July 1, 2018. This proposal addresses the immediate implementation of the necessary ordinance and resolution to establish rates in a timely manner.', 'Long-term Parking Management Strategies', 'Staff will work with city stakeholders and other City Departments to develop a long-term comprehensive strategy that is aligned with the City’s larger focus on supporting a more livable community, and return to Council on or before June 30, 2019 with specific long term strategy proposals for Council approval and adoption. Among the steps staff will take going forward are the following:', '· Partner with City Departments, stakeholders, and TNC businesses to create mobility options that support the use of more sustainable travel modes', '· Evaluate the effectiveness of a SM Resident Downtown Access Parking Program and a Downtown Merchant Validation Program', '· Work with stakeholders to analyze the feasibility of pursuing a universal valet parking program', '· Return to Council with a comprehensive strategy that addresses the reduction of free or subsidized parking with investments in tangible mobility options', '· Return to Council annually to report on the State of Citywide Parking', 'Judicial Council Parking', 'The fee resolution also extends the bulk parking fee for the California Judicial Council for twelve months from July 2018 to June 2019 in anticipation of the multipurpose sports field, with a possible request for a six month extension if construction demands allow. The Council has made progress in promoting alternative options for its employees, customers, and jurors; however, the Council requires additional time to address budget impacts and to develop programs to address its minimum parking needs, particularly for members of the public who utilize the court’s services.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Due to the ever-changing conditions surrounding current and emerging transportation options and parking alternatives, revenue projections in establishing budgets are as much an art as a science, and predictive models developed by staff to gauge parking revenues fall into this category. The model used to develop the proposed pricing strategy is based on the concept of demand elasticity and recognizes that both occupancy and elasticity changes throughout the day, including research that suggests that elasticities tend to be higher when there are more alternative transportation options.', 'The proposed parking rate and permit fee adjustments account for parkers shifting amongst the Citywide parking facilities, and takes a proactive approach to managing demand across the remaining parking facilities, slightly increasing the Downtown core parking rates to encourage parkers to shift to less expensive facilities without oversaturating any given facility due to significant rate differential between structures. Lessons learned from the FY 2016-17 parking rate change suggest that not making the secondary rate increase to other peripheral parking facilities within the Downtown portfolio would result in potential overcrowding in those facilities.', 'Staff believes that the following range between $3 million and $5 million of increased revenues is sound, prudent, and based on an elasticity model that has included several years of data from Santa Monica parking facilities as well as benchmarking against industry standards of practice and in comparison with other parking operations with similar characteristics. While no model will exactly predict total revenues, staff is confident that it has established a fairly strong case for these predicted increases, if the recommendation is approved as submitted for implementation by July 1, 2018. The anticipated revenues would primarily recover the revenues lost over the last 1-2 years due downward trend of parking transactions related to the changing mobility patterns. Staff will include the revenue projections as part of the FY 2018-19 Exception Based Budget, and will continue to actively monitor parking activity in the various facilities and adjust revenue estimates, if necessary, during the FY 2018-19 midyear budget.']}
{'Title': '2018 Council Retreat: 21st Century Government, Council’s Five Strategic Goals, and the Performance Management Framework', 'Department': "City Manager's Office, Administration", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '04. Study Sessions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council receive the updates, discuss and provide direction to staff on next steps to effectively pursue a 21st Century Government and implement the citywide performance Framework adopted in last year’s Budget.', 'Body': ['“Cities that think ahead, stay ahead.”', 'Background', "Among the powers vested in the City Council is the responsibility to provide overall policy direction to the City government. This responsibility extends beyond making decisionson individual agenda items and approving the City's budget. It involves setting an overall focus on what matters most --both in delivering consistent, high-quality results as well as shaping an organizational structure, culture and capacity to achieve those goals.", 'Over the decades, Santa Monica has goneover and abovethe essential protection of "health, safety and welfare" that is the core legal requirement of all California municipalities. In fact, in 2003, the City Council adopted an overall set of measures developed after broad community input to “enhance our resources, prevent harm to the natural environment and human health, and benefit the social and economic well-being of the community for the sake of current and future generations.” This became the basis for a regular Sustainability Report Card. Similarly, in 2013, the City undertook a pioneering effort to identify the key indicators of Community Wellbeing, to create a “guide for making more informed decisions, more efficient use of resources, and improve the quality of life of people throughout the community." In 2015, the City Council unanimously adopted five Strategic Goals as “game-changing” efforts to create a new model of mobility; exert regional leadership on homelessness; reclaim local control of the Santa Monica Airport; maintain a diverse and inclusive community; and promote wellbeing so that residents Learn & Thrive. Finally, last year, the City Council incorporated into the 2017-19 Biannual Budget a Framework that integrates our delivery of City services and Strategic Goals with the larger outcomes that support a sustainable city of wellbeing.', 'Introduction', 'Even as our city has been at the forefront of pursuing broad and visionary goals to improve the quality of life and standard of living of community members, like other California cities, Santa Monica has retained much of the structure and processes inherited from a City Charter adopted in 1947 and traditional government practices that are considerably older. This contributes to increasing tension between public expectations and the capacity of local government to address them in the 21stCentury.', 'From the way we consume our news to power our vehicles, technological innovation is disrupting every industry and sector—the public sector is no exception. The rapid acceleration of change has, at times, bred economic displacement and inequitable growth. Skeptical of governments’ ability to solvethese problems, some people in this country and elsewhere have become frustrated and angry -- and many are nostalgic to return to the stability and comfort of some version of the remembered past.', 'Here in California, as once reliable windows of social and economic opportunities have closed, our population has burgeoned in size and diversity. According to a 2012 Stanford Center for Longevitystudy, while California’s population increased by 10%, Hispanic and Asian populations each grew by about 30%. Though California’s boom economy has supported this growth, vibrancy has forced housing prices to rise; in just the past year, the median home value in Santa Monica hasrisen8.4%. While an affordability crisis rages, the State’s pension liabilities are mounting and now far outweigh our ability to fund them without considering painful trade-offs. At the regional and local levels, we are assuming a new metropolitan identity, moving beyond the old hallmarks of the California Dream (a single-family home, an expansive lawn, a car). Local media outlets have gone digital. In the face of these challenges and changes, community members are no longer accepting of slow-moving and methodical government processes and procedures. Residents increasingly base their expectations of government on private consumer experiences—they demand solutions, and they expect themnow.', 'The City Council retreat is an opportunity to step back from the operational decisions that made for the past fiscal year’s successes in order to have a strategic and broad-based conversation with the City’s executive leadership team in a more informal and unstructured environment. In the context of the new Framework and a broader push for Santa Monica to demonstrate the potential of 21stCentury government, the goal of this morning session is to focus on a shared vision of the City’s overall direction. The essential question is: How can the Council and executive team work together more effectively with the community to tackle these new 21stcentury challenges – and opportunities?', 'Government in the 21stCentury', 'Getting to the bottom of that question begs another: what is the model of governance in the 21stcentury? As the Council has acknowledged with the strength and sustainability of our local economy, we cannot risk resting on our laurels. As the sole provider of traditional local services, cities have operated like monopolies. Yet increasingly the private sector is competing to satisfy needs that were once automatically assumed to be the domain of the public sector. In a state where technology is promising that “there’s an app for that,” the public sector must demonstrate it is delivering cost-effective public value. To do so, the public sector must take stock of what we have been, and in turn, what we have to become. Like other traditional industries facing disruption in recent times (newspapers, record companies, automobiles, travel agents etc.) we must re-examine every aspect of our operating model or face brutal choices down the road. Because of its robust economy and public infrastructure and assets,Santa Monica faces less immediate threat than most cities. Instead, these assets give us a head start to be a model of successful 21stCentury government.', 'The following table outlines and juxtaposes some features of these two models of governance. It is not meant to imply stark contrasts so much as an evolution from one era to the next:', '20thCentury Governance', '21stCentury Governance', 'Provide services', 'Deliver outcomes', 'Fixed Structure', 'Evolving structure', 'Chain of Command organizational chart', 'Cross-disciplinary teamwork and collaboration', 'Individual transactions and service delivery', 'Ongoing relationship with community members', 'Managing operations; achieve compliance', 'Managing performance; achieve results', 'Hire for expertise, experience and credentials', 'Hire for talent, potential and fit with values', 'Government acts as a vending machine', 'Government engages community in “barn raising”', 'Line Item Budget', 'Programmatic performance budgets', 'Driven by long-standing rules, best practices and expectations', 'Data-driven – do more of what works and less of what doesn’t', 'Drawing inspiration from the entrepreneurial success stories of Silicon Beach and beyond, our City is approaching the challenge with a focus on embracing agility, testing and experimenting our way toward optimal solutions. We are beginning to think about and apply technology, not only to digitize services, but to transform service experiences. We are cultivating and deploying our human capital to focus on empowerment, accountability and growth, unlocking the untapped potential of our workforce. We are harnessing data to be pro-active and on top of trends instead of waiting to react to their impact.', 'This session offers an opportunity for Council to reflect with key staff and community members on our understanding of 21stcentury government, and how it applies here in Santa Monica', 'The City’s Evolution to Define “The Why”', 'Santa Monica has never shrunk from the challenge of solving big problems. This zest for exceptional service, however, has come at the price of straining our capacity to meet growing demands. It is unsustainable to continue to add staff to address new challenges. As the problems the City is called on to solve become ever more numerous, complex and dynamic, we must parse with care theimportantfrom theurgent.', 'Strategy—the decision to prioritize some things over others— has long been the lifeblood of private sector success. Recognizing the profound differences between government and private business, there is still much we can learn from the private sector’s calibrating organizational structure, culture, and operation to strategy.', 'Council embraced the need to set clear priorities when it formulated the five Strategic Goals in August 2015. In designing the five goals, Council took the community’s and staffs’ input, examined the breadth of the City’s initiatives, and selected those where focused efforts would move the needle most:', '●Maintaining an inclusive and diverse community', '●Establishing a new model for mobility', '●Securing local control of the City land occupied by the Santa Monica Airport', '●Taking a leadership role in regional efforts to address homelessness; and', '●Fostering a community partnership to Learn and Thrive.', 'Once identified, the City formed teams for each goal, which focused on developing plans of action. These living, malleable documents include background information on each goal area, along with a theory of change (the “why” behind the goal), and a dashboard, which identifies key outcomes as well as key activities and metrics designed to achieve agreed upon outcomes. Coordinating efforts across units in this manner was, and remains, a challenge for an organization structured on old notions of how governments function. Notwithstanding that impediment, the City progressed in all five areas.', 'The Council’s five Strategic Goals represent City’s effort to set clearly articulated priorities and harmonize efforts across departments on these specific issues. Yet this effort was not sufficient to capture the overarching vision for the community as well as create a cohesive structure to manage diverse functions and performance of City departments. The Framework, developed as part of the City’s biannual budget process along withSaMoStat(the City’s new performance management system), integrates and builds on the initial success of defining the five Strategic Goals. The Framework for a Sustainable City of Wellbeing Built on a Foundation of Good Governance is the City’s strategic vision, tying organizational purpose to the day-to-day functions of individual departments. The Framework is organized into six outcome areas, each of which is broken down into sub-outcomes, clarifying what the City hopes to achieve in specific areas:', '· Safe, Connected, and Engaged Community (“Community”);', '· Resilient Built and Natural Environment (“Place and Planet”);', '· Lifelong Opportunities for Personal Growth (“Learning”);', '· Physical, Mental, and Environmental Health (“Health”);', '· Inclusive Affordable, and Diverse Local Economy (“Economic Opportunity”); and', '· Reliable, Effective, and Efficient Government (“Governance”)', 'Each sub-outcome area includes outcome metrics, designed to measure success in achieving the overarching outcomes. To guide the Framework forward, questions to consider at this retreat include: how we might buildon data and experience; what does the shift to a single Framework mean for other city-wide, like the Sustainable City Plan, or localized efforts; how might we better measure and communicate progress; should “Safer Community” be its own outcome area given the growing challenges faced by Santa Monica in that arena?', 'Alongside efforts at building the capacity for strategic thinking within City Hall, the City is undertaking a variety of projects to embrace the 21stcentury model. Ahead of completing the City Services Building, we are working at modernizing the City’s internal operations and culture. To meet rising expectations for City services to be available at the click of a button, anytime, and anywhere, we are crafting a digital strategy. Though these changes represent new ways of thinking and achieving, the indicators of success will be what they always have for government: we will have elevated our community’s sense of trust and satisfaction; we will have identified outcomes and measures with clarity, and report them with transparency; we will have maintained our fiscal health; we will have raised our workforce’s effectiveness and satisfaction; and we will both engage and empower our community.', 'To ensure the dialogue that comes of this retreat is as engaging and constructive as possible in driving a shared vision of, and commitment to, 21stcentury government, here are a few questions to conclude:', '· What are the hallmarks of 21stcentury government in Santa Monica?', '· How are we progressingtoward this transitionto a 21stCentury government?', '· What is the role of citizens, Boards and Commission in informing the visionand its implementation?', '· What is theleadershiprole ofthe CityCouncil inthis transition?', 'Saturday’s session is designed to foster candid discussion among the Council and the City’s executive leadership (City Management team, City Attorney, City Clerk and department heads) to address these key questions.']}
{'Title': 'Proclamation declaring April as ArtsMonth 2018.', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'City Manager Report: ArtsMonth – An ode to the arts and creativity in Santa Monica', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Recognition of Interim Police Chief Kenneth Semko', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Airport Lease Agreement with Santa Monica Community College District', 'Department': 'Public Works, Airport Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a lease agreement with Santa Monica Community College District (SMC) for classroom space located at 2800 Airport Avenue, Santa Monica, CA 90405, reflecting the general terms and conditions outlined in this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'As owner of the Santa Monica Airport, the City has leases covering more than half a million square feet devoted to both aviation and other uses, including cultural, recreational and educational as authorized by Charter Amendment LC. In accordance with the Santa Monica Airport (SMO) Leasing and Licensing Policy of August 8, 2017, the City is moving forward with renewed and revised leases on city-owned properties. Staff seeks authorization to lease 25,086 square feet of classroom space and 180 parking spaces to Santa Monica Community College (SMC) at the City-owned property located at 2800 Airport Avenue. SMC has leased this property from the City since July 1, 1988. The proposed agreement is consistent with the provisions of the Airport’s Leasing and Licensing Policy, which requires that all tenants lease property at the Airport at fair market value. The proposed lease with SMC is for post-secondary education classes and programs for a period of five years, with an option for an additional five-year period. The base rent is at fair market value and begins at $43,291.90 monthly with an annual increase of 2.5%. The new rent rate would be effective on April 1, 2018.', 'Background', 'On May 17, 1988, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a lease with SMC for public college and educational activities at 2800 Airport Avenue (formerly known as the Organized Reserve Corps Armory site). The term of this agreement was for 10 years, with an additional 10-year option to renew (Attachment A).', 'On July 1, 1988, the City and SMC entered into a new lease agreement for the site at an annual rent of $100,000 (or $8,333 per month) adjusted upward by the consumer price index. On July 1, 1998, SMC exercised the option to renew the lease for an additional 10 years. The term of the agreement ended on June 30, 2008.', 'Since July 1, 2008, SMC has continued to occupy the property under an expired lease. Upon the lease expiration, SMC’s occupancy of the premises converted into a month-to-month tenancy under the same terms and conditions of the expired lease. On July 1, 2015, the City noticed SMC that on August 1, 2015 their previous rental amount of $21,410.83 would be increased by 50% to a new monthly rental amount of $32,116.25.', 'On January 12, 2016, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a five-year Motor Vehicle and Pedestrian Access Agreement with SMC. The purpose of the agreement was to allow for pedestrian ingress and egress and to continue vehicular egress from the north vehicle gate at SMC’s Satellite Campus to the intersection of Donald Douglas Loop South and Airport Avenue. As part of this agreement, SMC was responsible for all costs for any necessary improvements made to the property to facilitate motor vehicle and pedestrian access. However, these improvements were not completed by SMC (Attachment B).', 'On July 1, 2017, the City began negotiations for a new lease agreement with SMC for classroom and parking space at 2800 Airport Avenue that culminated in the general terms and conditions proposed in this report.', 'Discussion', 'SMC leases property at 2800 Airport Avenue for post-secondary education classes and programs. SMC seeks to maintain current use of the property and does not intend to expand current classes and/or programs. The proposed lease with SMC is for 25,086 square feet of classroom space and 180 parking spaces. The proposed lease would be for a term not to exceed five years with a monthly rate of $43,291.90 per month to be increased annually by 2.5%, and an option to renew for an additional five years at fair market value for similar quality space in the area. The new rent rate will be retroactive to April 1, 2018. SMC would have the option to terminate the proposed agreement in the event of an SMC fiscal emergency by providing one-year notice to the City.', 'Additionally, the City would authorize a tenant improvement credit in the amount of up to five months’ rent for a total rent credit of $227,556 to be equally allocated monthly across the initial five-year term. Any improvements undertaken by SMC would revert to the City at the conclusion of the lease term. Although SMC would modify the building with minor interior tenant improvements, SMC does not propose to expand the building.', 'Annual rent paid by SMC to the City would be between $519,503 for year one and $573,434 for year five, exclusive of tenant improvement credits. In addition, SMC agrees to pay the City an additional $250,000 upon lease execution to discharge any and all past obligations to the Airport related to improvements to Donald Douglas Loop South that were not performed by SMC as agreed upon under the Motor Vehicle and Pedestrian Access Agreement with the City. The City has agreed to undertake the construction of improvements to the egress within the Airport’s property.', 'SMC participates in the City’s Transportation Demand Management Program for all its locations in Santa Monica including 2800 Airport Avenue. SMC’s Average Vehicle Ridership (AVR) target is 1.75. SMC would be required to comply with all city building code regulations, planning standards, and any applicable Federal Aviation Administration regulations, as a condition of the lease. Finally, the lease is consistent with the terms of the voter-approved Measure LC passed in 2014, which allows Santa Monica Airport to be used for the development of parks, public open spaces, and public recreational facilities and the maintenance and replacement of existing cultural, arts and educational programs.', 'SUMMARY OF PROPOSED LEASE TERMS', 'Lease Commencement', 'Upon Execution of Lease Document', 'Rent Commencement', 'April 1, 2018', 'Term Ends', '60 months from date of lease execution', 'Options', 'One five-year option not to exceed December 21, 2028', 'Base Rental Rate', '$43,291.90 per month', 'Escalations', '2.5% increase annual at the lease anniversary', 'Tenant Improvement Allowance', 'Tenant shall receive a rent credit that is equivalent to five months’ rent, amortized monthly over five years, for a total of ($227,556.48)', 'Parking', '180 parking spaces', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The recommended lease with SMC would generate an estimated $119,053 in Airport revenues for FY 2017-18 at account 33431.402120. Additionally, a one-time payment of $250,000 would be allocated in FY 2017-18 to account 33431.402120. Revenue budget changes will be included in the FY 2018-19 Proposed Budget.']}
{'Title': 'Award Construction Contract for the Big Blue Bus LCNG Fuel System Modification Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2371 to Wyoming NorthStar Incorporated, a Wyoming-based company with local offices in Newport Beach, California; for the Big Blue Bus Liquified-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG) Fuel System Modification Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Wyoming NorthStar Incorporated, in an amount not to exceed $1,098,643 (includes a 10% contingency); and3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Big Blue Bus (BBB) currently operates a fleet of approximately 200 buses fueled by Liquefied-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG). BBB seeks Council authorization for construction services to provide facilities upgrades to the existing fuel and wash system at the BBB Campus. These upgrades are needed to provide a more efficient and fail-safe fueling system and continue uninterrupted bus service to riders, while improving workplace safety at the BBB Campus. Staff recommends awarding a contract to Wyoming Northstar Incorporated in an amount not to exceed $1,098,643 (including a 10% contingency) for the Big Blue Bus Liquefied Compressed Gas Fuel System Modification Project.', 'Background', 'On January 27, 2015, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement #10019 (CCS) with RNL Interplan, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $117,282 to provide design services for the Big Blue Bus (BBB) Fuel and Wash Upgrades Project (Attachment A).', 'On April 12, 2016, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement #10019 (CCS) with RNL Interplan, Inc. in the amount of $112,419 for design services to expand the Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) fuel system at BBB. This resulted in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $229,701 (Attachment B).', 'On November 1, 2016, the City Manager executed a second modification to professional services agreement #10019 (CCS) with RNL Interplan, Inc. to provide required design and engineering services previously not included in the first contract modification. The second modification was within the authorized contingency and new budget authority was not requested.', 'On October 10, 2017, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a third modification toagreement #10019 (CCS) in the amount of $73,420(including a10% contingency) with RNL Interplan,Inc., a California-based company, foradditionaldesign services to replace themethane gas-detection systemsattwo locationsinthe BigBlueBusCampus (Attachment C). This will result in an amended agreement with anew total amount not to exceed $303,121.', 'On January 17, 2018, based on the design and detailing provided by RNL Interplan, Inc., the City published Notices Inviting Bids for construction services to provide facilities upgrades to the existing Liquefied-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG) fuel system at the Big Blue Bus Campus in accordance with City specifications.', 'Discussion', 'The existing Liquefied-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG) fuel and wash system at the Big Blue Bus (BBB) Campus was installed in 2002. The Big Blue Bus Fuel and Wash Building is operational seven days per week and services approximately 200 buses per night. The existing fueling system is operational; however, the system lacks redundancy, and there is no fail-safe system that safeguards against fueling interruptions in the event of a fueling system or pump failure. The operational system and software is outdated and needs to be replaced with an up-to-date and more robust system.The upgrades to the BBB LCNG fueling system would provide redundancy in the fuel pumps system to ensure that BBB can fuel its fleet of buses even during the failure of one of their fuel pumps.This project would improve the existing fueling system, including relocating two existing LCNG pumps, installing two new LCNG pumps and related hardware, installing new high-flow LCNG dispensers, and installing a complete replacement of the operations systems with a new master Programmable Logic Controller (PLC) control system and program.', 'The BBB strives to be a leader in sustainable, clean energy public transportation. Looking ahead, the BBB and City Council are working on a plan to replace the existing BBB LCNG fleet with Battery Electric Buses (BEB) fleet. Per Federal requirements, all public transportation buses should have a minimum useful life of 12 years; for example, a new LCNG bus delivered in 2018 would be eligible for replacement in 2030. The BBB Fuel System Modification project would ensure proper fueling capacity at the BBB Campus throughout the fleet’s transition from LCNG to electric.', 'Next Steps', 'If approved, construction would tentatively begin in late May 2018 and would be completed by November 2018.One fueling lane would remain operational at all times and the system switch over would occur on a weekend to minimize impacts to bus fueling schedules.', 'Vendor Selection', "On January 17, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for construction services to provide facilities upgrades to the existing Liquefied-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG) fuel and wash system at the Big Blue Bus Campus in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.071(a). Thirty-nine vendors downloaded the bid. Four bids were received and publicly opened on February 21, 2018.The bid results are as follows:", 'Vendor', 'Bid Amount', 'GP Strategies Corporation', '$919,942', 'Wyoming Northstar Incorporated', '$998,766', 'EFS West', '$1,239,242', 'Fastech', '$1,243,982', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff contacted references to review work experience and Wyoming NorthStar Incorporated obtained the most positive reviews and references noted the vendor’s quickness of response and problem-solving skills. All respondents reported that the work by Wyoming NorthStar Incorporated was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner while maintaining consistent quality. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that Wyoming Northstar Incorporated has a license that is current, active, and in good standing.Based on these criteria, Wyoming Northstar Incorporated is recommended as the best bidder.', 'On March 19, 2018, GP Strategies Corporation submitted a bid protest alleging, inter alia, that they are the lowest bidder and the best valued bidder with past LNG/LCNG fuel station design/build experience, and specific experience with the BBB fueling system. In accordance with appeals procedure set forth in the Notice Inviting Bids, the Public Works Director evaluated the bid protest and issued a final determination recommending Wyoming Northstar Incorporated as the best bidder. Copies of the bid protest and the Public Work Director’s final determination are attached (Attachments D and E).', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Wyoming Northstar Incorporated is for an amount not to exceed $1,098,643 (including 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C410826.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Award Agreement for Santa Monica Airport Buildings Property Condition Assessment', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# 2508 to Omgivning Architects, a California-based company, to provide a comprehensive building assessment at nine building locations at the Santa Monica Airport;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Omgivning Architects, in an amount not to exceed $756,140 (including a $68,740 contingency) for a total amount not to exceed $756,140 over a two-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City of Santa Monica (City) is the owner/operator of the Santa Monica Airport (Airport) and has leased Airport property and tenant spaces along both sides of Airport Avenue since the 1940s. The Airport is an important municipal asset, maintaining leases with approximately 397 tenants and generating approximately 70% of its revenues from leasing. Due to deferred maintenance, many of the tenant spaces and buildings are showing signs of aging with both structural and non-structural deficiencies. It is critical for the City to address tenant building issues and deficiencies in a timely manner. Staff recommends an agreement to be awarded to Omgivning Architects in an amount not to exceed $756,140 to provide a comprehensive building assessment at nine building locations at the Santa Monica Airport.', 'Discussion', 'Due to the ongoing wear and tear of weather and use over the decades, the frequency of repairs occurring on leased Airport building properties has increased substantially compared to previous years. To extend the life of these buildings, staff is recommending a Property Condition Assessment, which would entail investigating the life expectancy of mechanical, electrical, and plumbing systems, as well as the current structural integrity of the buildings. In-house staff does not have the design expertise for each of these trades required to perform a thorough building assessment. Any issues brought to light by the assessment would be addressed in a future construction project which would make repairs and bring the buildings as a whole to current building codes and standards in the most cost-effective manner. The consultant would also provide the City with an estimated operational budget for each of the properties to better account for their post construction maintenance costs. The Property Condition Assessment would evaluate the following nine Airport locations.', '· 2501 Airport Ave.', '· 2701 Airport Av', '· 2900 Airport Ave.', '· 3000 Airport Ave.', '· 3011 Airport Ave.', '· 3026 Airport Ave.', '· 3050 Airport Ave.', '· 3200 Airport Ave.', '· 3300 Airport Ave.', 'The scope of the proposed project includes the completion of a comprehensive assessment and initial design drawings on how to address the needed repairs for each of the nine buildings. For each building, an assessment report would be prepared which would include a summary of the overall condition of the buildings with itemized deficiencies to be addressed, schematic designs for the repairs, cost estimates for repairs and annual maintenance/operation costs, and usable square footage totals with a recommendation for the City to proceed with either refurbishment or replacement.  Staff would return to Council at a future date with a recommendation to award construction services to complete the building upgrades as funding becomes available.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On January 8, 2018, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) #SP2508 to provide a Property Condition Assessment report, schematic design services and cost estimation services for nine building locations at the Airport. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.075(a). A total of 106 vendors downloaded the RFP. Three firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department.', '· AE3 Partners Architects', '· Nonzero \\ Architecture', '· Omgivning Architects', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience with similar scopes of work, project approach, project team and references, and prime and sub-consultant past projects. Omgivning Architects was recognized in the evaluation process for their effective project management, completeness, and client responsiveness. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Omgivning Architects as the best qualified firm to provide a comprehensive building assessment at nine building locations at the Santa Monica Airport.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to Omgivning Architects is for an amount not to exceed $756,140. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account M339088.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Bus Stop Shelter Custodial and Maintenance Services', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4316 to Shelter Clean Services, Inc., a California-based company, to provide custodial and signage replacement services for Big Blue Bus (BBB) bus stops and zones located within and outside of the City of Santa Monica;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Shelter Clean Services, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $978,738, which includes a 10% contingency for a five-year term with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Big Blue Bus (BBB) provides transit service across 56 square miles, well beyond the City limits. Staff recommends the award of Bid #4316 to Shelter Clean Services, Inc. to provide custodial and signage replacement services for all Big Blue Bus stops, bus shelters and bus loading zones served by BBB routes located in Santa Monica, Los Angeles, and Los Angeles County, at specified hourly labor charges. This award would enable the City to continue providing clean and well maintained Big Blue Bus stops and zones, and ensure that all street furniture and shelters at stops are maintained to a high standard of cleanliness at approximately one thousand locations. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $978,738, which includes a 10% contingency over a five-year term.', 'Background', 'In 2014 and continuing into 2016, Big Blue Bus implemented the Evolution of Blue program designed to provide new bus routes and stops to integrate into the new Expo Line light rail service. This program included the newly designed and implemented Bus Stop Improvement Project within Santa Monica as well as the upgrade of traditional amenities outside the City of Santa Monica. Due to the enhanced amenities at BBB stops that resulted from the Bus Stop Improvement Project, signage replacement and custodial requirements have increased. The prior standard for BBB stops consisted of a pole, eye level signs displaying maps and schedules, and a target displaying the BBB brand logo. The new sites include a large sign with multiple route and information slots, custom seating, solar panels, lighting, and real-time signage with electronic components and canopies, all of which require additional cleaning and maintenance.', 'On January 16, 2015, the City executed a Contractual Services Agreement (CSA) with Shelter Clean in an amount of $150,000, for a one-year period, to provide custodial and signage replacement services for all BBB bus stops, shelters and bus loading zones. This contract was executed to meet the increased bus stops and zones custodial needs resulting from the Bus Stop Improvement Project. On February 23, 2016, Council awarded Bid #4144 to Shelter Clean Services to provide custodial and signage replacement services for BBB bus stops, shelters and loading zones in an amount not to exceed $315,000 over a two-year period.', 'Discussion', 'Bus stops and zones are high profile elements that require regular cleaning and signage replacement. Big Blue Bus currently contracts this service to ensure that bus stops and zones remain clean, providing a pleasant environment for BBB passengers. BBB has approximately 1,000 bus stops in Santa Monica and Los Angeles County. The stops feature varied shelter configurations to accommodate high, medium, and low volume stops. High volume shelters have a sign unit, two shade units and seating for two to six customers depending on location, medium volume shelters have a sign unit, one shade unit and seating for two to four customers, and low volume shelters have a sign unit, one shade unit and seating for one to two customers. Stops outside of Santa Monica have a pole, target, seating, eye level signs and specialty signage.', 'Each bus stop requires routine cleaning to provide a safe and pleasant environment for customers and staff and is an important part of BBB’s maintenance standards and customer experience model. The cleaning and signage replacement of each bus stop consists of: picking up trash, sweeping any debris from the transit cement pad, pressure washing the cement pad on an as-needed basis, wiping down transit furniture, hand wiping shade structure ceiling panels, cleaning of solar panel arrays and lighting systems, disinfecting seats, backs, and arm-rests, cleaning and polishing shade structures and signs, removing graffiti, stickers, and non-transit related signs and posters on all bus stop signs and furniture, post system information updates throughout the year, and performing minor maintenance such as removing/replacing/refastening bus signage and poles, shelter panels, solar lighting and transit furniture.', 'The award of this bid would ensure that bus stops are inspected and cleaned as scheduled by BBB. Technicians would log into a work order system and document all work specific to a bus stop. BBB maintenance staff would evaluate reports on a weekly and monthly basis for quality control and to ensure compliance with the bid scope of work.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014, staff was directed by the City Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 staff report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” custodial services were identified as meeting the criteria for contractual services under the categories of space required, equipment required, and workforce flexibility.', 'Custodial cleaning and signage replacement of our bus stops and loading zones requires the vendor to provide all equipment needed to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment. In addition to cost savings, the nature of the custodial work needed requires a large employee pool, as well as requisite supervision for custodial staff.', 'Based on the recommendations of the January 13, 2015 staff report, staff solicited bids for outside contracting of custodial and signage replacement services for bus stop shelter and loading zones.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On January 26, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide bus stop custodial and signage replacement services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-nine (29) vendors downloaded the bid. Three (3) bids were received and publicly opened on February 15, 2018. The cost estimates are summarized below:', 'Cost Estimate', 'Semilla Landscape Corporation', 'Shelter Clean Services, Inc.', 'Ultimate Maintenance Services', 'Estimate 5-year period', '$    839,525', '$  889,762', '$ 958,134', '10% Contingency', '$  83,953', '$  88,976', '$  95,814', 'Contract 5 yr. total', '$  923,478', '$  978,738', '$ 1,053,948', 'Bids were evaluated based on criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. In evaluating the bids for bus stops and zones custodial services, BBB staff performed outreach to the references listed in the bid responses and evaluated the previous experience of each bidder. Semilla Landscaping’s cost was $10,000 lower annually than the other bidders, but their experience statement did not indicate transit experience, including the need to change update signage during service changes, which occur two or three times per year. Shelter Clean Services, Inc. is not the lowest bidder; however, it was the only bidder that had experience providing custodial services for transit bus stops including preparing stops for service changes resulting from BBB’s service changes (also called shake-ups). Based on these criteria, Shelter Clean Services, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Shelter Clean Services Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $978,738 including a 2.5% annual price increase and a 10% contingency. Funds of $169,274 are available in the FY 2018-19 budget in the Big Blue Bus Department. This contract will be charged to account 416574.555018. Future year funding is contingent on City Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award of Commissioning Services Agreement for the City Services Building Construction Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP #2250 to Syska Hennessy Group, Inc., a California-based company, to perform commissioning services for the City Services Building Construction Project; Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Syska Hennessy Group, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $95,189 (including 10% contingency) with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City Services Building (CSB) construction phase commenced in December 2017, with the goals to centralize and streamline city services for the community, eliminate leased office space saving the City up to $10 million annually, and model the City’s commitment to sustainability and the environment.  The CSB’s sustainable design includes strategies to achieve net-zero energy (NZE) and net-zero water (NZW) performance. If these targets are met, the City will benefit from never paying for energy or water utility costs, which are expected to escalate over time. Commercial office buildings like the CSB are required by code to hire a third-party commissioning agent to ensure building systems are designed, coordinated and installed correctly. Because the CSB includes unique high-performance building systems, staff is recommending enhanced commissioning services, which are encouraged by California Building Code and the LEED Rating system for energy savings. For building owners that intend to operate a building through its useful life, investing in enhanced commissioning increases life-cycle cost savings. Staff recommends awarding an agreement to Syska Hennessy Group, Inc. for enhanced commissioning services in an amount not to exceed $95,189. The budget for these services was included in the overall cost of construction for the CSB, approved by Council on August 8, 2017 (Attachment A).', 'Background', 'On August 8, 2017, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second contract modification to Agreement #10051 (CCS) with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for a Guaranteed Maximum Price for construction services with a total amount not to exceed $70,600,507 (Attachment A). At the same meeting, Council also adopted a Resolution Authorizing Issuance of Series 2017 Bonds, and approved the related documents required for the Issuance of Lease Revenue Bonds, Series 2017, to finance the City Services Building Project for a maximum principal amount of $76,760,000 (Attachment B).', 'The City Services Building (CSB) Project brings nearly all core municipal operations onto one City Hall campus as envisioned in the Civic Center Specific Plan. The investment in this new building meets three main objectives:', '1. Offers a one-stop hub to better serve the community. The CSB would bring departments and vital public counter functions under one roof to streamline services in one location.', '2. Eliminates all existing city office space leases and consolidates municipal operations onto city-owned land. City Hall was constructed in 1938 and in 79 years, the services that the City provides to the community has expanded and outgrown the historic building. For several decades, city divisions have been spread throughout the downtown, leasing space. With the construction of the City Services Building, the City will eliminate leases saving as much as $10 million annually and bring 240 staff under one roof.', '3. Achieves a strong return on investment for the City both economically and environmentally with a resource efficient structure. The building is a long-term investment that is designed to streamline operational functionality and to be resource efficient. It is a Living Building and will not have a water or electric bill because it will produce the energy and water it consumes on site.', 'Code Requirement', 'The California Building Code requires all buildings over 10,000 square feet perform fundamental commissioning activities. The recommendation of this staff report is to hire a commissioning agent that will perform enhanced commissioning activities above and beyond the baseline requirements of the California Building Code to ensure energy and water savings.', 'Discussion', 'The commissioning process is an integrated set of activities intended to ensure that a project’s energy and water-related systems are coordinated, installed, calibrated and perform as intended. When properly executed, commissioning’s major benefit is energy savings. A Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory study of 643 buildings found that commissioning provided average whole-building energy savings of between 13 and 16 percent. The same study also found that if every non-residential building in the U.S. were properly commissioned, the nation would realize $30 billion in energy savings by 2030. Commissioning services also assess project components related to water, indoor environmental quality and durability.', 'The City Services Building (CSB) construction phase commenced in December 2017, and the project targets Living Building Challenge (LBC) certification. LBC is considered the pinnacle of sustainable design, with net-zero energy (NZE) and net-zero water (NZW) performance required for certification. Unlike Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) certification, the industry standard for sustainable building design, LBC is a performance standard awarded after the building is operational and has demonstrated NZE and NZW through actual utility bills. Designing for performance and auditing the design with enhanced commissioning ensures operational savings promised during design are achieved through the life of the building.', 'The CSB represents best practices in sustainable design and construction for Santa Monica’s Mediterranean climate. The net-zero energy and net-zero water strategies require complex building systems to operate in concert for optimal performance. According to CALGreen, the California Green Building Standards Code (version 2016), new buildings 10,000 square feet and higher shall include commissioning in the design and construction processes of the project to verify that the building systems and components function properly. City Staff is confident in the CSB design but recognize that achieving its performance targets will depend on an effective commissioning process to validate the design, installation and proper functioning of all of the building’s systems.', 'The following building systems will be commissioned for the CSB Project: heating, ventilation and air-conditioning (HVAC); automated operable windows; photovoltaics (PV) systems; sub-metering and data collection; lighting controls; occupant pre-settings and timers; plumbing including heat pumps, potable water treatment system, greywater system and composting toilets. Because of the innovative building systems in the CSB, the City seeks commissioning services to provide fundamental commissioning (as required by CALGreen) as well as the following:', '1. Create an Operations & Maintenance Plan for the building;', '2. Provide ongoing commissioning of energy systems after the building is operational to ensure the Living Building Challenge Net-Zero Energy Certification is met;', '3. Provide enhanced commissioning services including:', 'a. monitoring-based commissioning services to develop procedures and identify points to be measured and evaluated to assess ongoing performance of energy and water systems; and', 'b. building envelope commissioning (the physical separation between the building’s exterior and interior components like the walls, windows, floors and doors) to ensure building enclosures meet requirements for acoustical, structural, thermal, blast resistance, durability and energy and air/waterproofing performance.', 'Commissioning services cannot be provided by the project’s contractor for quality control purposes. The commissioning agent is required to observe the construction process with frequent site visits and inspections. Site visits may be necessary on short notice to keep the project’s construction schedule on track. Ultimately, the commissioning agent will provide all documentation to demonstrate compliance with CALGreen requirements and provide a letter certifying that the commissioning plan was successfully executed. The commissioning report will verify the City’s assumptions about the performance of the building, which the Total Workplace plan of action will reference to ensure a smooth and effective transition for building occupants. Total Workplace is a multi-departmental initiative to ensure City staff are prepared to transition to the new building and offer efficient services to the community. The budget for commissioning services was included in the overall cost of construction for the CSB, approved by Council on August 8, 2017 (Attachment A).', 'Consultant Selection', 'On December 12, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide commissioning services for the City Services Building Construction Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.075(a). Forty-five vendors downloaded the RFP. The following 20 firms responded.', '· Argento / Graham', '· ARUP', '· Capital Engineering', '· CBRE | HEERY', '· Edison Energy', '· Engineering Economics, Inc.', '· Gaia', '· GLUMAC', '· Goss Engineering', '· Green Dinosaur', '· Harrison Thomas Group', '· Humann Building Solutions', '· Kitchell', '· kW Engineering', '· P2S Cx', '· Partner Energy', '· Syska Hennessy Group, Inc.', '· The Cadmus Group', '· TM Cx Solutions, LLC', '· VCA Green', 'Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. The selection panel completed an initial review based on the following criteria: price, previous experience on high performing projects, comparable projects, knowledge of the specific systems proposed on the project, key personnel’s previous experience with the specific systems proposed on the project, quality of work plan, and compliance with City specifications.  The five firms that scored highest in the initial review were then interviewed by the panel.', 'Syska Hennessy Group, Inc. presented a unique understanding of the specific systems proposed on the City Services Building Project and thorough knowledge of LBC Certification. Syska has previous experience with two LBC projects, which is unique since there are only 15 fully certified LBC projects worldwide. They articulated their expert knowledge of natural ventilation systems, composting toilets and rainwater capture and treatment systems. Additionally, with more than 500 professionals across 16 offices offering a full range of engineering services, Syska Hennessy could draw from robust resources and experience to support the CSB commissioning activities. Out of the 20 initial proposals received, Syska Hennessy was the seventh lowest cost. They were the lowest of the five finalists that were interviewed. These costs, which were included in the cost of construction approved by Council, include all four of the additional-alternatives (add-alt) the City requested proposals for. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Syska as the best qualified firm to provide commissioning services for the City Services Building Construction Project.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to Syska Hennessy Group, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $95,189. Funds are available in the FY 2017-2018 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C014083.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Software Subscription Agreement for Learning Content Management System', 'Department': 'Information Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #136 to Cornerstone OnDemand, a California-based company, for the purchase and implementation of a centralized training portal solution, Cornerstone Learning Suite Solution.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Cornerstone OnDemand for software subscription, implementation services, and the purchase of training content and professional services as needed, in an amount not to exceed $ $839,065 (including $15,024 contingency), over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. 3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'All City Departments provide regular staff training, including staff development, safety, regulatory (harassment prevention, drivers’ safety, OSHA, etc.), and peer-to-peer knowledge transfer. Whether formal or informal, each Department currently manages and tracks curriculum in different ways. The City has never implemented a centralized system or process to gauge the effectiveness of such offerings. The purchase and implementation of a Learning Management and Content System (LMS) would bridge this gap. It would foster a more comprehensive approach to staff development, fostering learning communities, promoting staff career paths, providing educational opportunities in various media to more effectively meet staff needs and help them stay current, informed and engaged and support succession planning. Staff recommends executing a five-year contract with a company based in Santa Monica, Cornerstone OnDemand (Cornerstone), for the purchase, training and implementation of their Learning Suite Solution.', "Cornerstone's system is a web-based, feature-rich, collaborative, user-friendly software environment that supports and enhances instructor-led, virtual, and self-paced training. This city-wide portal will enable training, while also capturing data on training performance to achieve insight into City training offerings. The system would be used to administer, document, track, report, schedule, house and deliver training to City staff.", 'In addition, staff is requesting funds to purchase as-needed training content through Cornerstone, as they resell third-party training content at discounted rates. The cost of this purchase, including licensing, training, implementation services, and 10% contingency is an amount not to exceed $439,065, with the additional amount not to exceed $400,000 ($80,000 annually) for optional as-needed training content and professional services for a 5-year grand total not to exceed $839,065. Funding for the original purchase of this system has been earmarked in the Total Workplace budget. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Discussion', 'As the motto for Santa Monica Institute states, we are “The City that Learns.” Santa Monica strives to be a tech-savvy, service-oriented organization with a Governance framework that promises our customers a government that is transparent and trustworthy. To support this customer-service focus, training and education must continue to be a central focus that helps to keep the workforce on top of the knowledge and skills they need to perform with excellence.', 'Staff with a broad set of relevant skills find greater satisfaction from their jobsas they feel more valuable and can utilize a wider skillset. Poorly trained employees have lower levels of engagement, motivation and productivity. While some City staff have always had regulatory, credentialing and legal training requirements, it was only recently that the City formalized staff development course offerings and automated student registration across the organization by means of the Santa Monica Institute (SMI).', 'Since 2014, ISD has been providing online computer training via both web-based content providers and through in-house developed training videos. In 2017, ISD implemented a formalized IT training program and expanded its offerings to include mandatory cyber security awareness training and other in-person and online business software trainings to support city staff in acquiring the skills and knowledge necessary to be a more technology- and business-literate organization.', 'The Big Blue Bus, Fire Department, Risk Management, Human Resources and Library each continue to manage their respective training mandates and offerings via disparate systems.', 'While these Departments all have training in common, there is no central training portal to manage, track, measure effectiveness or promote collaboration among learners, which hinders the cooperative approach that makes our individual and collective business units function efficiently. The purchase and implementation of the Learning Management and Content System (LMS) software from Cornerstone would bridge this gap by enhancing enterprise-wide employee development and compliance training, by creating standardized scheduling, learning communities and implementing one familiar City-wide portal.', 'Cornerstone’s web-based, collaborative, user-friendly software environment supports and enhances instructor-led, virtual, and self-paced training. The system includes authoring tools for online training, and comprehensive reporting, tracking, and analysis by employee, job class, and department. This system would be a single landing place for staff training whether it be Instructor-led or external training curriculum from other training content providers. Simple built-in reporting will provide real time visibility into the City’s compliance requirements by organizational unit and employee, available to management and individual employees. It will also assist in retaining and promoting talented workers, through motivational learning opportunities and comprehensive transcript maintenance.', 'As Departments currently have no formalized system to track and provide existing training, the migration to this LMS will be provide much-needed functionality in the data-driven paradigm the City has created.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In February 2017, ISD issued an Request for Information (RFI) to learn about the different options available in terms LMS product offerings. The results of the RFI informed the development of a Request for Proposals (RFP), which was issued on September 28, 2017. ISD also partnered with various City departments, including Big Blue Bus, Fire Department, Human Resources, Santa Monica Library, and Finance in developing the RFP to ensure that the product selected could meet the City’s collective training needs.', 'The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fifty vendors downloaded the bid and 12 bids were received. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including the proposed software solution, price, references, previous experience, value added-breadth of service, presentation/demonstration of proposed solution, and compliance with City specifications. Cornerstone OnDemand’s product features and user interface best align with the City’s IT needs in terms of an up-to-date, feature-rich, easy to use solution. Cornerstone has vast experience working with municipalities, including City of Los Angeles, Ventura County Fire Department, and Contra Costa County. The 19 year-old company, headquartered in Santa Monica, provides solutions in use by over 35 million people in 192 countries, and in 43 languages.', 'Cornerstone received praise from their references for their feature-rich product, implementation approach, comprehensive knowledge transfer and training approach, and customer service and support. In terms of functionality, the Cornerstone solution has integration with Tyler Munis, the City’s new ERP software currently in implementation, and their solution provides a built-in scheduling component that will enable automated training enrollment. Based on these criteria, Cornerstone is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Cornerstone OnDemand for the licensing, implementation, training services and the purchase of training content is for an amount not to exceed $839,065. Approval of the contract requires the following budget actions:', '1. Release of fund balance in the amount of $165,264 at account 1.380256', '2. Appropriation of $165,264 to account SO015814.589000', "Training content would be charged to various departments' budgets as applicable. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}
{'Title': 'Request for Change Orders with Four Vendors for Fleet Maintenance Goods and Services', 'Department': 'Public Works, Street & Fleet Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a change order for interim funding for the next six months to purchase order #28093-OF in the amount of $31,090 with American Moving Parts, LLC, a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of brake parts, supplies, and service for passenger cars, and light-, medium-, and heavy-duty vehicles, until the goods can be bid. This would result in a revised purchase order total not to exceed $208,127, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a change order for interim funding for the next six months to purchase order #28016-OF in the amount of $26,779 with Battery Power, Inc., a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of vehicle batteries and pickup of battery cores, until the goods can be bid.  This would result in a revised purchase order total not to exceed $182,985, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a change order for interim funding for the next six months to purchase order #28020-OF in the amount of $42,388 with Los Angeles Freightliner, a California-based company, to furnish and deliver OEM Crane Carrier brand parts, until the goods can be bid. This would result in a revised purchase order total not to exceed $207,227, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a change order for interim funding for the next six months to purchase order #28024-OF in the amount of $63,858 with Natural Gas Systems, Inc., a California-based company, to furnish all labor, parts, materials, equipment, and supervision necessary to provide maintenance and repair services for the natural gas station at the City Yards facility, until the goods can be bid. This would result in a revised purchase order total amount not to exceed $233,878 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff is requesting change orders for interim funding for the next six months until the goods and services currently provided by American Moving Parts, LLC, Battery Power, Inc., Los Angeles Freightliner, and Natural Gas Systems can be formally bid. Due to staff turnover and vacancies, Fleet Management was not able to address these bids prior to their expiration dates. Modifying the purchase orders to provide interim funding for six months would allow Fleet Management to bid out the goods and services used in the maintenance and repair of City vehicles, and the CNG fueling stations at the City Yards facility, while maintaining adherence to City purchasing policies. Staff recommends that the City Council approve change orders for American Moving Parts, LLC, Battery Power, Inc., Los Angeles Freightliner, and Natural Gas Systems to provide interim funding for a six-month period. This would result in a cumulative, modified purchase order amount not to exceed $164,115, with a new total amount not to exceed $832,217, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Background', 'Fleet Management is responsible for ensuring that the City’s diverse fleet of vehicles and other automotive-related equipment, such as power washers and generators, and fueling infrastructure are available, dependable, meet the highest environmental standards for a sustainable fleet, and are safe to operate from acquisition through disposal. Fleet Management attempts to balance maintenance costs, while ensuring vehicle and fueling infrastructure reliability. The vendors American Moving Parts, LLC, Battery Power, Inc., Los Angeles Freightliner, and Natural Gas Systems, were awarded informal bids based on the City’s purchasing guidelines. Battery Power, Inc.’s bid expired in September 2017, and American Moving Parts and Natural Gas System’s bid expired in October 2017. Due to staff turnover and vacancies, Fleet Management was not able to get these goods and services out to bid prior to their purchase order expiration dates. The vendors are willing to continue providing the goods and services to the City until formal bids can be completed. Although Los Angeles Freightliner’s bid does not expire until November 2018, it is anticipated that expenditures exceeding the informal bid limit of $175,000 will occur with all four vendors prior to the completion of formal bid processes. The following table summarizes the new current not to exceed amount for each vendor to cover the next six months until the bid process can be completed:', 'Vendor Name', 'Original Bid Term Dates', 'Current Amount Spent', 'Amount Requested', 'Total Amount not to Exceed', 'American Moving Parts, LLC', '10/13/2014 – 10/12/2017', '$177,037', '$31,090', '$208,127', 'Battery Power, Inc.', '09/04/2014 – 09/03/2017', '$156,206', '$26,779', '$182,985', 'Los Angeles Freightliner', '11/10/2015 – 11/09/2018', '$164,839', '$42,388', '$207,227', 'Natural Gas Systems', '10/09/2014 – 10/08/2017', '$170,020', '$63,858', '$233,878', 'Total:', '$668,102', '$164,115', '$832,217', 'Discussion', 'The goods and/or services provided by American Moving Parts, LLC, Battery Power, Inc., Los Angeles Freightliner, and Natural Gas Systems are purchased to ensure that the current fleet of vehicles and fueling infrastructure at the City Yards facility can be maintained based on safety and manufacturer standards. Each of the following vendors has agreed to extend the supply of goods and services provided until formal bids can be completed.', 'American Moving Parts, LLC', 'American Moving Parts furnishes Fleet Management with all labor, materials, equipment, and supervision necessary to provide brake supplies and off-site services for passenger cars, as well as light- and heavy-duty trucks. Pricing is in accordance with quote #46708-OG, dated October 13, 2014. The vendor has agreed to extend the purchase order on the same terms and conditions, with a 5% price increase. The change order for interim funding would result in a new total purchase order amount with American Moving Parts, LLC, based in Los Angeles, California, not to exceed $208,127.', 'Battery Power, Inc.', 'Battery Power, Inc. furnishes and delivers vehicle batteries and picks up used battery cores as required by Fleet Management. Pricing is in accordance with quote #46699-OG, dated September 4, 2014. The vendor has agreed to extend the purchase order at the same price, terms, and conditions. The change order for interim funding would result in a new total purchase order amount with Battery Power, Inc., based in San Fernando, California, not exceed $182,985.', 'Los Angeles Freightliner', 'Los Angeles Freightliner furnishes and delivers OEM Crane Carrier parts as required by Fleet Management. Pricing is in accordance with quote #49943-OG dated November 10, 2015. The Resource Recovery and Recycling Division operates more than 30 refuse trucks that require OEM Crane Carrier brand parts. The vendor has agreed to extend the purchase order with the same price, terms and conditions. The change order for interim funding would result in a new total purchase order amount with Los Angeles Freightliner, based in Whittier, California, not to exceed $207,227.', 'Natural Gas Systems', 'Natural Gas Systems furnishes all labor, materials, equipment, and supervision necessary to provide maintenance and repair services for the CNG fueling station at the City Yard Fleet and Water Division locations. Pricing is in accordance with quote #46750-OG, dated October 9, 2014. The vendor has agreed to extend the purchase order at the same price, terms, and conditions as in the previous years. The change order for interim funding would result in a new total purchase order amount with Natural Gas Systems, based in Corona Del Mar, California, not exceed $233,878.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'The items and services noted above were already informally, competitively bid by the City of Santa Monica. Staff is requesting authorization for change orders for interim funding for six months, until formal bid processes can be completed.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The change orders for interim funding coverage are summarized below:', 'Vendor', 'Change Order Amount', 'Amended Not-to-Exceed Amount', 'Account numbers to Charge', 'American Moving Parts, LLC', '$31,090', '$208,127', '54459.522990', 'Battery Power, Inc.', '$26,779', '$182,985', '54459.522990', 'Los Angeles Freightliner', '$42,388', '$207,227', '54459.522990', '54459.522991', '54459.522920', 'Natural Gas Systems', '$63,858', '$233,878', '54459.533123', '54459.533126', 'Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Public Works Department.', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Agreement for Purchase of Ruckus Network Equipment and Site Assessment and Installation Services', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Infrastructure and Cloud Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid#4310 to SmartWAVE Technologies LLC (SmartWAVE), a Georgia -based company, for the purchase of Ruckus network equipment and site assessment and installation services; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with SmartWAVE for the purchase of Ruckus network equipment, site assessment and installation services in an amount not to exceed $868,000, including a $87,000 contingency, over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'City Wi-Fi connects over 13,000 members of the public to the internet daily at speeds of 8 megabits per second upload and download. The existing equipment is now over 10 years old, is beginning to fail, and does not meet current industry standards. It is necessary to replace the aging equipment and expand Wi-Fi coverage. Staff seeks to engage the services ofSmartWAVE, a wireless systems integrator, to conduct wireless site surveys and analysis to determine the areas and locations where equipment is installed, but coverage is deficient or absent altogether, as well as to design a strategic deployment plan to optimize City Wi-Fi coverage. At this time, staff seeks approval to enter into a five-year contractual services agreement withSmarWAVEfor siteassessment and installation services in amount not to exceed $299,000 and issue a Purchase Order for the purchase of Ruckus wireless equipment, as needed, for a period of five years in an amount not to exceed $569,000.', 'Background', 'The City first launched City Wi-Fi service in 2005 at Virginia Avenue Park, 3rd St Promenade and the Main Library. There are now over 350wireless access points that provide free Wi-Fi service tothe Cityparks, open spaces, facilities, entertainment venues and 19 commercial and transit arterials.', 'The number of users and devices connecting to City Wi-Fi has increased substantially in the last five years and continues to grow, primarily due to the proliferation of smart phones and other wireless devices, and the shift to mobile-centric computing.', 'As part of the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program Budget adoption, Council appropriated funding to establish an ongoing replacement program. That year, as part of the initial rollout of the project, staff replaced critical network infrastructure to improve system reliability and increase capacity. This year, staff will begin replacing wireless equipment installed at various City locations, as well as install new equipment to expand Wi-Ficapacity andcoverage.', 'Discussion', 'To move forward with this project, staff seeks to engage the services ofSmartWAVE, a wireless systems integrator, to conduct comprehensive wireless site surveys and analysis to determine the areas and locations where equipment is installed but coverage is deficient or absent altogether. Through this analysis,SmartWAVEwill also design a strategic deployment plan to optimize City Wi-Fi coverage by replacing equipment in existing locations throughout the City, as well newpubliclocations where coverage has never existed. This project will be paid for by approved CIP funding from the City Wi-Fi Replacement Program.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'After completing technical evaluation of wireless network equipment from various manufacturers, including Cisco, HP Aruba, Ruckus and others, staff selected Ruckus equipment as the Standard for City Wi-Fi due to the technology which performed better in high density environments such as 3rd Street Promenade and the Pier, esthetics and the small form-factor of the equipment that blends in nicely with the street lights and traffic poles, and the price point which was approximately 50% of the cost of competitors. On December 12, 2017, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids for the purchase of Ruckus network equipment and site assessment and installation services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press, in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 27 vendors downloaded the bid and one bid was received before the bid close date of January 3, 2018. The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Because only one bid was received, Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to find out why they did not submit a bid; 10 no bidders responded providing various reasons, including not being a reseller of Ruckus products, not being able to meet the reseller certification/partnership level specified in the bid, and not being able to offer competitive pricing due to the discounted pricing that was extended to them by the equipment manufacturer. The bid submitted bySmartWAVEaddressed all requirements of the bid.SmartWAVEhas the highest-level services certification from the equipment manufacturer, Ruckus.SmartWAVEhas experience with similar projects for other public agencies, including City of San Jose, City of Mountain View, City of West Hollywood, and various other municipalities. The references provided bySmartWAVEfor City of San Jose and City of Mountain View indicated it provided outstanding service.SmartWAVEhas also provided outstanding service on previous City of Santa Monica projects. SmartWAVE has committed to extending the City of Santa Monica fixed pricing on all Ruckus equipment purchased for the next five years. In sum,SmartWAVEmet all the requirements defined in the bid. Based on these criteria, staff recommendsSmartWAVE as the best bidderto provide network equipment and site assessment and installation services.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract and purchase order to be awarded toSmartWAVETechnologies LLC is for a total not to exceed is $868,000. Funds in the amount of $218,000 are included in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019158.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Tire Lease and Related Onsite Tire Services', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4294 to Michelin North America, Inc., a South Carolina-based company, for the lease of new transit tires and related services;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Michelin North America Inc., in an amount not to exceed $2,635,171, including a $239,561 contingency for a five-period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends the award of Bid #4294 to Michelin North America Inc. to provide new transit tires and related services on a tire lease program. Big Blue Bus operates a fleet of 200 transit buses, with six to ten tires on each bus. BBB transit buses run approximately 6 million miles per year, and billing for transit bus tires is on a per-mile basis. The agreement includes the lease of transit tires on a flat rate per-mile-driven basis plus the cost of services including inspection, repair and replacement, and inventory control. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $2,635,171, which includes a 10% contingency, over a five-year term.', 'Background', 'Tire leasing has been a standard practice in the transit industry since the 1940’s and a common practice at Big Blue Bus (BBB) for the last 45 years. Leasing tires is more economical than purchasing because it is based on cost per mile-driven rather than purchasing individual tires. The service ensures that new tires are available at all times, and that any necessary repairs or replacements can be made in a timely manner.', 'On November 13, 2012, Council awarded bid #4022 to Michelin North America Inc. for an amount not to exceed $3,432,462 over a five-year period, including a one-time payment to the previous tire lease provider of $390,000. This one-time payment was authorized to purchase the previous vendor’s existing inventory as part of the transition to the new vendor.', 'BBB’s latest agreement expired on November 12, 2017, requiring BBB to solicit bids for tire leasing services for its fleet of transit buses.  An interim purchase order was approved under the City Manager’s authority for services performed while the bidding process was ongoing.', 'Discussion', 'Big Blue Bus currently leases bus tires from Michelin North America, Inc. The existing lease provides tire inventory, including spare stock on a replacement basis, and two full-time on-site service attendants who perform inspections, tire repair, and replacement. Tires are individually branded prior to delivery for inventory control purposes. Tire rates are fixed and BBB only pays for the miles the tire actually travels. The award amount is based on estimated miles traveled per year (6 million miles) plus a 10% contingency for unforeseen charges such as tire damage due to accidents or curb damage, increased miles traveled and new bus purchases. The award of this bid would enable BBB to maintain its current fleet of transit buses in safe operating condition through the timely and efficient repair or replacement of damaged or worn-out tires.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014, staff was directed by Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” seven criteria were established to determine proper use of contracted staff. Of these, “Workforce Flexibility” and “Capital/Equipment Requirements” are relevant to BBB’s decision to contract the services related to tire lease and replacement.', 'Bid #4294 requires that the vendor provide all necessary tooling and equipment to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment. In addition to cost savings, the tire repair and replacement service requires a large employee pool that would be available to work day and night to ensure that buses are available for service. The added costs associated with bringing this service in-house would be $1,947,888 to the contracted amount over a five-year period.', 'Based on the criteria outlined in the January 13, 2015 staff report, and the added costs associated with bringing this service in-house, staff recommends that Council award bid #4294 to Michelin North America Inc. for tire lease and related services. The total expense for the five-year term is not to exceed $2,635,171.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On December 12, 2017 the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide tire lease and related services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirteen (13) vendors downloaded the bid. We received and publicly opened on February 7, 2018 one proposal from Michelin North America Inc.', 'Cost Estimate', 'Michelin North America Inc.', 'Estimate 5-year Period', '$ 2,395,610', '10% Contingency', '$ 239,561', 'Contract 5yr Total', '$ 2,635,171', 'The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a proposal. One prospective bidder responded that they could not bid as they were unable to comply with the domestic partner provision to the living wage ordinance. Michelin has had a positive history of providing tire lease and related services for Big Blue Bus and is able to meet all of the City’s requirements. In addition, the bid cost has decreased from the previous contract cost. Based on these criteria, Michelin North America, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Michelin North America Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $2,635,171 including a 5% annual price increase and a 10% contingency. Funds of $437,230 are available in the FY17-18 Capital Improvement Program. This contract will be charged to account C410106.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Adoption of Resolution Authorizing Application for Grant Funds from the State of California Natural Resources Agency', 'Department': 'Strategic Planning (PCD)', 'Sponsors': 'Director Susan Cline', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Adopt the resolution (Attachment A) authorizing the application for grant funds in the amount of $1,477,809 from the California Natural Resources Agencyto fund implementation of the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Plan Streetscape Improvements;and2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to apply for the grant, accept the grant, if awarded, and accept all grant renewals, if awarded.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'This report seeks authorization to submit an application to the California Natural Resources Agency Urban Greening program for an amount not to exceed $1,477,809 to fund implementation of the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Plan Streetscape (LiNC), which was approved by Council on April 25, 2017 (Attachment B). The grant funds may be used for a variety of landscaping, pedestrian safety and mobility-related capital enhancement projects that are included in the LiNC design. Adoption of the attached resolution is a requirement of the grant program for eligibility to receive Urban Greening funds allocation for Fiscal Year (FY) 2019-20.', 'Discussion', 'The Urban Greening Program funds projects that reduce greenhouse gases, decrease energy consumption and reduce vehicle miles traveled, while also transforming the built environment into places that are more sustainable, enjoyable, and effective in creating healthy and vibrant communities. The Urban Greening Program is funded by the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund (GGRF), which allocated $26 million to the Natural Resources Agency in 2016 to fund the planning and implementation of green infrastructure projects.', 'The recently approved LiNC Streetscape was awarded CIP funding of $2.9M for FY17/18 to implement a discrete phase of work targeting connections across the boulevard, which includes preparing the necessary construction documentation. Additional funding is required to realize the other elements of the concept design, including the provision for additional landscaped medians and landscaping, ADA compliant curb ramps, and green infrastructure low-impact development facilities. If awarded, the grant would fund a portion of additional funds needed with remaining funds requested through CIP, or other grant opportunities as presented. The LiNC is an eligible project under the guidelines of the Urban Greening Grant program.', 'It is expected that grant awards will be announced by June 2018 and, pursuant to the grant guidelines, funds must be expended within three years of the award.Based upon a preliminary analysis of the eligible project elements such as additional landscaped medians, ADA ramps, and bioswales and rain gardens, staff estimates that the Urban Greening funds would expedite the build-out of most of the LiNC streetscape by several years, excluding the most costly components such as new pedestrian street-lighting, which staff anticipates funding through future grant opportunities. Without the grant funds, completion of the project would otherwise be subject to future budget requests.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The total amount of grant funds requested from the California Natural Resources Agency is $1,477,809. If awarded, expenditure and revenue budgets will be established. The grant requires no local match; however, the City’s application will leverage committed resources, including the implementation of the peak-hour dedicated bus lane, and the FY17/18 CIP award of $2.9 million for Phase 1 implementation,as well as in-kind staff time.']}
{'Title': 'Award Construction Contract for Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Repair', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2528 to John S. Meek Company, Inc., a California-based company, for the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Repair Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with John S. Meek Company, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including a 11% contingency);3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project would consist of the removal and replacement of the existing Harbor Patrol boat hoist and crane, and the design and construction of a new steel catwalk on the southwest end of the Santa Monica Municipal Pier. These improvements are necessary due to the facilities’ nearing the end of their useful life and to adequately maintain existing Santa Monica Police Department Harbor Patrol operations, facilities, infrastructure and equipment. The hoist and crane are primarily used to lift or lower the Harbor Services Unit’s dinghy boat from or onto the water. The catwalk is used for docking, boarding and disembarking the Santa Monica Police Department Harbor Patrol boat. Staff recommends John S. Meek Company, Inc. to construct these improvements in an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including an 11% contingency).', 'Background', 'The Pier’s boat hoist and crane and appurtenant catwalk is located on the southwest corner of the Pier and is used by the Pier and Harbor Services Unit of the Santa Monica Police Department (Harbor Patrol) to launch and load their boat. The Harbor Patrol watches over the seaward area around the Pier and performs sea rescues in the Santa Monica Bay when necessary. The hoist and crane are primarily used to lift or lower the Harbor Services Unit’s dinghy boat from or onto the water as operations require. The catwalk serves as a dock for the Harbor Patrol boat, and also supports Pier maintenance staff with access to areas beneath the Pier.', 'Discussion', 'The boat hoist and crane, and appurtenant catwalk are nearing the end of their useful life and must be removed and replaced with new infrastructure. The boat hoist and crane are experiencing electrical, mechanical and structural issues that limit their functional capabilities. Issues include rusted machinery, electrical malfunctions, and structural deterioration. The steel catwalk has deteriorated, with localized material failure and rusting, and is also in need of removal and replacement.', 'Contractor Selection – Construction', 'On November 6, 2017, the City issued a Notice Inviting Bids for the construction of the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-two vendors downloaded the bid, and on December 6, 2017, one bid was received and publicly opened.', 'Engineer’s Estimate: $226,950', 'The difference between the bid amount and engineer’s estimate is attributable to an underestimation in mobilization for marine work, catwalk design cost, and overall labor for marine construction. The engineer’s estimate was also based on an older crane quotation and excluded costs for demolition and electrical work.', 'The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. John S. Meek Company, Inc. has completed many repair projects for the City at the Santa Monica Pier, including wood deck replacements, various concrete repairs, timber and concrete pile repairs, and full section repairs. John S. Meek Company, Inc. has also completed similar Pier projects for the cities of Long Beach and Redondo Beach. Staff contacted references listed in the bid package, and all respondents reported that work performed by John S. Meek Company, Inc. was completed within project requirements. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that John S. Meek Company, Inc.’s license is current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, John S. Meek Company, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder for the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project.', 'Construction Management', "Construction management and public outreach for this project would be provided by City staff. Construction management would include inspecting the contractor's work during construction, verifying and documenting field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts as a result of the construction activities, attending the contractor's safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings and maintaining all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work conducted during construction.", 'Public Outreach', 'In March and April 2017, Engineering staff met with the Pier Management staff, Pier businesses, Pier Corporation staff and the Pier Board about upcoming Pier projects that included this project. Staff would reengage to communicate with Pier tenants regarding all pre-construction public outreach while fostering open lines of communication and responding to the day-to-day concerns of the residents, visitors and local businesses.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The project is categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15301(c) and Section 15302 of the CEQA Guidelines. Class 1 exempt projects include the "operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination." Class 2 exempt projects include the “replacement or reconstruction of existing structures and facilities where the new structure would be located on the same site as the structure replaced and would have substantially the same purpose and capacity as the structure replaced.” The project qualifies as a Class 1 and Class 2 project exempt from CEQA. Therefore, this project is categorically exempt from CEQA.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to John S. Meek Company, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including an 11% contingency). Additional funds in the amount of $10,000 is also needed for administrative and prevailing wage costs. Funds of $100,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C309202.589000. Award of the contract requires a budget transfer of $250,000 from account S010300.589000 to account C019202.589000 and appropriation of an additional $160,000 from the Pier fund to account C309202.589000']}
{'Title': 'Second Reading and Adoption of Interim Zoning Ordinance Extending Interim Zoning Ordinance Number 2569 (CCS) Which Amended Portions of Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.07.030 to Revise Development Standards for Maximum Parcel Coverage, Maximum Building Height, Additional Minimum Stepbacks for Upper Stories, Limitations on Aggregate Floor Area for Upper-Story Decks and Balconies, and Exclusion of Certain Accessory Dwelling Units from Parcel Coverage in the R1 Single-Unit Residential District', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council adopt an Interim Zoning Ordinance Extending Interim Zoning Ordinance Number 2569 (CCS)', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'At its meeting of March 27, 2018, the City Council introduced for first reading an interim zoning ordinance extending Interim Zoning Ordinance Number 2569 (CCS) which amended portions of Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.07.030 to revise development standards for maximum parcel coverage, maximum building height, additional minimum stepbacks for upper stories, limitations on aggregate floor area for upper-story decks and balconies, and exclusion of certain accessory dwelling units form parcel coverage in the R1 Single-Unit Residential District.', 'The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption.']}
{'Title': 'Master Facility Use Agreements with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District', 'Department': 'Community & Cultural Services', 'Sponsors': 'Director Gigi Decavalles-Hughes', 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Master Facilities Use Agreement combining the two tax measures (YY and GS) into a single agreement (Measure YY/GS Facilities Agreement) including related supplemental terms and conditions with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District with an initial term ending June 30, 2028.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Over the years, the City of Santa Monica has built a positive and collaborative partnership with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District. The City has supported exceptional educational, cultural and recreational achievements at our schools. At the same time, the School District has supported the City’s residents by maintaining high caliber classroom education as well as facilities used by students and residents alike.  This relationship is codified in a Master Facilities Use Agreement, which terminates on June 30, 2022, and related supplemental agreements, which terminate on June 30, 2018. The agreements allow community members to use District facilities at the elementary, middle, and high schools in Santa Monica during non-school hours for recreation and sports purposes. At this time, the City and the District desire to amend the supplemental agreements for the middle schools, CREST and playground partnership to reflect current practices, to allow for unsupervised general use of the middle school fields by the community and to extend the term of the supplemental agreements to coincide with the term of the Master Facilities Use Agreement.', 'In 2010 and 2016, the voters passed local tax increases with accompanying advisory measures recommending that portions of the revenues be dedicated to improving and maintaining school facilities and support school programs. In keeping with the intent expressed by the voters, staff is recommending that Council authorize the City Manager to enter into a new agreement to combine terms and conditions for the allocation of the revenues from the two recent tax measures (YY and GS) into a single agreement with supplemental agreements covering with the recreational use of Santa Monica High School and memorializing the City’s and the District’s mutual understanding pertaining to community use of Los Amigos Park (Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement). The new agreement would supersede the existing Samohi Master Facilities Use Agreement and the Samohi Supplemental Use Agreement in their entirety.', 'Pursuant to the agreements, the City anticipates that it will pay the School District a total of $25,127,020 in FY 2017-18.', 'Background', 'In 2005, the Council approved an initial Master Facilities Use Agreement and related supplemental agreements with the SMMUSD. The Agreement provides unrestricted revenue from the General Fund to the District in return for community use of District facilities, including elementary and middle school playfields, recreational facilities and buildings under-utilized during non-school hours. In April 2009, Council approved exercise of the first renewal option by amending and extending the Agreement by three years, through April 2012.  In May 2012, Council approved entering into a new Master Facilities Use Agreement and related supplemental agreements for an initial term of 10 years (through June 30, 2022) with an option to extend for an additional five years to June 30, 2027.', 'Measure Y and Measure YY were approved by Santa Monica voters in November 2010. Measure Y established a half percent transaction and use tax and advisory Measure YY recommended that half of the transaction and use tax revenue be used to support school, educational and after-school programs. Following voter approval of these measures, in May 2011, Council approved entering into a Samohi Master Facilities Use Agreement and supplemental program agreement with SMMUSD to allow the City and community to utilize facilities at Santa Monica High School (Samohi) when school is not in session and in return receive an annual amount from the City’s General Fund equivalent to one half of the revenue received by the City from the transaction and use tax, thereby effectuating the will of the voters. The 10-year initial term expires on June 30, 2021 and may be extended for additional 10-year terms by mutual agreement and consistent with the Master Facilities Use Agreement.', 'Measures GSH and GS were approved by the Santa Monica voters in November 2016. Measure GSH established another half percent transaction and use tax; advisory Measure GS recommended that half of the transaction and use tax revenue be used to improve and maintain Santa Monica’s public schools and support educational and afterschool programs at the District’s facilities in Santa Monica.', 'Discussion', 'District and City staff recently met to discuss the longstanding practice of community use of the District-owned Los Amigos Park site during non-school hours and determined that it would be prudent to document this mutually agreed upon practice within the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement intended to effectuate the will of the voters as expressed in advisory Measure GS to devote half of the additional sales tax collected to public school education. Additionally, with the incorporation of sports lights and synthetic turf at Lincoln Middle School under construction, District and City staff identified opportunities to modify the existing supplemental agreements to the Master Facilities Use Agreement relating to the Lincoln and John Adams Middle Schools in order to carve out time at these schools for general unsupervised recreational opportunities, similar to the model used for Samohi. Staff also determined that it would be prudent to make minor modifications to the supplemental agreements for CREST and Playground Partnership to reflect current practices. The resulting Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement would retain the majority of the provisions in the existing Samohi Master Facilities Agreement with the following modifications and additions:', 'Term of Agreement: As noted above, the current term for the Samohi Master Facilities Agreement expires on June 30, 2021 with an option to extend for additional 10 year terms. It is recommended that this term be amended in the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement to expire on June 30, 2028 with an option to extend for additional 10 year terms by mutual agreement between the City and District. It is also recommended that the term for the supplemental agreements for Lincoln and John Adams Middle Schools, CREST and Playground Partnership be amended to mirror the term of the Master Facilities Use Agreement (through June 30, 2022 with an option to extend for an additional five years to June 30, 2027).', 'SMMUSD Unification: The SMMUSD Board of Education is currently reviewing the request of the Malibu community to separate from the district and create a Malibu Unified School District (also officially referred to as “unification”). While it is unknown at this time whether unification will occur, it is recommended that a provision be included in the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement to clarify that if SMMUSD were to split into two districts, the funding provided through Measures YY and GS would reside with the entity with jurisdiction over Santa Monica High School and Los Amigos Park as the sole successor in interest to the rights and obligations of the District under the Agreement.', 'Force Majeure: Both District and City staff recommend that a “Force Majeure” provision be added to the Agreement to address obligations of each party should there ever be a major, unanticipated natural or human-caused disaster.', 'Supplemental Agreements:  The following elements would be addressed in the revised supplemental agreements for Lincoln and John Adams Middles Schools, CREST,  Playground Partnership and Samohi as well as in the Supplemental Agreement for Los Amigos Park:', '· facility use plans to address permit group and general community use of the sites during non-school hours;', '· staffing at the sites by District or City staff as determined by the particular site needs;', '· permit fee collection;', '· documentation of permits issued; and', '· details regarding custodial services and maintenance needs.', 'In keeping with established practice, Supplemental Agreements would be reviewed periodically by operational staff from each entity and may be revised without governing board approvals so long as they are only related to e practical and operational changes.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The City’s projection for half of the combined (Measure YY and GS) one percent transaction and use tax is $16,100,000 (Account 01274.566810), although the final amount is based on actual transaction and use tax revenue received over the year. While the City has not yet paid the District the amount equal to one half the revenue received for Measure GS to date, that amount, totaling $5,650,681 as of 2/28/18 has been set aside in the General Fund reserve in anticipation of the executed agreement between the City and the District. Disbursements will be made once the City Council and Board of Education have approved and executed the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement.']}
{'Title': 'Annual Review of Development Agreement Compliance', 'Department': 'Development Review 3', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review the status of Development Agreement compliance; and2. Determine good faith compliance for those that are in compliance and listed as such in Table 1.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Many major Santa Monica projects in recent years have been entitled with Development Agreements that set forth terms and conditions of approval. This report provides an annual summary of the status of compliance for each of the 33 Development Agreements that are currently in effect and subject to annual compliance report submittals. Council last reviewed the status of Development Agreement compliance at its March 7, 2017 meeting.  Since the passage of an ordinance establishing the City’s Development Agreement framework in 1982, 33 Development Agreements have been enacted that are still in effect:', 'Project Status', 'Count', 'Completed', '23', 'Under Construction', '5', 'Not Commenced', '5', 'TOTAL', '33', 'This includes two projects approved since Council’s last annual review of Development Agreement compliance: 1325 6th Street and 1430 Lincoln Boulevard. Based on staff’s review of each of the 28 projects already built or under construction, staff recommends Council determine that all of these agreements are in good faith compliance with requirements specified for each property. A summary of the 33 projects is below in Table 1.', 'Newer Development Agreements typically carry requirements for reducing traffic generated by the projects. While defined as being in good faith compliance, this report also summarizes staff’s work with three other properties that are, consistent with development agreement requirements, implementing additional transportation demand management measures to achieve the numeric peak-hour Average Vehicle Ridership (AVR) targets identified in each Agreement. These three properties are Colorado Center, Providence Saint John’s Health Center, and Saint Monica’s Catholic Community. For each of these three Agreements, the AVR targets are structured as goals and not requirements. More specifically, the owner’s inability to achieve the AVR target for the peak periods doesl not constitute a default within the meaning of the Agreement, provided that the owner is taking all reasonable and feasible steps to achieve compliance, including implementing additional single-occupancy trip reduction measures as specified by the City.', 'Background', 'Chapter 9.60 of the Municipal Code establishes the processes and requirements for the City to enter into a Development Agreement. One of the provisions is annual review by the City Council of each approved Development Agreement to determine good faith compliance with the terms and conditions of the Agreements. In accordance with the Municipal Code statute governing Development Agreements, the applicant or successor must demonstrate good faith compliance with the terms of the Agreement.  The term “good faith compliance” generally means: (a) compliance by Developer with the requirements of existing regulations, except as otherwise modified by the Development Agreement; and (b) compliance by Developer with the terms and conditions of the Development Agreement, subject to the existence of any specified excusable delays (as defined in the Development Agreement) which prevented or delayed the timely performance by Developer of any of its obligations under the Development Agreement.  If, as a result of the periodic review, the City Council finds and determines, on the basis of substantial evidence, that the applicant or successor hasn’t complied in good faith with the terms or conditions of the agreement, the City Council may commence proceedings to enforce, modify, or terminate the Development Agreement.', 'Each Development Agreement contains unique time frames, obligations, and requirements. The obligations can be one-time or ongoing; some are fees, some are actual physical improvements, and some are ongoing services.', 'Planning staff works closely with other City departments and divisions to confirm compliance with agreement terms that fit within those departments’ areas of expertise. For example, Housing and Economic Development performs the annual compliance review of affordable housing obligations in Agreements, while Community and Cultural Services performs the review of child care program obligations.', 'Early Development Agreements Not Subject to Monitoring', 'As explained in compliance reports submitted to Council in 2010-2017, there are five very early Development Agreements that are not subject to ongoing monitoring:', '· Lincoln Property/Phase II of the Ocean Park Redevelopment Area', '· 1426 California Avenue', '· 2823-2825 Santa Monica Boulevard', '· 1040 4th Street (Dorchester)', '· 701 Santa Monica Boulevard', 'In general, these early Development Agreements required certain street improvements and, in some cases, the payment of fees. For example, the Agreement for 701 Santa Monica Boulevard required the payment of an Arts and Social Service Fee and an In-Lieu Housing Fee. Such fee obligations were satisfied when the projects were completed. Thus, compliance and monitoring have not, in general, been an issue.', 'The Dorchester at 1040 4th Street, which was one of the City’s earliest efforts to create affordable housing, is the only project in the City that includes affordable units that are condominiums, instead of apartments. The model proved to be problematic in several ways. There were problems with recordation and notification of the affordability requirement. Some of the unit owners purchased intending to live there themselves or house a family member. Many purchased with arguably insufficient notice of the restrictions. Most had no experience in property management, much less the management and financing of a lone affordable unit. For the Housing Division’s monitoring period in 2017, of the fifteen units, ten of the owners filed compliance reports pursuant to the Development Agreement. Four of the unaccounted units are part of settlement agreements with the City, and the matter of the remaining unit has been referred to the City Attorney’s Office.', 'Discussion', 'As a result of staff’s review of all 33 Development Agreements subject to compliance reporting, staff has determined that all 23 constructed projects and all five under-construction projects are in good faith compliance. The remaining five Development Agreements do not require monitoring. Attachment A summarizes all Agreements where annual compliance reports are required and have been submitted for the current review period, and provides a brief status update on the projects under construction and those properties where construction has not yet commenced. As summarized below and detailed more fully in Attachment A, the three properties that are working to increase the their AVR results have implemented TDM plans during the annual reporting cycle and will be required to implement additional measures to reduce SOV trips and also focus on improving survey methodology to increase the accuracy of the annual AVR data collected to better reflect the full range of employee commute trips associated with each property.', 'Colorado Center management collects survey data from its tenants from both large and small employers to determine its site-wide average vehicle ridership during the AM and PM peak periods. This expanded survey effort includes employers with more than 50 employees, as well as employers with fewer than 50 employees; the latter are not currently required to perform employee trip surveys per the City’s Trip Reduction Ordinance. Colorado Center’s AVR target is 1.5 during both the AM and PM peak periods. The property achieved a 1.40 AVR during the AM peak period (an increase over the 1.37 AVR reported in 2016) and a 1.42 AVR during the PM peak period (an increase over the 1.36 AVR reported in 2016). As detailed more fully on pages 1-4 of Attachment A, Colorado Center will be required to implement measures focused on restructuring its carpool incentive program, and continuing full implementation of its Evolve Your Commute marketing and incentive program for the property. Colorado Center management will also be required to work with tenants’ Employee Transportation Coordinators to quantify the SOV trip reduction necessary for each employer and to structure tenant-specific incentives to achieve the site-wide AVR peak period targets.', 'Providence Saint John’s Health Center has a 1.6 AVR target for the AM and PM peak periods. The Health Center reported a 1.5 AVR for the AM peak period and a 1.39 AVR for the PM peak period. Subsequent to submittal of the AVR data, the Health Center provided documentation that the employee assumption for the PM peak period was inaccurate and that, with the adjustment for the inaccurate employee count, the Health Center’s PM peak period AVR is 1.51. As detailed more fully on pages 9-16 of Attachment A, the Health Center’s 2017 AVR survey documented that approximately 55 more caregivers took the bus, biked, walked, or carpooled in the PM peak period compared to 2016. Providence Saint John’s Health Center will be required to continue implementation of all its previously approved Green Commute Program enhancements and work with City staff to make improvements to the facility’s survey methodology to increase the accuracy of its annual AVR data collection. This increase in accuracy will serve to better-reflect the full range of employee commute trips associated with the facility’s 24 hour a day/7 days a week operations and provide a clearer baseline to establish program incentives for employees.', 'The Development Agreement for Saint Monica’s Catholic Community specifies a 1.5 AVR for the AM and PM peak periods. Saint Monica’s reported a 1.44 AM AVR and a 1.38 PM AVR with an 88% survey response rate in the AM and 87% in the PM. City staff believes that, if a 90% response rate had been achieved (three more AM surveys and four more PM surveys), Saint Monica’s would have been much closer to their target of a 1.5 AVR. As detailed more fully on pages 19-20 of Attachment A, staff is scheduling a meeting with Saint Monica’s to discuss compliance, including ways to garner a higher survey response rate to ensure that additional trip reduction measures are responsive to the full range of employee commutes.', 'Attachments B and C also provide a summary of TDM program measures that have been incorporated in newly-approved or amended Development Agreements since 2010 in conjunction with the City’s Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) implementation.', 'Development Agreements (33)', 'Recommended Finding:', 'Good Faith Compliance', 'Completed Projects', '(23)', 'Recommended Finding:', 'Not in', 'Good Faith Compliance', 'Completed Projects', '(0)', 'Recommended Finding:', 'Good Faith Compliance', 'Under Construction', '(5)', 'Construction Has Not Commenced', '(5)', '2401-2525 Colorado Avenue - Colorado Place II & II (Colorado Center) (1981)', '•', '1541 Ocean Ave - Paseo Del Mar (1982)', '•', '2700 Colorado Ave - National Medical Enterprise (Viacom) (1982)', '•', '530 Pico Blvd - Bayview CA Unlimited Partnership', '(Le Meridien Delfina) (1983)', '•', '2000-2200 Colorado Ave - Arboretum (AO Santa Monica) (1987)', '•', '1620 26th Street & 2425 Olympic Blvd - Water Garden (1988)', '•', '1733 Ocean Ave - Maguire Thomas (1990)', '•', '2221 Santa Monica Blvd - Providence Saint John’s Health Center (1998)', '•', '1776 Main Street - Rand (2000)', '•', '3030 Olympic Blvd - Lantana East (2004)', '•', '3030 Olympic Blvd - Lantana South (2004)', '•', '1725 Ocean Ave - The Village (2008)', '•', '725 California Avenue - Saint Monica’s Catholic Community (2010)', '•', '1800 Stewart St - Agensys (2010)', '•', '2834 Colorado Avenue -', 'Colorado Creative Studios (2011)', '•', '702 Arizona Avenue (2011)', '•', '1317 7th Street (2011)', '•', '710 Wilshire Boulevard (2012)', '•', '1548 6th Street (2012)', '•', '2930 Colorado Avenue (2013)', '•', '1318 2nd Street (2013)', '•', '1731 20th Street -', 'Crossroads School (2013)', '•', '1554 5th Street -', 'Courtyard by Marriott (2013)', '•', '501 Colorado Avenue -', 'Hampton Inn & Suites (2013)', '•', '315 Colorado Avenue - Arclight Cinemas at Santa Monica Place (2014)', '•', '1402 Santa Monica Blvd -', 'Mini Automobile Dealership (2014)', '•', '1112-1122 Pico Blvd (2014)', '•', '1415 5th Street (2015)', '•', '1560 Lincoln Blvd (2015)', '•', '1601 Lincoln Blvd (2016)', '•', '500 Broadway (2016)', '•', '1325 6th Street (2017)', '•', '1430 Lincoln Blvd (2017)', '•', '1333-1337 Ocean Avenue -', 'Hill Street Partners III (2007)', 'Expired in 2012', '1900 Pico Blvd - Santa Monica College Parking & Pool (1989)', 'Expired in 2014', '401 Broadway (2011)', 'Zoning code-compliant project built', 'Public Outreach', 'The Municipal Code requires that that the City provide at least 10 days’ notice to the Developer or successor-in-interest of the City Council’s scheduled meeting to review Development Agreement compliance. This notice has been provided.', 'Next Steps', 'Staff will continue its ongoing Development Agreement compliance review; reports will be made to Council annually during the first quarter of the calendar year. The next report will be made in the first quarter of 2019.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Santa Monica Library Board for a term ending 06/30/2018.', 'Department': 'City Clerk 13-Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer, Mayor Pro Tem Davis and Councilmember McKeown that the Council allocate $14,000 of its discretionary funds to the Main Street Business Improvement Association to aid in the production of its Summer SOULstice, a family-friendly community festival on Main Street. The funds will be used to offset the costs for City-required staffing of public safety and fire safety officers and road closures on Main Street, among other City costs.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer, Mayor Pro Tem Davis and Councilmember McKeown that the Council allocate $7,500 of discretionary funds to serve as a matching grant to assist students from lower-income families to participate in this year’s student cultural exchange program with our Friendship City of Kizugawa, Japan. Funds will be provided to the Santa Monica Science Magnet, a 501(c)(3) non-profit.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': "City Manager's Report: Seismic Retrofit Update", 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Proclamation recognizing March 2018 as Red Cross Month in the City of Santa Monica', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Award Contract for Fire Station No. 1 Construction Services', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #2235 to Bernards Bros., Inc., a California -based corporation, for the construction of Fire Station No. 1. 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Bernards Bros., Inc., in an amount not to exceed $26,525,000, and authorize an additional $2,652,500 for contingency (10%) for a total of $29,177,500.3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'For more than a decade, the City has been working to make Fire Station No. 1 in the downtown core seismically safe, code compliant and appropriately sized. The City is now ready to award the contract to construct the new Fire Station No. 1 at 1337-45 7th Street, which will replace the existing Fire Station No. 1 at 1444 7th Street. This project is important because the existing fire station:', 'The new Fire Station No. 1 will be fully compliant with current seismic safety and Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) regulations. The facility will include:', '· Five appropriately sized and equipped apparatus bays;', '· Living facilities including sleeping quarters and restrooms that are appropriate for all staff members;', '· Community room;', '· Sufficient parking for all on-duty personnel;', '· Rooftop solar panels;', '· Large openable windows and a heat chimney to utilize natural ventilation;', '· A large light shaft bringing natural light to the apparatus bay floor and', '· Drought tolerant landscaping.', 'The design of the new Fire Station No. 1 is complete, as is bidding for the project. Staff recommends Bernards Bros. Inc. to provide construction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project, in an amount not to exceed $26,525,000. This amount is $2 million above the engineers estimate due to inflation. Staff anticipates that construction will be completed in early 2020. The existing Fire Station No. 1 site will no longer be needed for its current purpose in 2020. Staff will begin to evaluate the potential reuse opportunities for the site. As the building is included in the Historic Resources Inventory, an assessment of its historic status is recommended as a first step in the process. Based on the historical assessment and site evaluation, staff would return to council for further consideration.', 'Background', 'On June 26, 2007, Council authorized staff to execute a contract to study whether the existing Fire Station No. 1 could be retrofitted or if it should be rebuilt (Attachment A). The study indicated that the existing facility is in need of a seismic retrofit, facility upgrades, and building improvements to be in compliance with all current codes, including ADA, and to meet current staffing requirements. The seismic upgrades needed to retrofit the existing facility would add wall thickness and additional corridors, which would further narrow the interior spaces and compromise the functional and equipment storage needs of the firefighters. Therefore, retrofitting the existing fire station structure was not a viable option, and construction of a new, larger Fire Station No. 1 was approved to address all issues.', 'In October 23, 2012 and May 26, 2016, Council authorized a professional services agreement and one modification (respectively) with Rob Wellington Quigley FAIA Corporation (RWQ), a California-based company, to provide design and preconstruction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project (Attachments B, C, D).', 'During the design process the entire design went through a “value engineering” review. Value engineering is a systematic and organized approach to providing the necessary functions in a project at the lowest cost. Value engineering promotes the substitution of materials and methods with less expensive alternatives, without sacrificing functionality or quality. It is focused solely on the functions of various components and materials, rather than their physical attributes.', 'On December 17, 2013, Council approved the proposal to finance the construction of Fire Station No. 1, and authorized staff to continue with project design (Attachment E).  On April 6, 2016, the project was approved by the Planning Commission. On June 6, 2016, the project was approved by the Architectural Review Board (ARB).', 'The FY 2016-18 Capital Improvement Budget of $41.6 million for the project included all project costs, including construction, construction management, testing and inspection services, technology infrastructure, furniture, equipment, unforeseen conditions (site hazardous material), and prevailing wage monitoring.', 'Discussion', 'Fire Station No. 1 services mostly the downtown and northwest areas of Santa Monica with two fire engines allocated to citywide response. The facility is also an Essential Services Building, as defined by the California Essential Services Buildings Seismic Safety Act of 1986. An Essential Services Building should be operational and capable of providing services to the public after a natural disaster. However, the existing Fire Station No. 1 does not meet current seismic code.', 'On February 27, 2018, the City finalized a land swap agreement, exchanging public property located at 1338-42 and 1321 5th Street, for property located at 1337-45 7th Street (“7th Street Property”). The 7th Street Property will serve as the new site to build the replacement facility for Fire Station No. 1. The existing Fire Station No. 1 will remain operational throughout construction until the new fire station is ready for occupancy. The estimated completion date for the project is early 2020.', 'Contractor Selection', "On August 2, 2017, the City published a Notice Inviting Submission of Contractor’s Qualifications (SOCQ) to provide construction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project. The SOCQ was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.071(a) provisions. Sixty-eight vendors downloaded the bid. Seven Statements of Qualifications were received and publicly opened on August 31, 2017. Qualifications were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work, specifically experience constructing a fire station, work in and for the City of Santa Monica, and work in congested urban areas. Based on these criteria, the City pre-qualified the following list of vendors as best bidders: Bayley Construction, Bernards Bros., Inc., and Morley Construction Company.", 'On November 27, 2017, the City issued the Request for Bids (RFB) to the pre-qualified vendors to provide bids for construction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project in accordance with City specifications. Three bids were received and publicly opened on January 22, 2018.', 'Vendor', 'Bid', 'Bayley Construction', '$25,478,806', 'Bernards Bros., Inc.', '$26,525,000', 'Morley Construction Company', '$27,739,501', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Bernards Bros., Inc. is not the lowest bidder, but offered comprehensive knowledge and experience having previously successfully completed two fire station projects and a number of high profile and complex projects in Santa Monica, most notably at Santa Monica College (SMC). Bernards Bros., Inc. demonstrated its understanding of the importance of site controls, cleanliness, and communication with the neighborhood, including at their SMC campus project. Bernards Bros., Inc. provides extensive in-house Building Information Management (BIM) services, which will proactively identify building system conflicts and create detailed as-built documentation to aid in future maintenance of the facility. Additionally, Bernards Bros., Inc. received positive references from other municipalities and institutions for project completion timeliness, project management, and project billing professionalism. Based on these criteria, Bernards Bros., Inc. is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Bernards Bros., Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $26,525,000 with authorization of an additional $2,652,500 for contingency (10%) for a total authorization of $29,177,500. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C014063.589000. The total project cost is $41.6 million. Approximately $6.5 million of this total has been set aside to be funded from cash on hand. Consistent with the previously approved financing plan, the remainder of the project will be financed with a lease revenue bond and staff will return to Council in May to seek approval for bond issuance.']}
{'Title': 'Amendment to the Resolution Adopting Rules of Conduct for the Audit Subcommittee', 'Department': 'Finance Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution modifying the Audit Subcommittee Rules of Conduct.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On June 27, 2017, Council adopted Resolution No. 11046 adopting modified Rules of Conduct for the Audit Subcommittee of the Santa Monica City Council.  The modified rules required that in addition to a quorum, two Council Committee members must be present in order for a meeting to occur.  At the February 28, 2018 Audit Subcommittee meeting, staff presented a second amendment to the Rules of Conduct (Attachment A) for Subcommittee consideration. In order for Subcommittee business to move forward in a timely manner, the proposed Rules would require that only one Council Committee member be present for a meeting to occur.', 'Background', 'On July 28, 2015, Council adopted a resolution establishing an Audit Subcommittee to assist the City Council in fulfilling their oversight responsibilities for the financial reporting process, the framework for internal control, and the audit process.On May 9, 2017, Council approved the establishment of an ad hoc compensation study advisory committee to take part in Audit Subcommittee discussions on a citywide compensation study being conducted by Moss Adams, LLP, the City’s Internal Auditor. At its June 27, 2017 meeting, the City Council adopted Resolution No. 11046 adopting modified Rules of Conduct for the Audit Subcommittee of the City Council. Section 2 of the modified resolution states that “A majority of Committee Members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, except to adjourn. Two Council Committee members must be present for a meeting to occur.” Section 6 of the resolution states that “Any ad hoc committee shall only convene during public meetings of the Audit Committee.”', 'Discussion', 'Since the establishment of the ad hoc committee in May 2017, there has been an increased need for Audit Subcommittee meetings in order to allow sufficient opportunity for the ad hoc committee to meet. In response to this increased need, and in consideration of scheduling challenges that persist even for meetings that do not include the ad hoc committee, staff seeks to modify the language in the current resolution. The amended language would require that only one Council Committee member be present for an Audit Subcommittee meeting to occur, allowing for increased flexibility in scheduling and further ensuring that Subcommittee business moves forward in a timely manner.', 'Staff presented this modification to the Audit Subcommittee at its February 28, 2018 meeting and the Subcommittee unanimously approved of the change.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Reject All Bids for the City Yards Ecodistrict Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Reject all bids for Request for Proposals (RFP) #SP2396 for establishing an Ecodistrict and communication and outreach services for the City Yards Modernization Project. 2. Direct staff to reissue a bid in order to obtain the best bidder for communication and outreach services for the City Yards Modernization Project.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Communication and outreach services are required for the City Yards Modernization Project. The bid solicitation posted on September 11, 2017 included, in addition to communication and outreach services, the requirement to establish an ecodistrict. However, during evaluation of bids received, two conditions caused staff to reevaluate the need to pursue a certified ecodistrict project: 1) the five bids received far exceeded the available budget; and 2) the Council’s prioritization of the Pico Neighborhood Plan underscored the need to coordinate and unify outreach efforts between departments. Staff recommends rejecting all bids and re-advertising a revised bid without the requirement to establish an ecodistrict. Section 2.24.100(a) of the Municipal Code requires Council approval to reject all bids and re-advertise.', 'Background', 'On July 12, 2016, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate a Guaranteed Maximum Price (GMP) with design-build contractor Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (HDCC) for design services of Phasing Package A for the City Yards Modernization Project (Attachment A). Council also authorized the City Manager to register the City Yards as an ecodistrict with EcoDistricts Protocol.', 'In October 2016, the City registered the City Yards as an ecodistrict with EcoDistricts Protocol. Registration did not bind the City to complete an ecodistrict.', 'On January 9, 2018, Council set upcoming priorities for the City Planning Division including the direction to staff to create a broad outreach strategy for the Pico Neighborhood Plan that would address community concerns, including issues related to protecting quality of life and reducing impact from adverse uses such as the freeway, City Yards operations and former landfill, and the Expo Maintenance Facility. Council also directed staff to involve all groups in the Pico Neighborhood (Attachment B).', 'Discussion', 'On September 11, 2017, the City published RFP #2396 to provide 1) communication and outreach services for the City Yards Modernization Project, and 2) to establish an Ecodistrict in the Pico Neighborhood in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 87 vendors downloaded the bid, and five bids were received on October 18, 2017. All submissions received exceeded the $250,000 budgeted funding available for these services.', 'Vendor', 'Bid', 'Blue Point Planning', '$632,015', 'Ecomotion', '$598,045', 'Evolve', '$1,603,936', 'Global Green USA', '$702,482', 'Stok', '$789,120', 'Additionally, following issuance of the RFP, staff determined proceeding simultaneously with both the City Yards Ecodistrict and the Pico Neighborhood Plan would be duplicative in that the scope for both projects rely on similar outcomes, engagement strategies and neighborhood participation. To this end, Council identified the Pico Neighborhood Plan as a priority Planning project at its January 9, 2018 meeting.', 'Despite staff’s recommendation to eliminate EcoDistricts Certification from City Yards Modernization project goals, the Project would still seek Envision Certification. Similar to LEED Certification, which uses a green building rating system to assess a building project, Envision is a green infrastructure rating system best applicable to a project like the City Yards which spans an entire campus area.', 'Municipal Code Section 2.24.100(a) requires Council approval to reject all bids and re-advertise. Therefore, staff recommends that Council reject the five bids received for establishing an Ecodistrict in the Pico Neighborhood and direct staff to refine and re-advertise the bid for project communication and outreach services, without the requirement to establish an ecodistrict.', 'Outreach and communication services are still required for the City Yards Modernization Project. The City Yards Modernization Project would re-bid to focus exclusively on the project’s outreach and communication strategy and also include scope to coordinate with the Pico Neighborhood Planning team on outreach activities, messaging and communications.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Award Construction Contract for Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Repair', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2528 to John S. Meek Company, Inc., a California-based company, for the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Repair Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with John S. Meek Company, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including a 11% contingency);3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project would consist of the removal and replacement of the existing Harbor Patrol boat hoist and crane, and the design and construction of a new steel catwalk on the southwest end of the Santa Monica Municipal Pier. These improvements are necessary due to the facilities’ nearing the end of their useful life and to adequately maintain existing Santa Monica Police Department Harbor Patrol operations, facilities, infrastructure and equipment. The hoist and crane are primarily used to lift or lower the Harbor Services Unit’s dinghy boat from or onto the water. The catwalk is used for docking, boarding and disembarking the Santa Monica Police Department Harbor Patrol boat. Staff recommends John S. Meek Company, Inc. to construct these improvements in an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including an 11% contingency).', 'Background', 'The Pier’s boat hoist and crane and appurtenant catwalk is located on the southwest corner of the Pier and is used by the Pier and Harbor Services Unit of the Santa Monica Police Department (Harbor Patrol) to launch and load their boat. The Harbor Patrol watches over the seaward area around the Pier and performs sea rescues in the Santa Monica Bay when necessary. The hoist and crane are primarily used to lift or lower the Harbor Services Unit’s dinghy boat from or onto the water as operations require. The catwalk serves as a dock for the Harbor Patrol boat, and also supports Pier maintenance staff with access to areas beneath the Pier.', 'Discussion', 'The boat hoist and crane, and appurtenant catwalk are nearing the end of their useful life and must be removed and replaced with new infrastructure. The boat hoist and crane are experiencing electrical, mechanical and structural issues that limit their functional capabilities. Issues include rusted machinery, electrical malfunctions, and structural deterioration. The steel catwalk has deteriorated, with localized material failure and rusting, and is also in need of removal and replacement.', 'Contractor Selection – Construction', 'On November 6, 2017, the City issued a Notice Inviting Bids for the construction of the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-two vendors downloaded the bid, and on December 6, 2017, one bid was received and publicly opened.', 'Engineer’s Estimate: $226,950', 'The difference between the bid amount and engineer’s estimate is attributable to an underestimation in mobilization for marine work, catwalk design cost, and overall labor for marine construction. The engineer’s estimate was also based on an older crane quotation and excluded costs for demolition and electrical work.', 'The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. John S. Meek Company, Inc. has completed many repair projects for the City at the Santa Monica Pier, including wood deck replacements, various concrete repairs, timber and concrete pile repairs, and full section repairs. John S. Meek Company, Inc. has also completed similar Pier projects for the cities of Long Beach and Redondo Beach. Staff contacted references listed in the bid package, and all respondents reported that work performed by John S. Meek Company, Inc. was completed within project requirements. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that John S. Meek Company, Inc.’s license is current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, John S. Meek Company, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder for the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project.', 'Construction Management', "Construction management and public outreach for this project would be provided by City staff. Construction management would include inspecting the contractor's work during construction, verifying and documenting field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts as a result of the construction activities, attending the contractor's safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings and maintaining all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work conducted during construction.", 'Public Outreach', 'In March and April 2017, Engineering staff met with the Pier Management staff, Pier businesses, Pier Corporation staff and the Pier Board about upcoming Pier projects that included this project. Staff would reengage to communicate with Pier tenants regarding all pre-construction public outreach while fostering open lines of communication and responding to the day-to-day concerns of the residents, visitors and local businesses.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The project is categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15301(c) and Section 15302 of the CEQA Guidelines. Class 1 exempt projects include the "operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination." Class 2 exempt projects include the “replacement or reconstruction of existing structures and facilities where the new structure would be located on the same site as the structure replaced and would have substantially the same purpose and capacity as the structure replaced.” The project qualifies as a Class 1 and Class 2 project exempt from CEQA. Therefore, this project is categorically exempt from CEQA.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to John S. Meek Company, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including an 11% contingency). Additional funds in the amount of $10,000 is also needed for administrative and prevailing wage costs. Funds of $100,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C309202.589000. Award of the contract requires a budget transfer of $250,000 from account S010300.589000 to account C019202.589000 and appropriation of an additional $160,000 from the Pier fund to account C309202.589000']}
{'Title': 'Award of Contract to Deborah Aschheim for Percent-For-Art  Project for Fire Station #1', 'Department': 'Community & Cultural Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Recommend ActionsStaff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Deborah Aschheim, a California-based artist, the fabrication of the artwork to be installed at Fire Station No. 1;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Deborah Aschheim, in an amount not to exceed $160,000.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'A new 25,000 square foot above-grade fire station at 1337-45 7th Street, to replace the existing Fire Station No.1 at 1444 7th Street, will soon be built. In accordance with the City’s Percent for Art ordinance, the project will include a public art element. Deborah Aschheim designed art glass panels to illustrate the stories and experiences of the Santa Monica Fire Department, from both a historical and modern-day perspective that will be installed in various bays. Staff recommends the Council authorize a contract with Deborah Aschheim in an amount not to exceed $160,000, funded by the Percent-For-Art (PFA) allocation generated by the Fire Station No. 1 Capital Improvement Project.', 'Background', 'In 1986, the City of Santa Monica adopted Resolution Number 7231(CCS) to establish a Percent for Art (PFA) Program to enrich the lives of all residents of and visitors to the City of Santa Monica by providing funding for various forms of public art. The PFA Program requires that eligible Capital Improvement Projects set aside a budget of an amount equal to at least one percent of the total project budget for public art. The Fire Station No. 1 project is a qualifying Percent for Art project.', 'Vendor Selection', 'A Request for Qualifications for Southern California-based artists to design public art was published in October 2015. Following a competitive panel selection process that considered five possible artists for the project, Deborah Aschheim was selected to receive the commission based on having the strongest presentation, submission, and portfolio of previous public artworks. In June 2016, she was awarded a contract (contract #3154) in the amount of $40,000 for the delivery of an artwork proposal. This contract has concluded and has been closed, which requires a new contract to be created for the fabrication and installation of the art piece.', 'Discussion', 'Ms. Aschheim’s proposal, “Back Story” is an illustrated narrative translated in art glass panels that tells stories of the Santa Monica Fire Department, past and present. The extended timeline of this project allowed Ms. Aschheim to pursue an in-depth engagement with SMFD that included observation of fire, rescue and paramedic activities, the fire training academy and SMFD administration. The artist spent hundreds of hours observing Fire Department Personnel, working closely with Deputy Chief Tom Clemo.', 'Over the course of this informal “artist residency,” the artist has generated a significant body of work related to the SMFD in addition to images that will be translated into 15 permanent glass architectural elements. Ms. Aschheim will be contracting Franz Mayer of Munich, an internationally renowned glass fabricator, to fabricate the artworks. These large-scale glass panels will be installed on the interior of the Fire Station in the Watch Room and the Community Room. The artist will also produce an accompanying book of sketches and text excerpts from interviews with SMFD personnel. This artwork will be a significant addition to the City’s Public Art Collection and an engaging feature of the city’s newest state-of-the-art fire station facility.', 'On June 19, 2017 the Public Art Committee recommended approval of Ms. Aschheim’s proposal. The Arts Commission then unanimously approved the proposal and approved a budget for fabrication at $160,000 at its meeting the same day. Ms. Aschheim will be responsible for all fabrication and installation as part of the contract.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Total award for the project is $200,000, $40,000 of which has already been paid to Ms. Aschheim for the completion and delivery of the artwork proposal. The contract to be awarded to Deborah Aschheim is for an amount not to exceed $160,000. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget. The contract will be charged to account C010081.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Authorization to execute a contract modification with the Hawkins Company', 'Department': 'Human Resources Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement #10473 (CCS) in the amount of $68,000 with The Hawkins Company, a California-based company, for executive recruitment services. This will result in a three year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $208,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On occasion, City staff enlists an executive recruitment firm to assist with hard-to-fill, specialized vacancies at management and director levels. One firm in particular, The Hawkins Company, has been used recently by staff to recruit for the positions of Director of Library Services, Assistant City Manager, Deputy City Manager and City Architect. To continue this successful relationship, the agreement currently in place with The Hawkins Company requires a one-year extension and additional funds for a total contract term of three years and an amount not to exceed $208,000. This change will allow for the City to utilize their services for the positions of Water Resources Manager, Human Resources Manager and one additional unanticipated vacancy that would require a more specialized focus the Hawkins Company provides.', 'Discussion', 'The Human Resources Department performs 200 recruitments annually with a staff consisting of four recruitment analysts and two technicians. An executive recruitment requires extensive targeted outreach to attract top candidates from a diverse pool of potential applicants: thorough background investigations; and industry specific contacts.  While Human Resources staff has the capability to perform duties of this complexity, the time and resources required for specialized and proactive candidate recruitment, detracts from filling other important vacancies occurring throughout the City. The Hawkins Company has continued to prove its value by providing comprehensive recruitments that include strong candidate profiles, targeted marketing outreach, screenings, selection and backgrounds. The City has been consistently impressed with the quality, quantity and diversity of the candidates recruited and the excellent customer service provided throughout the recruitment and selection process.', 'The Hawkins Company was selected following a Request for Proposals (RFP) for Executive Recruitment Services in August 2015.  Hawkins was chosen as one of the top 3 bidders out of 12 proposals. The additional top 2 firms were Teri Black & Co., and Ralph Anderson & Associates. Teri Black & Co was selected to recruit for the City’s Fire Chief in 2016 and Ralph Anderson & Associates provided executive recruitment services for Chief Information Officer, and Chief of Police. These firms were evaluated and chosen, based on qualifications, experience, fees, references, services, and ability to engage a diverse pool of potential candidates to meet the City’s needs.', 'A one-year agreement with The Hawkins Company was entered into on August 15, 2016 for an amount not exceed $34,500. On June 13, 2017 City Council approved a first modification to the original agreement extending the contract termination date to June 30, 2018 for a total amount not to exceed $140,000 (Attachment B). Since that time, The Hawkins Company has conducted recruitments for Assistant City Manager, Deputy City Manager and City Architect.', 'A second modification will extend the contract term to June 30, 2019 and allow for three additional recruitments at the cost of $34,000 each, bringing the total value of the contract to $208,000.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The modification to be awarded to The Hawkins Company is $68,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $208,000.  Funds are included in the FY 2017-19 Adopted Biennial Budget in various departments.']}
{'Title': 'Resolution Approving Final Parcel Map No. 72808 for a Three-Unit Condominium Project at 2512 7th Street', 'Department': 'Development Review 2', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached Resolution (Attachment A) approving Final Parcel Map No. 72808 for a condominium project located at 2512 7th Street.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Parcel Map for the following condominium project at 2512 7th Street. The Vesting Tentative Parcel Map was approved by the Planning Commission on August 3, 2016. A timely filing of the Final Map was made to the County prior to the Map’s expiration date. According to Section 66452.6(d) of the Subdivision Map Act, once a timely filing is made to the County or City, subsequent actions of the local agency, including, but not limited to, processing, approving, and recording of a map, may lawfully occur after the map’s expiration date.', 'PARCEL MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER   UNITS', '72808 2512 7th Street OP Real Estate Development Corp. 3', 'The following table provides a brief summary of the project:', 'Zoning District', 'OP2 – Ocean Park Low Density Residential', 'Parcel Area', '7,937 square feet', 'Parcel Dimensions', '160.08’ x 50’', 'Existing On-Site Improvements (Year Built)', 'Vacant', 'Rent Control Status', 'N/A – vacant property', 'Historic Resources Inventory Status', 'N/A – vacant property', 'AHPP Compliance', 'Payment of Fee', 'Discussion', 'A Vesting Tentative Parcel Map application (15ENT-0350) was submitted to the City Planning Division on December 24, 2015, to create three residential condominium air space parcels on one land lot in the Ocean Park Low Density Residential (OP2) zoning district. After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved the Vesting Tentative Parcel Map for the above project on August 3, 2016. The action of the Planning Commission was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map. As a vesting tentative parcel map application, its associated approval confers a vested right to proceed with development in substantial compliance with the ordinances, policies, and standards in effect at the time the vesting map is deemed complete by the City. In this case, the application was deemed complete on May 26, 2016, and therefore the development is subject to the development standards of the 2015 Zoning Ordinance (as amended) in effect at that time.', "The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium tax of $3,000 prior to issuance of building permits. The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer’s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. The City Engineer’s office indicates that there are no required off-site public improvements. The City Attorney's Office has approved the Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Resolution Approving Final Parcel Map No. 73829 for a Three-Unit Condominium Project at 212 Bay Street', 'Department': 'Development Review 2', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached Resolution (Attachment A) approving Final Parcel Map No. 73829 for a condominium project located at 212 Bay Street.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Parcel Map for the following condominium project at 212 Bay Street. The Vesting Tentative Parcel Map was approved by the Planning Commission on June 15, 2016. A timely filing of the Final Map was made to the County prior to the Map’s expiration date. According to Section 66452.6(d) of the Subdivision Map Act, once a timely filing is made to the County or City, subsequent actions of the local agency, including, but not limited to, processing, approving, and recording of a map, may lawfully occur after the map’s expiration date.', 'PARCEL MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER   UNITS', '73829 212 Bay Street Lucas Ralson, MLR Ventures, LLC 3', 'The following table provides a brief summary of the project:', 'Zoning District', 'NC – Neighborhood Commercial', 'Parcel Area', '6,022 square feet', 'Parcel Dimensions', '120.44 x 50’', 'Existing On-Site Improvements (Year Built)', 'Vacant', 'Rent Control Status', 'N/A – vacant property', 'Historic Resources Inventory Status', 'N/A – vacant property', 'AHPP Compliance', 'Payment of Fee', 'Discussion', 'A Vesting Tentative Parcel Map application 15ENT-0331 was submitted to the City Planning Division on November 10, 2015 to create three residential condominium air space parcels on one land lot in the Neighborhood Commercial (NC) zoning district. After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved the Vesting Tentative Parcel Map for the above project on June 15, 2016. The action of the Planning Commission was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map. As a vesting tentative parcel map application, its associated approval confers a vested right to proceed with development in substantial compliance with the ordinances, policies, and standards in effect at the time the vesting map is deemed complete by the City. In this case, the application was deemed complete on November 11, 2015 and therefore the development is subject to the development standards of the 2015 Zoning Ordinance (as amended) in effect at that time.', "The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium tax of $3,000 prior to issuance of building permits. The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer’s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. The City Engineer’s office indicates that there are no required off-site public improvements. The City Attorney's Office has approved the Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Second Modification to Gafcon Contract for Citywide Prevailing Wage and Labor Compliance', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Procurement', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate andexecute a second modification to Contract No. 10435, in the amount of $600,000 for three years with two additional one-year renewal options with Gafcon, Inc., a California-based company, to provide citywide State and Federal labor compliance and certified payroll monitoring on an as-needed basis. This will result in a five-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $900,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Since 2016, Gafcon, Inc. (Gafcon) has provided certified payroll monitoring services for city projects subject to State and Federal prevailing wage requirements. Services consist of job classification selection, certified payroll compliance monitoring, on-site interviews of workers, and enforcement if needed. Although a formal solicitation was conducted, the original three-year contract was executed under City Manager authority as a pilot to ensure compliance with state-mandated requirements in a timely fashion. At the time, staff did not have a full understanding about the quantity of projects that would require monitoring. The first modification on February 28, 2017, addressed this issue as staff developed a better understanding of actual use. As of the first modification, Gafcon was monitoring 81 projects. Gafcon is currently monitoring 105 active projects citywide. Due to an increase in the number of projects currently monitored, in anticipation of future large-scale projects, and to support the addition of Davis-Bacon Act Federal Prevailing Wage compliance monitoring, staff recommends amending the agreement with Gafcon in the amount of $600,000 for three years, with two additional one-year renewal options, for a new total amount not to exceed $900,000 over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'Two 2014 California laws (SB 7 and SB 854) define prevailing wage requirements, and establish responsibilities for prevailing wage payment. Prevailing wage law applies to anyPublicWorks projectthat exceeds $15,000 for repair/maintenance and $25,000 for new construction.The law requires prevailing wage payment to certain labor categoriesidentified in the State of California Labor Code (commencing in Section 1770etseq.)when employed for any work on or in the execution of a Public Works project.The City must 1) award public works bids in compliance with the law and report these bid awards to the California Department of Industrial Relations (DIR); and 2) ensurecontractors/subcontractors register with the DIR and provide certified payroll records to the Labor Commissioner.', 'On May 31, 2016, following a formal Request for Proposals (RFP), under City Manager authority, staff executed agreement #3142 in the amount not to exceed $80,000 over a three-year period with Gafcon to provide certified payroll monitoring services for projects subject to State and Federal prevailing wage requirements.', 'On February 28, 2017 (Attachment A), a first modification to Contract No. 10435 (CCS), formerly known as agreement #3142, was approved by Council in the amount of $220,000 over a three-year period with a new total amount not to exceed $300,000.', 'Discussion', 'City prevailing wage projects include construction and maintenance of public buildings, housing, public work infrastructure and similar facilities, and could include projects funded in part or in whole by Federal or State grants. Gafcon is currently monitoring 105 active projects Citywide.', 'Gafcon ensures that the Prime Contractor and Subcontractors comply with all California Labor Codes as outlined by California State Department of Industrial Relations (DIR). During the span of a project, Gafcon assists with the following:', '· Audit of certified payroll records to assure compliance with laws/regulations;', '· Compliance with apprenticeship laws/regulations and training fund contributions;', '· Identifies labor compliance violations and resolves issues and calculates applicable penalties/fines;', '· Conducts on-site inspections and worker interviews;', '· Provides the City progress payment and withhold recommendations based on the contractor’s compliance with labor laws/regulations through project close-out.', 'Gafcon will now also monitor Federal Davis-Bacon Act prevailing wage compliance requirements. This work has been done on a case-by-case basis individually by various contractors. Adding this scope to the existing contract with Gafcon will afford continuity by providing one point of contact. The City has three to five federally-funded projects which require adherence to federal and state prevailing wage laws. The added scope for this work would be minimal as three to five projects represent only approximately three to five percent of the total number of projects monitored.', 'The larger projects currently being monitored by Gafcon include: City Services Building, Clean Beaches Initiative, Water Main Replacement, and Parking Structure Repairs. These are larger projects that require significant labor compliance and monitoring. Gafcon also oversees and manages the City’s Labor Compliance Program for Prop 84-funded projects, which includes annual reporting to DIR. The two additional one-year renewal options would ensure the projects mentioned above continue to be monitored efficiently and would ensure a smooth project close-out.', 'Anticipated future large-scale projects include the City Yards Modernization Project, with a requested project budget of $114,000,000, and Fire Station #1, with a requested project budget of $41,000,000. Of the $600,000 requested for this second modification, approximately half will fund compliance monitoring for the current and future large-scale projects mentioned above. For example, the City Services Building alone will budget approximately $125,000 for Prevailing Wage and Labor Compliance charges.', 'Gafcon has agreed to honor their pricing for the two additional one-year renewal option terms and the additional scope. The modification amount is based on a monthly spending average of $14,700 by Departments and Divisions for a steadily increasing number of City prevailing wage projects since May 2016. Staff recommends the approval of a second modification to Contract No. 10435 (CCS) in the amount of $600,000 with two additional one-year renewal options with Gafcon to provide citywide State and Federal labor compliance and certified payroll monitoring services for a total amount not to exceed $900,000 over five years.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Gafcon is $600,000 with two additional one-year renewal options, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $900,000 over a five-year period. Funds are available within existing budgets, and would be charged to the appropriate Division or project account based on request for oversight and labor compliance services. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval and budget adoption.']}
{'Title': 'Modification of City Council Rules of Order', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution modifying the Rules of Order and Procedures for the Conduct of City Council meetings, to establish a procedure for public speakers to submit electronic media files as part of their public comment during City Council meetings. This new procedure will take affect beginning with the April 10, 2018 meeting.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends that the City Council establish a deadline for public speakers to submit electronic presentation materials to the City Clerk’s Office by 12 p.m. on the business day preceding a Council meeting. The new rule would allow time to screen files for viruses, allow staff and speakers sufficient time to set up presentation files, and reduce meeting delays and disruptions.', 'Background', 'At the December 15, 2015 meeting, the City Council amended the Rules of Order and Procedure for the Conduct of City Council meetings to: 1) elaborate on the description for items heard under Item 2: Special Agenda Items; and 2) clarify public comment rules on the City Manager’s Report and late requests to donate speaker time on Item 14: Public Input. The current rules have been in effect for over two years with minimal disruptions to meetings, but staff has identified that a procedure is needed to address concerns regarding public speakers submitting and presenting electronic presentation materials during meetings.', 'Discussion', 'Currently, there is no established procedure for speakers to submit media files such as PowerPoint presentations, videos, audio, images, and portable document formats (PDFs) to be setup before and during their time for public comment. City Clerk staff has administratively established a 6:30 p.m. cutoff time on the day of City Council meetings to submit files, but staff continues to receive requests for assistance after this time and throughout the meeting.', 'The concern with uploading speakers’ media files after the meeting has commenced is the inability to screen files for computer viruses, and/or compatibility with the City’s software. While the computer in the Chambers can screen files for viruses, its connection to the network poses a security threat to City staffs’ operations, information, software and hardware. Lastly, different versions of presentations, video, audio, and image viewing software may prevent public speakers from accessing their files, and does not allow sufficient time for the public speaker to convert their presentation material into other formats before addressing the Council.', 'The number of public speakers using media files during public comment varies from one meeting to another and can be disruptive to meetings and staffs’ other duties. For example, the computer used to project these files is located at the front of the chambers, next to the public podium, where City staff and speakers stand throughout the meeting to address the Council on various items. It is also not possible for the City Clerk to upload files for speakers while taking votes and performing other duties. She may inadvertently interfere with content being displayed on the screen in the Chambers, on CityTV and online at the time.', 'Therefore, staff proposes to establish a deadline for speakers to submit electronic media files to the City Clerk’s Office no later than 12 p.m. on the business day preceding a City Council meeting. Files must be emailed to the City Clerk’s Office at clerk@smgov.net and include the Council meeting date, agenda item number, and name of the public speaker. Electronic presentation materials would only be allowed on agendized items. The earlier deadline would prevent access of corrupt files into the City’s network; it would allow staff adequate time to prepare presentation materials for public speakers, and would reduce delays and disruptions during the meeting. Upon approval by Council, the new rule would take effect starting with the April 10, 2018 Council meeting and be included: in the Council’s Rules of Order; on all Council agendas; and, the Council website to give the public adequate notice and give staff the authority to enforce the new rule. Alternatives to staff’s recommendation are to keep the current rules as is or modify the proposed deadline or procedure.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Second Reading and Adoption of Ordinance Amending Chapter 2.04 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code Relating to Civil Service Rules and Regulations', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached ordinance amending Chapter 2.04 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code relating to Civil Service Rules and Regulations.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'At its meeting of March 6, 2018, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending Chapter 2.04 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code relating to Civil Service Rules and Regulations.', 'The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption.']}
{'Title': 'Introduction for First Reading of an Interim Ordinance Extending Interim Zoning Ordinance 2569 (CCS) for Interim Changes to Development Standards in the R1 Zoning District Pending Adoption of Permanent Revisions to the R1 Development Standards', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading an interim ordinance (Attachment A) extending interim development standards in the R1 zoning district.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On February 13, 2018, Council adopted Interim Zoning Ordinance No. 2569 to temporarily reduce the scale of new construction in R1 zoning districts. The interim ordinance was adopted in response to community concerns regarding the size of new home construction and the number of pending applications for demolitions and new home construction in the R1 district.', 'The Council also established February 23, 2018 as the date that complete applications for new construction in the R1 zone must be submitted in order to be reviewed under then-current standards. Between January 23, 2018 and February 23, 2018, 23 applications for new home construction in the R1 zone were submitted.  An additional six applications for additions/remodels were also submitted. Nine demolition permits were submitted, raising the total number of pending demolition permits to 42. Comparatively, over the past three years during the same period, the City received less than eight applications for new construction. Annually, the City typically receives approximately five permit applications per month.', 'The interim ordinance is set to expire on May 15, 2018. This report proposes extending the interim ordinance until November 15, 2019 to provide an opportunity to conduct a comprehensive revision of the R1 standards, including exploring potential solutions to address the problem of the size of new home construction and the number of demolitions of existing homes to make way for new homes that are out of scale in the R1 district. The extension will also allow time for a robust public engagement process.', 'Background', 'On October 5, 2016, in response to public correspondence and testimony, the Planning Commission held a discussion about the rapid change occurring in the R1 zoning district citywide. At the time, the Commission had previously reviewed Variances for homes 9,000-11,000 square feet in size. On December 1, 2016, the Planning Commission submitted a letter to the City Council requesting that Council direct staff to prepare a comprehensive review of citywide R1 zoning standards. A comprehensive review of R1 development standards has not occurred since selected amendments were made approximately 20 years ago.', 'As part of Council’s discussion on City Planning Division priorities on January 9, 2018 and in response to significant concerns raised by neighborhood groups and residents about the size and scale of new single-unit dwelling construction, Council determined that a revision to the R1 standards was of high importance. Council further directed staff to return with interim zoning standards that would temporarily reduce the size and scale of new homes pending a public process to study revisions to the R1 zone development standards.', 'Staff prepared an Interim Zoning Ordinance after considering Council direction and public input, and conducting its own analysis. On January 23, 2018, Council conducted a public hearing to introduce the proposed interim ordinance for first reading that established the following interim changes applicable to new construction in the R1 district:', '· Reduced maximum building height to 28 feet;', '· Limited maximum parcel coverage to overall 50% on a sliding scale with a maximum 20% parcel coverage for the second floor;', '· Required that upper level stepbacks are measured from the second floor;', '· Limited aggregate second floor balconies and decks to an aggregate of 400 sf; and', '· Eliminated accessory dwelling units from parcel coverage calculations.', 'The interim ordinance was adopted on February 13, 2018 and became effective on March 16, 2018. Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.46.090(C), the ordinance is set to expire sixty days thereafter, on May 15, 2018. Council may extend the interim ordinance beyond May 15, 2018 for up to 60 months.', 'Discussion', 'Adoption of the proposed ordinance extending the applicability of the interim development standards for the R1 district would ensure that the opportunity to protect the City’s unique and diverse neighborhoods is not lost while a comprehensive review of the R1 standards is underway. The interim standards continue to allow for reasonable new construction in the R1 district more consistent with existing neighborhood character.', 'The interim ordinance represents a temporary measure to reduce the maximum allowable size of new single-unit dwellings in the R1 zoning districts. Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.46.090(C), the initial interim ordinance can only be adopted for 60 days and is set to expire on May 15, 2018. The proposed interim ordinance would extend the term for an additional 18 months. Prior to expiration of the extended interim ordinance on November 15, 2019, staff will undertake a comprehensive update to the R1 Development Standards, which was identified as a high City Planning priority by Council on January 9, 2018.', 'The extension of this ordinance would provide opportunity for study of existing standards and exploration of possible options to address the scale and mass of new construction with all affected stakeholders. In a recent study session on potential zoning amendments, the Planning Commission directed moving some potential amendments, such as thresholds for requiring new garages in R1 districts, to the R1 comprehensive update because of their association with potential incentives for additions/remodels instead of demolition and new construction. This work effort will require a significant public engagement process regarding the appropriate character and scale of new construction and additions in R1 neighborhoods which could begin in the second half of FY2018-19.', 'Community Outreach', 'Since the interim standards were enacted, staff has received numerous inquiries from homeowners requesting information about the standards and concerns about loss of property value. Further, staff was invited to the North of Montana’s Association annual meeting where some attendees expressed opposition to the interim standards and the lack of notification regarding the changes. In order to provide broad notice of the interim standards, in addition to the public notice required by SMMC Sections 9.46.090(C) and 9.37.050(B), staff has disseminated information in the following ways:', '· Summary of changes on PCD website (www.smgov.net/pcd)', '· Summary of changes in press release', '· Summary of changes in Seascape March edition', '· Summary e-mail to PCD e-mail distribution list', '· Postcard mailing to 7,700 homes', 'Staff anticipates a broad public engagement process to include all stakeholders affected by changes to the R1 standards. The form and scale of the outreach process is not yet determined.  However, given the technically nuanced nature of the amendments being considered, staff is considering forming a technical working group of local design and construction professionals as a starting point. This is an approach that was previously taken in developing the North of Montana Development Guide. A link has also been added to the PCD website for interested stakeholders to sign-up if they wish to participate in the R1 update. Staff anticipates holding public workshops and smaller meetings as necessary that present the work of the technical working group. This would allow residents to provide feedback on possible options for the amendments.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The proposed interim ordinance is categorically exempt from the provisions of California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to 15061(b)(3) of the State Implementation Guidelines (common sense exemption). Based on the evidence in the record, it can be seen with certainty that there is no possibility that the proposed interim ordinance may have a significant effect on the environment. The recommended interim ordinance represents a temporary change to regulatory standards and would not allow more mass or floor area within the Zoning Ordinance than existing regulations. Therefore, no further environmental review under CEQA is required.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Master Facility Use Agreements with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District', 'Department': 'Community & Cultural Services', 'Sponsors': 'Director Gigi Decavalles-Hughes', 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Master Facilities Use Agreement combining the two tax measures (YY and GS) into a single agreement (Measure YY/GS Facilities Agreement) including related supplemental terms and conditions with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District with an initial term ending June 30, 2028.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Over the years, the City of Santa Monica has built a positive and collaborative partnership with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District. The City has supported exceptional educational, cultural and recreational achievements at our schools. At the same time, the School District has supported the City’s residents by maintaining high caliber classroom education as well as facilities used by students and residents alike.  This relationship is codified in a Master Facilities Use Agreement, which terminates on June 30, 2022, and related supplemental agreements, which terminate on June 30, 2018. The agreements allow community members to use District facilities at the elementary, middle, and high schools in Santa Monica during non-school hours for recreation and sports purposes. At this time, the City and the District desire to amend the supplemental agreements for the middle schools, CREST and playground partnership to reflect current practices, to allow for unsupervised general use of the middle school fields by the community and to extend the term of the supplemental agreements to coincide with the term of the Master Facilities Use Agreement.', 'In 2010 and 2016, the voters passed local tax increases with accompanying advisory measures recommending that portions of the revenues be dedicated to improving and maintaining school facilities and support school programs. In keeping with the intent expressed by the voters, staff is recommending that Council authorize the City Manager to enter into a new agreement to combine terms and conditions for the allocation of the revenues from the two recent tax measures (YY and GS) into a single agreement with supplemental agreements covering with the recreational use of Santa Monica High School and memorializing the City’s and the District’s mutual understanding pertaining to community use of Los Amigos Park (Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement). The new agreement would supersede the existing Samohi Master Facilities Use Agreement and the Samohi Supplemental Use Agreement in their entirety.', 'Pursuant to the agreements, the City anticipates that it will pay the School District a total of $25,127,020 in FY 2017-18.', 'Background', 'In 2005, the Council approved an initial Master Facilities Use Agreement and related supplemental agreements with the SMMUSD. The Agreement provides unrestricted revenue from the General Fund to the District in return for community use of District facilities, including elementary and middle school playfields, recreational facilities and buildings under-utilized during non-school hours. In April 2009, Council approved exercise of the first renewal option by amending and extending the Agreement by three years, through April 2012.  In May 2012, Council approved entering into a new Master Facilities Use Agreement and related supplemental agreements for an initial term of 10 years (through June 30, 2022) with an option to extend for an additional five years to June 30, 2027.', 'Measure Y and Measure YY were approved by Santa Monica voters in November 2010. Measure Y established a half percent transaction and use tax and advisory Measure YY recommended that half of the transaction and use tax revenue be used to support school, educational and after-school programs. Following voter approval of these measures, in May 2011, Council approved entering into a Samohi Master Facilities Use Agreement and supplemental program agreement with SMMUSD to allow the City and community to utilize facilities at Santa Monica High School (Samohi) when school is not in session and in return receive an annual amount from the City’s General Fund equivalent to one half of the revenue received by the City from the transaction and use tax, thereby effectuating the will of the voters. The 10-year initial term expires on June 30, 2021 and may be extended for additional 10-year terms by mutual agreement and consistent with the Master Facilities Use Agreement.', 'Measures GSH and GS were approved by the Santa Monica voters in November 2016. Measure GSH established another half percent transaction and use tax; advisory Measure GS recommended that half of the transaction and use tax revenue be used to improve and maintain Santa Monica’s public schools and support educational and afterschool programs at the District’s facilities in Santa Monica.', 'Discussion', 'District and City staff recently met to discuss the longstanding practice of community use of the District-owned Los Amigos Park site during non-school hours and determined that it would be prudent to document this mutually agreed upon practice within the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement intended to effectuate the will of the voters as expressed in advisory Measure GS to devote half of the additional sales tax collected to public school education. Additionally, with the incorporation of sports lights and synthetic turf at Lincoln Middle School under construction, District and City staff identified opportunities to modify the existing supplemental agreements to the Master Facilities Use Agreement relating to the Lincoln and John Adams Middle Schools in order to carve out time at these schools for general unsupervised recreational opportunities, similar to the model used for Samohi. Staff also determined that it would be prudent to make minor modifications to the supplemental agreements for CREST and Playground Partnership to reflect current practices. The resulting Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement would retain the majority of the provisions in the existing Samohi Master Facilities Agreement with the following modifications and additions:', 'Term of Agreement: As noted above, the current term for the Samohi Master Facilities Agreement expires on June 30, 2021 with an option to extend for additional 10 year terms. It is recommended that this term be amended in the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement to expire on June 30, 2028 with an option to extend for additional 10 year terms by mutual agreement between the City and District. It is also recommended that the term for the supplemental agreements for Lincoln and John Adams Middle Schools, CREST and Playground Partnership be amended to mirror the term of the Master Facilities Use Agreement (through June 30, 2022 with an option to extend for an additional five years to June 30, 2027).', 'SMMUSD Unification: The SMMUSD Board of Education is currently reviewing the request of the Malibu community to separate from the district and create a Malibu Unified School District (also officially referred to as “unification”). While it is unknown at this time whether unification will occur, it is recommended that a provision be included in the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement to clarify that if SMMUSD were to split into two districts, the funding provided through Measures YY and GS would reside with the entity with jurisdiction over Santa Monica High School and Los Amigos Park as the sole successor in interest to the rights and obligations of the District under the Agreement.', 'Force Majeure: Both District and City staff recommend that a “Force Majeure” provision be added to the Agreement to address obligations of each party should there ever be a major, unanticipated natural or human-caused disaster.', 'Supplemental Agreements:  The following elements would be addressed in the revised supplemental agreements for Lincoln and John Adams Middles Schools, CREST,  Playground Partnership and Samohi as well as in the Supplemental Agreement for Los Amigos Park:', '· facility use plans to address permit group and general community use of the sites during non-school hours;', '· staffing at the sites by District or City staff as determined by the particular site needs;', '· permit fee collection;', '· documentation of permits issued; and', '· details regarding custodial services and maintenance needs.', 'In keeping with established practice, Supplemental Agreements would be reviewed periodically by operational staff from each entity and may be revised without governing board approvals so long as they are only related to e practical and operational changes.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The City’s projection for half of the combined (Measure YY and GS) one percent transaction and use tax is $16,100,000 (Account 01274.566810), although the final amount is based on actual transaction and use tax revenue received over the year. While the City has not yet paid the District the amount equal to one half the revenue received for Measure GS to date, that amount, totaling $5,650,681 as of 2/28/18 has been set aside in the General Fund reserve in anticipation of the executed agreement between the City and the District. Disbursements will be made once the City Council and Board of Education have approved and executed the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement.']}
{'Title': 'Resolution Certifying the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) Environmental Impact Report (EIR) for the Airport Park Expansion Project and Project Approval', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': 'Director David Martin', 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt a resolution (Attachment A) certifying the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) Environmental Impact Report (EIR) for the Airport Park Expansion project, and a resolution (Attachment B) adopting the Statement of Overriding Considerations and Mitigation Monitoring Program to approve the project.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Airport Park Expansion Project would convert approximately 12 acres of non-aviation land at the Santa Monica Airport (SMO) into new park and recreational space adjacent to the existing 8.3-acre Airport Park. The Airport Park Expansion Project would construct two International Federation of Association Football (FIFA)-regulation-sized synthetic turf sports fields, 95 community garden plots, a large natural turf multi-purpose area, pickleball courts, recreational paths, fitness equipment, picnic areas and structures containing restroom, concession and storage facilities.', 'In accordance with the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA), an Environmental Impact Report (EIR) was prepared for the project (Attachment C). The EIR determined that the Airport Park Expansion Project would have a significant impact on the environment with respect to construction noise and traffic. This report recommends the City Council adopt the resolutions to certify the EIR and adopt a Statement of Overriding Considerations and Mitigation Monitoring Program.', 'Background', 'The City has long envisioned park and recreational uses on non-aviation land located south of the runway. There are approximately 40 acres of Airport property designated exclusively for non-aeronautical purposes. This area contains several buildings that are leased to artists, commercial office tenants, a restaurant, and museum. Airport Park and the Airport Park Expansion Project site are also within this area of the Airport.', 'The City has developed the area south of the runway to include commercial/office, restaurant, event venues, and educational non-aviation uses, as well as the existing Santa Monica Airport Park. In July 2002, the Final EIR for the Santa Monica Airport Park Project was certified, allowing for the development of the existing 8.3-acre public Airport Park within SMO property. Located in the northwest corner at the intersection of Airport Avenue and Bundy Drive, the park site is designated “residual land” and the development of non-aviation uses was permitted under the Airport Master Plan and the Airport Layout Plan. In 2003, the Airport Park design was approved, construction began in December of 2005 and the community has been enjoying the fields, dog park, tot lot, picnic area and general purpose turf area since April of 2007. The existing Santa Monica Airport Park project cost $7,052,330 to design and construct.', 'On March 24, 2015, the City Council heard a presentation by City Staff regarding SMO and future options for SMO operations, as well as land occupied by SMO (Attachment D). The City Council unanimously voted to direct City staff to develop recreational uses on approximately 12 acres of non-aviation land adjacent to the existing Airport Park within three years to address community requests for sports fields.', 'On June 18, 2016, a community event was held at the existing Airport Park, attended by approximately 106 people, in which three park concept schemes were presented. The three park concepts proposed included a Runway Concept (Option 1), a Landing Strips Concept (Option 2), and a Flight Path Concept (Option 3). Option 1 involved three new fields, one at FIFA-regulation size, with 192 net parking spaces and a new drop-off/turnaround location at the south. Option 2 also involved three new fields, two at FIFA-regulation size, with 160 net parking spaces and a new drop-off/turnaround location at the south. Option 3 involved two new fields, both at FIFA-regulation size, with 102 net parking spaces and a new drop-off/turnaround location at the north.', "On July 21, 2016, the three park concepts were presented to the City Recreation and Parks Commission along with the data collected from community members on their preferences for park amenities. Concept Option 3 was unanimously chosen by the Commission with additional recommendations, including: the addition of a “loop” pathway to surround the combined park areas; provision of a pedestrian entry at Bundy Avenue; placement of the Community Gardens away from the runway and within close proximity to other new amenities; retention of the size of both the existing children's playground and dog park; and that consideration be given to add concessions and pickleball courts.", 'On July 25, 2016, the three park concept schemes were presented to the Santa Monica Airport Commission along with the data collected from the community. Action was not required and the Commissioners deferred to public input and the recommendations of the Recreation and Parks Commission.', 'Based on the Council directive to maximize sports fields, community input, and the recommendations of the Recreation and Parks Commission, the design team developed a new hybrid concept balancing active recreation amenities with landscaped areas for passive recreation and organized to facilitate further expansion of the park in the future.', 'On September 27, 2016 the City Council approved the conceptual direction of the new hybrid concept and directed staff to proceed with design and construction documents (Attachment E). The hybrid concept approved by Council is the project analyzed in the EIR.', 'Discussion', 'In accordance with CEQA, an EIR was prepared to analyze the potential environmental effects of the Airport Park Expansion Project, both individually and cumulatively.', 'In accordance with Section 15082 of the CEQA Guidelines, a Notice of Preparation (NOP) was published on March 8, 2017 for a 30-day comment period which indicated the City’s intent to prepare an EIR for the project. The NOP was distributed to Federal, State, Regional, and City agencies, neighborhood groups, and occupants and owners within a 1,000-foot radius of the Project site and was published on the City’s Planning and Community Development website. Additionally, a public scoping meeting was held on March 21, 2017 to present the project and receive comments on the scope of the EIR.', 'On October 27, 2017, a Notice of Completion and Public Availability of the Draft EIR was published, commencing a 45-day comment period for the Draft EIR. The environmental areas studied in detail in the Draft EIR include:', '· Air Quality', '· Construction Effects', '· Greenhouse Gas Emissions', '· Hazards and Hazardous Materials', '· Land Use and Planning', '· Neighborhood Effects', '· Noise', '· Transportation/Traffic', 'Other issue areas such as Agricultural/Forestry Resources, Biological Resources, Aesthetics, Cultural Resources, Hydrology/Water Quality, Geology/Soils, Mineral Resources, Neighborhood Effects, Population/Housing, Public Services, Tribal Cultural Recourses, and Utilities were determined to be less than significant.', 'The Final EIR, which was published in January of 2018, contains all comments and responses to comments received during the comment period as well as minor changes to the Draft EIR.', 'The EIR identified mitigation measures in the areas of Hazards and Hazardous Materials, Noise (Construction), and Transportation/Traffic (Construction) to reduce potential impacts to less than significant levels. To ensure these measures are properly enacted, a mitigation monitoring program is necessary and will be enforced during the construction and operation of the project, if approved. The mitigation measures are provided in the Final EIR.', 'Significant and Unavoidable Impacts', 'The EIR determined the project would result in short-term significant and unavoidable construction-related impacts from noise, and long term significant and unavoidable impacts to transportation and traffic due to operation of the park. During construction, even with the implementation of identified mitigation, the use of heavy-duty construction equipment would exceed ambient noise levels at the residences across South Bundy Drive by more than 5 dBA (decibels), thus exceeding the City of Los Angeles’ thresholds for construction noise. Project construction would not exceed the City of Santa Monica thresholds for construction noise.', 'Operation of the park would increase the number of vehicle trips on the roadway network, such that four nearby intersections would be significantly impacted under the City’s currently adopted thresholds. These thresholds are based on quality of traffic service categorized by traffic flow and utilizing level of service (LOS) quality ratings ranging from A (best) to F (worst). The following intersections in the City were projected to experience a significant impact during one or more analyzed peak hours:', 'Intersection LOS Quality Level', '23rd Street & Dewey Street  F during the P.M. peak hour', '23rd Street & Airport Avenue D during the A.M. peak hour', 'Bundy Drive & Ocean Park Boulevard F during A.M. and P.M. peak hours Centinela Avenue & Airport Avenue  E during the P.M. peak hour', 'In addition, based on the City’s adopted thresholds for neighborhood street segments, operation of the project would result in a significant impact on certain street segments. Specifically, the project would result in an increase in vehicle trips (i.e., more than one vehicle trip) to two neighborhood street segments, 23rd Street north of Dewey Street and Dewey Street west of 23rd Street. No significant impacts were identified at intersections based on the City of Los Angeles’ thresholds. Currently there are no feasible mitigation measures available to reduce these impacts, so the impacts would remain significant and unavoidable. It should be noted that the State Office of Planning and Research is in the process of revising the significance criteria for CEQA traffic analysis from LOS to vehicles miles traveled (VMT) in accordance with SB743. Although the project would result in a significant impact on intersection and street segment LOS under existing adopted thresholds, the project would result in beneficial impacts under the forthcoming VMT thresholds (i.e., no significant impacts).', 'Comments on the Draft EIR', 'The Draft EIR was available for a 45-day public review period, during which a total of four comment letters were received. Two of the comment letters were from public agencies and two were from members of the public. The commenting agencies included Caltrans Division of Aeronautics and Southern California Edison. These comments provided regulatory information regarding development of the project, and did not raise any significant concerns regarding the environmental analysis. The commenting members of the public requested additional information regarding the park’s features and traffic/parking. Responses to all comments received are included in the Final EIR.', 'Alternatives Studied', 'The EIR studied five alternatives to the project, which are intended to reduce the significant environmental impacts of the project.', '· Alternative 1 – No Project/No Build (Existing Conditions)', '· Alternative 2 – No Project/Reasonable Foreseeable Development (Non-Recreational Use)', '· Alternative 3 – Airport Park Expansion without Fields', '· Alternative 4 – Reduced Project (East Paved Surface Area only)', '· Alternative 5 – Community Recreation Center', 'Environmentally Superior Alternative', 'In general, the environmentally superior alternative as defined by CEQA should minimize adverse impacts to the project site and its surrounding environment. Of the alternatives considered, the "No Project/No Build Alternative” does not create any new impacts; therefore, it is environmentally superior to a project, which proposes to change existing conditions. However, the No Project/No Build Alternative does not meet any of the project objectives. CEQA Guidelines section 15126.6 states that if the environmentally superior alternative is the No Project/No Build Alternative, the EIR shall also identify an environmentally superior alternative from among the other alternatives. Of the alternatives considered, Alternative 3 (Airport Park Expansion without Fields) reduces the project’s impacts the most; although significant and unavoidable short-term construction noise impacts and long-term traffic impacts would remain, the long-term traffic impacts would be measurably reduced. Therefore, Alternative 3 is considered to be the environmentally superior alternative over other alternatives that may have fewer impacts in other areas. However, by providing no new sports fields, Alternative 3 would not meet the project’s objectives, particularly the objective to develop recreational uses that would meet the highest priority needs of the community. In spite of being an environmentally superior alternative, the City may reject this alternative on policy grounds and may pursue the alternative that can attain most of the City’s overall project objectives so long as findings are made that there are sufficient benefits to the community (“overriding considerations”) to warrant project approval.', 'Statement of Overriding Considerations', 'Due to the significant and unavoidable impacts of the Airport Park Expansion Project, approval of the project will require the City Council to adopt a Statement of Overriding Considerations. The benefits of the project include expanding opportunities for public wellbeing, recreation and community development for City residents consistent with long-standing City objectives. Additionally, the project is consistent with the City’s Land Use and Circulation Element, which encourages high-quality recreational facilities to be developed through an offering of diverse amenities and activities intended to serve all ages, physical abilities, and activity levels and suitable for individual, team or large group use. The amenities would include a community learning garden, individual garden plots, team-based sports fields, paths for walking and running, stair steps, resistance training, zones for pickleball and table tennis, multiple non-programmed park and fitness areas and expansive open green space within Santa Monica’s urban setting. The benefits of the project would be incorporated into the Council resolution adopting the Statement of Overriding Considerations and Mitigation Monitoring Program should the Council determine an override is appropriate.', 'Next Steps', 'Once the EIR is certified, design will conclude upon reaching completion of 100% construction documents. Construction of the project is dependent on securing a permit for construction and identification of construction funding.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The CIP budget has appropriated $1.6 million in General Funds to fund the design phase for the Santa Monica Airport Park Expansion Project. The unfunded construction budget is currently estimated to be $39.3 million and would require alternative financing given that the estimate is more than the General Fund CIP annual allocation would be able to support.', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions.']}
{'Title': 'Potential Enhancements and Improvements to Local Election Laws and Enforcement Mechanisms', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office", 'Sponsors': 'City Clerk Denise Anderson-Warren', 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council review and comment on potential enhancements and improvements to local election laws and enforcement mechanisms.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City of Santa Monica has long been committed to a democracy that is responsive to the people and to an electoral process that ensures fair and effective representation. As a result, Santa Monica has adopted local regulations to promote transparency and level the playing field for electioneering that go beyond State law. In August 2017, the California Fair Political Practices Commission (FPPC) announced penalties against the Huntley Hotel, Richardson Patel, and Pure Pilates, Inc., for violations of the Political Reform Act relating to campaign contributions made in Santa Monica elections. In response, on November 28, 2017, Council directed staff to provide information on how the violations were identified and how local law was circumvented; to provide recommendations for a process to enforce, receive complaints regarding violations of, educate the community about, and create transparency on current / past investigations of violations of local campaign finance laws; and to explore options for campaign financing, including public financing.', 'Discussion', 'The Political Reform Act and the Santa Monica Elections Code', 'Elections in Santa Monica are governed by the California Elections Code, the Political Reform Act (PRA), and the Santa Monica Elections Code. The PRA is the state law that governs campaign finance, financial conflicts of interest of public officials, lobbyist registration and reporting, post-governmental employment, mass mailings at public expense, and gifts to public officials and candidate. Every candidate, candidate’s campaign committee, general purpose committee, political party committee, slate mailer organization, major donor, and person or entity making independent expenditures on candidates or ballot measures in California is subject to the PRA. Information about PRA campaign finance and disclosure requirements is available at http://www.fppc.ca.gov/learn/campaign-rules.html.', 'The FPPC is the state agency with primary responsibility for enforcing the PRA. The FPPC Enforcement Division regularly brings enforcement actions based on violations of the PRA in state and local elections including but not limited to:', '· Laundered campaign contributions;', '· Gifts and contributions over the state contribution limits;', '· Improper use of campaign funds, including personal use;', '· Campaign mass mailings at public expense;', '· False, inadequate, or inaccurate reporting on campaign statements and reports;', '· Non-filing or late filing of campaign statements or reports; and', '· Anonymous or cash contributions of $100 or more.', 'Charter cities are not authorized to alter or reduce the requirements of the PRA. Charter cities may, however, impose additional regulations that are consistent with the purpose of the PRA and stricter in effect. The Santa Monica Elections Code imposes further regulations on election activity in order to, among other things, ensure the credibility and integrity of the local election process; ensure equal opportunity for all candidates, promote diversity among candidates, and strengthen the community’s trust that their government is representative; promote participation in government and trust that the democratic process is not subverted by affluent special interest groups; and preserve a sense of community, safeguard local democracy, and effectuate a commitment to fair public process. For these purposes, the Santa Monica Elections Code, among other things:', '· Prohibits any person from making contributions totaling more than $340 to a candidate or controlled committee of a candidate in each election, as well as any candidate or committee from receiving such contributions (SMMC 11.04.050);', '· Prohibits the Santa Monica City Council, Santa Monica Rent Control Board, and their administrative officers from circulating any newsletter or mass mailing within 88 days of an election to approve or disapprove any ballot measure or to select any Council or Board member (SMMC 11.04.130); and', '· Requires committees raising or spending funds to support or oppose an initiative, recall, or referendum to file financial disclosure documents electronically with the City Clerk in addition to complying with State law (SMMC 11.04.165).', 'Additional information about Santa Monica elections, including campaign disclosure statements, is available at http://www.smvote.org.', 'Reporting Violations of State and Local Elections Law', 'The City of Santa Monica takes seriously any complaint or allegation regarding a potential violation of state or local election laws. Any member of the public who believes that a violation has occurred is encouraged to file a complaint or report with the FPPC Enforcement Division, the Santa Monica City Clerk’s Office, or the Santa Monica Police Department.', 'Complaints or reports may be submitted electronically or via email to the FPPC Enforcement Division by following the directions at http://www.fppc.ca.gov/enforcement/file-a-complaint.html.', 'Complaints or reports may be submitted to the City Clerk’s Office in person in Room 102 of City Hall or by email at clerk@smgov.net.', 'Upon receiving a complaint, the FPPC Enforcement Division will investigate and pursue any alleged violation of the PRA.', 'The Santa Monica City Clerk also receives complaints and reports of election law violations. The City Clerk does not investigate such complaints or reports but is required to report any apparent violation of the law to the appropriate enforcement agency. Per the procedure specified by the PRA and the FPPC, an apparent violation exists if the City Clerk knows or has reason to believe that a statement contains material inaccuracies or omissions, or when a filer fails to file all or part of a statement after reasonable notice has been provided.', 'Upon receiving a complaint or report of an alleged violation of the PRA or the Santa Monica Elections Code, the City Clerk will notify a candidate or committee of the complaint and request a response. Following two such notifications, if the City Clerk knows or has reason to believe that a campaign statement has inaccuracies or omissions that constitute an apparent violation of state or local law, or that state or local law has otherwise been violated, the City Clerk will report the potential violations to appropriate authorities, including the FPPC and/or the Chief of the Criminal Division of the City Attorney’s Office. Upon receiving any such report, the Chief of the Criminal Division of the City Attorney’s Office will determine whether conflict-of-interest concerns (actual or apparent) require a referral to the Los Angeles County District Attorney’s Office or another City Attorney’s Office for investigation and potential prosecution. To avoid any conflict-of-interest concerns (actual or apparent), the Chief of the Criminal Division will operate independently from and not confer with the City Attorney in conducting any investigation or prosecution of an alleged or apparent violation of the Santa Monica Elections Code.', 'The FPPC Enforcement Division’s Investigation of The Huntley Hotel, Richardson Patel, and Pure Pilates, Inc. In August 2017, the FPPC published its meeting agenda containing two enforcement items relating to activity in Santa Monica.', 'In the Matter of The Huntley Hotel; FPPC No. 15/246.Staff: Commission Counsel Michael W. Hamilton, Special Investigator Ann Flaherty, and Special Investigator Marshall Miller. The Huntley Hotel, a luxury hotel in Santa Monica, made contributions in the names of others instead of its own legal name to support candidates for Santa Monica City Council. In 2012, The Huntley Hotel made the following contributions in the names of others instead of its own legal name: nine contributions to Terry O’Day for City Council 2012, nine contributions to Gleam Davis for City Council 2012, eleven contributions to Richard McKinnon for City Council 2012, eleven contributions to Ted Winterer for City Council 2012, and four contributions to Santa Monicans for Responsible Growth, totaling $86,650; in violation of Government Code Section 84301 (44 counts). From 2013 through 2015, The Huntley Hotel made the following contributions in the names of others instead of its own legal name: one contribution to Santa Monicans for Renters Rights, one contribution to Santa Monica Coalition for a Livable City and sixteen contributions to McKinnon for City Council 2014, totaling $10,700; in violation of Government Code Section 84301 (18 counts).Total Proposed Penalty: $310,000.', 'In the Matter of Richardson Patel and Pure Pilates, Inc.; FPPC No. 17/00182.Staff: Commission Counsel Michael W. Hamilton, Special Investigator Ann Flaherty, and Special Investigator Marshall Miller. Richardson Patel was a law firm located in Los Angeles, CA until it merged with another law firm in 2015. Pure Pilates, Inc. is a Pilates studio located in Encino, CA. In 2012, Richardson Patel acted as an agent for The Huntley Hotel by making a $10,000 contribution to Santa Monicans for Responsible Growth in the name of Pure Pilates without disclosing the identity of the true donor, in violation of Government Code Section 84302 (1 count). Pure Pilates acted as an intermediary of The Huntley Hotel and failed to disclose the original contributor information for the $10,000 contribution to Santa Monicans for Responsible Growth, in violation of Government Code Section 84302 (1 count).Total Proposed Penalty: $10,000.', 'At the FPPC’s public hearing on August 17, 2017, Enforcement Division staff shared the following additional information about the investigation that led to these findings and proposed penalties:', '· The Enforcement Division’s investigation did not result from a complaint or a tip. Rather, the investigation resulted from proactive review by the Enforcement Division of contribution data.', '· The Enforcement Division has developed its own internal tools for identifying violations of the Political Reform Act. These tools include gathering contribution data from jurisdictions across the State that have adopted local campaign contribution limits. After collecting such data, the Enforcement Division uses a spreadsheet to identify noteworthy patterns of contributions; these patterns include multiple contributions from the same employer, from the same address, and/or from large numbers of unemployed individuals.', '· The Enforcement Division’s investigation began with the identification of noteworthy contributions using this technique. The Enforcement Division then continued its investigation for approximately two years before issuing its findings and entering stipulated judgments with The Huntley Hotel, Richardson Patel and Pure Pilates, Inc.', '· The stipulated agreements included all of the violations that the FPPC had evidence to prove based on its two-year investigation.', '· It is the standard practice of the Enforcement Division to automatically refer any potentially criminal conduct uncovered during an investigation to relevant criminal authorities, including the District Attorney’s Office, the Attorney General’s Office, and the U.S. Attorney’s Office.', 'A recording of the August 17, 2017, hearing is available at: http://www.fppc.ca.gov/about-fppc/hearings-meetings-workshops/current-agenda/past-agendas/2017-agendas/aug-2017-agenda.html.', 'The FPPC Enforcement Division did not alert the City of Santa Monica regarding its investigation while the investigation was ongoing. Rather, the City learned about the investigation and violations through the FPPC August 2017 agenda and related news reports.', 'Following approval, the FPPC implemented the proposed penalties, which were among the largest in its history, through stipulation agreements with The Huntley Hotel, Richardson Patel and Pure Pilates, Inc. The stipulated judgments are attached. (Attachment A and Attachment B)', 'Local Response to the FPPC Investigation', 'Council, community groups, and concerned members of the public have asked whether local enforcement efforts should now be taken in regard to potential related violations of local election law revealed by the FPPC investigation. Some have suggested that an independent counsel should be appointed to investigate the matter.', 'In considering whether local action is necessary following the FPPC’s investigation, one must keep in mind that enforcement mechanisms are intentionally redundant. Just as federal and state prosecutors have authority to prosecute the same conduct, but rarely do, state and local enforcement mechanisms are intentionally redundant to ensure effective enforcement of the law. Specifically, in deciding the best course for pursuing an enforcement matter, three considerations arise. First, enforcement investigations are often undermined when multiple agencies investigate the same matter simultaneously. Decisions as to which witnesses to interview, when, and with what information, are strategic considerations that can be undermined when enforcement work is unnecessarily duplicative. Here, the FPPC may not have alerted local authorities based on a determination that a simultaneous local investigation would undermine its efforts. Second, enforcement agencies must consider whether the interests of various entities will be vindicated. Here, the FPPC may have determined that local interests would be vindicated by the substantial fines imposed and public attention paid to its ultimate findings and penalties. Third, where vigorous, thorough, and complete, state agency investigation may be preferable to local investigation in order to avoid conflict-of-interest concerns and/or the appearance of bias.', 'In light of the seriousness of the violations, members of the public have asked whether criminal investigation is appropriate. Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 11 provides that it is a misdemeanor offense for any person to contribute more than $340 to any candidate for office or to the controlled committee of any candidate in a local election. Misdemeanor offenses, however, are subject to a one-year statute-of-limitations; this statute-of-limitations had already passed with respect to the relevant conduct when the FPPC announced its investigation, findings, and stipulated judgments in August 2017. The Los Angeles County District Attorney’s Office would be responsible for investigating and pursuing any potential felony criminal activity. The City Attorney’s Office has confirmed that the Los Angeles District Attorney’s Office is aware of the FPPC’s investigation and findings. The FPPC has also stated publicly that it automatically refers any potential criminal conduct to appropriate authorities, including district attorneys’ offices. The relevant criminal enforcement authority is therefore aware of the conduct and capable of conducting further investigation, should such investigation be appropriate.', 'Questions have also arisen regarding whether the candidates who received the contributions described above were aware that the contributions had been made unlawfully in names other than those of the true contributor. The FPPC stipulations in this matter give no such indication. The FPPC had authority to investigate and find violations based on knowing receipt of unlawful contributions if any candidate was so aware. Specifically, California Government Code Section 84211 requires candidates and committees to accurately report contributions received. The FPPC has imposed penalties on candidates and committees for failure to accurately report contributions in other, similar enforcement matters.', 'Potential Enhancements to Enforcement Options', 'The FPPC investigation described above was a proactive, thorough investigation conducted by the FPPC independently, without notice to the City of Santa Monica. Nonetheless, in light of the investigation and violations, Council directed staff to present options for enhancing enforcement of the Santa Monica Elections Code. Staff offers the following options for Council’s consideration and direction.', '1. Enhance Collaboration with the FPPC for Enforcement of Local Election Laws', 'In recent years, the FPPC and various local government entities have taken steps to enhance collaboration in enforcement of election laws. The following options now exist for seeking further cooperation:', 'a. The City could seek state legislation expressly authorizing the FPPC to enforce provisions of the Santa Monica Elections Code. California Government Code Sections 83123.5, 83123.6, and 83123.7 now expressly authorize the FPPC to act as the civil prosecutor responsible for enforcing local campaign reform ordinances adopted by San Bernardino County, Stockton, and Sacramento. These provisions required enactment by the California Legislature and come into effect upon mutual agreement between the FPPC and the local government entity, pursuant to which agreement the local government entity typically reimburses all costs.', 'b. Council could authorize the City to support introduction of legislation amending the FPPC to allow any local entity to contract with the FPPC for enforcement of local law. Such legislation has been previously introduced in the Assembly and Senate but has not passed. No such bill is currently pending.', 'c. The Council could adopt a resolution authorizing the City Clerk and City Attorney formally to request that the FPPC communicate and coordinate with the Los Angeles County District Attorney’s Office and/or the Criminal Division of the City Attorney’s Office in sufficient time to allow for prosecution whenever an FPPC investigation involves potential criminal violations of the Santa Monica Elections Code as well as the PRA.', '2. Establish Reciprocity with a Local City Attorney’s Office to Ensure Effective Enforcement of Campaign Finance Laws', 'The Los Angeles County District Attorney’s Office has the resources, ability, and jurisdiction to prosecute criminal election violations, under state or local law. Concerns may be raised, however, about whether the District Attorney’s Office will be willing to prioritize misdemeanor violations of local elections law. To resolve this concern, Council could direct staff to explore reciprocity arrangements with one or more local prosecutors for misdemeanor prosecutions of local election law. Such an arrangement could be established, for example, with the City of Burbank, Long Beach, Los Angeles, Pasadena, or Torrance, providing a streamlined referral option should a situation arise where misdemeanor prosecution may be appropriate but investigation within the Santa Monica City Attorney’s Office may pose conflict-of-interest concerns or create the appearance of bias.', '3. Explore Creation of an Election Law Commission', 'Council could explore creation of an enforcement commission. Six charter cities (Berkeley, Los Angeles, Oakland, San Francisco, San Jose, and Simi Valley) have established local commissions with some authority to enforce local election laws. While intuitively appealing, such Commissions lack the training and experience of career prosecutors and require appointment by City officials, reducing the ability to remove any appearance of bias. In Berkeley, for example, each Councilmember appoints one member of the independent ethics commission. Staff would not recommend such an option based on the importance of upholding the reality as well as the perception of impartiality in administering election law.', 'Enhancements to Campaign Finance Law', 'Council directed the City Attorney’s Office to consider potential improvements to Santa Monica campaign finance law, including public financing of elections. Santa Monica has historically adopted strong campaign finance laws and practices, including local contribution limits, the posting of candidate and committee disclosure statements online, and public subsidization of election-material fees. Staff nonetheless presents the following options for consideration:', '1. Seek Public Comment on the Costs and Benefits of Public Campaign Financing', 'Public financing programs typically (a) replace private contributions with public grants, (b) use public funds to match private contributions made by small donors, or (c) offer discounted advertising rates or waived election-material fees for qualified candidates. The California Supreme Court has held that public financing programs in charter cities are lawful, but the impact of such programs has been limited by United States Supreme Court decisions holding that such programs can only be adopted on a voluntary basis, leaving open candidates’ option to fundraise using traditional methods from private sources. Based on this limitation and expense, contribution limits are the norm, while public financing programs are the exception.', 'Four of the ten largest cities in California – Long Beach, Los Angeles, Oakland, and San Francisco – have some form of a public financing grant or matching program in effect. In smaller cities, Richmond voters adopted a public matching program in 2012, and Berkeley voters did so in 2016. Governor Brown signed a law in 2016 that would have allowed public financing of state and general law city elections. The law has been invalidated, however, by a court as in conflict with Proposition 73, a 1988 ballot measure that barred public funding of state and general law city campaigns. Litigation is ongoing.', 'The key to effective public campaign financing programs utilizing grants or matching funds is to appropriately balance qualification thresholds, matching amounts, and expenditure limits such that multiple candidates opt-in and vigorous public debate over issues of public concern ensues. In Los Angeles, for example, City Council candidates must meet significant thresholds of voter signatures or contributions in order to participate; matching funds are available at a ratio of up to 4:1 in the general election; and matching funds are only available to candidates who agree to limit expenditures to $408,000. Candidates in Los Angeles often participate in the public financing program. By contrast, matching programs adopted by the voters in Long Beach and Oakland have been under-utilized and criticized as providing inadequate matching ratios (1:2 and 1:1, respectively, for general elections) to incentivize candidates to participate. In 2016, Berkeley adopted a public finance program with a 6:1 matching ratio. While options for funding include a special tax, most cities discussed use general fund resources to fund a special trust account in order to provide campaign matching funds.', 'Because public finance grant or matching programs must utilize a certain level of matching ratio to be potentially effective, the programs require substantial resources and community input is essential. Should Council wish to receive more information about public financing programs, staff recommends that Council direct staff to develop a plan for soliciting public input on anticipated costs and benefits of campaign finance programs.', 'Notably, Santa Monica already utilizes the third type of public campaign finance mentioned above, in that the City does not charge filing fees for voter-initiated petitions, including initiatives and charter amendments, nor does it charge a filing fee for candidates running for City office.In addition, the City pays for all candidate election costs related to the printing, translating, handling and mailing of the candidate statement which is included in the City’s voter information pamphlet that is mailed to each registered voter. Because the City of Santa Monicapaysfor all candidate statement costs, and has paid themsinceat least 1974, during every election all candidateshavechosento file a candidate statement,and to have it translatedinto Spanishand printed in the voter information pamphlet.', '2. Increasing or Eliminating Campaign Contribution Limits', "Staff has previously suggested increasing or eliminating campaign contribution limits. The majority of local jurisdictions in California do not have campaign contribution limits; and, as explained in previous reports, the courts invalidate limits that are so low as to interfere with a candidate's ability to communicate her or his views.In 2011, Council raised contribution limits to $325, with Consumer Price Indexing every five years on a simple basis. The contribution limit is currently $340. According to Common Cause, in 2016, the lowest city contribution limit was $100 (Davis, Del Mar, Galt, Poway, Scotts Valley), whereas the largest limit was $4,200 (Fresno). The average (median) contribution limit was $500.", '3. Community Education Regarding Election Laws', 'Finally, in connection with the news regarding the FPPC investigation, one member of the community has raised a concern about candidates in Santa Monica elections receiving unlawful in-kind contributions from supporters. Most nonmonetary contributions valued at $25 or more must be reported as campaign contributions. An FPPC information sheet regarding in-kind contributions is attached to this staff report. FPPC has made available the attached information sheet regarding contributions. (Attachment C)', 'The City Clerk currently invites neighborhood organizations and the general public to its FPPC Candidate/Treasurer Workshop, where state and local laws are addressed. This event will take place in August 2018. Council could direct the City Clerk to promote this event to the public more broadly and to display FPPC guidance materials more prominently on smvote.org.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Santa Monica Library Board for a term ending 06/30/2018.', 'Department': 'City Clerk 13-Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer, Mayor Pro Tem Davis, and Councilmember McKeown that Council direct staff to pursue decarbonization and protect public health and safety by exploring transition from open-flame technologies for heating and cooking into electrification, requiring new construction to use 100% renewable-sourced electricity.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': "City Manager's Report: Homeless Count Update", 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Award RFP for the Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study, Pier West End Retrofit and Pier Area 2 Upgrades at the Santa Monica Pier', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# SP2473 to Moffatt & Nichol, a California-based company, to provide structural engineering consulting and design services to develop a new Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study and prepare construction documents for the Pier West End Retrofit and Pier Area 2 Upgrades at the Santa Monica Pier; Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Moffatt & Nichol, in an amount not to exceed $328,000 (including a 10% contingency) over a two-year period.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The last Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study was completed in 2008 (Attachment A). The study evaluated the Santa Monica Pier structures and provided recommendations and cost estimates for upgrades over a 10-year period. A new assessment is required to reevaluate the present-day condition of the Pier’s structural components (above and below water) and to provide recommendations and cost estimates for future improvements. Staff recommends Moffatt & Nichol to provide engineering design services including the preparation of a new infrastructure assessment study, and the development of construction plans and documents. Staff also recommends that Moffatt & Nichol provide engineering support during the construction phases of the Municipal and Newcomb Pier upgrade projects recommended by the 2008 Study. The total contract award would be for an amount not to exceed $328,000 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Background', 'The Santa Monica Pier (Pier) is over 100 years old and is an iconic destination where community and educational events are programmed throughout the year. It is an internationally recognized destination that draws over 6 million visitors each year. Over the years, the Pier has been subjected to harsh environmental and user impacts due to its coastal location and heavy usage.', 'In an effort to plan for and address the maintenance requirements of the Pier, in 2008 the City completed a Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study (2008 Study) that: (1) focused on the evaluation of the existing condition of the Pier’s various structural components; (2) conducted upgrade studies for the various structural systems, which included accommodations for 15-ton (H-15) and 20-ton (H-20) truck loading that the Pier is currently incapable of handling and; (3) developed a maintenance program in conjunction with a proposed 10-year improvement plan (Attachment A). Many recommendations of the 2008 Study have been implemented, and numerous areas have been upgraded at the Pier.', 'Discussion', 'The Santa Monica Pier is composed of two separate structures, the Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier, as shown in Figure 1.', 'Municipal Pier', 'The Municipal Pier begins at the concrete approach of the Pier Bridge and extends approximately 1,480 feet west over the ocean. The Municipal Pier is the main thoroughfare for pedestrian and vehicular access to commercial and recreational destinations. While the Municipal Pier is decked entirely with timber boards fastened to timber stringers (similar to joists), three different structural substructures are currently in place. The term substructure refers to structural elements below the decking including piles, caps, beams, and stringers. The westernmost 440 feet is composed of concrete piles supporting a concrete waffle system. The easternmost 675 feet is entirely timber, and the middle 365 feet was upgraded in 2014 to concrete piles, concrete caps, and concrete tie-beams.', 'Newcomb Pier', 'The Newcomb Pier is approximately 1,050 feet long by 265 feet wide and supports the majority of the commercial tenants, including an amusement park, the historic carousel, and on-deck parking for passenger cars. The majority of this pier is also made of timber, except for a 350-foot by 135-foot section in the southwest corner that supports the amusement park rides. This section has a substructure consisting of concrete piles and beams with timber stringers and decking.', 'The sections with concrete substructures in both piers are relatively new compared with the timber sections and are generally in good condition. The condition of the timber sections varies from good in the recently upgraded portions to poor in some areas of the Newcomb Pier deck system.', 'Figure 1', 'New Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study (New Study)', 'The new Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study will provide inspection of elements both above and below the water’s surface, GIS database documentation, assessment of the existing condition of all structural elements including the decking, and recommendations for a new 10-year improvement plan based on the findings.', '2008 Study Upgrade Recommendations – Remaining Work', 'There are limited locations identified in the 2008 Study that still require upgrades to increase structural capacity, including: (1) the easterly portion of the Newcomb Pier referred to as Pier Area 2 (Fig. 2); and (2) the west end of the Municipal Pier referred to as West End (Fig. 2). These proposed upgrades would allow access for larger vehicles including, but not limited to, emergency and delivery vehicles. Part of the new study would reassess and/or revalidate the previous recommendations made in the 2008 Study, which may require new or additional recommendations for these areas. If deemed necessary, these recommendations would be vetted prior to proceeding with the upgrades.', 'Area 2 Upgrade (Newcomb Pier)', 'Recommended upgrades to the Newcomb Pier include improving the structure to an H-15 rating (15-ton vehicle). Current structural capacities in different portions of the Newcomb Pier range from 3 to 15 tons. A priority area for structural upgrade is Area 2, as shown in Figure 2. Area 2 is approximately 25,000 square feet. The limits of this area are bounded by approximately 70 feet of the Hippodrome to the east, edge of the parking lot to the west, the Hippodrome to the north and the edge of the parking lot to the south.', 'In this zone, 2-inch-thick wood decking is supported by 3-inch-thick by 12-inch-deep stringers that are spaced 22 inches apart. The current calculated capacity for this area is 3 tons. To upgrade this section to an H-15 rating (15-ton vehicle), the stringers must be removed and replaced with larger stringers spaced closer together.', 'Pier West End Upgrade (Municipal Pier)', 'The existing concrete waffle structure portion of the Municipal Pier at the west end is not capable of supporting a 20-ton vehicle, such as a fire engine. Strengthening the existing members is necessary to safely accommodate the additional loading requirements of a 20-ton vehicle. Moffat & Nichol would be tasked with developing alternatives for upgrading the waffle slab. The West End is approximately 10,400 square feet.', 'Figure 2', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The project is categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15301(c) and Section 15302 of the CEQA Guidelines. Section 15301(c) exempts Class 1 projects consisting of the "operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination." This exemption includes “existing highways and streets, sidewalks, gutters, bicycle and pedestrian trails, and similar facilities." Section 15302 exempts Class 2 projects consisting of the “replacement or reconstruction of existing structures and facilities.” The project\'s West End and Area 2 improvements at the Santa Monica Pier qualify as Class 1 and 2 projects exempt from CEQA. In addition, none of the exceptions specified in Section 15300.2 of CEQA Guidelines would apply that would preclude the use of this CEQA exemption: The project site is not located in a sensitive environment; the project would not have a significant effect on the environment; the project would not damage scenic resources; the project would not be located on a hazardous waste site; and the project would not cause a change to a historical resource including the Santa Monica Pier as all materials would be replaced with the same material type and would look exactly the same. Therefore, this project is categorically exempt from CEQA.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On September 28, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) forthe', 'design of the Pier West End Retrofit and Pier Area 2 Upgrades and structural engineering services for preparation of a new Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fifty-three vendors downloaded the RFP, and seven firms responded. The following firms submitted proposals:', '· AECOM', '· COWI North America, Inc.', '· Holmes Structures', '· Moffat & Nichol', '· Walker Consultants', '· Walter P. Moore', '· WJE Associates, Inc.', 'A selection committee consisting of staff from the Civil Engineering Division reviewed the proposals. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience, references, proposed project work plan and timelines, proposed project team, quality work products, creativity, demonstrated technical competence and understanding of the project scope, and value added services and cost. Based on these criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Moffat & Nichol as the best qualified firm to provide structural engineering design services in an amount not to exceed $328,000 (including a 10% contingency). Moffat & Nichol demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with similar projects in the cities of Seal Beach, Redondo Beach, Manhattan Beach, Newport Beach, Goleta, Los Angeles (San Pedro), Los Angeles (Wilmington), Malibu and Santa Monica. Moffat & Nichol also demonstrated through past projects their ability to offer experienced design teams that can complete high quality project designs and reports in an expeditious manner and at competitive hourly rates.', 'Next Steps', 'The anticipated timeline for the infrastructure assessment and design phase of the project is approximately 8-12 months. After completion of the design work, the project team would prepare the bidding documents, advertise the project on the City’s on-line bidding site, select a contractor, and return to the City Council for award of the construction contract.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to Moffat & Nichol is for an amount not to exceed $328,000. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:', 'Account No. Description FY 17-18', 'C309187.589000 Structural Engineering Inspection / Assessment $ 191,000', 'C309186.589000 Pier Substructure Retrofit – West End $ 74,000', 'C309185.589200 Pier Deck Upgrade – Area 2  $ 63,000', 'Total Funds Available $ 328,000']}
{'Title': 'Correct Contract Reference for Contract Modification with DNV-GL for Climate Action Plan', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council:1. Amend the authorization of November 28, 2017 Council action to authorize a First Modification of Agreement No. 10240 (CCS) with DNV-GL for additional services for the Climate Action & Adaptation Plan in the amount of $34,000 for a three-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $260,578 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Discussion', 'On January 26, 2016 (Attachment A), Council approved an agreement with DNV-GL, a Norway based company with offices in California, for an amount not to exceed $226,578 for professional services for the Climate Action & Adaptation Plan (“Original Agreement”). This Original Agreement was assigned contract number 10240 (CCS). In the staff report dated November 28, 2017 (Attachment B) requesting a first modification for additional services, staff inadvertently referred to the Original Agreement as contract number 3286. To correct this error, staff requests an amendment of the authorization of November 28, 2017 to authorize a First Modification of Agreement No. 10240 (CCS) instead of Agreement No. 3286.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to DNV-GL is $34,000, for an amended contract total not to exceed $260,578. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Public Works Department. The contract will be charged to account 014261.555060.99544. Future-year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': "Presentation of the City's Comprehensive Annual Financial Report", 'Department': 'Finance Department, Financial Operations', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council receive and file the City’s Comprehensive Annual Financial Report, the independent auditors’ unmodified report for the City’s financial statements for the fiscal year ended June 30, 2017, and the attached Auditors’ Letters to Council.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR; attachment A) communicates the City’s financial position and activity for the fiscal year ended June 30, 2017. Overall, the City’s operations show stability and steady growth, reflecting its prudent and sound management practices.', 'The Statement of Net Position, similar to a balance sheet, reports total assets and liabilities of the City. The total net position of the City for all activities was $1.6 billion.', 'The General Fund balance decreased by $40.8 million (to $346.3 million) over the prior year, primarily due to an additional payment of $35.6 million paid to CalPERS in June 2017, which represents the General Fund’s portion of the $45 million overall pay down of the City’s unfunded pension liability.', 'While, overall, the City’s financial position is strong, the largest concern is the growing liability for future pension obligations. The City’s various pension plans are approximately 72% funded with a combined unfunded long-term actuarial liability of approximately $461 million.', 'The independent auditors’ unmodified report communicates that the CAFR, and audited information within, fairly present the City’s financial position for the fiscal year ended June 30, 2017. This audit is performed in compliance with City Charter requirements. An attached submittal letter (attachment B) states that the City’s independent auditors encountered no difficulties and had no disagreements with management during the audit. An additional report on the City’s internal control over financial reporting and compliance (attachment C) notes no instances of non-compliance. The letters include corrected and uncorrected misstatements found during the audit and management has provided detailed responses.', 'The City of Santa Monica has received an unmodified audit report for more than three decades and has been awarded the Certificate of Achievement for Excellence in Financial Reporting by the Government Finance Officers’ Association of the United States and Canada (GFOA) for its CAFR for 33 consecutive years, since it began participating in the program. To make the CAFR more transparent, staff has provided an explanation for key financial performance indicators shown in the report.', 'The City’s external auditors, Lance, Soll & Lunghard (LSL) CPAs, presented the CAFR to the Audit Subcommittee on January 16, 2018. The presentation included details of the audit process and the financial reports, and provided an opportunity for Subcommittee members to ask questions of the auditors. The Audit Subcommittee approved the CAFR and recommended that it be presented to the full Council with a 5-0 vote.', 'Background', 'The CAFR communicates the City’s financial condition and activity in a transparent and organized manner and in compliance with accounting and financial reporting standards established by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board (GASB). The report presents historical and comparative information that can be useful to City staff, elected officials, and external users such as debt rating agencies, businesses, other public agencies, and the City’s residents. The most recent CAFR and over 10 years of prior year reports are available at the City’s libraries, the City’s Finance Department, and on the City’s Finance website at: https://finance.smgov.net/budgets-reports.', 'As required by the City Charter, financial statements are prepared by the City and audited by independent auditors. The City selects its independent auditor through a competitive procurement process in which Audit Subcommittee members take part as evaluators. The City’s current independent auditor, Lance, Soll & Lunghard (LSL) CPAs, is in their second year auditing the City.', 'The quality of the City’s financial reporting and the CAFR are measured in two ways: (1) an unmodified audit report by the independent auditors; and (2) the Certificate of Achievement for Excellence in Financial Reporting, awarded by the Government Finance Officers’ Association of the United States and Canada (GFOA). The attainment of the latter is the highest form of recognition in governmental accounting and financial reporting.', 'Auditors follow audit industry standards established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants (AICPA). These standards require auditors to provide an opinion on specific areas of the City’s financial statements based on observations, inquiries, testing of transactions, and analysis.', 'The City’s CAFR includes the following major sections and information:', 'Introductory Section', '· Letter of Transmittal – prepared by management and used to communicate information on areas that may have an impact on the City’s finances now and in the future. This includes economic factors as well as budget and management factors.', 'Financial Section (the main body of the CAFR for current year information)', '· Independent Auditors’ Report – the City’s report card on the content of the CAFR', '· Management’s Discussion and Analysis (MD&A) – provides an analytical overview of the City’s financial status and results for the year', '· Basic Financial Statements – reports finances at a point in time (assets - liabilities) and throughout the year (revenues - expenditures), and cash flows', 'o City-Wide Statements – overview of financial information including all of the City’s operations by financial activity', 'o Fund Financial Statements – a detailed look at funds, reporting the Balance Sheet and Statement of Revenues, Expenditures and Changes in Fund Balance', 'o Notes to the Financial Statements (Notes) – a narrative explanation that accompanies the Basic Financial Statements', 'Required Supplementary and Supplementary Information Sections', '· Pension Information – schedule of changes in the pension liability and related ratios; schedule of contributions by plan', '· OPEB Information – schedule of Other Post-Employment Benefits funding information', '· Budget to Actual Comparisons – for all governmental funds with a legally adopted budget', '· A breakout of individual funds – for funds that were presented in a cumulative manner in the Financial Section', 'Statistical Section (current and historical information – up to 10 years)', '· Financial Trends', '· Revenue Capacity Information', '· Debt Capacity Information', '· Demographic and Economic Information', '· Operating Information', 'Discussion', 'The attached CAFR for FY 2016-17 has received an unmodified opinion by LSL. An unmodified opinion communicates that the financial statements are fairly presented and that the information used in the report is reliable. In their written communications to Council, the auditors note that they encountered no significant difficulties with management in performing or completing the audit.', 'Statement on Auditing Standards (SAS) 114 establishes standards for the auditors’ communication with those charged with governance. SAS 115 provides guidance on communicating matters related to the City’s internal controls over financial reporting that have been identified in an audit of the financial statements. These statements require the auditors to consider and report on internal controls, significant audit findings, and other matters as prescribed in the standards as they relate to the audit of the financial statements. The letters that satisfy the SAS requirements are attached to this report.', 'At the request of the Audit Subcommittee, the external auditor conducted a conference call with Subcommittee Chair Sue Himmelrich and Subcommittee member Elizabeth VanDenburgh on January 10, 2018 to discuss the results of the audit without staff present. The CAFR was presented to the Audit Subcommittee of the Council on January 16, 2018 by LSL. Subcommittee members were given the opportunity to review the report and ask questions to the external auditor and staff. The topics discussed included the required communication and responsibilities of the external audit firm, the background of significant accounting estimates such as pensions and pollution remediation, internal control improvements as noted in the SAS 115 letter, and a new Accounting pronouncement implemented by GASB Statement 75 Accounting and Financial Reporting for Postemployment Benefits Other Than Pensions. The Audit Subcommittee received and filed the CAFR with a 5-0 vote.', 'The City of Santa Monica has received an unqualified/unmodified audit report and the GFOA Award for 33 years, since the City first participated in the GFOA program in FY 1983-84.', 'Overall, the City’s CAFR shows that City finances are stable. The following is an explanation of some key indicators reported in the CAFR.', 'General Fund Balance', 'The most notable measure of a City’s financial health is the General Fund balance. As presented in the Basic Financial Statements, the City’s General Fund assets exceeded liabilities by $346.3 million as of June 30, 2017. This balance is comprised of a number of categories, as follows:', '· $22.1 million nonspendable, restricted or committed resources that are required for specific purposes according to legal/contractual agreements or by ordinance or resolution of the City Council;', '· $256.1 million assigned funds set aside for specific purposes based on budget priorities (i.e., continuing and future capital projects; project financing equity, prior year encumbrances, and expenditure control budget); and', '· $68.1 million in unassigned funds as follows:', 'o $57.0 million rainy day contingency (15% of annual operating and revenue-supported capital expenditure budget);', 'o $9.7 million economic uncertainty reserve to mitigate potential revenue losses;', 'o Offset by a $1.6 million unrealized loss;', 'o $3.0 million other unassigned fund balance.', 'The strong fund balance and rainy day and economic uncertainty reserves play a key role in Santa Monica’s AAA general obligation bond rating from all three national rating agencies. In addition to being an indicator of very strong financial health, the high bond rating allows the City to pursue lower cost financing structures.', 'The General Fund balance decreased by $40.8 million over the prior year, primarily due to an additional payment of $35.6 million paid to CalPERS in June 2017, which represents the General Fund’s portion of the $45 million overall pay down of the City’s unfunded pension liability.', 'Citywide Net Position', 'The Statement of Net Position, similar to a balance sheet, reports total assets and liabilities of the City as of June 30, 2017. The total net position of the City for all activities was $1.6 billion. Net position is broken out into three categories: capital, restricted, and unrestricted.', 'Net Capital Position ($1,177.2 million)', 'Capital assets include land, buildings, improvements, intangibles, infrastructure and utility systems, and construction in progress. Intangible assets represent rights of use for items such as software and payments for Santa Monica’s cost of improvements to the City of Los Angeles sewage treatment system. Some notable capital projects that were underway as of June 30, 2017 are:', '· City Services Building', '· Fire Station 1', '· Fire Station 3', '· Fire Apparatus Replacement', '· Enterprise Resource Planning System', '· City Yards Modernization', '· Pier Bridge Electrical Upgrades', 'Restricted Net Position ($217.6 million)', 'These assets are subject to agreements with creditors, developers, grantors, or laws or regulations of other governments. Approximately 63% of this amount is restricted for affordable housing and committed to various projects, 18% is restricted per federal, state and other grant regulations, and the remaining amount is restricted for the Cemetery’s trust fund, debt service reserve, development agreement terms, and other grant and legislative constraints.', 'Unrestricted Net Position ($172.5 million)', 'This represents the balance of net position that is neither part of capital assets nor restricted. Healthy capital and operating reserves in the business-type activities support rate stabilization and recovery strategies for the City’s many activities.', 'Long Term Debt', 'The primary source of long term debt is in the form of bonds issued by the City. At the end of the current fiscal year, the City’s total long-term debt outstanding (excluding issuance premiums) was $77.4 million. Principal payments of $6.2 million were made on one general obligation bond for the Main Library construction, five General Fund revenue bonds for various parking structures and the Public Safety Facility, and one revenue bond to fund a proportionate share of capital improvements of the City of Los Angeles Hyperion wastewater treatment facility. On July 1, 2016, final payment was made on the Parking Authority Refunding 2002 Lease Revenue bonds. More information on long term debt can be found in Note 9, page 57 of the CAFR.', 'Pension Liability', 'Like all cities in the State CalPERS pension fund, Santa Monica faces significant long-term unfunded pension liabilities. GASB 68, implemented in FY 2014-15, was a pronouncement intended to provide greater transparency for pension accounting by requiring entities to report unfunded liability in the financial statements rather than in the footnotes. These GASB pronouncements do not affect either the amount of contributions a government makes to pension plans or the total net pension liability, which is still actuarially determined. Total net pension liability, or unfunded liability, is based on projected future benefit payments attributed to the current and past employees’ service, less the assets accumulated to pay those liabilities.', 'As shown on the Statement of Net Position, page 1 of the CAFR, the City has a net unfunded actuarial liability of approximately $461 million: the difference between a total pension liability of approximately $1.62 billion and plan assets of approximately $1.16 billion, making the City’s various pension plans approximately 72% funded. The unfunded liability amount increased from $387 million as shown in the prior year’s CAFR, to $461 million, primarily due to the actual returns on the investment portfolio being less than CalPERS’ projected returns. Since plan assets are based on market value, changes in investment values can have a drastic impact on the overall funding ratio of the plans, positively or negatively. The City’s annual payments include a portion to fund current benefits as well as an amount to pay down the unfunded liability. Annual actuarial valuations provide the City with the amount of the contribution that must be paid annually into the plan to ensure that the current unfunded liability is paid off over the following 30 years. In FY 2016-17, the portion of the actuarially determined employer contribution (ADEC) dedicated to paying down the unfunded liability was $26.7 million, or 53% of the total $50.2 million ADEC.', 'A detailed explanation of the Employee Benefits Programs including detailed pension information by plan is included in Note 16 (pages 76 through 87) and the Required Supplementary Information (pages 99 through 104).', 'State-mandated pension reform and Council-approved cost saving measures mitigate pension cost increases. Over the past three years, Police and Fire sworn employees have increased their contributions towards pensions to reach over 28% of the total pension cost, while Miscellaneous employees are contributing over 25% of the pension cost.  The passage of the Public Employee Pension Reform Act, or PEPRA, in September 2012 is working to further control cost increases in the future, as new employees entering PERS after January 1, 2013 are receiving reduced retirement benefits and cities are encouraged to further increase employees’ share of contribution costs. To date, approximately 32% of the City’s permanent workforce is receiving reduced pension benefits. The City will continue its Council-adopted policy to pay down at least an additional $1 million of the unfunded liability every year.', 'At the December 21, 2016 meeting, the CalPERS Board of Administration approved lowering the CalPERS discount rate assumptions, the long term rate of return from 7.5% to 7.0%. Due to timing, it did not affect the liability reported in this year’s CAFR, but will likely increase the liability in the CAFR beginning next year.', 'In June 2017, responding to the prospect of additional significant pension contribution rate increases beginning in FY 2018-19, Council approved a $45 million pay down of the City’s pension unfunded liability. Due to the requirements of GASB 68 reporting, the impact of this payment will not be reflected in the net pension liability until the FY 2017-18 CAFR. Based on updated estimate from CalPERS that take all these factors into consideration, the combination of the additional pay down and a better than anticipated experience level resulting from City employees retiring later is contributing to a 1/3 decrease in the projected growth of pension costs over the next 5 years that will help minimize the impact of the discount rate change.', 'Cash and Investments', 'The CAFR also includes detailed information on the City’s cash and investments. As of June 30, 2017, the City had $764 million in total cash and investments, all of which are in the form of investments authorized by the California Government Code and the City’s investment policy or in compliance with bond indenture agreements. More information on cash and investments is found in Note 5, page 37 of the CAFR.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action to receive and file this annual report.']}
{'Title': 'Award Bid for Bus Detailing Services for Big Blue Bus', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #4295 to Uniserve Facilities Inc., a California-based company, for bus detailing services for the Big Blue Bus;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Uniserve Facilities Inc., in an amount not to exceed $622,166 including a 10% contingency for five-year term with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends the award of Bid #4295 to Uniserve Facilities Services to provide detailing services to transit buses as required by Big Blue Bus. The detail service includes labor and materials to thoroughly clean and detail transit buses and service vehicles at specified prices. All cleaning materials would be environmentally friendly products that conform to all Federal, State, and local laws, rules, and regulations governing cleaning products. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $622,166 with a 10% contingency over a five-year term.', 'Background', 'Big Blue Bus (BBB) has used Uniserve Facilities Services (Uniserve) since 2012 to maintain its fleet of transit buses and service vehicle in a “like new condition,” with the exception of normal wear and tear. This provides a safe and pleasant environment for passengers and staff and is an important part of BBB’s maintenance standards and new customer experience model. On April 24, 2012, Council awarded a bid to Uniserve for an amount not to exceed $441,000 over a three-year period. This service was re-bid and awarded to Uniserve by Council on August 26, 2014, again for a three-year period, in an amount not to exceed $300,000. BBB’s latest contract expired June 30, 2017, requiring BBB to solicit bids for detail cleaning services for its fleet of transit buses and service vehicles. An interim purchase order was approved under the City Manager’s authority for services performed while the bidding process was ongoing.', 'Discussion', 'The City’s fleet of transit buses requires daily cleaning, fueling, and fluids inspection. In order to maintain our high standard of cleanliness for the exterior and interior of our buses, BBB has developed a program wherein each bus receives a detailed cleaning at least twice a year. This comprehensive program requires the cleaning of all interior surfaces including the steam cleaning of passenger seats, graffiti removal, cleaning and waxing of flooring, cleaning of all lighting fixtures, windows and a detail cleaning of the operator area. Transit Bus exterior cleaning includes, but is not limited to, a complete and thorough cleaning of the exterior body panels, windows, tires, and wheels. Additionally, the exterior of the transit buses and service vehicles receive an application of a polishing wax to maintain the paint color and to reduce paint oxidation and fading. Regular detailing minimizes the deterioration of upholstery, sidewalls, floors, and other interior and exterior bus panels.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014, staff was directed by Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” bus detailing and cleaning services were identified as meeting the criteria for contractual services under the categories of “Space Requirement”, and “Workforce Flexibility.”', 'Bid #4295 requires the vendor to provide all equipment and materials needed to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment. In addition to cost savings, the nature of bus detailing work needed requires a large employee pool that would work every morning.', 'Based on the recommendations of the January 13, 2015 Staff report, staff recommends that Council award bid $4295 to Uniserve for bus detailing services. The total expense for the five-year term is not to exceed $622,166.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On November 17, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide detailing services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. One thousand twenty-nine vendors (1,029) were notified and fourteen (14) vendors downloaded the bid. We received and publicly opened on December 12, 2017 proposals from Ultimate Maintenance Service and Uniserve Facilities Services.', 'Cost Estimate', 'Ultimate Maintenance Service', 'Uniserve Facilities Services', 'Estimate - 5-year Period', '$ 571,799', '$ 565,605', '10% Contingency', '$ 57,180', '$ 56,561', 'Contract 5yr Total', '$ 628,979', '$ 622,166', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product and compliance with City specifications. Uniserve has had a positive history of providing bus detailing services for Big Blue Bus, and is able to meet all of the City’s requirements in addition to being the lowest bidder. Based on these criteria, Uniserve Facilities Services is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Uniserve Facilities Services is for an amount not to exceed $622,166 including a 3% annual price increase and a 10% contingency. Funds of $106,534 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Big Blue Bus Department. The contract will be charged to account 41651.555011. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award Contracts for Seismic Retrofit Program Engineering Reviews', 'Department': 'Building & Safety (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Award RFP# 147 to the following four firms:a) Degenkolb Engineers, a California-based company for seismic structural evaluation report peer review services; b) IDS Group, a California-based company for seismic structural evaluation report peer review services; c) JAS Pacific, a California-based company for plan review services; andd) Interwest Consulting Group, a California-based company for plan review services.2) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute professional service agreements with:a) Degenkolb Engineers, in an amount not to exceed $525,000 (for three years, with one additional one-year renewal option in the amount of $100,000 on the same terms and conditions) for a total amount not to exceed $625,000 over a four-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval;b) IDS Group, in an amount not to exceed $525,000 (for three years, with one additional one-year renewal option in the amount of $100,000 on the same terms and conditions) for a total amount not to exceed $625,000 over a four-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; c) JAS Pacific, in an amount not to exceed $125,000 (for three years), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; andd) Interwest Consulting Group, in an amount not to exceed $125,000 (for three years), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval;', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In order to meet the demands of the City’s Seismic Retrofit program, the Building and Safety Division will need to hire engineering consultants with expertise in analyzing large, complex buildings. As part of the Seismic Retrofit Program, engineers and architects will submit structural evaluation reports regarding buildings on the City’s list of Potentially Seismically Vulnerable Buildings (PSVB) for the City’s review. Current Building and Safety staff do not have the experience necessary to quickly and accurately review structural evaluation reports for the largest, most complex buildings on the PSVB list. Similarly, staff do not have the experience necessary to perform Plan Checks of construction plans submitted for these types of large buildings. Consultant services may also be necessary to augment existing plan check staff if plan check volumes increase significantly due to retrofit submissions. As such, the Building and Safety Division is seeking to contract with consultants to assist with the tasks of structural report review and plan check review to ensure that 1) structural analyses are comprehensively reviewed by qualified individuals, and 2) the current level of plan check service to customers is not compromised. The full cost of these services would be recouped through seismic fees adopted in the FY2017-18 budget.', 'Background', 'Santa Monica’s Seismic Retrofit Program officially commenced on August 14, 2017, when the Building Officer first issued orders to building owners of 30 Concrete Tilt-Up buildings to seismically evaluate and, if necessary, retrofit their building(s). Orders will continue to go out in waves to the owners of various building types through August of this year.', 'The Building Officer’s order directs owners to perform a structural analysis of their building(s) by a licensed engineer or architect for the City’s review, pursuant to SMMC Section 8.58.030, to determine if the building meets the minimum earthquake standards specified in the City’s Seismic Retrofit laws. If not in compliance with the minimum earthquake standards, a structural retrofit of the building is required.', 'Fees to support the Seismic Retrofit program were established during the 2017 fee study.  Four new fees resulted from the study and were adopted by Resolution No. 11051 (CCS) during the June 27, 2017, budget adoption Council meeting (Attachment E). The intent of these fees is to make the Seismic Retrofit Program a full cost recovery program.', 'The four fees and their purpose are as follows:', '1) Seismic Retrofit Report Review – Covers cost of City staff time to review a structural report of a building subject to the Seismic Retrofit law.', '2) Seismic Retrofit Plan Check – Covers cost of City staff time, or outside consultant, to review a plan check submittal for a proposed retrofit of a building subject to Seismic Retrofit law.', '3) Seismic Retrofit Permit – Covers cost of retrofit permit issuance and subsequent City inspections associated with retrofit construction for a building subject to Seismic Retrofit ordinance.', '4) Seismic Retrofit Peer Review – Covers cost of peer review of a structural report by an outside agency for a building subject to the Seismic Retrofit law.', 'Discussion', 'The entire PSVB list encompasses just under 2,000 buildings. Non-Ductile Concrete (NDC) and Steel Moment Frame (SMF) buildings comprise roughly 140 of the overall total; however, they are the largest and most complex building types on the list. The submitted structural evaluation reports for these buildings must be reviewed by the City to determine whether or not the building in question needs to be retrofitted. There is not a sufficient amount of Building & Safety plan check staff with the technical expertise necessary to quickly and efficiently evaluate the very dense and highly technical reports for NDC and SMF building types. Therefore, outside consultant services are needed to perform these evaluations and make a recommendation to Building and Safety staff based on their review.', 'A similar situation will arise when NDC and SMF owners submit plans for a retrofit plan check review. The complexity of these building types demands a high level of structural expertise to thoroughly evaluate a plan submission. Additional consultant services will also be necessary to assist the City with the review of these plan checks.', 'The final round of Building Officer orders for the Seismic Retrofit Program is scheduled to be distributed to property owners on August 6, 2018. Property owners will have anywhere from two to twenty years (depending on the building type) from the date their order was issued to complete the retrofit of their building(s). It is anticipated that the increase in plan check submittals as a result of the retrofit plan submissions will necessitate additional reviewers to supplement the capacity that City plan check staff is able to accommodate without compromising a satisfactory level of service to the public. As such, consultant services will be required to perform plan check reviews and accommodate this additional plan check volume.', 'The 60 NDC and 78 SMF buildings on the PSVB list are required, pursuant to SMMC Chapters 8.76 and 8.80, to submit a structural evaluation report to the City within three years from the date of issuance of the Building Officer order (October 23, 2017). This assumes that approximately 140 structural reports will require review by consultants. Each report would be charged a $121.84 fee for staff processing when it is submitted, with an additional hourly review rate of $256.68 for the peer review by an engineer. Assuming that reports will take, on average, 35 hours to review (based on past experience), Building and Safety is requesting authority to award $1,250,000 to fund these reviews. All expenditures to consultants for these reviews would be recouped in-full through the established Seismic Retrofit fees. Staff recommends executing contracts with both Degenkolb Engineers and IDS Group to perform these structural evaluation report reviews. Having two firms available for this task gives the City flexibility in assigning the reviews and makes it possible to send reports to multiple firms if a high volume is received in a short period of time to ensure that turn-around times remain reasonable for customers.', 'Plan Check fees for seismic retrofit plan reviews would be charged in exactly the same way. Every submission will receive a $121.84 fee for intake, along with $256.84 per hour for review. NDC buildings have 10 years from October 23, 2017, to complete a retrofit, and SMF buildings have 20 years from the same date to complete construction. It is difficult to predict when these buildings will actually submit for plan check and initiate the construction phase of their retrofits, but staff does not anticipate many submissions in the first few years of the program. At this time, Building and Safety would like to request authority to award $250,000 to fund consultant plan check services to cover the review of these projects. This will allow any early plan checks submitted for NDC or SMF buildings to be reviewed, as well as provide funding to address any overflow of retrofit plan check submissions due to the Seismic Retrofit program. If a consistent increase in volume occurs, additional funding will be necessary to accommodate the increase and staff, as authorized by Council. Again, all expenditures for seismic retrofit plan checks to outside consultants would be entirely recouped through Seismic Retrofit Plan Check fees. Staff recommends executing contracts with both JAS Pacific and Interwest Consulting Group to perform the seismic retrofit plan check reviews for the same reasons stated above regarding structural evaluation report reviews.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In November 2017, the City published a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide both structural evaluation report peer review services and seismic retrofit plan check services to the Building and Safety Division in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. The City received 15 proposals. Proposals were evaluated and the respondents were ranked based on the criteria in SMMC Section 2.24.073 for selecting the best qualified person or firm. Firms had the option to submit only for structural evaluation report peer review, only retrofit plan check, or both. After considering the proposals, evaluators selected the top two firms for structural report review and the top two firms for plan check services based on overall qualifications.', 'The firms selected for structural report review are 1) Degenkolb Engineers and 2) IDS Group. The firms selected for plan check services are 1) JAS Pacific and 2) Interwest Consulting Group. All four companies specialize in the areas they were selected for and excel in at least three of the four major evaluation criteria: engineering experience, staff qualifications, record of success with past clients, and fee proposal.', 'Staff recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Degenkolb Engineers and IDS Group for structural report peer review services. Each agreement would be for an amount not to exceed $625,000 over a four year period. This would allow for any buildings needing extensions on their structural report submissions that may carry over beyond the three year deadline for submissions. Both companies would be assigned to peer review structural evaluation reports submitted to the Building and Safety Division as part of the Seismic Retrofit program. Staff also recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with JAS Pacific and Interwest Consulting Services for retrofit plan check services. Each agreement would be for an amount not to exceed $125,000 over a three year period. Both companies would be assigned to review seismic retrofit plans submitted to the Building and Safety Division for plan check review as part of the Seismic Retrofit Program', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreements to be awarded to Degenkolb Engineers, IDS Group, JAS Pacific, and Interwest Consulting Group are for an amount not to exceed $1,500,000. Funds of $408,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department. The agreements will be charged to account 01321.555060. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award RFP# 126 to Westnet, Inc. for a Fire Station Alerting System.', 'Department': 'Fire Department', 'Sponsors': 'Chief Information Officer Joseph Cevetello', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': '1. Award RFP# 126 to Westnet, Inc. a California-based company for a Fire Station Alerting System.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Contractual Services Agreement with Westnet, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $800,000 for the initial purchase and installation.3. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Maintenance Agreement with Westnet, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $350,000 for maintenance of the system over a 5-year period with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Fire Department utilizes a Fire Station Alerting System to alert firefighters to respond to emergencies and routine calls for service. The Fire Station Alerting System is the primary method by which firefighters are alerted to respond to emergencies and is a mission critical component of the overall dispatch process. Implemented in 2009, the existing system is no longer supported by the manufacturer and does not offer certain advanced features such as enhanced night-vision lighting, zone-based alerting and integration with fire station automation systems. Staff recommends Council approve purchase of a new Fire Station Alerting System from Westnet, Inc and a five-year maintenance agreement in an amount not to exceed $1,150,000.', 'Background', 'As part of the process to return dispatching services from the Los Angeles City Fire Department to Santa Monica in 2009, it was necessary to install a new Fire Station Alerting System to replace the system provided and utilized by the City of Los Angeles.', 'On October 13, 2009, Council authorized the purchase of the Zetron Fire Station Alerting System from Advanced Electronics, Inc.', 'The current system has been utilized since 2009. The system has experienced several substantial failures over the last six months necessitating the use of backup alerting procedures while efforts were made to repair the system by the Information Services Department. The current system is no longer supported by the manufacturer and replacement parts are difficult to obtain and in some cases, no longer available.', 'Discussion', 'The National Fire Protection Agency (NFPA) publishes standards for Fire Departments to utilize when implementing programs and systems, including technology. The proposed new Fire Station Alerting would be fully compliant with NFPA requirements for station alerting systems including support for at least two disparate methods for the system to communicate with each fire station, backup power requirements, and system monitoring and alarms in the event of a system outage.', 'In addition, modern Fire Station Alerting Systems address firefighter health and safety by utilizing enhanced night-vision lighting, zone-based alerting to ensure that only crews assigned to incidents are alerted to respond, and integration with various fire station automation systems such as apparatus bay doors and cooking equipment.', 'The proposed new Fire Station Alerting System would integrate with the Fire Department’s Computer Aided Dispatch (CAD) system to allow automated processing and transfer of information from CAD to the Fire Station Alerting System for immediate alerting to the fire stations.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On July 24, 2017, the City published a Request for Proposal to furnish and provide a Fire Station Alerting System in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 1,414 vendors were notified, 34 vendors downloaded the bid. Two proposals were received and publicly opened on August 25, 2017. One proposal received was non-responsive because the vendor did not fulfill the Prevailing Wage requirements as specified in the RFP. The remaining proposal was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Based on these criteria, Westnet, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Westnet, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $1,150,000. Funds of $800,000 for the installation are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019147.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Renewal of Downtown Property-Based Assessment District', 'Department': 'Housing and Economic Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Authorize the City Manager to cast its ballots on behalf of City-owned properties in support of continuing the Downtown Property-Based Assessment District for an additional 10-year term; and 2) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute the renewal of the Amended and Reinstated Services Agreement with Downtown Santa Monica Inc. for an additional 10-year term.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The establishment of the Downtown Property-Based Assessment District (PBAD) has played a significant role in the success of Santa Monica’s Downtown. DTSM, which derives part of its revenue from the PBAD, provides enhanced maintenance, security, marketing and management that significantly improves the attractiveness of Santa Monica’s historic Downtown as a place to live, work, shop, dine and visit. In 2008, a majority vote by Downtown property owners favored the formation of a PBAD for a 20-year term, subject to the property owners reaffirming the value and utility of the district with a 10-year affirmative vote. Council is asked to authorize the City Manager to vote the City’s ballots for City-owned properties in favor of continuing the Downtown PBAD for an additional 10-year period. Staff also recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Fourth Amendment to Amended and Restated Services Agreement No. 9063 (CCS) with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) to renew the agreement for an additional 10-year term and modify any other related terms and conditions. Total City assessments are budgeted to be approximately $406,070 annually with increases of up to five percent per year.', 'Background', 'On March 25, 2008, Council approved a Downtown Management Plan (Management Plan) which was the basis for an assessment engineer’s report (Engineer’s Report) setting forth the mechanism for assessing property owners to raise funds (AttachmentA). OnJuly24,2008, after a majority vote in favor of the proposed assessment, Council adopted Resolution 10336 (CCS), which established the Downtown Property-Based Assessment District (PBAD) and authorized the levy and placement of assessments on property tax rolls for properties within the district (Attachment B). Assessment funds are used to provide enhanced services and activities within the PBAD, such as maintenance and ambassadors, which are in addition to the baseline services provided by the City. The authorizing documents approved by Council outline the district boundaries, services, budget, cost, formation, and duration. A 20-year district term was established subject to a 10-year majority vote by the property owners affirming the continuation of existing services.', 'The City entered into a services agreement (Services Agreement) with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) to define roles and responsibilities between the City and DTSM, and to delineate the collection and disbursement of assessment fees generated from the Downtown PBAD. The Services Agreement provides that the 10-year initial term of the agreement may be renewed for an additional 10-year period upon a majority vote in favor of extending the Downtown PBAD and Council approval.', 'The Downtown PBAD generally encompasses the core of the downtown area bounded roughly by Ocean Avenue to the west, 7th Street to the east, the Santa Monica Freeway to the south, and Wilshire Boulevard to the north. Properties within the boundaries are assessed based on the lot or building square footage (whichever is greater), the property’s location within one of four benefit zones, and the type of use/ownership (commercial, residential, governmental, and non-profit). The Downtown PBAD as originally established in 2008 was comprised of three benefit zones. In 2015, a fourth benefit zone was established through the Colorado Avenue Overlay Zone, which runs until 2028, coinciding with the end of the Downtown PBAD term. The Downtown PBAD is separate from the Lincoln Boulevard Property-Based Assessment District (Lincoln PBAD), which was also formed in 2015 and also runs until 2028.', 'DTSM, a 501(c) (3) non-profit organization, is under contract with the City to administer the assessment funds and manage a variety of programs, services, and operations to support economic stability and community life in Santa Monica’s Downtown. DTSM provides hospitality and maintenance services, programs a year-round calendar of community events including a popular seasonal ice rink, and promotes Downtown as a vibrant shopping, dining, and entertainment destination. DTSM is governed by a 13-member Board of Directors with six members appointed by the City Council, six elected by property owners, and one appointed by the City Manager.', 'Since formation of the Downtown PBAD, DTSM has funded programs that have improved the area and attracted residents, businesses, and visitors alike. Notable services include a maintenance program, which provides staffing 24 hours per day, 7days per week, a hospitality ambassador program, and enhanced marketing efforts and special events that help to promote the district. Attachment C produced by DTSM provides an overview of data demonstrating the measurable impacts of their operations, which have benefited Downtown and Santa Monica generally.', 'Discussion', 'Downtown property owners are being asked to consider only the continuation of district services under the existing Management Plan and Engineer’s Report. An assessment ballot initiative managed by the City is not required since there are no modifications to the district’s boundaries, assessment rate structure, governance, or other terms. Thepurpose of the 10-year vote is for the district’s property owners to affirm the services and assessments to be provided for the second 10-year term.', 'DTSM is administratively conducting the affirmative vote and is responsible for distributing and collecting the ballots, with the DTSM Board of Directors responsible for certifying the results. DTSM has retained Kristen Lowell Inc. (KLI), who was the consulting engineer on the Downtown PBAD’s formation, to advise on conducting the vote and to provide independent verification in tabulating the ballots and presenting the official results. Under KLI’s guidance, DTSM will follow the same internal balloting process used to elect property owner representatives to their board.', 'On February 15, 2018, DTSM mailed ballots and informational materials to property owners within the Downtown PBAD boundaries. Ballots are due on March 20, 2018, and the results will be tabulated by KLI and presented to DTSM’s Board of Directors at its March 22, 2018 meeting. In conjunction with the vote, DTSM proactively outreached to property owners and is holding office hours when ballots can be returned or concerns can be addressed directly. Property owners receive one vote for each assessment dollar paid, with ballots weighted in accordance with FY 2017-18 assessments. For the district to continue, the majority of ballots returned, as weighted by assessments, must be in favor of continuing the Downtown PBAD for another 10 years.', 'City’s Ballots', 'Council is asked to authorize the City Manager to cast ballots on behalf of several City-owned properties located within the boundaries of the Downtown PBAD. There are 31 City-owned parcels within the district that represent approximately 9.35 percent of the assessment vote. City properties mainly include the public parking structures and surface lots, the 4th/5th Street and Arizona Avenue site, the Santa Monica Main Library, and property adjacent to the Expo terminus station, as well as other properties listed on Attachment D.', 'Next Steps', 'If the Downtown PBAD property owners affirm the district’s 10-year extension, staff recommends Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Fourth Modification to the Services Agreement with DTSM to renew the term for an additional 10 years and modify any other required terms and conditions. However, if the majority of votes do not support the Downtown PBAD continuation, then programs such as enhanced maintenance and ambassador services would not be able to continue after May 2019 with the termination of the assessment funding and the end of the Services Agreement term.', 'Any subsequent renewal of the district would require a new management plan, engineer’s report, and ballot process, as would any new or increased assessments that are not consistent with the provisions of the adopted Management Plan. The duration of the Downtown PBAD 20-year term limit coincides with the expiration of the Colorado Overlay and the Lincoln PBAD in 2028. At that time, the City and DTSM could initiate proceedings to form a new PBAD that combines the Downtown PBAD and the Lincoln PBAD into a single assessment district that would serve Santa Monica’s Downtown.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'Should the Downtown property owners vote in favor of continuing the Downtown PBAD, the City would continue to pay property assessments for City-owned properties for an additional 10 years. In FY 2017-18, DTSM received $4,343,973 in property assessments within the Downtown PBAD. Of that, assessments for City-owned properties totaled approximately $406,070, which represents 9.35 percent of Downtown PBAD assessment funds. City assessments are funded from Housing and Economic Development Account 01274.577840 - Assessments for City-owned Property. To keep pace with the consumer price index and program costs, annual assessments may be increased up to five percent, subject to annual review and approval by DTSM’s Board of Directors. Additionally, the City’s annual assessment expenditures may vary depending on property acquisition and disposition over the next 10 years.']}
{'Title': 'Resolution Regarding Offshore Oil Drilling, Exploration and Fracking', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached resolution reaffirming the City’s position against offshore oil and gas drilling, seismic oil exploration, oil and gas leasing, hydraulic fracturing (fracking) and other well stimulation in federal and state waters off the Pacific coast.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In response to a U.S. Department of the Interior proposal to open U.S. offshore coastal waters, including the waters off California, to oil and gas exploration, Council directed staff to draft a resolution opposing this proposal at its February 27 meeting. Staff recommends Council adopt the attached resolution, which reaffirms the City’s past policy actions opposing fracking and oil drilling, and calls for a ban on new offshore oil and gas drilling, seismic oil exploration, fracking, and other well stimulation in federal and state waters off the Pacific coast and opposes new federal oil and gas leasing in all U.S. waters. The City’s lobbyist will advance the City’s position in Washington, D.C. as necessary and appropriate based on Council’s policy direction.', 'Background', 'Council has adopted similar resolutions in recent years. On November 12, 2012, Council adopted a resolution in support of a moratorium on fracking in California. On December 9, 2014, Council adopted a resolution opposing oil drilling in Hermosa Beach which could negatively impact Santa Monica Bay. In its 2016 State of California Legislative Platform, Council noted its support for State bonds, funding and legislation aimed at both reducing existing, and banning new oil and gas extraction.', 'Offshore oil drilling and production have been shown to put environmental and public health at risk from oil spills, increased air and water pollution, intense ocean noise and other potential damage. These environmental and public health impacts can also negatively affect local and regional economies in coastal areas. The 1969 Santa Barbara oil spill, which to date is the third largest oil spill in U.S. waters, impacted over 40 miles of coastline from Goleta to Ventura, and resulted in the death of over 3,600 sea birds and hundreds of marine mammals including dolphins, elephant seals and sea lions. The economic impacts from the oil spill to Santa Barbara County were severe, as all commercial fishing was suspended in the affected area, and tourism to the County suffered a precipitous drop. More recently, in 2015 a pipeline servicing offshore oil platforms off Santa Barbara County burst and impacted the same area of coast, killing more wildlife and negatively impacting recreational and commercial activities in the Santa Barbara area.', 'Hydraulic fracturing (commonly known as “fracking”) is a technique that is used to increase oil and gas production by injecting water and chemicals at high pressures into the ground to create fractures in subsurface rock to release petroleum or natural gas for extraction. Negative impacts related to fracking include impacts to air quality, generation of polluted wastewater and excessive water use required by the fracking process.', 'Discussion', 'In January, the U.S. Department of the Interior Bureau of Ocean Energy Management released a Draft Proposed Plan (DPP) for the 2019-2024 Offshore Oil and Gas Leasing Program, which would make 90 percent of the U.S. offshore continental shelf, including coastal waters off of the coast of Southern California, open to oil and gas exploration. The DPP includes 47 potential offshore lease sales including six new lease sales off the California coast. There have been no new lease sales in the Pacific region (which includes all of the coastal waters off of California, Oregon and Washington) since 1984. The comment period for the DPP is open through March 9, 2018.', 'The attached resolution reaffirms the City’s position against offshore oil drilling and fracking. Specifically, the resolution calls for a ban on new offshore oil and gas drilling, seismic oil exploration, fracking, and other well stimulation in federal and state waters off the Pacific coast and opposes new federal oil and gas leasing in all U.S. waters.', 'To date the Governors of California, Oregon and Washington as well as 33 California cities and counties, including the City and County of San Francisco, Santa Barbara County, Ventura County, and the cities of Santa Barbara, Goleta, Malibu, Manhattan Beach, and Los Angeles have formally opposed the DPP proposal for new federal offshore oil and gas leases in the Pacific Ocean, and many have also called for a ban in offshore hydraulic fracturing or “fracking.”', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Downtown Parking Management Pricing Strategies Study Session', 'Department': 'Parking Operations (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '04. Study Sessions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Direct staff to draft an ordinance modifying the Santa Monica Municipal Code (“SMMC”) Section 3.16 related to on-street parking management and Section 3.04 related to the establishment of off-street public parking fees; 2. Review and provide direction to staff on the proposed parking management strategies consistent with the policies in the Land Use and Circulation Element (“LUCE”) to further manage congestion, improve public parking services, address downtown residents’ parking desires, and encourage shifts toward more sustainable modes of transportation; 3. Direct staff to report annually on the State of Citywide Parking, including a financial and operational analysis as well as recommendations for future year parking rate adjustments.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Parking policy and parking facilities have been integral to the evolution of Santa Monica, particularly our vibrant Downtown and three miles of beachfront. The City owns and/or operates 43 parking facilities with approximately 14,000 available public parking spaces. These parking facilities help support the diverse local economy by providing convenient access to housing, retail centers, hotels and restaurants, employment, a public beach and community parks, education and recreation centers, special events, and municipal services and social service agencies alike.', 'Both policy and the market for parking are changing, however. There is increasing recognition of the high economic and environmental cost of subsidized parking, and growing recognition that in a region where there are seven parking spaces for every car that greater attention must be paid to the efficient utilization of parking.', 'Council adopted policies outlined in the Land Use and Circulation Element (“LUCE”) and Downtown Community Plan (“DCP”) suggest that parking pricing is one of the most effective strategies to reduce traffic congestion, encourage the shift towards alternative modes of transportation, and facilitate a more efficient use of existing parking supply. Based on a comprehensive analysis of the aggregated parking transaction and occupancy data, staff seeks Council direction on employing a demand-responsive parking pricing strategy in the Downtown core and peripheral parking facilities to proactively manage the various weekday and weekend demands, including traffic, congestion and circulation challenges. These policy shifts are part of the City’s larger focus on the Strategic Goal of creating a new model of mobility, one that Council reaffirmed during its wide-ranging February 27, 2018 study session, emphasizing the importance of aligning our policies and investments to support a more livable community. In addition, these concepts reflect changing mobility patterns as alternate travel modes including ride share companies, bike share, electric scooters, and the advent of autonomous vehicles reshape how people travel, with the apparent net impact of reducing and/or redistributing locational parking demand.', 'Staff believes that creating a weekday versus weekend pricing structure throughout the Downtown and peripheral facilities would better align pricing with demand to ensure that there is at least 15% availability at all times in all facilities, and allow the City to maintain sufficient ongoing revenues to fund parking, traffic and circulation programs, and other essential public services. Staff recommends that Council review and provide comment on the proposed parking management strategy options, and direct staff to return to Council in the future with the necessary resolutions to adopt revised transient parking rates and permit fees.', 'Additionally, staff recommends that Council direct staff to draft an ordinance for first reading modifying the SMMC Section 3.16.170 and Section 3.04.035 to streamline the process and modernize the municipal code to reflect the current practice of setting on-street and off-street parking rates based on the policies and goals outlined in the LUCE and DCP.', 'Over the previous five months, Staff conducted study sessions with various stakeholders throughout the City to ensure that the needs of the communities represented by the respective stakeholders were considered in the overall proposed parking management strategies. Feedback from each body is incorporated in the strategies outlined in the Discussion Section of the staff report.', 'Background', 'On May 11, 2010, Council adopted a resolution establishing new parking rates for off-street parking as a first phase in implementing the 2009 Walker Parking Study recommendations. The Walker Parking Study found that there was an imbalance in pricing between the different parking facilities within Downtown resulting in the unintended consequence of putting visitors, employees, and transient and monthly parkers in competition for the most convenient and often least expensive spaces while other spaces in the City remained unoccupied. Walker Parking consultants provided recommendations consistent with the LUCE to better manage parking demand and maximize efficiency of the public parking supply in Downtown Santa Monica. The Walker Parking Study recommended that the City:', '· Increase on-street and off-street public parking rates in the Downtown to more efficiently and effectively utilize existing public and private parking resources to meet parking needs, thereby creating greater availability of parking for visitors in the Downtown', '· Use increased parking revenues to enhance parking operations, parking technology, wayfinding, parking occupancy assessments, and capital repairs and replacements', '· Review parking occupancies regularly and adjust parking rates to encourage optimal use of public parking resources', 'On July 10, 2012, Council adopted a resolution establishing new parking fees at citywide on-street parking meters, off-street parking facilities, and beach parking lots, including a reduction in the Downtown grace period from two hours to 90 minutes. These changes were informed by a parking rate study conducted by Walker Parking Consultants in 2012, consistent with the LUCE and the 2009 Walker Parking Study with the continued goal of:', '· Managing parking demand to ensure availability in all locations and better use of underutilized parking resources', '· Identifying the relationship between the pricing of public parking, private parking, adjacent land uses and parking demand', '· Reviewing parking occupancies and adjust parking rates to encourage optimal use of public parking resources', '· Developing an objective, technical and transparent process by which to set public parking rates', 'On May 10, 2016, Council adopted a resolution establishing revised parking rates for the Civic Center and Downtown parking facilities to address increased high weekday occupancies and discourage potential “park and ride” activity due to the arrival of the Expo Light Rail. Staff anticipated that the rate increase would result in an additional $4.2 million in ongoing revenues beginning in FY 2016-17 based on utilization rates at that time and some attrition in transient transactions because of the higher rates. Staff monitored parking occupancies over the course of the first year of Expo Light Rail service. Attachment A includes a detailed year over year analysis of transactions, utilization, parking duration and peak occupancies for each parking facility.', 'Discussion', 'Parking policy is ultimately driven by the City’s larger policy goals, including supporting the Mobility Strategic Goal and contributing to the City’s Framework of Economic Opportunity and fiscal sustainability. This report seeks direction for staff to undertake a transition in parking policy that involves a range of interrelated changes. Accordingly, this report breaks down the concepts via the following sections:', '1. Analysis of Parking Occupancies, Transactions, and Durations', '2. Proposed Downtown and Peripheral Parking Facility Pricing Strategies', '3. Other Items for Council Consideration', '4. Alternative Pricing Strategies for Future Consideration', '5. Annual State of the Citywide Parking Report', '6. Public Outreach and Communication with Boards and Commissions', 'Section 1 – Analysis of Parking Occupancies, Transactions, and Durations (Sessions)', 'In FY 2015-16, there were 7.6 million total (transient and permit) parking transactions in the Downtown core and peripheral facilities discussed in this staff report. In FY 2016-17, there were 7.1 million total parking transactions, resulting in a 0.5 million, or 7%, reduction when compared to the prior year. The data included in Attachment A shows that the parking rate increase in FY 2016-17, in conjunction with increased popularity of Transportation Network Companies (“TNC”) and the increased demand in Expo Light Rail ridership (Attachment B) had a direct impact on parking behavior in the City, particularly successful in achieving the following goals:', '· Reducing total parking sessions in these Downtown core facilities', '· Discouraging park and ride activity in the Downtown core facilities', '· Reducing high weekday peak occupancies in most of the Downtown parking facilities', '· Freeing up parking for short-term parking for residents and Downtown visitors', '· Encouraging parkers to utilize less expensive parking facilities on the periphery of the Downtown core, or consider shifting to alternative modes of transportation', 'The reduction in total parking transactions continued into the first half of FY 2017-18. In light of this, on February 13, 2018, staff included a $3.9 million, or 7%, reduction in projected General Fund parking revenues as part of the Midyear Financial Status Update to Council. The midyear budget adjustment corrects the previous ongoing revenue projection related to the FY 2016-17 parking rate increase and accounts for the current shift in how staff believes people travel into the Downtown, including the following:', '· Expo Light Rail ridership realized a significant increase when it began six-minute headway service in March 2017. The City’s Traffic Management Division also implemented a signal priority protocol for Expo trains around this time, giving the rail “the green light” versus surrounding traffic. Expo now has a significant time and frequency advantage it did not have prior to March 2017. Additional information related to Expo Light Rail Ridership Statistics are included in Attachment B.', '· The Police Department worked out “geo-fenced” customer pick up solutions with Lyft and with Uber. As such, these TNC operators have streamlined their operations making them even more attractive for use in our downtown, and along Main Street. The significance is that TNC customers are able to get greater access to downtown and Main Street venues than ever before. This provides a competitive time and money advantage over the pricing and location of our parking structures and lots.', '· The nature of downtown shopping is changing significantly. As mentioned in the Midyear Financial Status Update, many customers are switching from visiting brick and mortar stores and making bulk purchases to on-line shopping.', 'While there were also slight decreases in the average peak occupancy for weekdays and weekends in some of the Downtown and peripheral facilities during the first half of FY 2017-18, other parking facilities either maintained existing peak occupancies or realized increases primarily due to their proximity and accessibility to the Downtown.', 'Section 2 – Proposed Downtown and Peripheral Parking Facility Pricing Strategies', 'The LUCE and the DCP include specific language about how to better manage the parking resource and achieve greater mode shift to other more sustainable transportation options. The LUCE suggests managing parking in Santa Monica as a limited resource, ensuring that adequate parking is available for residents, employees, and visitors by establishing an availability target of at least 15% of spaces in every lot and garage at all times. It also suggests that the City should adjust parking prices and the hours of enforcement to meet this target, varying by time of day, season, and location. Moreover, the LUCE recognizes that parking provides a substantial positive revenue stream to the City that should continue well into the future. The DCP echoes many of the core parking management principles of the LUCE, including maximizing the use of the Citywide parking inventory of available spaces and actively reviewing parking data to address occupancy, traffic, access and circulation challenges. The DCP goes a step further and recommends an integration of public and private spaces into a shared network with real-time information to further inform policy decisions.', 'Setting sensible parking pricing is one of the most effective strategies to manage demand, ensure parking availability at all times, maximize the use of underutilized facilities, reduce traffic congestion, and encourage the use of more sustainable modes of transportation. Staff included three strategy options for Council consideration, review, and discussion. Based on the Council adopted policies mentioned above, staff seeks Council direction on the concept of implementing a demand-responsive parking pricing strategy that sets different rate structures on weekdays and weekends based on their different demand patterns.', 'The proposed pricing adjustments included in this staff report would continue the multipronged strategy of:', '· Balancing the needs of the community, including residents, businesses, employees, and visitors alike, with a focus on establishing a new rate structure that welcomes and favors residents as our priority users into the Downtown area,', '· Facilitating desired turnover and incentivizing longer term parking sessions outside of the Downtown core,', '· Encouraging the mode shift towards sustainable transportation options, and', '· Maintaining sufficient revenues to reinvest in traffic, parking, and other essential public services programs.', 'To achieve the aforementioned objectives, staff asks that Council consider and provide feedback on the following range of choices included in Options A, B, and C:', '1. Extend the pilot Downtown employee discount validation parking program for one additional year, through June 30, 2019', '2. Use shorter pricing periods, ensuring minimal impact on short-term parking sessions and progressively increasing the incremental parking rates for successive time periods. This is designed to encourage long-term parking sessions in the less expensive parking facilities outside of the Downtown core, or to encourage consideration of mode shift', '3. Set monthly parking permit fees to 11 times the transient weekday daily maximum rate, limiting monthly permit parking holders’ access to one or two facilities', '4. Reduce the free “grace period” in the Downtown core facilities, Parking Structures 1-8 and Ken Edwards Center, from 90 minutes to 60 minutes', '5. Reduce the free “grace period” in Parking Structure 9, a non-Downtown core facility located north of Wilshire Blvd., from 90 minutes to 30 minutes', 'Option A', 'Downtown Core Parking Structures 1 and 3 – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'Parking Structures 1 and 3 are both located on 4th Street between Wilshire Blvd. and Santa Monica Blvd. with a combined inventory of 674 total parking spaces. Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for Parking Structures 1 and 3 for weekdays and weekends:', 'Facility', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'PS 1', '91%', '85%', '82%', '99%', '96%', '88%', 'PS 3', '100%', '99%', '95%', '100%', '100%', '95%', 'Both facilities regularly reach weekday and weekend peak occupancies between 11 a.m. and noon, maintain peak occupancies through 8 p.m., and do not begin to significantly taper off until after 9 p.m. Staff believes that the excessively high weekday and weekend peak occupancies are due to the limited capacities and proximity of these two facilities to the Third Street Promenade and surrounding businesses. Additionally, these are the first two parking facilities introduced to travelers along the Wilshire corridor when headed south on 4th street.', 'Historical City pricing strategies suggest these facilities be priced similarly to the other facilities within the Downtown core to avoid customer confusion and reduce circulation and congestion problems related to simply shifting travel from one location to another. However, based on the data and price sensitivity, staff seeks Council direction on setting parking rates for these facilities slightly higher than the rest of the parking portfolio to respond to the specific demand in these facilities with a goal of ensuring at least 15% availability at all times. Staff anticipates that this pricing strategy will shift parkers to other less expensive facilities within the Downtown core or periphery, thereby facilitating a more efficient use of the overall Downtown parking availability.', 'Downtown Core Parking Structures 2, and 4 through 8 – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'Parking Structures 2, and 4 through 8 are located within the Downtown core between Wilshire to the north, Colorado to the south, 4th Street to the east, and 2nd Street to the west. Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for the aforementioned facilities:', 'Location', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'PS 2', '73%', '62%', '58%', '69%', '56%', '48%', 'PS 4', '83%', '76%', '71%', '81%', '73%', '71%', 'PS 5', '70%', '61%', '62%', '70%', '70%', '67%', 'PS 6', '79%', '70%', '76%', '84%', '77%', '77%', 'PS 7', '70%', '68%', '62%', '84%', '82%', '75%', 'PS 8', '50%', '55%', '56%', '76%', '77%', '80%', 'Most of these Downtown parking facilities regularly reached weekday peak occupancies around noon and maintained peak occupancy through 8 p.m. before sharply tapering off after 8 p.m. On the weekends, most of these facilities regularly reached peak occupancies by noon and maintain peak occupancy to as late as 9 p.m. before sharply tapering off in the late night.', 'Staff believes that setting the parking rates for these facilities slightly lower than the proposed rates for Parking Structures 1 and 3 will:', '· Account for anticipated increase in parkers shifting from parking in Parking Structures 1 and 3 due to the rate differential', '· Improve traffic circulation within the Downtown core', '· Take a proactive approach in better managing congestion while ensuring 15% availability within all of the Downtown core facilities at all times', 'Ken Edwards Center Parking Structure – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'The Ken Edwards Center Public Parking Structure is located on 4th Street between Broadway and Colorado Avenue with 98 available parking spaces. These parking spaces are available to all on a first come first served basis. Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for this facility:', 'Location', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'KEC', '79%', '78%', '76%', '15%', '15%', '17%', 'The Ken Edwards Center Parking Facility regularly reached weekday peak occupancy around 11 a.m., slowly tapering off through 3 p.m., and then experienced a sharp decline after 4 p.m. Staff believes that this is due to the various programs offered at the Ken Edwards Community Center during the week. Parking in this facility is subsidized by the General Fund through free parking validations provided to Ken Edwards Community Center program users. On the weekends, the facility is significantly underutilized, reaching peak occupancy around 17% at noon, and gradually emptying throughout the afternoon. Staff believes that the low weekend usage is due to limited weekend programs offered at the Ken Edwards Community Center as well as a lack of permanent signage indicating this is a public parking facility. Staff recently installed temporary signage on the weekends to direct traffic into the facility to temporarily address this issue. As a result, there has been a slight uptick in transactions and occupancy in this facility.', 'Based on the occupancy and transaction data, staff recommends increasing the weekday daily maximum rate from $17.50 to $20.00, and reducing the weekend daily maximum rate from $17.50 to $10.00. Staff believes that the proposed rate structure aligns with the demand for this facility, ensuring that there will not be any weekday parking spillover from other Downtown core parking facilities due to price differential. Staff anticipates that the proposed weekday rate would ensure 15% availability at all times for Ken Edwards Center program users. The proposed reduction in the weekend rate is to maximize the use of this underutilized facility on the weekend.', 'Downtown Peripheral Parking Structures 9 and 10 – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'Parking Structure 9 is located outside of the Downtown core on 4th Street just north of Wilshire Blvd. and shares an alley on Third Court with Parking Structure 10, for a combined inventory of 381 total spaces between the two facilities. Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for these two facilities:', 'Location', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'PS 9', '81%', '64%', '69%', '66%', '60%', '56%', 'PS 10', '55%', '48%', '44%', '80%', '70%', '62%', 'Staff believes that pricing these two facilities similarly will help balance the demand between them and reduce on-street traffic in the Downtown core as part of the overall peripheral parking pricing strategy. Staff anticipates that the proposed rate structure will ensure at least 15% availability as these are the two most northern parking facilities in the entire portfolio and are likely to attract new parkers shifting from Parking Structures 1 and 3, and parkers shifting from the Downtown core due to the rate differential and easier accessibility from Wilshire Blvd.', 'Downtown Peripheral Parking - Civic Center Lot and Structure – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for the two facilities:', 'Location', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'Civic Lot', '70%', '50%', '43%', '43%', '34%', '28%', 'Civic Structure', '84%', '60%', '54%', '60%', '43%', '37%', 'The proposed changes reflect adjustments to the weekday and weekend incremental rate at the Civic Center parking facilities without adjusting the grace period, and without adjusting the weekday or weekend daily maximum rate. The proposed incremental rate adjustments are simply correcting the imbalance in the Downtown core incremental parking rates versus non-Downtown core facilities. It currently costs more to park in the weekday at the Civic Center for three hours ($5.50) than it does in the Downtown core facilities ($3.10). The proposed changes keeps long-term parking sessions in these facilities less expensive than the Downtown core, thus continuing to support the holistic parking strategy that ensures maximum use of all parking facilities in the citywide parking portfolio. Staff will return to Council with the results of the recently begun Walker Parking Consultants Civic Center parking impact study and a broader Civic Center parking policy discussion in the future.', 'Downtown Periphery Parking - Main Library Structure – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'The Main Library Parking Structure is located on Santa Monica Blvd. between 6th Street and 7th Street with 529 available parking spaces. Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for the Main Library Parking Structure:', 'Location', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'Main Library PS', '77%', '83%', '71%', '52%', '51%', '45%', 'The Main Library Parking Structure regularly reached peak occupancy around 11 a.m., maintained peak occupancy through 6 p.m. before sharply tapering off in the evening. The high weekday peak occupancy can be attributed to long-term weekday parkers taking advantage of the cheaper all day parking rate ($10.00), when compared to the Downtown all day parking rate ($17.50) and Civic Center all day parking rate ($14.00). Staff anticipates parkers will shift from the Downtown core to the Library due to the price differential; therefore, the proposed rate structure would allow the Main Library Parking Structure to service these parkers and ensure 15% availability at all times.', 'Monthly Parking Permits for Downtown and Peripheral Parking Facilities', 'Parking Facility', 'Current Monthly Rate', 'Proposed Monthly Rate', 'Difference ($)', 'Difference (%)', 'Parking Structures 1 and 3', '$176.00', '$275.00', '$99.00', '56%', 'Parking Structures 2, 4 through 8', '$176.00', '$220.00', '$44.00', '25%', 'Ken Edwards Center', '$176.00', '$220.00', '$44.00', '25%', 'Parking Structure 9', '$176.00', '$187.00', '$11.00', '6%', 'Parking Structure 10', '$132.00', '$187.00', '$55.00', '42%', 'Civic Center Parking Lot and Structure [1]', '$160.00', '$160.00', '$0.00', '0%', 'Main Library', '$82.50', '$154.00', '$71.50', '87%', 'Affordable Housing [2]', '$65.00', '$65.00', '$0.00', '0%', 'Currently, the “anytime access” Downtown monthly parking permits for Parking Structures 1-9 and Ken Edwards Center are $176 per month, which is equivalent to about 10 times the weekday daily maximum transient parking rate of $17.50. As most full-time employees work an average of 22 days per month, this effectively represents 12 days of discounted or subsidized parking for monthly permit holders.', 'Staff recommends increasing the monthly parking permit rate to 11 times the weekday daily maximum rate of the respective facilities, in an effort to balance the demand of regular long-term Downtown employees with the need to ensure parking availability for transient, Santa Monica residents, and visitors who frequent Downtown. The proposed monthly permit rates would also create a rate structure that is in alignment with LUCE, DCP goals, and Council policy. This action allows complete transparency of the hidden subsidy provided with monthly parking. Setting the monthly parking permit rates to 11 times the weekday daily maximum rate effectively represents a 50% discount or subsidy for monthly parking permit holders. As stated in the LUCE, “unrealized revenues related to subsidized parking is money that could otherwise be used for capital repairs and operating cost of providing parking and incentives for alternative modes of transportation.”', 'Staff recommends a gradual and well broadcasted phasing in of the monthly parking permit increases over the course of next fiscal year for Parking Structures 1 and 3, Parking Structure 10, and the Main Library Parking Structure. This would allow staff time to conduct outreach to the impacted customers and provide alternative parking options, if necessary, in other facilities based on a review of transactions and durations in the other facilities.', 'Option B', 'Option B reflects a more moderate increase to the parking rates in the parking facilities, as outlined below:', 'Parking Facility', 'Current Monthly Rate', 'Proposed Monthly Rate', 'Difference ($)', 'Difference (%)', 'Parking Structures 1 and 3', '$176.00', '$220.00', '$44.00', '25%', 'Parking Structures 2, 4 through 8', '$176.00', '$187.00', '$11.00', '6%', 'Ken Edwards Center', '$176.00', '$187.00', '$11.00', '6%', 'Parking Structure 9', '$176.00', '$187.00', '$11.00', '6%', 'Parking Structure 10', '$132.00', '$187.00', '$55.00', '42%', 'Civic Center Parking Lot and Structure', '$160.00', '$160.00', '$0.00', '0%', 'Main Library', '$82.50', '$132.00', '$49.50', '60%', 'Affordable Housing', '$65.00', '$65.00', '$0.00', '0%', 'The detailed rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment D.', 'Option C', 'Council could consider implementing some of the proposed rate changes in Option A or Option B in phases, including adopting some of the proposed rate changes without any adjustments to the grace periods at this time. Depending on the guidance provided by Council at this study session, staff will return to Council with any necessary ordinance and/or resolutions in the future.', 'Rate Survey of Privately-owned Parking Facilities in the City of Santa Monica', 'Staff conducted a survey of parking rates for privately owned parking facilities within the City of Santa Monica, as these facilities directly affect parking demand and traffic circulation in the City. Attachment E includes a rate graph of six privately owned parking facilities and their respective weekday parking rates. Most of these private parking facilities reach a weekday daily maximum parking rate between $20.00 and $22.50 at three hours of parking, and none of them provides free grace periods without validation to their customers. These same private parking facilities have a flat weekend rate ranging from $6 to 12 upon entry.', 'Staff believes that the proposed parking rate adjustments to the City facilities included in this staff report take into account the market conditions, are aligned with Council adopted policies and parking management strategies, and are appropriately priced to ensure that there is not an unintended consequence of parking spillover to City facilities due to pricing imbalances between public and private parking facilities.', 'Section 3 – Other Items for Council Consideration', '3A – Ordinance', 'Section 3.16.170 of the SMMC governs the process in which on-street parking meter rates can be adjusted, including specific target occupancy rates, the amount and frequency of rate changes, the amount in which and the minimum and maximum range in which on-street meter rates can be adjusted. This policy and process is outdated and does not align with other provisions in the municipal code, particularly Section 3.04.035 that allows off-street parking rates to be established and changed from time to time via resolution. Staff recommends streamlining the process and modernizing the municipal code to reflect the current practice of setting on-street and off-street parking rates based on policies and goals outlined in the LUCE and DCP. As part of a holistic parking management strategy, on-street parking rates should be set in tandem with off-street parking rates to facilitate the turnover of on-street parking spaces more frequently and making them available for short-term use, directing traffic off the streets into the parking facilities, and ensuring at least 15% availability at all times.', '3B – Adjust Free Disabled Placard Parking Policy in Off-Street Parking Facilities', 'Council adopted a policy via resolution to provide free parking for vehicles displaying ADA placards for the following on-street parking meters and off-street City parking facilities:', '· On-street parking meters (in conformance with State law)', '· Preferential parking zones 1-5 (in conformance with State law)', '· Main Library Parking Structure', '· Main Library Parking Surface Lot', '· Civic Center Parking Structure and Parking Lot (except during capacity events)', '· Beach Parking Lots (South, Central, and North)', '· Pier Deck Parking Lot', '· Parking Structure 10', '· Main Street Parking Lots (Lots 9, 10, 11, and 26)', '· Mid-City Parking Lots (Lots 7, 8, and 12)', '· Downtown Parking Lots (Lots 27, 28, 29, and 30)', 'Staff recommends adjusting this policy to eliminate free ADA parking for the Main Library Parking Structure and Parking Structure 10 as these facilities have higher average peak occupancies than some of the other parking facilities in the overall City parking portfolio. Additionally, Parking Structure 10 has a total of 81 parking spaces, two of which are reserved for ADA parking. By charging for ADA parking in these specific facilities, ADA parking spaces will become more available to residents and visitors by discouraging long-term transient parking and “storage parking” in these spaces.', 'This proposed adjustment was discussed with stakeholder representatives of the Commission for the Senior Community and the Disabilities Commission.', '3C – Adjust Rate for Annual Senior Beach Parking Permit', 'The annual Senior Beach parking permit allows California residents, ages 62 and over, to park at all Beach parking lots (excluding Pier Deck) during posted time limits of sunrise to sunset. The annual permit fee is $2.20 and is valid from April 1 to March 31. There are currently 3,000 permits made available to eligible California residents, with 42% of which are purchased by Santa Monica residents while the remaining 58% purchased by non-Santa Monica residents.', 'Below are the current rates for an annual Senior Beach parking permit in the following neighboring beach cities:', '· Los Angeles County Beaches and Harbor Senior Parking Permit - $25', '· Orange County Beach Parking Pass for Seniors and Disabled - $35', '· Long Beach Day Parking Pass for Seniors - $75', '· Huntington Beach Senior Parking Pass - $75', 'Staff recommends adjusting the rates to $25 to align with Los Angeles County Beaches and Harbor rates (lowest rate amongst the neighboring beach cities). This proposed pricing change was discussed with stakeholder representatives of the Commission for the Senior Community and the Disabilities Commission.', 'Section 4 – Alternative Pricing Strategies for Future Consideration', 'By way of background, below are some of the commonly used demand-responsive parking pricing strategies employed by various agencies to ensure availability at all times in their facilities:', 'Congestion Pricing – is a demand-side solution of setting prices to reduce parking, traffic and congestion during high peak occupancy or rush hours. This pricing method is supposed to encourage users who can be flexible in their usage times to shift their use away from peak periods to times when it is less expensive. Below are some of the congestion pricing options:', '· Time of Day Pricing (“Time Bands”) – set parking rates based on peak parking demand patterns (i.e. cheaper parking during low-demand morning hours, increased parking rates during high-demand afternoon hours, and reduce parking rates for low-demand evening hours)', '· Day of Week Pricing – sets parking rates based on the different demand patterns during weekday and weekends', '· Progressive (“Length of Stay”) Parking Pricing – sets parking rates to facilitate a desired rate of turnover, maintain rates for desired short-term parking at a lower rate and then escalate rates with time', 'Dynamic Pricing – is another demand-side solution that sets pricing based on real-time changes in the market. This pricing strategy would allow the City to increase rates when demand is high and lower rates when demand is lower based on real-time occupancies in each of the facilities. This would require a significant investment in new parking technologies and systems and each of the various parking and traffic systems would need to interface with each other in real-time to supply the necessary data to facilitate this pricing strategy. This strategy is not proposed for Santa Monica parking facilities at this time.', 'Section 5 – Annual State of the Citywide Parking Report', 'Staff recommends that Council direct staff to report annually on the State of Citywide parking. This report would including the following:', '· Analysis of parking revenues, including utilization and availability data by location, day of week, and parking type', '· Analysis of parking operating and capital expenditures, including progress reports on capital improvement projects', '· Operational assessment and services update', '· Parking asset management update including planned equipment replacement', '· Emerging parking trends and technologies', '· Key accomplishments', '· Various challenges of Citywide parking operations and proposed opportunities for improvement', '· Future year parking rate recommendations based on data analytics and Council adopted parking policies', '· Progress towards meeting Council strategic goals', 'Section 6 – Public Outreach and Communication with Boards and Commissions', 'Staff conducted study sessions with the following Boards and Commissions to ensure that the needs of the communities represented by the respective commissions were considered with the proposals included in this staff report:', '· Commission for the Senior Community – October 2017', '· Santa Monica Library Board – October 2017', '· Chamber of Commerce – November 2017', '· Disabilities Commission – November 2017', '· Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. – November 2017', '· Santa Monica Travel and Tourism – January 2018', 'Official feedback from each body was thoroughly considered and incorporated herein.', 'Attachment F includes formal responses from the respective bodies. Staff will return to the Boards and Commissions with additional study sessions to further discuss these topics and inform these stakeholders of broader parking management strategies.', 'Recommended Next Steps', 'Staff recommends the adoption of specific rate changes consistent with Option A to address Council concerns of traffic congestion, Downtown circulation, parking availability, and reductions in free parking. However, based on comments, feedback, and discussion at this study session, staff will return to Council at the March 27, 2018 Council meeting with specific rate proposals and enabling ordinances and resolutions.']}
{'Title': 'Introduction and adoption of an Emergency Ordinance setting forth regulations for shared mobility systems and devices and providing for generally applicable enhanced enforcement measures, and adoption of a Resolution establishing an impound fee and related administrative fines.', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Adopt an emergency ordinance, provided as Attachment A, adding Chapter 3.21 to the City of Santa Monica Municipal Code setting forth regulations for shared mobility systems and devices, adding Section 1.14.030 authorizing the City Manager to implement Administrative Instructions, and amending Section 1.08.010 to provide for civil penalties of up to $5,000 for violations of local law, and2) Adopt a resolution, provided as Attachment B, establishing an impound fee for shared mobility devices abandoned in the public rights-of-way and administrative fines for violations of Chapter 3.21, and3) Direct staff to establish a pilot program to assist with the development of a regulatory framework for shared mobility systems and devices.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Santa Monica staff, residents, and stakeholders have been actively pursuing the Council’s strategic goal of Establishing a New Model for Mobility. The goal is supported and enriched by connections with the Sustainable City Plan, Wellbeing Project, and Land Use and Circulation Element. Efforts such as GoSaMo have encouraged Santa Monica residents and visitors to try a variety of mobility options, including shared mobility devices such as bicycles and vehicles.', 'New forms of shared mobility devices and systems, such as dockless bicycles and motorized scooters, have begun operating in the Los Angeles area, including Santa Monica. These systems can provide benefits in an urban environment – but they present new concerns and dangers to public safety, particularly in light of the City Council’s Vision Zero to eliminate deaths and serious injuries from collisions – as well as compliance with the California Vehicle Code and the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA), particularly on public sidewalks. One of the critical safety concerns with these types of systems operating in Santa Monica is when the devices are left in the public rights-of-way in a haphazard way, causing obstructions to pedestrian and Americans with Disability Act (ADA) travel and access points, such as wheelchair ramps. Such unregulated devices have also caused collisions and accidents, some resulting in serious injuries. Accordingly, urgent regulatory actions are necessary to protect public health and safety. Several cities in the United States are addressing these same issues and have begun implementing pilot programs or new regulatory approaches to accommodate such devices. Staff recommends adoption of the proposed Emergency Ordinance to address immediate public safety concerns as a first step, while staff develops a pilot program to facilitate the development of a safe and more sustainable long-term regulatory framework for these devices.', "The proposed Ordinance further recommends enhancing the City’s tools to enforce this proposed Ordinance and other local laws more generally by authorizing the City Attorney's Office to seek civil penalties of up to $5,000 for each violation of local law.", 'Additionally, like many existing City enforcement programs, part of enforcing this Ordinance will require the undertaking of Administrative Hearings. The City Manager currently issues Administrative Instructions to interpret City policies with clarity, govern operation, and provide procedures to implement them. To reiterate longstanding practice and to further insulate the hearings process from legal challenges, staff recommends amending the Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) to clearly articulate the City Manager’s authority to implement these Administrative Instructions.', 'Background', 'New forms of shared use mobility systems are proliferating in cities throughout the United States. The most common are “dockless” shared bicycles but other forms such as shared electric bicycles, electric scooters, and mopeds also exist. Most rely on app-based rental, and GPS location services to identify the device. The “dockless” shared bicycles lock to themselves via a lock over the rear wheel. Cities have begun to respond through enforcement efforts against unlawful uses combined with pilot programs with responsible operators to create regulatory frameworks to integrate these devices into their existing transportation systems.', 'Pilot Regulatory Programs for Shared Mobility Systems', 'The City of Seattle created a pilot program in July 2017 to allow bike share companies to operate in the city under a permit. Currently Spin, Lime Bike, and ofo are operating under the City’s pilot program with over 9,000 bikes deployed.', 'In January 2018, the Austin, Texas City Council approved the creation of a “dockless” bike share pilot program, making it clear that the program was a one-year test. The program is expected to be implemented in May or June of 2018.', 'In San Francisco, the City has launched an 18-month pilot program. Only one company, JUMP Bikes, which offers peddle assist electric bicycles, has successfully fulfilled the requirements of the San Francisco Metropolitan Transportation Authority’s bike share permit application.', 'In December 2017, the Los Angeles City Council authorized the Los Angeles Department of Transportation to develop and enter into a contract with “dockless” bike share operators in Council District 15/Harbor District. A licensing agreement has been developed to address liability and indemnification, while Council considers the policy framework for a pilot.', 'New York City put out a public request for information to explore the feasibility of “dockless” bike sharing systems, taking into consideration its existing CitiBike bike share system by not allowing the dockless system to operate where CitiBike operates. The city expects to have a pilot program up and running by the summer or fall of 2018.', 'Breeze Bike Share', 'Santa Monica launched Breeze Bike Share in November 2015 with 500 bikes and 80 “stations”. Breeze bike stations consist of clusters of bike racks throughout Santa Monica, and geo-located on the Breeze smartphone app. The bikes offer flexible locking through on-board locks, which means that users can lock at a station, or choose to lock to a bike rack outside the station for a $2 surcharge. Breeze Bikes were purchased with grant funds, are owned by the City, and operated under contract by CycleHop. The Santa Monica Municipal Code was amended in August 2015 to enable Breeze Bike Share operations in the public right-of-way in SMMC Chapter 3.20. Metro Bike Share runs a traditional “smart-dock” bike share system in which bikes can only be locked to stations. Metro installed two stations in Santa Monica in 2017, located on the property they own at the Metro Expo Line stops in Downtown and at 17th Street.', 'Bird Rides, Inc.', 'Around September 2017, Bird Rides, Inc. (“Bird”) began offering shared electric scooter rentals in Santa Monica, without a City business license. Scooters began to arrive in Santa Monica in an unanticipated fashion on the city’s streets and sidewalks, posing significant safety concerns with respect to hazards/obstructions in the public rights-of-way and disabled access ramps. After being contacted by City staff, Bird obtained a Business License for its office location, and has pursued a Business License for its vending of scooters on private property. The City has issued an approval to vend its scooters on private property with conditions on its operations, particularly as they relate to scooters being placed in the Public Rights-of-Way (PRW). The conditions are currently being appealed by Bird.', 'Each morning Bird employees deploy scooters on sidewalks, primarily in the downtown, recollecting the scooters in the evenings. In addition to the hazards posed with the scooters being left in the public rights-of-way, hazardous user operation of the scooters have continued to be observed. These unlawful operations have resulted in accidents, some resulting in serious injuries. Bird scooters fit the definition of a “motorized scooter” as defined in Section 407.5[1] of the California Vehicle Code.  State law requires riders of motorized scooters to wear a helmet and prohibits riding on the sidewalk. Bird scooter riders are also required by the CA Vehicle Code to be over 16 years of age and possess a valid driver’s license or instruction permit. A motorized scooter may be operated on a bicycle path, trail or bikeway, but not on a sidewalk. If on a roadway, it must be operated in the bicycle lane, if there is one.', 'Discussion', 'This staff report is presented in three separate sections, 1) Shared Mobility Devices and Systems, 2) Civil Penalties, and 3) Administrative Instructions.', 'Section 1 - Shared Mobility Device Systems', 'The shared use market for mobility devices, such as bicycles, has seen a new model emerge that uses free-floating bikes without stations or docks. The devices can be located, unlocked, and relocked using a smartphone app. “Dockless” systems enable bikes and scooters to be left in any location, regardless of the presence of a rack or other object to secure it to.', 'Shared mobility systems, and in particular new forms such as e-bikes and e-scooters, can have benefits by providing additional mobility options. For users, this means quicker, easier, and cheaper access to a device that can be used to travel short distances, and a quick roll out of these options since the infrastructure of docking stations is no longer required.  However, one challenge presented by the newer dockless shared mobility devices is that operators and users may leave the devices haphazardly in the Public Rights-of-Way (PRW), creating accident causing obstacles, causing more congested pedestrian walkways and obstructing ADA travel and access points, such as ramps. Many users are not educated in safe operational requirements and thus may not properly operate such new devices (e.g. not wearing helmets, not riding on the sidewalk, and in some cases possession of a valid driver’s license or instruction permit). The City has responded to this by proactively sharing safety information to riders to ensure Santa Monica residents and visitors were equippedwithinformation on how to safely and legally operate motorized scooters. These efforts, included:', '· A blog post that received 1,267 viewswithan average of 3:24 minutes spent on the page,', '· Posts on Facebook, Twitter and Instagram with a total of 64,377 impressions,', '· Local and regional media coverage withsafety messages, and', '· Direct education of scooter users on the lawful and safe use of scooter practices by Santa Monica police officers.', 'Moreover, some operators choose to operate in complete disregard for applicable laws or safety, likely in an effort to maximize profits. The confluence of these factors has created serious public safety hazards throughout the City and necessitates immediate corrective actions.', 'In order to address the ongoing public safety concerns created by unregulated Shared Mobility Devices, such as scooters, staff recommends that Council adopt the attached emergency ordinance creating Chapter 3.21 – Shared Mobility Devices to establish the following provisions:', '1. Clarify the code to define shared mobility operations as vending and subject to Chapter 6.36 Vending.', '2. Unless otherwise approved by the City, prohibit the following activities:', 'a. Offering or displaying for rent a shared mobility device from the public rights-of-way or public property without City authorization.', 'b. Placing, parking, abandoning or leaving unattended a shared mobility device on the public rights-of-way or on public property.', '3. Clarify that shared mobility devices left in the public rights-of-way constitute an immediate hazard and are subject to immediate impounding.', '4. Establish authority to charge an impound fee.', 'Staff also recommends that the proposed provisions of Chapter 3.21 sunset on January 1, 2019 to provide time for staff to develop a pilot program and return to Council with updates to the Chapter that begin the process of potentially authorizing and regulating commercial shared mobility systems and devices.', 'Compliance', 'One of the critical safety concerns with these types of systems is when the devices are left in the PRW, causing obstructions to pedestrian and ADA travel and access points, such as wheelchair ramps. If a user or employee of the system leaves a device in the PRW or on public property, it is essential that operators of the system remove it. Additionally, it is unlawful for an operator itself to place the devices in the PRW. Since the technology that facilitates most shared mobility systems includes a Global Position System (GPS), companies that operate these systems know where they are located at any given time. It is this same technology that allows users to locate the device, and enables the definition of allowing pick-up and drop-off geo-fenced locations. As such a company has the information necessary to ensure the removal of the device to a safe and lawful location.', 'In order to ensure that companies are incentivized to remove the devices from the PRW themselves and that the City’s costs of enforcement, storage and removal are not borne by the public but by the party imposing such costs, staff recommends that Council adopt the attached resolution establishing an impound fee of $60 and Administrative Fines of $500 to $1000 for violations of the proposed provisions of Chapter 3.21 as follows:', 'Violation Description', 'Proposed Fine', 'Display, offer or make-available for rent any Shared Mobility Device in the PRW or on public property.', '$1,000', 'Install, place, maintain, operate, or facilitate the installation, placement, maintenance or operation of a Shared Mobility System in the PRW or on public property.', '$1,000', 'Place, park, or abandon any Shared Mobility Device in the PRW or on public property.', '$ 500', 'Facilitate the placement, parking, or abandonment of any Shared Mobility Device in the PRW or on public property.', '$1,000', 'Failure by operator to immediately remove any of its Shared Mobility Devices abandoned in any Public Area or the PRW', '$ 500', 'The $60 impound fee is a cost-recovery fee based only on the time of a third party company that would assist with the removal of any devices left in the PRW. Although staff has recently impounded devices, such as scooters operated by Bird Ride’s, Inc., no impound fee currently exists making these efforts ineffective. Once staff has more experience with implementing the process for impounding of mobility devices, a revised impound fee will be proposed with the FY2018-19 Exception Based Budget to account for staff time.', 'Due to the nature of the way Shared Mobility Systems operate and because of how they have been introduced to the public, users routinely leave the devices they rent in the PRW after arrival at the conclusion of their trip. Staff proposes to take proactive measures to remove the hazards created when users or operators leave the devices in the PRW, by contracting with a third party to monitor and remove the devices. The proposed impound fee is intended to recover the costs associated with these efforts by charging for each device that is impounded. Staff would monitor the frequency with which staff is having to remove the devices from the PRW; any company that continually fails to remove its devices from the PRW would also be subject to the proposed administrative fines, civil action, and/or criminal prosecution. It is important to note that enforcement related to devices left in the PRW will be focused on the operator not the user. To limit any criminal liability on the part of users, the law provides for only an infraction when any device is left in the PRW. Misdemeanor penalties would be available for other provisions of the ordinance, such as displaying or offering for rent a Shared Mobility Device in the City.  The Police Department would however continue to enforce the State Vehicle Code as it relates to the operation of vehicles, including shared mobility devices (e.g. not wearing helmets and in some cases possession of a valid driver’s license or instruction permit).', 'Section 2 - Civil Penalties', "Civil penalties can be an important tool to garner compliance with local law, including compliance with this proposed Emergency Ordinance. Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 1.08.010 currently does not set forth any civil penalty for violations of local law. While certain specific code provisions currently provide for civil penalties (e.g. SMMC 4.56.040), such provisions remain sparse within the Municipal Code. In order to bolster the City’s enforcement options for violations of local law, including this Emergency Ordinance, staff proposes to amend SMMC Section 1.08.010 to authorize the City Attorney's Office to seek civil penalties of up to $5,000 for each violation of local law.", 'Section 3 - Administrative Instructions', 'From time to time, the City Manager promulgates Administrative Instructions which guide a wide range of City operations, including Administrative Hearings. Administrative Instructions are intended to clearly interpret local law and provide procedures to implement them. Administrative Instructions are reviewed by all Department heads before implementation. To more clearly reiterate longstanding practice, staff recommends amending the SMMC to specifically articulate the City Manager’s existing authority to implement Administrative Instructions governing administrative hearings.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Impound fees, and possibly fines, will be collected as part of enforcement efforts, as well as there will be future contract costs related to the physical collection and impounding of the mobility devices abandoned in the public rights-of-way. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future.']}
{'Title': 'Introduce for First Reading an Ordinance Amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 2.04 Relating to Civil Service Rules and Regulations', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Introduce for first reading an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Sections 2.04.070 (Application for examinations), 2.04.160 (Appointments from eligible lists-Fingerprinting-Conviction Record), 2.04.180 (Temporary assignments) and 2.04.320 (Sick leave) of the Civil Service Rules and Regulations.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Santa Monica Municipal Code (“SMMC”) Chapter 2.04 encompasses the civil service rules and regulations that apply to City employees. As a result of recent changes in State law and regulations, it is necessary to update various civil service rules and regulations in order to comply with current State law. Staff has presented the proposed ordinance to the Personnel Board and notified representatives of the City’s recognized employee organizations. Staff now recommends adoption of the attached ordinance amending various sections of SMMC Chapter 2.04.', 'Background', "Several recent amendments and additions in State law have revealed a need for minor, conforming updates to SMMC Chapter 2.04. The Healthy Workplaces, Healthy Families Act of 2014 (Labor Code, §§ 245 et seq.) and consequent changes to California’s Kin Care law (Labor Code, § 233) provide all City employees with certain entitlements and protections in the accrual and use of paid sick leave. State Assembly Bill No. 1008, effective January 1, 2018, added Government Code section 12952, which makes it an unlawful employment practice under the Fair Employment and Housing Act to seek or consider a job applicant’s conviction history before a conditional job offer is made. The legislation also requires an employer considering an applicant's conviction history to make an individualized assessment of that history in relation to the specific duties of the job. State Assembly Bill No. 1487, effective January 1, 2018, added Government Code section 20480 to limit out-of-class appointments; the temporary appointment of an employee to an upgraded position or higher classification in a vacant position is now limited to 960 hours each fiscal year.", 'Discussion', "As a result of recent changes to State law described above, certain provisions of the civil service rules and regulations set forth in SMMC Chapter 2.04 need to be updated for consistency with current applicable law. The primary updates to the civil service rules and regulations are the following: (1) provisions in SMMC sections 2.04.070 and 2.04.160 related to substantive and procedural considerations of applicants' criminal convictions have been revised to comply with AB 1008 and to facilitate administrative efficiency; (2) SMMC section 2.04.180 has been modified to account for the additional limitation of 960 hours each fiscal year for temporary out-of-class appointments in vacant positions; and (3) various subdivisions of SMMC section 2.04.320 relating to sick leave have been revised for consistency with current State law.", 'City Charter Section 1012, subdivision (a), requires the Personnel Board to make recommendations to City Council on the amendment of civil service rules and regulations. Staff presented the attached ordinance to the Personnel Board at a regularly scheduled meeting on February 22, 2018, and following a public hearing thereon, the Personnel Board recommends that Council approve the revisions to the Municipal Code as set forth in the attached ordinance. Additionally, the City Attorney’s Office notified all bargaining unit representatives of the proposed ordinance and provided them with an opportunity to respond and provide comments.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'First Modification with ChargePoint to Provide, Install and Operate Electric Vehicle Charging Stations; Resolution to authorize application for MSRC funds', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '11. Resolutions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to agreement #10507 (CCS) in the amount of $493,247 including 10% contingency with ChargePoint, a California-based company, for the purchase and operation of 45 electric vehicle charging stations. This will result in a five-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $666,372 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.2. Adopt the attached resolution authorizing the application for incentive funds in the amount of $121,500 from Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) for Clean Transportation Funding for the 2017 Local Government Partnership Program to accelerate the transition to zero and near-zero emission vehicles. 3. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to apply for and accept the incentive funds, if awarded.4. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report, for the agreement modification and the incentive funds, in the event that the incentive funds are awarded.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'To advance the goal of having 300 electric vehicle (EV) charging ports in Santa Monica by 2020 as called for by the recently adopted Electric Vehicle Action Plan (Attachment A), the City plans to add 81 EV charging ports (45 stations) across the City. This includes 44 public and one fleet charging station. The City currently has 89 public charging ports (53 single-ports and 18 dual-ports) available at 71 charging stations (the City has a mix of single-port and dual-port stations). Staff recommends modifying the agreement with ChargePoint to procure the new charging stations for a total amended amount not to exceed $493,247, resulting in a new contract for an amount not to exceed $666,372 over five years.', 'Staff have identified incentive funding of $121,500 through the Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) Clean Transportation Program (Attachment B) to partially offset the one-time procurement and eligible installation costs. In order to be eligible to receive MSRC funding, cities must deliver a brief MSRC-provided presentation (Attachment C) to Council about the Clean Transportation Program and obtain an approved resolution from Council (Attachment D).', 'Background', 'Santa Monica has been a leader in adopting low emission vehicle technology and providing public charging infrastructure.', 'On November 8, 2011, Council held a study session on electric vehicle (EV) infrastructure (Attachment E). Staff presented the challenges to accommodating EV charging for residents, visitors, and employees as well as the pending installation of charging infrastructure.', 'Since then, the City has expanded its public charging infrastructure from 20 charging ports to 89 throughout the city. This total includes seven dual-port charging stations at the Civic Center Structure that were provided by UCLA through a grant-funded research project and one solar-powered charging station at the Airport Administration Office.Nine charging stationsat City Yardsare used exclusively for theCity’s vehicle fleet, whichnow includes over 130 electric vehicles.', 'On July 25, 2017, Council awarded a bid to ChargePoint for the installation of charging stations through Southern California Edison’s Charge Ready pilot program (Attachment F). Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with ChargePoint to install smart charging stations (16 stations, 31 charging ports) at the Civic Center Parking Structure roof for fleet vehicle charging Table 1). Smart charging stations are network connected, which allows for a range of functions including station usage monitoring, cost recovery (charging a fee), maintenance alerts, dynamic pricing, and customer notifications when batteries are full.', 'Table 1: New EV Charging Stations – Original Contract', 'Location', 'Notes', 'Dual-port Stations', 'Single-port Stations', 'Total Available Ports', 'Civic Center Parking Structure', 'Fleet', '15', '1', '31', 'Total Fleet Stations', '16', 'Discussion', 'The EV Action Plan is a guiding document for expanding the infrastructure needed to support the growing demand from EV vehicle owners. The plan establishes goals to expand the number of places where charging is available as well as set out policies for installing charging stations in apartment complexes, private residences, and other privately held locations. The proposed modification to this contract would allow the City to take the next important step to expand the number of charging stations, and provide them in more neighborhoods across the City.', 'The modification includes a capital cost, not to exceed amount of $278,197, including 10% contingency, and an operating cost, not to exceed amount of $215,050 for a total additional not to exceed amount of $493,247 over five years (Table 2). The capital cost includes a one-time purchase of equipment. Operating costs include ChargePoint network services and the ChargePoint Assure maintenance and warranty program (Assure is included at no cost the first year). After the first year staff will analyze maintenance costs and may choose not to proceed with the Assure maintenance program if it fails to prove cost effective.', 'Table 2: Original Contract + Modification', 'Capital Cost + 10% Contingency', '$278,197', 'Operating Costs', '$215,050', 'Total (Modification)', '$493,247', 'Original Contract Amount', '$173,125', 'New total not to exceed', '$666,372', 'The majority of existing charging stations are located in City-owned parking structures and surface lots; two charging stations are located on-street at Montana Avenue. All stations experience a high amount of usage, and staff regularly receive requests to add more charging stations.', 'Staff from the Office of Sustainability & the Environment, Street & Fleet Services, and Architecture Services divisions of the Public Works Department have proposed 27 sites for new and replacement charging stations (Table 3).', 'In response to community feedback to add new stations, rather than begin with replacements, most stations will offer brand new service. Staff are proposing to replace four stations that are obsolete and no longer useful to most EV drivers at Virginia Avenue Park, the Pier, the Solar Port & Water Resources Department. These existing stations are incompatible with EV models produced after the early-2000s.', 'In addition, staff recommends replacing the two existing stations at Montana Avenue, and adding one at this site in order to expand charging access in this area. The existing charging stations on Montana Avenue are highly utilized, however this older technology has no pricing mechanism to deter drivers from overstaying their allotted charging time. Staff frequently receives requests for additional stations and enforcement to encourage vehicle turnover. Costs to add electrical infrastructure for new EV charging sites on Montana Ave would be prohibitively expensive due to the necessary trenching and new service requirements. Replacing the older stations is a cost-effective way to enable more drivers to utilize the stations. The existing older charging stations will be repurposed to charge City fleet vehicles. The new station added at this site will utilize available electrical capacity in the existing service panel. These replacement stations also take advantage of a promotional rate offered by ChargePoint in order to improve charging facilities at a reduced cost.', 'Combined with the new stations, there will be a net gain of 79 publicly available charging ports and a citywide total of 168 public charging ports once all of the 45 stations are installed. The original contract and modification will add 32 fleet charging ports, for a new total of 46 charging ports designated for city fleet vehicles.', 'Table 3. New EV Charging Stations - Modification', 'Location', 'Notes', 'Single-Port Stations', 'Dual-Port Stations', 'Total Available Ports', 'Annenberg', 'New', '1', '2', 'Main Branch Library', 'New', '6', '12', 'Montana Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Ocean Park Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Fairview Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Memorial Park - Curbside', 'New', '5', '10', 'Marine Park', 'New', '1', '2', 'Virginia Ave Park', 'Replacement', '1', '1', 'Various – Ocean Park neighborhood (8 curbside sites)', 'New', '8', '16', 'Various – Wilmont neighborhood (8 curbside sites)', '15 New, 2 Replacement', '4', '13', '30', 'Santa Monica Pier', 'Replacement', '1', '1', 'Civic Solar Port', 'Replacement', '1', '2', 'Water Resources Division', 'Replacement (Fleet)', '1', '2', 'Total', '9', '36', '81', 'Total Stations', '45', '*Station locations are subject to change.', 'Curbside Charging Stations', 'The recently adopted Electric Vehicle Action Plan recommended adding curbside charging infrastructure in multi-unit residential neighborhoods.', 'Upgrades to the City’s streetlight network present opportunities to provide electrical infrastructure for EV charging. Staff is leveraging an existing project to modernize the streetlight electrical circuit in the Ocean Park neighborhood and install up to eight dual-port charging stations in the public right-of-way.', 'Staff have also proposed adding charging stations at up to eight new curbside locations in the Wilmont neighborhood and are working with Southern California Edison to determine feasibility of this effort. This area was selected based on the high density of the area and large volume of requests for charging stations.', '2017 Local Government Partnership Program (MSRC Funds)', "Funding for EV charging stations is partially available through the 2017 Local Government Partnership Program, which is funded by the Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) Clean Transportation Program. Funds are set aside for each city and county within the South Coast Air Quality Management District (SCAQMD) jurisdiction that participates in the AB 2766 Motor Vehicle Registration Fee (Subvention Fund) Program. The Local Government Partnership Program directly supports implementation of SCAQMD's 2016 Air Quality Management Plan (AQMP) by focusing MSRC investments on AQMP measures.", 'The MSRC allocated $121,500 to the City of Santa Monica through this program. Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure Installation is an eligible project category, and MSRC contributes up to 75% of the cost to purchase and install publicly accessible EV charging stations. Eligibility for MSRC incentive funding would require the City to enter into a reimbursement contract and meet specific deliverables.', 'Under the MSRC funding requirements, public EV charging sites must meet a 24-hour access requirement (no facility closures) in order to qualify for the 75% funding contribution. Facilities that do not meet the 24-hour access requirements are eligible to receive up to a 50% funding match. MSRC funds would be distributed on a reimbursement basis upon completion of approved project milestones and submittal of all required reports and invoices.', 'In order to participate, cities must obtain an approved resolution from City Council that acknowledges receipt of the MSRC-supplied presentation from city or county staff, authorizes the proposed project, and allocates the necessary matching funds. The program presentation must be presented to Council live as part of the application process. The application must also contain a project implementation plan, proposed budget, and implementation schedule. All projects must be completed within 60 months of contract execution. Program applications must be submitted by March 2, 2018.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On May 19, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals for the furnishing, delivery and installation of smart electric vehicle service equipment to replace existing charging stations, install new charging stations, and provide ongoing management services, such as networking and maintenance, in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirty-nine vendors downloaded the RFP. Ten firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Parking Division, Information Systems Department, Street & Fleet Division and Office of Sustainability & the Environment.', 'Evaluation was based on price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff then interviewed six shortlisted firms, evaluated the proposals, and conducted interviews. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, ChargePoint was selected as the best qualified firm. The original RFP allowed for sites to be added in addition to the initial specified sites.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to ChargePoint is $493,247 for an amended contract amount not to exceed $666,372. In addition to funds of $78,703 available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019157.589000, the contract modification requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', '1. Release the fund balance of $414,544 from reserve account 4.380236;', '2. Establish a transfer budget of $414,544 from 04695.570321 to 01695.570321;', '3. Appropriate $70,077 to account C019157.589000;', '4. Appropriate $121,500 to account C019157.589100; and', '5. Appropriate $222,967 to account 014261.555010.', 'The total amount of incentive funds available from MSRC is $121,500. If awarded, a revenue budget will be established at account 44426.407830 and an interfund transfer from account 44695.570140 to account 01695.570140 will be included in the Proposed FY 2018-19 Budget. The incentive funding will cover up to 75% of total project costs and requires local match funding to cover the remaining balance. Funds to cover remaining costs are included in the appropriation to account C019157.589100 above.', 'Future funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': "Proclamation: Women's History Month", 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Approve First Modification for Property and Assessment Management Software', 'Department': 'Public Works, Airport Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Software as a Service Subscription Agreement #10362 (SAAS) in the amount of $27,226 with Yardi Systems, Inc., a California-based company, to obtain additional real property and asset management software licenses and change the anniversary date from January 25 to December 31.  This will result in a five-year amended agreement (including renewal options) with a new total amount not to exceed $106,510 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City uses Yardi Voyager®, a proprietary real estate property and asset management software created by Yardi Systems, Inc. (Yardi), to manage the City’s commercial real estate operations, execute lease agreements, run analytics, and provide accounting process services. Staff now requires additional software licenses to manage properties at the Airport due to the elimination of master tenancies. Staff requests a first modification to the agreement with Yardi in an amount not to exceed $27,226, for a new five-year contract total amount not to exceed $106,510.', 'Background', 'Yardi has provided real estate property and asset management software services to the Housing and Economic Development (HED) department and the Airport since November 21, 2007. Staff uses Yardi Voyager® software to execute leases, run analytics, and provide accounting process services as well as to perform multiple property management tasks. These tasks include, but are not limited to generating monthly courtesy notices for tenants, recording payments, collecting monthly late fees and security deposits, preparing monthly billing journal entries regarding lease and license agreements, tracking tenant insurance documentation, tracking lease/license expiration dates, maintaining tenant contact information, and assessing Consumer Price Index (CPI) increases annually.', 'On September 27, 2016, Council authorized a five-year agreement with Yardi for software services for an amount of $14,933 in year one with four one-year options to renew, subject to annual cost of living increases not to exceed 3% per annum, for a total amount not to exceed $79,284 with future funding contingent of Council budget approval (Attachment A).', 'The system was originally procured using a competitive process in 2007. The 2016 support agreement was approved using an exception to the competitive bidding process because Yardi is the only vendor able to support its proprietary Voyager software. On December 31, 2017, the City exercised its option to renew the agreement until December 31, 2018.', 'Discussion', 'Currently, HED has two ledger user licenses, and the Airport has three ledger user licenses and one read-only license. HED manages 157 leases and license agreements in Yardi Voyager®, and the Airport manages 540 lease spaces in Yardi Voyager®, including offices, hangars, tie-downs and land leases. Due to the phasing out of master leaseholds, an additional 69 leasable spaces located at three Airport properties (2828 Donald Douglas Loop North, 3026 Airport Avenue, and 3100 Donald Douglas Loop South) all of which will be tracked by Yardi in FY 2017-18.', 'Staff requires three additional ledger user licenses to support the management of the additional properties and further increase the efficiency of the existing property management functions. This modification would result in a modification not to exceed $6,508 in FY 2017-18 and an additional $20,718 over the three subsequent years of the agreement.', 'Staff also proposes a modification of the anniversary date of the contract to simplify the accounting process for the agreement, resulting in a one-year term from December 31, 2017 to December 31, 2018, with three remaining one-year options to renew. The modification of the term date would have no impact on the FY 17-18 budget.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In 2007, staff requested proposals for a web-based, fully integrated platform to manage commercial real estate operations, execute leases, run analytics, and provide accounting process services for HED and the Airport. Based on proposals submitted, Yardi Systems, Inc. was recognized as the best bidder.', 'Yardi Systems, Inc. is the only vendor that can provide maintenance and support for its proprietary Voyager software system and is therefore the exclusive vendor pursuant to Section 2.24.080(d) of the Municipal Code. Staff recommends Yardi Systems, Inc. to furnish and deliver/provide software updates and support for its proprietary Voyager® software system as an exception to the competitive bidding process. On September 27, 2016, Council authorized the Software as a Service (SAAS) Subscription Agreement No. 10362 as an exemption to the competitive bidding process.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Yardi Systems, Inc. is $27,226 for an amended contract total not to exceed $106,510.  Funds of $6,508 are available in the FY 2017-18 budgets in the Public Works and Housing and Economic Development departments. The contract will be charged to the following accounts:', 'Account Number', 'Department & Division', 'Amount', '33431.588500', 'Public Works - Airport', '$5,916', '012681.555060', 'Housing & Economic Development - EDD', '$ 592', 'TOTAL', '$6,508', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award Contract for Transit Technology Consultant', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #143 to IBI Group, a California-based company, for a consultant to perform a system-by-system needs assessment of the Big Blue Bus’ transit technology infrastructure.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with IBI Group in an amount not to exceed $204,040 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The technological infrastructure of Big Blue Bus (BBB) is crucial to its operations and providing the best customer experience to over 13.6 million customers who ride BBB annually. As a mid-size transit agency, BBB relies on at least 20 different software and system applications, some of which are over 14 years old, to support its operation of 200 buses and 485 employees. In order to become more reliable, efficient, and better able to serve its customers and the Santa Monica community, BBB determined that a thorough analysis of its software and systems is needed in order to make strategic decisions about current and future technology needs. To do this, BBB is engaging a transit technology consultant to assist staff in conducting a system-by-system evaluation of BBB’s current software, hardware and systems to create a technology roadmap. Staff recommends award of a consultant professional services contract to IBI Group for a total project cost not to exceed $204,040.', 'Background', 'Big Blue Bus provides sub-regional transportation service to approximately 58 square miles of the greater Los Angeles area. Buses operate between 4:30AM and 1:30AM while the maintenance division is staffed 24 hours per day, seven days per week. Annual ridership is more than 13.6 million.', 'BBB uses software and system applications to manage transit service, maintenance work orders, personnel, customer service, public information, enterprise assets, system and route planning, and business operations. Many of these systems are not integrated due to variations in technology and compatibility. While each of these systems were the best fit for the BBB at the time of purchase, the technology landscape has changed rapidly and significantly as have the BBB’s technology needs as customers expect better on-time performance, more real-time information, and more efficient management of the BBB fleet.', 'Discussion', 'BBB needs to conduct a thorough analysis of its technology infrastructure and solutions – with specific regard to the unique operations and support needs of a transit agency – so that it can make strategic decisions about its current and future technology needs and purchases. To do this, BBB is engaging a transit technology consultant to do a system-by-system evaluation of BBB’s current software and systems and to create a technology roadmap based on that analysis. This consultant is responsible for the following deliverables:', 'The duration of the project is expected to be approximately one year, with the initial recommendations for a technology roadmap anticipated to be available in spring 2019. However, as the project progresses, staff will evaluate the cost/benefit as well as funding availability to implement a systems solution or software upgrade should it deem that the enhancement would provide a benefit to BBB customers, improve or enhance safety and security of BBB staff, or provide operational efficiencies before spring 2019.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On October 17, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for a Transit Technology Consultant. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Ads referring potential bidders to the city’s online bidding site were also published in two online trade publications. 1276 vendors were notified, and 105 prospective vendors downloaded the RFP. Four firms submitted proposals.', 'Proposals were submitted by IBI Group, Lumenor Consulting, Plante Moran, and Intueor.The proposals were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Big Blue Bus, Information Services Department, and Long Beach Transit. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience and technical competence;ability to meet project work plan and timeliness; quality control; cost of services/cost control;and responsiveness/presentation. Staff then interviewed the preferred firm.', 'Based on these criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends IBI Group as the best qualified firm to perform a system-by-system needs assessment of BBB’s technology infrastructure. This is based on its: 1) subject matter expertise with end-to-end transit technology systems; 2) specific experience with South California transit; 3)knowledge of systems from a full range of vendors and knowledge of emerging technologies; 4) history as innovators with bus rapid transit and transit signal priority implementations; and 5) proven focus on making transit work.', 'IBI Group has successfully conducted similar projects (needs assessments, transit system technology roadmaps, and technology strategic plans) as well as provided system implementation support for CAD-AVL and other onboard, business intelligence, and other transit-specific technology systems for clients throughout North America. Clients on the West Coast include TriMet in Portland, OR; King County and Community Transit in Washington State; AC Transit in Northern California; and LA Metro, Foothill Transit, and Long Beach Transit in our region. All references were positive.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to IBI Group is for an amount not to exceed $204,040. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget in account C410113.589000. If BBB moves forward with any procurement recommendations by the consultant, funds will be available in the Capital Improvement Program or as funding becomes available.']}
{'Title': 'Olympic Well Field Groundwater Management Contract Amendment', 'Department': 'Public Works, Water Resources', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement #9916 in the amount of $1,573,000 (including a 10% contingency) and extend the term for an additional three years to June 30, 2021, with ICF International, a Virginia-based company, to continue the regulatory mandated groundwater monitoring and studies related to the remediation of groundwater contamination in the Olympic Well Field and for adaptive management of the City’s groundwater resources to help achieve the City’s water self-sufficiency goals. This will result in a seven-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $4,378,636, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'ICF International is the City’s environmental consultant responsible for implementing the Olympic Well Field Groundwater Management Program to monitor and remediate groundwater contaminated with volatile organic compounds (VOCs) by third-party manufacturing facilities. The City’s current four-year agreement expires on June 30, 2018. The Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board (LARWQCB) mandates the City continue to monitor Olympic Well Field groundwater quality to ensure Santa Monica’s wells successfully capture and filter out these VOCs until they are reduced to safe levels. Further, because the Olympic Well Field is a significant source of drinking water for the City, this resource is necessary to help achieve the City’s water self-sufficiency goals. Staff therefore recommends a second modification to Agreement #9916 with ICF International to extend the term by three years to June 30, 2021 in the amount of $1,573,000 (including a 10% contingency). This will result in a seven-year amended agreement not to exceed $4,378,636.', 'Background', 'The Olympic Well Field is the City’s second largest source of groundwater supply. Historically, the Olympic Well Field was adversely impacted by volatile organic compounds (VOCs) from several former manufacturing facilities in the immediate area. The City pumps groundwater for treatment and public consumption from two groundwater wells located in the Olympic Well Field. The City entered into Settlement and Release Agreements with Boeing and Gillette that formerly conducted business in the Olympic Well Field area.', 'Conditions set forth by the LARWQCB require the City to demonstrate that dissolved-phase VOC plumes in the Olympic Well Field are captured by the pumping of the City’s production wells. To document this condition, the City subsequently developed the Olympic Well Field Management Plan in June 2012 to guide its efforts to monitor water quality, model VOC concentrations in the groundwater, and demonstrate plume capture.', 'On June 10, 2014, Council approved award of a competitively bid agreement with ICF for a term of up to four years not to exceed $2,220,900 to implement the Olympic Well Field Management Plan (Attachment A). To support the implementation of the Olympic Well Field Management Plan, on March 22, 2016 the City Council authorized a first modification to the PSA not to exceed $584,736 for additional groundwater program activities including the installation and development of additional groundwater monitoring wells and the redevelopment of existing wells (Attachment B).', 'Discussion', 'This proposed second modification would extend the agreement, set to expire on June 30, 2018, by three years until June 30, 2021 for the continuance of groundwater program activities required by the LARWQCB, and several tasks necessary to support the City’s goal of water self-sufficiency (Attachment C).', 'ICF has been the City’s primary environmental consultant and liaison with the LARWQCB in the Olympic Subbasin since 2014. As such, they have specialized expertise and experience with the site geology and hydrogeologic flow modeling of the Olympic Well Field aquifers, upon which the City depends for a significant portion of its local water supply. They are also especially knowledgeable with the terms and requirements of the Olympic Subbasin remediation agreement between the City and the LARWQCB. Their original contract was to perform quarterly groundwater monitoring for the City Yards property that had underground storage tanks. Their scope of work was subsequently expanded via a modification in 2016 to include, among other things, installation of three additional groundwater monitoring wells per the request of the LARWQCB, installation of dedicated sampling pumps in the City’s monitoring well network, groundwater monitoring and reporting, numerical groundwater flow modeling to document Olympic Well Field VOC plume capture, and as-needed technical support. The scope of work for this proposed amendment includes the following tasks designed to support the Olympic Well Field Management Plan, document aquifer contamination cleanup, and achieve the City’s water self-sufficiency goals as they pertain to the Olympic Subbasin.', 'Task 1 - Groundwater Monitoring', 'Continue the quarterly groundwater quality monitoring and reporting as described in the Olympic Well Field Management Plan. The monitoring is required by the LARWQCB and includes the 22 monitoring wells currently in the network. This data is vital to the documentation of aquifer contamination cleanup and restoration.', 'Task 2 - Supplemental Olympic Subbasin Groundwater Flow and Transport Modeling', 'Supplemental groundwater flow and transport modeling is necessary to assess potential impacts the proposed new water supply wells and aquifer recharge may have on the current configuration of the identified groundwater VOC plume. Documentation of plume location, size and capture is required by the LARWQCB.', 'Task 3 - Hydrogeologic Studies to Support Adaptive Management of Groundwater Resources', 'As part of the City’s ongoing efforts to attain water self-sufficiency, additional groundwater transport and associated hydrogeologic studies are necessary to allow for the adaptive management of the City’s groundwater resources in and around the Olympic Subbasin. Specific tasks include the time-critical review and assessment of natural groundwater recharge in the basin, peer review of the updated sustainable yield analysis, and liaising with the United States Geological Survey (USGS) on behalf of the City to incorporate the City’s existing flow model into the USGS regional (basin-wide) flow model.', 'Task 4 - As Needed Technical Support', 'On an as-needed basis, miscellaneous technical support may be required by the City in support of its identified objectives of remediating the Olympic Well Field and, most importantly, achieving its water self-sufficiency goals. Potential tasks include, but are not limited to, preparation of specialized presentations or maps at the request of the City, analysis of remote sensing data, peer review of third-party plans and reports, and analysis of exploratory boring geology, geophysical logs, and water quality.', 'Consultant Selection', 'Because of ICF’s extensive and specialized knowledge of the Olympic Subbasin aquifers, its long-standing relationship and credibility with the LARWQCB on behalf of the City, and the time critical nature of the proposed scope related to assessing the updated sustainable yield analysis, the proposed second modification offers the best value to the City. It would be very time-consuming and costly to bring a new contractor up to speed on the intricacies of the Olympic Well Field hydrogeologic flow model, the extensive amount of existing groundwater data necessary to successfully implement the Olympic Well Field Management Plan and help the City achieve water self-sufficiency in a timely way. Due to time constraints and the fact that ICF has specialized knowledge and experience of the Olympic Well Field, staff recommends a second modification to Agreement #9916 with ICF International to extend the term by three years to June 30, 2021 in the amount of $1,573,000 (including a 10% contingency). This will result in a seven-year amended agreement not to exceed $4,378,636.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to ICF International is $1,573,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $4,378,636. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts.', 'C019045.589000', 'Water Mediation Settlement Funds', '$1,273,000', 'C259224.589000', 'Water Funds', '$300,000', 'TOTAL', '$1,573,000', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar (DInSAR) Contract Modification', 'Department': 'Public Works, Water Resources', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement #3200 in the amount of $100,000 with Earth Consultants International, Inc. (ECI), a California-based company, for a supplemental Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar (DInSAR) study of the Santa Monica Groundwater Basin (SMGB) to assist in identifying sustainable amounts of water available for future potable use and extend the term of the agreement. This will result in a five-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $172,740 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'A preliminary analysis of the Santa Monica Basin indicates there may be additional groundwater pathways that were previously unknown. Utilization of water from the Santa Monica Basin is a fundamental strategy in the City’s efforts to meet its goal of water self-sufficiency, and to maintain safe, sustainable local sources of water for Santa Monica. Additional study would determine whether those pathways exist or not. Therefore, staff recommends that Council approve a second modification to ECI contract #3200 in the amount of $100,000 and extend the term by 3 years to November 2021. ECI would conduct the required supplemental study as well as annual updates of the supplemental study to incorporate any new data that may become available.', 'Background', 'On November 15, 2016, the City retained ECI to conduct a preliminary Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar (DInSAR) study to assess, among other things, whether historic pumping activities at the City’s well fields may have caused compaction of the aquifer sediments, which could contribute to less water being produced. The preliminary study did not find evidence of significant sediment compaction but did identify previously unknown pathways for natural recharge of the City’s aquifers. If confirmed by this supplemental study, these previously unknown hydrogeologic pathways could be used to help site additional water supply wells in order to achieve and sustain long-term water self-sufficiency for the City.', 'DInSAR is a satellite-based radar technology that is capable of measuring very small changes in surface elevation. The level of detail and broad area coverage that DInSAR data can provide makes it a valuable and cost-effective tool for the management of local groundwater resources and sustainability. The method has been used for more than 20 years by government agencies and research institutions to assess the conditions of groundwater basins and monitor land subsidence in areas with significant groundwater extraction rates.', 'Discussion', 'Staff now seeks to build on the preliminary work done with ECI to better understand how these newly identified pathways could benefit the City’s groundwater resources. If confirmed by this study, the seasonal recharge could increase the current estimate of how much groundwater the City can sustainably pump from the Santa Monica Basin and provide a powerful planning tool for adaptive management of the City’s groundwater resources. The additional data would also be useful for the City’s required Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (SGMA) efforts including creation of a state-mandated Groundwater Sustainability Plan for the Santa Monica Basin by 2022.', 'The supplemental study would involve conducting a sequential analysis of paired interferograms (radar images), with an emphasis on more recent data obtained during the annual wet and dry seasons (October-April and May-September, respectively). The objective of the study is to determine whether short-term cyclical positive deformation (rising land levels) is due to inflow of seasonal natural recharge into the groundwater basin. These data, if confirmed, would be useful in refining calculations of basin recharge volumes and for planning sustainable pumping schedules for the City’s long-term water self-sufficiency objectives to be discussed with Council this summer.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In October 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for a DInSAR study of potential land elevation changes related to groundwater extractions and recharge for the Santa Monica Basin. The RFP was sent to five consulting firms drawn from a prequalified list. Of the five firms, two responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department.', '· Tetra Tech', '· Earth Consultants International, Inc. (ECI)', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: (previous experience, references, ability to deliver the scope of work, and specialized qualifications).  Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends ECI as the best qualified firm to perform DInSAR study.', 'Completion of additional DInSAR analysis is critical to updating the preliminary sustainable yield analysis and updating the City’s Sustainable Water Master Plan, which are currently scheduled for presentation to City Council in summer 2018. Due to time constraints and the fact that ECI successfully completed the initial study, a second modification to the existing contract with ECI is recommended as the most cost effective and efficient way for the City to proceed.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to Earth Consultants International, Inc. is $100,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $172,740. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C259223.589000.  Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award Construction Contract for Access Path Replacement at Palisades Park and Virginia Avenue Park Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': 'Director Susan Cline', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #SP2467 to STL Landscape, Inc., a California-based company, for the Access Path Replacement at Palisades Park and Virginia Avenue Park Project;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with STL Landscape, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $786,500 (including a $71,500 contingency);Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Access Path Replacement at Palisades Park and Virginia Avenue Park Project would replace approximately 115,000 square feet of the existing decomposed granite (DG) that has worn down over time from use by pedestrians, joggers, and cyclists. This substantial use in conjunction with the impacts of the environment and weather over the years have created uneven surfaces along the pathways that degrade the experience of the users. Staff recommends STL Landscape, Inc. to replace the access paths in both parks for an amount not to exceed $786,500 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Discussion', 'To improve the condition of the DG pathways and enhance pedestrian safety, staff recommends replacing the worn down pathway material with new stabilized DG. The product selected for this project would be a natural, organic, permeable and non-eroding material.', 'Contractor Selection – Construction', 'On November 29, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the Access Path Replacement at Palisades Park and Virginia Avenue Park in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Forty-nine vendors downloaded the bid. Six bids were received and publicly opened on December 21, 2017:', 'Bidder', 'Bid Amount', 'STL Landscape, Inc.', '$ 715,000.00', 'GMZ Engineering Inc.', '$ 727,250.00', 'Environmental Construction Inc.', '$ 766,500.00', 'C.S. Legacy Construction, Inc.', '$ 856,096.00', 'PCN3, Inc.', '$ 877,950.00', 'Excel Paving', '$1,099,747.00', 'Engineer’s Estimate: $800,000.00', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City specifications. STL Landscape, Inc. has completed similar projects for Caltrans, Los Angeles County, Montebello Unified School District and the cities of Santa Ana, Claremont, Rolling Hills Estate and Santa Monica. Staff contacted references listed in the bid package, and all respondents reported that work performed by STL Landscape, Inc. was completed within the project requirements. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that STL Landscape, Inc.’s license is current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, STL Landscape, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder for the Access Path Replacement at Palisades Park and Virginia Avenue Park Project.', 'Construction Schedule and Management', 'Construction work is anticipated to begin in May 2018 and last for approximately four months. Staff is coordinating with Community and Cultural Services to phase construction at the two locations and ensure that impacts to park use are minimized to the extent possible during peak summer dates. Further delaying the project would fail to address community complaints and accessibility concerns related to the poor conditions of the parks’ pathways. City staff would provide construction management for this project, to include inspecting the contractor’s work during construction, verifying and documenting field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts as a result of the construction activities, attending the contractor’s safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings, and maintaining all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work conducted during construction. Construction management staff would coordinate with the Community and Cultural Services Department regarding park activities, and with the Public Landscape Division regarding maintenance activities on a daily basis.', 'Public Outreach', 'Due to the nature of this project, staff anticipates access interruptions to specific park areas. To mitigate these temporary public impacts, staff will conduct comprehensive outreach, including weekly updates on the City’s “Know Before You Go” (KBUG) web page and in the Santa Monica Daily Press. For work requiring temporary closures of park trails or facilities, highly visible signs would be placed at the parks to notify the public. Staff also plan to provide mailed notices, post information on social media, and the City’s webpage to help inform the community.', 'California Coastal Commission De Minimis Waiver', 'On November 27, 2017, the California Coastal Commission issued a Notice of “Permit Exemption/No Permit Required” allowing for the development of the project as described. Commission Reference Number: 5-17-0410-X.  The Virginia Avenue Park portion of the project is not located within the California Coastal Zone and therefore no permit exemption is required.', 'The project is categorically exempt from the provisions of California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15301(c) and Section 15302 of the CEQA Guidelines. Class 1 exempt projects include the "operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination." Class 2 exempt projects include the “replacement or reconstruction of existing structures and facilities where the new structure would be located on the same site as the structure replaced and would have substantially the same purpose and capacity as the structure replaced.” The project\'s replacement of decomposed granite for an existing bicycle/pedestrian pathway qualifies as a Class 1 and Class 2 project exempt from CEQA. In addition, none of the exceptionsspecified in Section 15300.2 of CEQA Guidelines would apply that would preclude the use of this CEQA exemption: the project site is not located in a sensitive environment, theproject would not have a significant effect on the environment, the project would not damage scenic resources, the project would not be located on a hazardous waste site and the project would not cause a change to a historical resource. Therefore, this project is categorically exempt from CEQA.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to STL Landscape, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $786,500. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:', 'Account No.', 'Description', 'FY 2017-18', 'C019166.589000', 'Access Path Replacement–Palisades Park', '$650,000', 'C019169.589000', 'Access Path Replacement–Virginia Avenue Park', '$136,500', 'Total Funds Available', '$786,500']}
{'Title': '2017 Bulletproof Vest Partnership Grant', 'Department': 'Police Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $29,070 from the United States Department of Justice (USDOJ) for the 2017 Bulletproof Vest Partnership (BVP) grant;2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant; andAuthorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) has been awarded a two-year grant of $29,070 from the U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ), Bureau of Justice Assistance (BJA) as part of the 2017 Bulletproof Vest Partnership (BVP) grant program. This grant would reimburse SMPD for 40 percent of the cost of approximately 35 replacement bulletproof vests purchased under the program. Funds must be spent by August 31, 2020.', 'Discussion', 'The Bulletproof Vest Partnership (BVP), created by the Bulletproof Vest Partnership Grant Act of 1998, is a unique U.S. Department of Justice initiative designed to provide a critical resource to state and local law enforcement.', 'Since 1999, more than 13,000 jurisdictions have participated in the BVP Program, with more than $430 million in federal funds committed to support the purchase of over 1.2 million bulletproof vests. The DOJ Office of Justice Programs’ BJA administers the BVP Program.', 'Bulletproof vests save lives by protecting officers from gunfire. The vests are an important resource for officer safety, which was one of the six main pillars identified in the Final Report of the President’s Task Force on 21st Century Policing released in 2015. The report states that every law enforcement officer should be provided with a bulletproof vest and that all law enforcement agencies should adopt policies that require officers to wear bulletproof vests.', "The Santa Monica Police Department currently provides a vest to every sworn and field assigned uniformed civilian employee and has a policy mandating that these employees wear their assigned vests. The City has been a recipient of these grant funds previously in 2006, 2010 and 2013 - 2016. These grant funds would help SMPD to continue to meet the mission of providing every law enforcement officer with a bulletproof vest. The 2017 program funding would provide for approximately 35 replacement vests. Bulletproof vests are on a five-year replacement cycle because of the degradation of the Kevlar from repetitive use; additionally, body moisture reduces the vest's ability to maintain the threat level guarantee, a circumstance that voids the manufacturer's warranty. The current grant award of $29,070 would support the purchase of the vests through August 2020.", 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Award of a $29,070 grant from the US Department of Justice Bulletproof Vest Partnership requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', '1. Establish revenue budget at account 20304.403754 in the amount of $29,070.', '2. Appropriate $29,070 to account 20304.578854 to reflect receipt of the U.S. Department of Justice Bulletproof Vest Partnership Grant.', '3. Funding is available in the amount of $43,729 in account 01304.544020 in the FY 2017 – 18 budget.']}
{'Title': "Santa Monica Police Department's Participation in the Pink Patch Project", 'Department': 'Police Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': "Staff recommends that the City approve the Police Department's continued participation in the nationwide Pink Patch Project (PPP).", 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Pink Patch Program (PPP) is a collaborative effort of 224 public safety agencies whose goal is to raise public awareness about breast cancer and to fundraise for research and treatment. The funds are raised by the sales of a pink version of the Police Department’s traditional uniform patch among other commemorative items made available for purchase to the public. Proceeds are donated in equal amounts to two local community organizations: the Saint John’s Health Center Foundation Breast Center and UCLA Santa Monica Breast Center.', 'Discussion', 'Coordinated by the Los Angeles County Police Chiefs’ Association, the PPP is an innovative breast cancer public awareness campaign designed to stimulate conversation with community members about the life-saving benefits of early detection and intervention. On January 1, 2017, the Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) became a participating agency of the PPP. In a four-month period, the department raised $3,360 and subsequently donated funds to two selected local organizations that support the project’s mission, the Saint John’s Health Center Foundation Breast Center and the UCLA Santa Monica Breast Center.', 'The Police Department would like approval to continue the sales of the pink police patch, pink patch t-shirts and sweaters, among other commemorative items. All proceeds raised will be deposited into a designated City account and distributed annually in equal amounts to the Saint John’s Health Center Foundation Breast Center and the UCLA Santa Monica Breast Center.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The cost of the patches and other memorabilia will be absorbed by the proceeds from sales and there will be no expense to the City. Net proceeds will be distributed equally to the Santa John’s Health Center Foundation Breast Center and the UCLA Santa Monica Breast Center.', 'Finance has established the following accounts for the Pink Patch Project:', '1. Revenue budget account 04304.408960 to reflect proceeds of pink patches and other memorabilia.', '2. Account 04304.566130 to reflect expenses and proceeds distribution.']}
{'Title': 'Selection of Default Phase 2 Renewable Electricity Tiers & Rates for the Clean Power Alliance of Southern California', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City CouncilApprove the recommended tiers of renewable energy to be offered for Phase 2 commercial customers and municipal accounts.Approve the transition of the City’s non-Direct Access accounts to be served by Clean Power Alliance of Southern California with the 100% renewable energy product.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In January 2015, Council directed staff to evaluate sub-regional Community Choice Aggregation (CCA) programs as a way to achieve community-wide reductions in greenhouse gas emissions from electricity generation by providing competitively-priced electricity from renewable sources to Santa Monica homes and businesses (Attachment A). Community Choice Aggregation or Community Choice Energy (CCA) allows local governments to purchase and sell electricity to customers in their jurisdictions as an alternative to traditional investor-owned utility (IOU) power procurement (Southern California Edison is the city’s IOU). In December 2017, Council voted to join Los Angeles Community Choice Energy (LACCE), since re-named the Clean Power Alliance of Southern California (CPASC) (Attachment B) because it has expanded beyond Los Angeles County cities. CPASC will offer multiple tiers of renewable energy products to customers of member cities, with the goal of achieving higher renewables than Southern California Edison (SCE), the existing electric utility.', 'As a member, Santa Monica can choose the default tiers of renewable energy products to be offered to Phase 2 commercial customers and municipal accounts. This selection will be finalized March 1 at the CPASC Board meeting. CPASC staff have recommended that member cities select a default tier for customers from tier structure options including 36%, 50% or 100% of renewable energy.', 'Staff recommends that Council recommend an alternative tier structure of 50%, 60-65% and 100% renewable energy, with the default product being 60-65% to maintain cost neutrality with SCE’s current base rates. In the event that CPASC does not accept the alternative tier structure, staff recommend that Council select 50% as the default tier product to be offered initially. Staff also recommends that eligible municipal accounts select the 100% tier. This recommendation would impact 13% of the City of Santa Monica’s energy accounts, at an approximate cost increase of $43,000 annually across various division utility accounts (Attachment C).', 'Background', 'On December 5, 2017, Council approved the first reading of the ordinance to join the Los Angeles Community Choice Energy (LACCE) and implement CCA in Santa Monica. Councilmember McKeown was selected as Santa Monica’s Director to the LACCE Board.', 'On December 7, 2017, the LACCE Board approved electricity rates for Phase 1 (County-owned accounts). For energy supplied at 60% renewable power, 25% carbon free power, and 15% unspecified power, the County accounts would see an average 2% discount on rates compared to Southern California Edison.', 'On January 17, 2018, the LACCE Board approved a power procurement strategy, and data and billing services for Phase 2, which would encompass all members’ municipal accounts and commercial customer accounts. Phase 2 is slated for June 2018 service launch.', 'On February 1, 2018, the LACCE Board approved a new name: Clean Power Alliance of Southern California (CPASC).', 'Discussion', 'Community Choice Aggregation or Community Choice Energy (CCA or CCE) allows local governments to purchase and sell electricity to customers in their jurisdictions as an alternative to traditional investor-owned utility (IOU) power procurement (California IOUs are Pacific Gas and Electric Company, San Diego Gas & Electric, Southern California Edison and Southern California Gas Company).', 'Local governments ‘aggregate’ the electrical demand of their community and procure power on their behalf. This is known as ‘energy generation’ and is paid by kilowatt-hour (kWh). The portion of the utility bill that is associated with energy generation is remitted back to the local government.', 'The incumbent IOU still conveys that power (transmission and distribution) to all customers and provides one utility bill to all customers (Southern California Edison is Santa Monica’s incumbent IOU).The portion of the utility bill that is associated with transmission, distribution and demand charges (paid by kilowatt priced at hourly intervals) is remitted back to the utility.', 'CCAs are established by a local ordinance voted on by the governing body of a county, city or special district (e.g. local water agency or public utility district). No public vote or referendum is required. CCA’s are opt-out programs, which means that utility customers are defaulted into becoming a CCA customer and must actively opt-out to remain with the incumbent IOU.', 'CPASC will launch electricity service to customers in phases: 1) LA County municipal accounts; 2) member city and county municipal accounts, and commercial customers; and 3) member city and county residential customers. The phases will initiate in February 2018, June 2018, and December 2018/January 2019, respectively.', 'On February 5, 2018, CPASC staff issued a memo instructing Board members to select their preference for default products to be offered for Phase 2 customers in their respective jurisdictions. Phase 2, which is anticipated to start in June 2018, will cover member city and county municipal accounts, and commercial customers. The memo offered Board members a three-tiered structure of 36%, 50% and 100% renewable energy (RE) products and requested members select the ‘default’ product to be offered to municipal accounts and commercial customers. Customers would have the options to opt up, down or out of the program entirely. Board members were instructed to voice their preliminary preference for a ‘default’ product to be offered (the product all customers would be offered by default) on February 12. The final tiers and rates would be approved at the CPASC Board meeting on March 1, 2018.', 'Staff, as well as the City’s appointed CPASC Board Member Councilmember McKeown, recommend adopting a more aggressive tier structure with higher renewable energy mixes that would not increase costs over SCE’s standard rates at the ‘default’ level. While CPASC staff are not currently offering the choice of a higher RE tier structure, staff is seeking Council direction to pursue a higher RE tier structure in order to encourage CPASC staff and board members to explore that option at the March 1 Board meeting.', 'SCE’s standard energy offering includes approximately 34% renewable energy for 2018. CPASC staff and its consultant, The Energy Authority, provided a comparison against SCE’s anticipated rates (Table 1). Staff estimates that a CPASC product of 60-65% RE could be cost-competitive with SCE’s base rate (34% RE), based on the rates confirmed for Phase 1 CPASC accounts. This “sweet spot” of maximizing renewable sources for electricity generation provides at a rate equal to what customers pay now for a mix of energy that is far more dependent on carbon would provide a “sweet green” tier most attractive to resident and business customers looking to maximize environmental benefits while minimizing additional costs.', 'Table 1. Estimated Rate Comparison', '(CPASC indicative rates vs. SCE’s rates)', 'Clean Power Alliance Plan (prepared by CPASC staff and contractors)', 'Net Bill Discount from SCE Standard Plan (34% RE)', 'Net Bill Discount from SCE Plans with Comparable RE Mixes', '36% Renewable', '-4%', 'N/A', '50% Renewable', '-3%', '-12%', '60-65% Renewable*', 'Recommended Option', '-2%', 'N/A', '100% Renewable', '+7%', '-10%', '* City staff analysis extrapolated from The Energy Authority’s data.', 'Commercial Accounts', 'Staff recommends that the Council approve the selection of 50%, 60-65% and 100% as the preferred tier structure for all commercial customers and municipal accounts, and that the 60-65% product be the default product offered. In the event that this more aggressive tier structure is not offered, staff recommends selecting 50% as the default product within the CPASC-proposed structure (36%, 50%, 100% RE). While it may not be feasible to change the tier rate structure initially, as the new entity gains traction and customers, the cost-competitive “sweet green” level of 60-65% may be added as an option with support from member cities focused on the environmental advantages of community choice aggregation.', 'Municipal Accounts', 'Since 1999, the City has procured 100% renewable energy through Direct Access – a unique status under state law that allowed the City to procure electricity directly from alternative energy service providers (and not SCE) for a certain period of time. New accounts are not eligible for grandfathered status under this law. Energy prices through Direct Access are up to 40% less than SCE’s rates, allowing the City to procure renewable power at much cheaper rates than what is available from SCE and what would be available from CPASC.', 'Currently, the City procures 100% renewable energy for its municipal accounts under Direct Access that complies with the State’s Renewable Portfolio Standard. The City pays approximately $1.4M annually to its Direct Access energy service provider for the electricity the City uses. In addition, the City pays SCE approximately $4.6M annually for its transmission and distribution services as the incumbent utility.  As City operations expanded, new electricity accounts were created, but were not eligible for Direct Access at the time of their creation. Of the City’s 695 electric accounts, 609 are under Direct Access and receive 100% renewable energy. The other 86 are not currently under Direct Access, and account for approximately 13% of municipal energy use (5.3 annual MWh out of the total 41.3 annual MWh).  These accounts are receiving SCE’s base level of renewable energy.', 'Staff recommends that these non-Direct Access accounts purchase energy through CPASC at the 100% renewable energy tier, bringing all accounts to 100% renewable energy and ensuring that the City is completely green-powered. Based on the preliminary analysis (Attachment C), these accounts would see a 7% increase in energy generation costs compared to SCE’s base kWh rate according to analysis prepared by The Energy Authority on behalf of the CPASC. The net impact to the affected accounts would be an approximate 5% increase, since energy generation represents only a portion of the utility bill (the remainder is for transmission and distribution).', 'Based on preliminary analysis of the most recent month of electric bills for the City, staff estimates this 5% increase would roughly translate into a cumulative $3,580 net increase per month for all municipal accounts purchasing CPASC energy. The annual cost would be roughly $43,000.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Recommending that the default tier for commercial energy customers in Santa Monica be 60-65% renewable would not have any fiscal impact on the City and is anticipated to be cost-neutral for those customers. Those customers would have the option to select a lower or a higher rate at their discretion.', 'Purchasing energy from the CPASC for the City’s non-Direct Access municipal accounts is estimated to cost roughly $43,000 annually above current energy costs. If the program begins in June 2018, the estimated monthly increase of $3,580 could be', 'covered in the FY 2017-18 operating budget in various accounts currently paying for non-Direct Access electricity. Budget approval for future years would be contingent on Council approval.']}
{'Title': 'Cancellation of Regular City Council Meetings Scheduled for the March 13, 2018 and July 10, 2018, and Scheduling a Special Meeting for March 6, 2018', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council vote to:1. Cancel the regular meetings scheduled for March 13, 2018 and July 10, 2018 due to a lack of quorum; and2. Schedule a special meeting for March 6, 2018.'}
{'Title': 'Approval of minutes for the January 9, 2018 Redevelopment Successor Agency meeting.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the Redevelopment Successor Agency approve the minutes for the January 9, 2018 meeting.'}
{'Title': 'Annual Update on City Investment Policy', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review and approve the City’s revised Investment Policy; and2. Extend the delegation of investment authority to the Director of Finance, as City Treasurer, from March 1, 2018 through February 28, 2019.Staff also recommends that the Successor Agency Governing Board:1. Review and approve the City Investment Policy for Successor Agency Investments; and2. Extend investment authority to the Treasurer of the Successor Agency, from March 1, 2018 through February 28, 2019.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'State law requires that the City adopt an investment policy (Attachment A) and that the City Council annually consider the policy at a public meeting. The Santa Monica City Charter delegates the authority for investing City funds to the Director of Finance as the City Treasurer. State law requires that the Council delegate investment authority to the City Treasurer for a one-year period, renewable annually. The current delegation of authority carries through February 28, 2018. In addition, Santa Monica City Charter Section 711 delegates the authority to invest City funds to the City Treasurer.', 'Discussion', 'City investments are made only in those instruments specifically authorized by California State laws, primarily Sections 53601, 16429.1, and 53684 et seq. of the Government Code. Within these legal guidelines, the three primary objectives of the City’s Investment Policy and investment practices, in priority order are:', '· Safety – Safety of principal is the foremost objective of the City’s investment program. City investments shall be undertaken in a manner that seeks to ensure the preservation of capital in the overall portfolio by diversifying its investments among a variety of securities offering independent returns.', '· Liquidity – City investments are kept sufficiently liquid to enable the City to meet all operating requirements which might be reasonably anticipated by structuring the portfolio so that securities mature concurrently with anticipated cash needs to the extent possible. Investments are primarily made in securities with active secondary or resale markets. Additionally, an adequate liquidity buffer is maintained for extraordinary circumstances.', '· Rate of Return – The City’s investment portfolio is designed with the objective of attaining a benchmark rate of return throughout budgetary and economic cycles taking into account safety and liquidity requirements. The benchmark may vary from time to time depending on the economic and budgetary conditions present.', 'The City continues to abide by the highest professional standards in the management of public funds. While the investment strategy is flexible and can change based on market and economic conditions, the legal and policy guidelines governing these investment decisions remain relatively static. In addition, the City Investment Policy includes socially responsible investment principles. In recent years, the City has added divestment from fossil fuels and from banks providing funding to fossil fuel companies to the policy, which resulted in the sale of two Wells Fargo bonds from the City’s portfolio in 2017.', 'On an on-going basis, staff also reviews public agency investment best practices and regulatory or legal changes to ensure City compliance. Staff has reviewed the latest Local Agency Investment Guidelines Report issued by the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission. There are no significant statutory changes requiring revisions to the City’s Investment Policy. Minor revisions reflecting staffing changes in the investment process are included. Only minor wording revisions are included in this year’s update.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions. Staff provides monthly reports to the City Council and the City Manager describing the present status of City investments and monies held by the City, and summarizing all investment transactions for the month. Interest earnings from the City’s pooled investment portfolio are allocated to the various City funds based upon each fund’s share of total City cash and investments. Projected investment earnings for each fund are included in the FY 2017-18 Revised Budget. No budget action is required at this time.']}
{'Title': 'The Future of Big Blue Bus', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '04. Study Sessions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff requests that the City Council review Big Blue Bus (BBB) governance, service design, and service delivery strategies and provide guidance to staff for framing the future of BBB.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary:', 'Big Blue Bus is the third largest municipal bus operator in Los Angeles County, providing service to the City and the Westside through 20 fixed route bus lines, a late night demand-response service from one of the Expo light rail stations, and a community Dial-A-Ride service (now branded MODE) that provides transportation to seniors and disabled City residents within the City limits. The service has a proud 90 year-history of providing cost-effective, high-quality bus transit to residents and neighbors of Santa Monica and offering connections to the region beyond. It has won the prestigious American Public Transportation Association’s Outstanding Transportation System award five times, last in 2011.', 'Since the inauguration of Santa Monica Municipal Bus Lines service in 1928, the system has matured to a sub-regional transportation operation, providing 54,000 daily trips to 58 square miles of LA County.', 'BBB has been tremendously successful as a leader in the County and the transportation industry. BBB has been a marketplace leader from technology innovations like BBB’s mobile phone applications for real-time schedule information and fare payment, to utilizing metrics to measure system performance to make informed decisions on service delivery, to leading the country in sustainability efforts by propelling buses with Near-Zero emissions engines fueled with Renewable Natural Gas (RNG).', 'As a result of historical transit ridership declines in the US and in LA County (per capita ridership has seen a consistent decrease since 2002), staff has undertaken a number of initiatives to provide more efficient and effective service, understanding that the cost for the provision of service has increased 1.17% over the last year. Should we continue to operate service in the current model, financial projections prepared for the Five Year Budget Forecast predict that the structural operating deficit could approach $11 million by FY19-20, and that subsequent years could exhaust BBB reserves by FY21-22.', 'Since providing the current level of service with the current service model would not be sustainable, the time has come to chart a new direction to ensure a sustainable transit model for our City’s residents, visitors and the Westside. We face the opportunity and challenge of adapting to the unfolding changes in mobility – including becoming more efficient in the delivery of our service, and focusing on enriching the customer experience in order to both retain current customers, and attract new ones. Staff is targeting the value that our service provides to our customers by improving the wellbeing of Santa Monica and Los Angeles (LA) residents, in addition to the value that we provide to the visitors who use our service.', 'While many agencies have decided to “wait out” the tectonic changes in our marketplace (thinking that these were cyclical ridership anomalies), BBB staff aggressively undertook new programs and projects to improve service quality, enhance the customer experience, and become nimbler. Customer amenities described in detail later in the report include mobile applications for fare payment and real time schedule information, discounted fares through TAP, Blue to Business, Discounted Youth Pass, and partnership with Lyft for late night and Dial-a-Ride (now branded MODE) service to the City.', 'Concurrently, staff has worked diligently to reduce and contain operating expenditures, including the engagement of a Third Party Administrator, Intercare Holdings, to manage our worker’s compensation program, installation of collision avoidance technology on the fleet to reduce accidents and support the City’s Vision Zero program, and streamlining the selection process and training program for Motor Coach Operators to optimize workforce availability. We have continued to use BBB Key Performance Indicators (KPIs) to enhance and improve operational performance and reliability (On Time Performance, Miles between Road Failures).', 'All these trends, challenges and opportunities take place in the context of Santa Monica’s Strategic Goal of “Creating a new model of mobility” set by the City Council in 2015. BBB is an integral player in this effort, and the future of our local and regional transit service is interwoven into discussions about bike, pedestrian and other modes of “first-mile, last-mile” connections between where people live, and where they journey for work, school, shopping, and services.', 'This report provides a summation of where we have been and the challenges we face today. It addresses some of the dramatic changes to the mobility landscape never before experienced by the transit industry. In looking to the future, staff seeks Council’s guidance on charting the future of BBB and poses three alternative options for framing the discussion:', '· Are we a leader?', '· Are we a partner?', '· Should we get out of the way?', 'The final section of this report, Where We’re Going: The Road to 2018, provides a comprehensive discussion on these three major areas for Council guidance:', '· Governance: A discussion on the appropriate future governing body for BBB as well as discussion on what policy and regulatory issues could be addressed to incentivize mass transit, define Santa Monica as a “Transit First” City, and allow the department to become nimbler.', '· Service Design: What should our transit system look like in the future based upon the Service Design options presented? Is the Council receptive to adopting new service planning standards understanding the current state of the market?', '· Service Delivery: How do we best provide efficient and effective service in the future? Is now the appropriate time to develop partnerships to provide more efficient service in order to maintain core service and provide other mobility options to the community?', 'Finally, since this study session will raise questions about governance and service delivery methodologies, a commitment to ensuring that a collective and collaborative approach is taken with all BBB staff to re-position BBB for future success is critical. Therefore, the BBB leadership team is committed to providing a thoughtful, engaging process for all levels of BBB staff to participate in an internal culture change to make this a successful journey serving all our diverse transit stakeholders: riders, community members and BBB staff.', 'Discussion', 'Where We’ve Been: The First 90 Years', 'During the first 90 years of service, BBB has been an industry leader in innovative approaches to service delivery and enhancing the customer experience. BBB is the third largest municipal bus operator in LA County providing service to the City and the Westside through 20 fixed route bus lines, a late night demand-response service from one of the Expo light rail stations, and a community demand-response service, MODE, that provides transportation to seniors and disabled City residents within the City limits, a service not offered by most other municipalities in LA County. This service is provided by BBB in addition to the complementary Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) paratransit service provided by Access Services.', 'The most recent comprehensive operational analysis, Evolution of Blue, was approved by City Council on April 28, 2015 and implemented in 2014-2016 to ensure that the system provided first-last mile connectivity to the seven new rail stations in the service area, and updated routes and schedules that had not been holistically analyzed in more than 15 years.', 'BBB has led the industry with transit technology by providing customer-friendly fare payment options through TAP, and was the second system in the County to also offer fare payment through a mobile ticketing app. Other technology applications include real-time schedule information available via mobile apps and at 34 bus stops in Santa Monica, customer and staff safety and security features through BBB’s CAD/AVL Radio System, on-board video surveillance systems, and proximity sensors and cameras installed on buses that alert operators to nearby pedestrians, bicycles, and vehicles in time to prevent collisions.', 'Over the years, the system has consistently ranked in the 90th percentile in customer satisfaction and in the industry for the following core strengths:', 'Fleet reliability, cleanliness, appearance, and sustainability: 100% of BBB’s fleet is propelled by clean RNG with projected further reduction of NOx emissions by more than 90 percent in 2018 with the current procurement of 27 more buses with near-zero emission engines. Average fleet age is less than 6 years, with an industry best practice of 8.5 years.', 'Infrastructure: BBB has a state of the art maintenance facility, fueling facility, and campus, as well as iconic on-street bus stop amenities at more than 235 stops in Santa Monica.', 'Strong brand: Customer satisfaction is at 94%.', 'Regional connectivity: BBB’s 58-square mile service area is dense with housing and jobs. BBB provides convenient connections to Metro’s Expo, Green, Blue, Purple, Red and Gold rail lines; Metrolink and Amtrak commuter rail; and Culver CityBus, Gardena Transit (Gtrans), Beach Cities Transit, Los Angeles Department of Transportation (LADOT) Commuter Express, LADOT Dash, Torrance Transit, Santa Clarita Transit, and Foothill Transit Silver Line bus service.', 'Last mile provider: Strong ridership on the Metro Rail system, particularly the Expo line, brings as many as 60,000 potential bus riders per day into our service area who are looking for last mile connections to their destinations.', 'World-class destinations: BBB serves Los Angeles Airport, Loyola Marymount University, Playa Vista, Marina Del Rey, VA campus in Westwood, Santa Monica College (SMC), University California, Los Angeles (UCLA), Westwood Village, Downtown Los Angeles, and Union Station.', "Workforce culture and development programs: BBB provides every employee with opportunities for training. This includes more than 16 annual hours of customized training on customer service, technology and fleet maintenance, safety and security, and de-escalation/self-defense tactics for front-line and safety sensitive staff. BBB's internal Supervisory Training and Education Program (STEP) also provides leadership training for front-line employees and develops their supervisory skills by allowing them to work as supervisors and instructors in an acting capacity.", 'Supervisory/management academy and other skills and curricula are available through internal and external programs facilitated by Southern California Regional Transit Training Consortium (SCRRTC), National Transit Institute (NTI), Transportation Safety Institute (TSI), American Public Transportation Association (APTA), and California Transit Association (CTA) as well as Santa Monica Institute (SMI).', 'Partnerships: Existing corporate and college contracts enable institutions to fund BBB fares as a benefit to their students and staff (including UCLA, SMC, Downtown Santa Monica, Inc., and Providence St. Johns Health Center). Business and college partnerships collectively make up 19% of BBB’s annual ridership and our new Blue to Business program provides further partnership opportunities.', 'Transportation Demand Management (TDM) initiatives: Targeted programs enable opportunities for broader ridership in addition to Blue to Business, including K-12 Youth (Blue to School) and transit assistance programs in our service area such as the LA County Transit Pass Subsidy Program intended for residents living in unincorporated parts of the County, the Low Income Fares are Easy (LIFE - formerly Rider Relief) program that provides transit discounts to low income LA County residents, and the Federal Employee Commuter Benefit Program.', 'Service reliability: On-time Performance (OTP) is consistently at 80% and the Road Call (RC) rate is over 19,000 miles between mechanical failures.', 'Figure 1 - On-time Performance in 2017 compared to 2016', 'Transit-Oriented Development (TOD) opportunities exist with the 4th Street/Colorado Avenue terminus site and Bergamot Station.', 'New technology to enhance the customer experience includes:', '· Real time schedule information through the NextBus app which allows customers to access the information using any type of mobile phone;', '· Smartphone apps such as the Transit App and Google Transit make use of BBB’s GTFS-RT (General Transit Feed Specification Real Time) open data feed for greater customer convenience at no cost to BBB;', '· Installation of regional TAP fare validators and offering of all BBB fare products on TAP for seamless fare payment, a system that has dramatically reduced boarding and dwell time;', '· The recently-opened LiNC Bus-Only Lane to improve travel speed for customers and provide enhanced operational efficiencies to invest these savings in more service on our busiest north-south corridor during commuter peak hours;', '· Solar powered real-time signs at 34 bus stops in the city; and,', '· Collision avoidance technology to address the Vision Zero city-wide effort and to improve safety on buses.', '· BBB is the first municipal transit agency in our region to offer mobile ticketing, allowing any customer with a smartphone to purchase, activate, and use mobile passes on our buses.', 'Partnerships with Federal, State, Regional, and City staff to leverage best practices with the advancement of new transportation technologies:  Connected and Automated Vehicle (C/AV) Technology development and pilot implementations are becoming prolific at cities throughout the country. Staff is actively participating in organizations such as the Intelligent Transportation Systems-California (ITS-CA), a public/private partnership formed to foster the development and deployment of advanced transportation systems within the State of California. Staff also serves on CONNECT-IT (Connect and Integrate Transportation Technology), the newly formed regional committee representing multiple jurisdictions in LA County that include 31 cities, several transit organizations, the Ports of Long Beach and LA, Caltrans, and others to develop a regional transportation technology architecture. BBB staff also supports the city’s Automated Vehicle (AV) Workgroup. Although many pilot programs are underway (as discussed in Appendix A) these organizations continue to analyze the potential threats and opportunities presented by emerging AV technology including safety, traffic congestion, infrastructure requirements, and other implications.', 'Technology Roadmap: With the advent of technology that would provide tremendous savings in the provision of mobility options and service, staff has initiated an analysis of all of our technology systems and is currently in the late stages of a procurement process to engage a consultant to perform a system-by-system needs assessment of BBB’s technology infrastructure. Recommendations will be prioritized based on cost/benefit and other criteria, including relevance in the changing transit marketplace, ease of implementation, and implementation timeline. Further information about BBB’s technology planning and demonstration programs planned and underway are explained in Appendix A.', 'Challenges & Changing Marketplace', 'As noted earlier, the public transit landscape has changed dramatically over the last three years. Transit ridership declines, particularly bus ridership, have been seen throughout not only the region and state but across all of North America.', 'BBB, like most other transit systems, saw a significant decline in ridership over the last three years, the most dramatic in FY15-16 and FY16-17 where ridership declined 11.58% and 19.56% respectively. However, ridership trends this year to date do show modest growth with August, October and November showing increases from .05% to over 4%, a positive trend that indicates we may have reached bottom, and BBB’s ridership performance in FY17-18 to date compares favorably with other municipal providers in our region as can be seen in the following figure.', 'Figure 2 - Bus Ridership FY17-18 YTD Comparison among Region’s Transit Providers', 'Although many in the industry predicted that ridership declines were “cyclical” due to economic changes, staff did not concur with this assessment and began a process of evaluating BBB ridership changes, demographic changes, and a new strategic direction.', 'In addition to conducting internal analyses, staff is participating in a regional ridership improvement task force formed in 2016 by BBB, Long Beach Transit, Culver CityBus and Metro to evaluate and address ridership retention and attraction of new customers. Staff is also participating in the LA County regional study of ridership patterns and providing data for the UCLA Institute of Transportation Studies recent work regarding transit ridership trends in the Southern California Association of Governments (SCAG) region, who just published their report a few weeks ago.', 'Based on information collected thus far, the following issues have directly influenced BBB ridership in recent years:', 'Disruptive factors affecting ridership trends in BBB’s service area, including opening of the Expo light rail extension to downtown Santa Monica: Route based analysis revealed that many riders shifted from BBB service to the Expo Line from BBB routes that ran parallel to the train. This affected Route 7, Rapid 7, and Rapid 10 customers most dramatically, as they can now reach their east-west destinations faster on light rail than by bus. However, ridership was lost on every BBB route at nearly every bus stop across the system, not just those directly impacted by the Expo light rail opening, indicating the presence of other forces at work. Staff efforts to better understand BBB’s changing ridership trends include an in-depth analysis using data compiled from customer satisfaction surveys, a non-rider survey of attitudes and opinions about transit, and public meetings.', 'Affordability of and access to driving in our region and state: Both automobiles and gasoline have become more affordable. Studies suggest that vehicle ownership rates may well be the “smoking gun” underlying transit’s precipitous decline in ridership.', 'o From 2000 to 2015, 2.4 million people moved into the County. During that same period, 2.1 million new automobiles were registered in the County, an almost 1:1 ratio of automobiles to new residents. According to US Census data, access to a vehicle increased most dramatically among lower income households (which have traditionally been considered public transportation’s “captive” riders.)', 'o In the entire SCAG region (Southern California Area Governments), the share of households without vehicles fell 30% between 2000 and 2015, while the share of households with less than one vehicle for each adult fell 14% as shown in the figure below from the report published in January 2018 by the UCLA Institute of Transportation Studies for SCAG.', 'Figure 3 - Zero Vehicle Households Decreasing, Especially in Low-Income Households', 'o Among foreign-born households, also traditionally transit users, percentage declines were larger; 42% decrease in the number of households without a vehicle, and 22% decrease in households with less than one vehicle, as shown in this figure from the same report.', 'Figure 4 - Zero-Vehicle Households Down among Recent Immigrants', 'o A recent BBB non-rider survey conducted in early 2018 on City and West Side residents who do not take public transportation comports to the data from the SCAG-UCLA Study that vehicle ownership was the number one reason that over 80% of the respondents no longer took public transportation.', 'Other external influences: Two other contributing factors affecting ridership trends in the region include the 2016 state legislation that provided driver’s licenses to an estimated 650,000 undocumented residents of LA County, who were most likely former transit riders; and gentrification of neighborhoods such as Central LA and the fringes of Downtown LA, causing losses of former transit commuters who had to relocate to more affordable housing well outside of the Los Angeles regional transit network and for whom driving or telecommuting became more viable options.', 'The rise of transportation network companies (TNCs) operating in our City and throughout the County offering affordable on-demand transportation alternatives and direct door-to-door service not only provides new mobility options for many of our former customers, but also presents a secondary issue of TNC’s conducting operations in BBB stops, hindering BBB’s ability to operate safely.', 'Deteriorated travel speeds: Traffic and congestion have had impacts on bus travel speed, which has slowed 4% in the last two years as traffic continues to worsen.', 'Regulatory cost of conducting business: While the past few years have been challenging for bus ridership and farebox revenue, operating costs for maintaining the current level of service have continued to increase due to higher wage rates and benefit costs, negotiated entitlements, and unfunded mandatory legislative actions at both the state and federal levels; e.g., National Transit Database (NTD), Safety Management Systems (SMS), Transit Asset Management (TAM), Family and Medical Leave Act (FMLA), the California Paid Sick Leave Law, and others.', 'Given the rising costs of operations, were BBB to continue to provide the current level of Revenue Vehicle Service Hours (RVSH) over the next two years, a potential budget deficit of approximately $11 million has been forecasted. This is not financially sustainable.', 'Where We’re Going: The Road to 2018', 'Framework', 'The following sections - Governance, Service Design and Delivery, and Fleet Composition - each provide opportunities for framing BBB’s future. Each section is prefaced with a series of questions to help Council formulate feedback for discussion. Staff also asks that Council consider each section in the framework of the questions that were posed in the Executive Summary.', '· Are we a leader? Do we continue to lead the industry and the County, understanding the inherent tradeoffs and risks?', '· Are we a partner? Is this the appropriate time to expand our partnerships with the private sector or other organizations?', '· Should we get out of the way? Is it time for an entirely new mobility model and framework and, if so, what is the transition period for getting there?', 'Governance', 'Is the Santa Monica City Council the appropriate policy body to govern a sub-regional bus operation? What actions can be taken to evolve our municipal policies and codes, many of which were developed in the 20th century, to keep pace with and embrace the disruptive technologies of the 21st century, to keep our City on the path to greater sustainability, and to add value to the services we provide to our citizens and visitors, especially mobility? What regulatory enhancements can be provided to truly identify Santa Monica as a “Transit First” community?', 'The governing body of the BBB has been the City Council of the City of Santa Monica since its creation as Santa Monica Municipal Bus Lines. While this relationship has been productive and rewarding for both parties, there may be reasons to re-examine that relationship now. Approximately 85% of BBB service is offered outside the City of Santa Monica in Los Angeles, Culver City, and in unincorporated sections of LA County. Santa Monica residents sometimes complain that the service is not locally focused and many erroneously assume that their City tax money underwrites BBB operations. While serving as the hub for a regional transit network provides advantages to Santa Monica residents accessing regional destinations and reduces traffic from incoming visitors and commuters, these advantages may be undervalued given expectations for local service.', 'Similarly, while BBB maintains cordial working relationships with our neighboring jurisdictions, our governing body does not contain representation or “champions” for those areas. As a result, constituents from those areas do not have an elected official to appeal to regarding BBB policy and actions, and BBB is sometimes challenged in obtaining cooperation to make needed changes or repairs to bus stops, street infrastructure, terminal availability, or bus routing. A transit board with representatives from all jurisdictions served might create a more effective and harmonious governance, and enhance BBB’s ability to confront current ridership trends.', 'In addition to the geographic and jurisdictional representation on a transit board, some transit systems have found value in assigning board members from constituent communities such as seniors, people with disabilities, or members of minority communities that are heavily represented in system ridership. An alternative local governance model might look more like the Airport Commission or Pier Board which supplements City Council oversight and enhances community participation in decision-making.', 'If sub-regional governance is not the answer, then what can be done to support BBB as a line department of the City that provides an invaluable service to not only citizens with their local and first-last mile mobility, but also moves more than 13.6 million people annually to their work, shopping, and entertainment options? BBB service is key to the economic health and wellbeing of not only the individuals who ride our buses, but of the City itself. With this in mind, what actions could be taken to evolve our municipal policies and codes, many of which were developed in the 20th century, to keep pace with and embrace the disruptive transportation trends and technologies of the 21st century? What regulatory enhancements could be adopted to truly identify Santa Monica as a “Transit First” community? For example, can citywide parking rate strategies be evaluated and eventually adopted to mitigate single occupancy vehicle trips to downtown, and with adoption of higher rates, incentivize the community to use another mobility option when traveling within the City?', 'Staff has identified best practices for how other municipalities are addressing congestion mitigation strategies, understanding that more TNCs transporting one or two passengers at a time bring additional congestion, pollution, and municipal code violations. Could policy changes for opportunities that do not currently exist within the framework of the City be considered? For example, the implementation of a new user fee for TNCs similar to Chicago’s new tax on Uber and Lyft could offset revenue loss and to help fund transit improvements and operations within the City. Should the City consider identifying TNC stops at strategic downtown locations to address the current practice of TNCs illegally staging in BBB’s stops, or stopping in the traffic lane, which negatively impacts bus operations safety as well as lane throughput and congestion?', 'Another approach to alleviating congestion is to encourage people to leave their cars and take public transit by implementing congestion pricing, which has a number of different applications including toll lanes already in use across the U.S. and in Southern California; but in this case specifically refers to assessing a fee on any vehicle entering city limits during rush hours. This approach is being discussed as a congestion-mitigation strategy in New York City; and has already been successfully implemented in London, Milan, Gothenberg, and Stockholm. This model is under consideration by the Southern California Association of Governments. By charging peak hour prices for driving, significant funds could be freed up to support transit systems and transportation improvements that support transit, bike and pedestrian mobility options.', 'Finally, administrative policy presents a governance challenge. Many projects require rapid implementation in a quickly changing technology environment, which can be impeded by a traditional procurement process that can result in technology solutions that are approaching obsolescence by the time of implementation. If BBB is to continue to take a leading role in our industry, be agile, and experiment with mobility options, staff suggests that Council consider a review of City policies/practices for procurements of new technologies, allowing for more pilots or iterative implementations, as well as considering updates to civil service policies for hiring, training, and development of staff.', 'The Service We Offer', 'How do we approach service design and what should our system look like in five years? Mobility options include all services currently offered by the City, and could include other service routes, more demand-response service open to the general public, Bus Rapid Transit (BRT) expansion on “bus-only” lanes, and additional express service to the South Bay/Long Beach and Ventura County.', 'How might our new service model best be delivered? Should BBB continue to operate all service and maintain all equipment? Should some service be contracted out in order to lower costs? Should service be delivered through a combination of these models? Should we operate only on major corridors and allow the private sector to fill in the service gaps and/or rely on other mobility options like bike/pedestrian? How are consumer preferences changing and how can those changes inform our decision-making?', 'Finally, how could we, as a City, evolve our mobility landscape to improve our constituents’ and visitors’ physical, economic, and social wellbeing through a “Transit First” approach whereby access to public transportation for citizens and visitors is seen as the basis of improved community wellbeing? Citywide street enhancements, corridor design, travel speed, universal electronic payment systems, bus stop placement, and transit-oriented development including affordable housing adjacent or close to mobility hubs with last-mile solutions complementary to fixed route transit (such as bicycle, scooter, pedestrian wayfinding, demand-response, and others) would all be designed with the transit customer in mind. For example, just as the recently opened LiNC bus-only lane is already increasing travel speed along that corridor for Route 3 and Rapid 3, additional bus-only lanes, Transit Signal Priority (TSP) and queue-jump to support more effective mass transit and other active mobility options could move more people to their destinations faster and more sustainably while at the same time improving operational efficiencies for Big Blue Bus. Best practices in other cities including Nashville, TN and Columbus, OH showing successful applications of this approach are described in Appendix B.', 'Staff has completed a great deal of work in service design and service delivery over the last five years, beginning with the Service, Design, Performance and Evaluation Guidelines adopted by Council in September of 2013. Service standards were adopted to ensure that service is provided equitably and fairly to all customer markets, understanding the resources available to do so. Using these standards, staff annually evaluates route performance and productivity to make informed recommendations and decisions on route and schedule changes.', 'Subsequent to that effort, staff embarked on a study of the impacts of rail expansion in the BBB service area. That study led to Evolution of Blue, recommendations on system modifications to interface with Expo to ensure first-last mile connectivity to the seven new stations in the BBB service area, as well as to preserve important market generators and existing high productivity bus corridors.', 'Shortly after the Council adopted the Evolution of Blue plan to restructure BBB service, the tremendous market changes described earlier in the section “Challenges and Marketplace” began to noticeably influence customer-riding behaviors. It became evident that additional factors beyond the changes adopted in Evolution of Blue were having dramatic impacts on the bus system. Ridership at all stops in the system declined nearly simultaneously, even on routes not impacted by the service changes. While it was clear that the rail system and ensuing bus route and schedule changes had removed some ridership, it also became clear that ridership was suffering for other reasons.', 'BBB ridership has stabilized in recent months as a result of a variety of ridership stabilization efforts taking place at BBB. However, this stabilization has been holding ridership steady at approximately 20% below levels seen just a few years ago. While the decrease in ridership is lamentable, BBB is in a far better position than most Southern California transit agencies that are still losing riders at a rate of 5% to 10% year over year (Figure 2 above). Put simply, this new stable level of ridership with BBB’s current level of service provided is not sustainable. The purpose of the following sections is to provide a menu of approaches that are economically viable and sustainable for the next five (5) years, and to allow BBB to continue to adopt and test new market initiatives and mobility approaches, as well as be nimble in the adaptation of technology advances and enhancements for improving the customer experience.', 'Service Design Options', 'Service design refers to passenger facing elements such as routes, schedules, span of service, frequencies, travel speed, fares and numerous other aspects that all influence how, when and where people take transit, and what it costs to operate the service. BBB intends to pursue a number of customer facing initiatives to improve the experience of using BBB that are not addressed in this discussion because they do not hold the potential to offer significant relief from the budget impacts identified. Rather than offering a comprehensive list, the following options are more narrowly focused activities that can be considered in whole or in part to significantly raise revenue, or cut costs, and in some cases increase passenger demand.', 'A status quo approach to service design is not recommended as it is not economically sustainable and would result in an increasing operating deficit and could mean depletion of reserves by FY21-22. From a community wellbeing perspective, any delay in action on service design increases the size of the measures that will need to be taken and will limit our flexibility to implement creative solutions.', 'Regardless of how we proceed with service design, the ridership losses we have suffered require the re-examination of our productivity standards. Currently, 45% of all weekday service and 38% of weekend service meets the minimum standards of productivity. Conversely, more than half of our service does not meet the standard. Productivity is defined as the number of passengers per hour that the service attracts. Unless we are prepared to pare half the BBB system, we are compelled to reset the minimum amount of riders that we find acceptable on our service.', 'Currently our productivity standards require 20 passengers per hour on local and commuter services (commuter service runs only in the peaks on weekdays) and 40 passenger per hour on Rapid and Express services in order for a route to be deemed sustainable. Staff is recommending adjusting that requirement to 12 passengers per hour on all services and then eliminating all services that do not meet that minimum. At 12 passengers per vehicle revenue hour, the average cost for providing a trip per passenger is $8.79. Even at the less restrictive standard of 12 passengers per hour, nearly a full 10% of today’s service would need to be eliminated in order for the system to meet the new standard.', 'With a new productivity standard in place, there are still choices to be made. Adherence to existing frequency standards, or adjustments to those same standards can be considered, and the decision as to whether to offer replacement service can also be considered. Furthermore, the suggested new standard of 12 passengers per hour may not be the correct threshold for a productivity standard. There is more than one path to reaching sustainability, and barring an unforeseen drastic increase in ridership, staff sees the need to explore these paths and to make choices. Following are two service design options for Council consideration and discussion:', 'Service Design 1 (SD1) – Establish a new productivity standard, retain current span of service standard, establish a new frequency standard, eliminate unproductive fixed route service, and provide demand response service: Under this model, services removed due to low productivity could be replaced with demand response service that provides similar service levels with lower cost per passenger. When service is removed and replaced by demand response, the customer would pay a base fare and BBB would provide a fixed contribution. Customers who incur costs above the base fare and BBB contribution would pay any additional balance. As an example, because this type of demand response service would be defined as a “premium” service, a higher fare would be charged ($1.75 to $2.50). In combination with a lower operating cost, and a fixed limit to the BBB contribution to the ride, the cost per passenger trip could be held to less than $7.', 'There are no proposed changes to Span of Service standards under this option. Those standards currently call for corridor service starting at 5am to 6am with a shut down time of midnight on weekdays, and a one hour later start time on weekends. Local service has the same start time as corridor service on all days and a shut down time of 9pm on all days.', 'This service design option also suggests the adjustment of minimum frequency standards that recognize the changing preferences of consumers. The current standards are every 30 minutes minimum for local service and every 15 minutes for Rapid and Express service during all days of the week. A new standard proposed under this option would be every 20 minutes on weekdays and every 30 minutes on weekends on all services.', 'Regarding frequency of service, many corridors would have higher service levels than the minimums in order to meet the current ridership demand (Santa Monica Blvd. every 10 minutes on weekdays, Pico Blvd. every 15 minutes on weekdays, etc.), but the minimums would be rigorously enforced and communicated to the public as part of the BBB brand.', 'At all times, the service would be required to obtain a minimum average of 12 passengers per hour productivity, or face elimination. At those times when the route is not running due to low productivity, passengers would be able to obtain a demand response shared ride that would pick them up and drop them off along the route corridor subject to the start and end times of the service day offered by the Span of Service standards which remain unchanged.', 'The advantage of this option is that it offers a low per passenger cost of service during low productivity times, while retaining the basic route structure and potential for route ridership growth. When and if the demand response ridership grows sufficiently to exceed the 12 passengers per hour threshold, the fixed route service could be reinstated during that hour, and the demand response service pared back. In this way, the route becomes a flexible service corridor able to offer as much or as little service is demanded by the public. In this way, costs are controlled, and passengers are provided service that does not suffer in frequency or convenience as a result of low demand.', 'The exception to this reinvestment approach is the Rapid 10, the Downtown Los Angeles Express that does not reach 12 passengers per vehicle revenue hour for any period long enough to offer even a limited service day, and would be proposed for elimination under this plan. However, the long route length does not make this service a candidate for alternative, reasonably priced demand response service.', 'The table below shows what the weekday service might look like under this scenario. Blue areas would identify fixed route service at a 20 minute or better frequency, and pink areas would be subsidized demand response service along those routes. In a preliminary analysis at the above level of frequency and productivity standards, staff estimates savings of approximately $5.8 million could be realized after service reductions and reinvestment to meet minimum frequency standards. $1.2 million of those savings would be re-invested in the new demand response mobility opportunities providing over 170,000 annual trips. The resultant savings would be utilized to rebuild reserves and used to leverage federal and state capital and planning funding.', 'Figure 5 - Weekday Service Modifications under the Service Design 1 (SD1) Model', 'The last element of this service design approach would be a phased approach to raising fares over a three- to five-year period in order to sustain a 20% farebox recovery ratio. The service model would include premium pricing in order to achieve Council adopted farebox recovery policies.', 'Service Design 2 (SD2) - Establish a new productivity standard, retain current span of service standard, establish a new frequency standard, eliminate unproductive fixed route service, but limit reinvestment of savings in a demand response service during hours when productivity standards are not met. This approach provides core fixed route service on productive lines and eliminates unproductive service with limited reinvestment. This model is similar to those that Houston Metro and Seattle recently undertook to pare unproductive service and focus on core productive service to improve frequency and span of service. The difference between this option and the first option would be the limit of reinvestment in demand response service where fixed route service was eliminated.', 'Staff conducted a small-scale version of this in FY2013-14 after the Council adopted the Planning Standards. Underperforming service was eliminated or reduced; and, in that case, the service hours were reinvested in core routes such as Route 1, Route 2, Route 3, Route 7, and Rapid 3 and 7.', 'Under this scenario, several compromise alternatives could be considered:', '1. No replacement service for routes or route segments that are eliminated; in a preliminary analysis staff has estimated that, with no reinvestment, savings of approximately $5.8 million could be realized under this option. Savings would be utilized to rebuild reserves that would be used to match federal and state capital and planning funding.', '2. Limited replacement service for routes or route segments. This approach invests some of the savings into limited demand response zones. Staff could evaluate options that do not necessarily reproduce the fixed route alignment with a demand response alignment, but instead look at demand response zones that transport riders the last mile to the transit network in whichever way is most expedient and efficient.', 'The disadvantages of this option are twofold. One, the lack of demand response service in some areas may further erode fixed route ridership during productive hours; two, where last mile demand response zones are offered, if they do not reproduce the route corridor, they may complicate the option to restore fixed route service if and when demand response ridership increases. However, the implication of further savings beyond those offered in SD1 cannot be ignored as the balance of the fixed route elimination savings would be recognized as overall savings, which would be utilized to rebuild reserves that would be used to match federal and state capital and planning funding.', '3. No replacement service for routes or route segments combined with investment in new markets to be piloted over an 18-month period and implemented if successful. Suggested new markets might include:', 'a. A BRT or express bus network that would provide service to the South Bay, Long Beach, Malibu, and Oxnard.', 'In a preliminary analysis, staff has estimated that the annual savings of approximately $5.8 million in service cuts would require a reinvestment of approximately $1.5 million to create a Santa Monica to South Bay Express or a Santa Monica to Oxnard Express, or approximately $3 million annually to implement both depending on service levels.', 'b. Development of a water ferry service that would operate two routes, one from Santa Monica or Marina del Rey to Malibu, then to Oxnard, and a southern route that would operate from Santa Monica or Marina del Rey to the South Bay, then to Long Beach and the Orange County line.', 'BBB has not developed a pricing model for ferry implementation.', 'Implementation of service into any of these new markets would likely require limiting service expansion to a selection of only one or two key services in order to realize projected savings, with a preliminary estimate selecting a single new market for reinvestment would generate a net savings of approximately $3 million. These savings would be utilized to rebuild reserves that would be used to match federal and state capital funding.', 'Service Design 3 (SD3) - Limit service outside of Santa Monica: This option considers the possibility of transforming BBB from a sub-regional provider to a local provider of transit. With 85% of current service outside of Santa Monica, this option would vastly shrink the size of BBB. This proposal would involve abandoning most service outside of Santa Monica and offering the abandoned routes to neighboring agencies such as Metro, Culver City Bus or LADOT to absorb. These agencies could not be forced under current regulations to absorb those routes, nor could they be forced to continue to run them if they deemed them unproductive after initial adoption. Additionally, even if they did adopt the routes, control of fares and levels of service would shift to other agencies.', 'Limited City service would continue to be operated, and could be supported with Measure M and R Local Return, and Prop A Local Return. However, the total funding from these measures and Prop A amounts to approximately $3 million annually. Additionally, formula Measure R and M funding of over $16 million would be reallocated to other service providers in the County.', 'In the past, the City dedicated Local Prop A funding to provide the Tide and Ride shuttles. Those services were deemed unproductive. A partnership with Santa Monica Travel and Tourism and hotels could provide matching funds that would enhance core service routes to connect popular destinations downtown and fringe destinations like Montana Avenue or SMC from the downtown core.', 'It should be noted here that many of BBB’s most productive services cross the city line and have more than half of their service miles outside Santa Monica, including routes 7 and Rapid 7 on Pico Blvd, Routes 3 and Rapid 3 on Lincoln Blvd, and route 1 on Main Street and Santa Monica Blvds. Those high productivity corridors correspond to lower costs per passenger and all of those routes consistently fall below the mean cost per passenger ($5.10 in FY2017) of the BBB system.', 'Conversely, some of the Santa Monica based services consistently have lower productivity and the consequence of a higher costs per passenger including Routes 18, 41, 42, and 43, which all fell above the mean cost per passenger for FY2017. It is a likely outcome that a local-only service model would suffer lower productivity overall and higher costs per passenger than the current sub-regional model.', 'Due to the high level of unknowns, staff has not estimated the financial impact of this approach; however, implementation of this approach would greatly diminish BBB’s funding opportunities.', 'Service Delivery Options', 'Service delivery refers to the types of vehicles that are used, the agency that is running the vehicles, the pay and benefits programs offered to bus operators, maintenance and support staff, and other factors divorced from issues such as routes, schedules and fares. While there is always some crossover between service delivery and service design, the next section focuses on considerations of service delivery.', 'Considering the market factors and internal challenges we face today, the following service delivery options are being considered by staff. When considering these, the range of options can include subcontracting the entire organization, to subcontracting different business functions as described below.', 'Subcontracted Operations: Understanding that the Council recently read the BBB Staff Information Item on the FY2016-17 BBB Performance Report, the current model of delivering fixed route service cannot continue to be sustained financially. Several routes have fallen below the Council adopted performance standards for consecutive quarters. In order to address delivering the current level of service efficiently, staff considered subcontracting some or all of the operation of the BBB system to a private contractor. This is a common approach to cost savings and one employed by LA Metro, Foothill Transit, as well as numerous other transit districts regionally.', 'Subcontracted costs are generally 10-25% lower due to lower wage and benefit rates. Single functions or multiple business functions can be subcontracted including Motor Coach Operations, Mechanical Support, Motor Coach Cleaning and other functions. The implementation of subcontracting routes, geographic portions of the service area, or an entire turn-key operation are options that are industry best practice, depending upon the goals that have been established by the organization. The advantage of this option is the ability to retain higher levels of service and low passenger impacts, while still reducing costs.', 'An example of a total turn-key privately contracted service delivery model is found locally at Foothill Transit, where all service and maintenance of the fleet are provided by an outside vendor. Foothill Transit has two (2) contractors established through geographic model where one contractor provides service to some communities from one garage, and a second operates service in a different area from a second facility. Foothill Transit administrative staff are all employees of the District and report to a district-wide board of directors. Administrative staff are maintained as District employees to administer contractual agreements, monitor performance, and sustain grant development/management. All liability and any relevant employee agreements would be assumed by the contractor.', 'In a preliminary analysis, staff has estimated that entering into an agreement with a private sector company that is suited for this work could generate annual savings of approximately $8-20 million annually depending on wage rates, employee benefits, and other similar factors.', 'Offer Select Routes to Neighboring Transit Partners: This model would shrink BBB service in size through turning over routes to Metro, Culver CityBus, LADOT, or other transportation providers in the region. The actual process that would take place is the abandonment of a route by BBB and the implementation of service by another agency at the same time, often by agreement.', 'This process is not without risks, as transit providers are under no obligation to accept the invitation to implement new service, or if they do accept to undertake it initially, to continue the routes as designed, or to run the routes at all, if they deem them unproductive after a trial period (usually two years). The recent closure of the Venice Metro base of operations on Main Street leaves West Hollywood as the closest Metro garage to Santa Monica, and distance from service is a key consideration when looking at adoption of new routes.', 'As stated above, the inherent risk to this model is that the new provider is under no obligation to continue to operate the service, and if it determined that it was prudent to abandon this service, the City could potentially lose its sub-regional connection to the County bus, rail, and other mobility options if this happened. Council would likely face decisions regarding service abandonment in terms of the sub-regional corridors that form the basis of BBB service.', 'Moving to More Demand Response Services Where Ridership is Low: This model begins to blur the line between service delivery and service design because it entails elements of both. The premise here is that where ridership falls below a certain determined level, fixed route service would be eliminated and demand response service implemented along the corridor. This is presented as a separate option to the concept offered in SD1 and SD2, because there are myriad possibilities in this type of service replacement that are not considered in either SD1 or SD2. Higher fixed route productivity standards could be considered, which would drive more fixed route service elimination and more replacement with demand response. Route productivity standards could be differentiated based on route length, providing the opportunity for different levels of demand response subsidy depending on distance travelled, and many other options for varying fares and subsidies could be considered.', 'The sophistication of the demand response technology available implies that this option could introduce significant levels of nuance that BBB could use to drive consumer behavior. Recent innovations in on-demand transportation have resulted in easier access to shared fleets and sophisticated calling, scheduling, dispatching, and couponing of rides being available at a low cost through TNC’s. The advantage to this option is the ability to provide the same or similar customer experience (wait time, cost, travel time) at a lower cost per passenger. Service would be provided during the same hours as fixed route, and would be available within the corridor at stops or major intersections.', 'Fleet Composition', 'BBB has been an industry leader in sustainability. It was one of the first agencies to adopt an alternative fuel path and is currently operating a fleet of 200 buses using Renewable Natural Gas (RNG). In 2017, BBB was the first agency in the country to adopt the Near-Zero emission engine produced by Cummins for all new bus procurements as well as for repowering of buses at mid-life. As of the end of 2017, BBB has 25 new buses and 15 repowered buses with the Near-Zero Engine, the most in the entire country. By the end of 2019, BBB will have 120 vehicles with the Near-Zero engines, reducing our current NOx by 91.5%.', 'Understanding that BBB’s service delivery model will change, what will the fleet of the future look like? How should we convert the fleet to Zero Emissions and Autonomous-Connected Vehicles, and what is the cost to build the necessary infrastructure? What are all of the relevant cost implications to do so, and what is the appropriate timeline? Staff will provide a detailed analysis of these technologies and options to Council at a future study session that is scheduled for later this spring.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Action', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of study session discussion. However, the financial concerns raised will require decisions to address the structural deficit. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future.']}
{'Title': 'Mobility Strategic Goal Update and Discussion', 'Department': 'Mobility (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '04. Study Sessions', 'Recommendations': 'Discuss progress toward the Council’s Strategic Goal of creating a new model of mobility and provide future direction on the three action areas of increasing transit usage, walking and biking; eliminating severe and fatal collisions (i.e. Vision Zero); and creating a complete and connected mobility network throughout Santa Monica.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary:', 'Given the severity of regional and local traffic congestion – and the economic, environmental, and safety costs of overreliance on cars – the City of Santa Monica has recognized the need for a comprehensive new approach – and developed a clear vision for a diverse transportation network that promotes people walking, biking, carpooling, and taking transit. This vision aligns with both the City’s General Plan and the City’s larger Framework for promoting wellbeing and sustainability – and a city that works for everyone.', 'The Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) of the General Plan (2010) set an inclusive and forward-looking mobility policy foundation, but could not predict the recent technology advances that pose new opportunities and challenges regarding use of the public right-of-way, public-private partnerships, data, and management strategies. This set of updated core principles to aid in day-to-day decision-making is based on adopted policy documents:', '· Put people and safety first.', '· Give all people access to mobility choices.', '· Pioneer a clean mobility future.', '· Design great streets for health and wellbeing.', '· Leverage private sector innovation in new mobility that serves community needs.', '· Strengthen government services with data-driven decision-making.', 'In August 2015, Council identified “Creating a new model of mobility" as one of its five Strategic Goals. Early work on the Mobility Strategic Goal yielded progress through the opening of Expo Light Rail, Breeze Bike Share, Evolution of Blue and GoSaMo mobility campaign. The report outlines more recent work, organized around the Mobility Strategic Goal\'s three target areas: increasing trips on foot, bike, and transit; eliminating severe injury and fatal collisions; and\u202fcreating a complete and connected mobility network.', 'Increasing transit, walking and biking trips:', 'Enabling alternative travel options requires a combination of revamped infrastructure and imaginative initiatives. The biennial Capital Improvement Program (CIP) organizes, prioritizes, and allocates funding for the numerous annual infrastructure maintenance and improvement projects. Mobility staff is preparing potential projects to be considered for funding in the next capital budget based on the following criteria: identified in adopted plans to complete bike, pedestrian and transit networks; advance work toward Vision Zero; leverage outside transportation funds; and coordinated with adjacent projects or maintenance efforts.', 'Vision Zero:', 'Vision Zero is a City target to eliminate severe injury and fatal collisions by the year 2026 for all roadway users. Vision Zero is an audacious goal but anything less would be unacceptable, and major cities like New York have shown that Vision Zero action plans can make major improvements.\u202f\u202fSanta Monica staff is working every day and across all departments to encourage safety on the street. Nonetheless, in 2017, 9 people were killed and 25 severely injured on Santa Monica streets. Speeding and distracted driving were among the greatest causes of these tragedies.\u202fA Priority Network Map was created to identify areas that will be first to receive more detailed evaluation of collision reports, to better understand the conditions occurring, the factors contributing to a crash, and what countermeasures would be effective.', 'Staff has prepared a 2-year work plan of strategic actions to advance Vision Zero within the larger goal of promoting a new model of mobility. The 2-year approach contains elements that are specific, measurable and concrete, allows sufficient time to test new tactical interventions and strategies, and incorporate elements into departmental work plans. Achieving Vision Zero will necessitate that all departments take a role. In the next year, staff will create and implement an outreach plan outlining steps the City is taking to make streets safer for all modes, how to be safe and attentive while traveling, and what everyone can do to participate in saving lives, highlighting that speeding and distracted driving are the leading causes of collisions.', 'Complete and connected mobility network:', 'The opportunity to create a safer and more seamless transportation system has been unlocked by technology and innovation. But it does not come without its drawbacks. The latest innovations in transportation that are happening today, particularly shared mobility, autonomous vehicles and vehicle electrification simultaneously support and undermine sustainability, equity, economic, and quality of life outcomes. Cities across the country are grappling with these new opportunities and challenges - starting pilot projects, reorganizing for new work flows, and developing tools to deal with the myriad data, communications, regulation, operation and maintenance challenges.', 'The report discusses the opportunities and challenges, and presents a range of short and mid-term steps in advocacy, infrastructure, data management and policy with the intent to encourage:', '· Vehicle automation that is safer for people on the street, and which does not increase local congestion and emissions, and', '· Shared mobility that supports transit and shared rides, expands mobility options, increases roadway efficiency, and reduces emissions.', 'Council input is needed on the approach, desired level of engagement and leadership, and content of specific steps. These work efforts are new, and are not currently in the planned projects, and Council direction can inform the level of effort toward staffing and resources.', 'Background:', 'On July 6, 2010, Council adopted the LUCE, the heart of the State-mandated General Plan, that sets the City\'s broad transportation policy foundation. It identified the City\'s street designations, transportation goals, demand management approach, parking policies, and established the goal of "No Net New Trips." This goal commits to using transportation management tools in a way that avoids any increase in vehicle trips in the evening peak period by 2030. The LUCE also recommends dozens of circulation and mobility action items. On November 22, 2011, Council adopted the Bike Action Plan as the LUCE\'s first action item, and staff has reported annually on Plan implementation since 2013.', 'Council identified a "New Model for Mobility" as one of the City’s top five Strategic Goals at an August 23, 2015 City Council meeting. This was consistent with the City’s proactive and on-going work on mobility policy, programs and implementation. The Mobility Strategic Goal seeks a more diverse mobility system that is convenient, attractive, cost-effective, customer-oriented and that supports community values of wellbeing and sustainability.', 'On February 23, 2016, Santa Monica adopted the Pedestrian Action Plan, consistent with LUCE recommendations.', 'This new model of mobility is linked not just to transportation, but to livability and accessibility. This is a broad-ranging movement that requires renovating our public streets, diversifying and improving mobility options and encouraging people to use them. Three target areas for the Mobility Strategic Goal were identified in a subsequent August 25, 2016 Information Item:', '1. Increasing trips on foot, bike, and transit', '2. Eliminating severe injury and fatal collisions', '3. Creating a complete and connected mobility network', 'At the February 14, 2017 City Council Meeting, Council instructed staff to prepare a report documenting the progress of several initiatives, including the Pedestrian Action Plan, Bicycle Action Plan, and Vision Zero. On May 9, 2017 the Council gave direction regarding creation of a Vision Zero strategy to reduce and ultimately eliminate severe injury and fatal collisions.', 'Discussion:', 'The City’s General Plan provides a comprehensive vision for preserving Santa Monica’s unique sense of place and planning for a dynamic and livable future: “The LUCE conserves the City’s neighborhoods and historic resources, expands open space, and creates new opportunities for housing where few or none currently exist. It reduces the amount of regional commercial growth and encourages smaller-scale local-serving uses and housing. It encourages new development connected directly to transit, creating a multimodal transportation system that incentivizes walking, biking and transit. It also encourages local-serving retail within walking distance of existing and new neighborhoods, serving to reduce greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions.” (Executive Summary)', 'The LUCE highlights the importance of treating streets as public spaces and the need to actively manage the street network to achieve our goals. It also puts equity at the forefront, insisting that public streets serve all people regardless of age, ability or mode choice. Streets were further identified as places that support public life, health, economic resiliency, and neighborhoods. Street space is understood to be managed as a limited resource, with a need to mitigate demand while also increasing efficiency. LUCE paints an inclusive picture of the role of streets, never losing sight that streets are meant for people first and are part of our community and social gathering spaces.', 'Since 2010 when the LUCE was adopted, many new and unforeseen transportation technology advances have occurred, resulting in new services and new uses of street space. These services include curbside passenger pick-up/drop-off, electric bicycle and scooter riding, and on-demand delivery services to name just a few. Santa Monica will need to adapt within this rapidly-changing environment and develop new tools to effectively manage public space for the common good.', "Reinforcing the community's core mobility goals and principles is an important first step to guide ad-hoc decision-making and set a foundation for longer-term efforts.\u202fThe following principles come from Santa Monica's adopted community plans, with minor updates that address current technological advances:", '· Put people and safety first – reverse decades of single-purpose engineering to increase automobile speed at the expense of all else, because no person should have to feel in danger or endanger another – and streets ultimately should be designed for people.', '· Give all people access to mobility choices - create a transportation environment that provides for everyone, diversifies available options, and provides equal access regardless of age, income, race, gender, or ability.', '· Pioneer a clean mobility future - reduce emissions from transportation to slow global climate change, by reducing demand and increasing the supply of efficient options.', '· Design great streets for health and wellbeing - create complete streets that are safe, pleasant and beautiful to provide social gathering places, strengthen community connections and help people thrive.', '· Leverage private sector innovation in new mobility that serves community needs - harness the investment in new mobility to increase the diversity of mobility options, with careful partnerships that protect community safety and resiliency.', '· Strengthen government services with data-driven decision-making - Create strength in government services by using a data-driven process to align new transportation services with Santa Monica values. Leverage and train a responsive workforce that can effectively use data to leverage resources to maximize public benefits.', 'These principles will help guide the day-to-day work of designing, managing and maintaining the mobility system that we have today and are creating for tomorrow.', 'The remainder of this report is presented in the order of the Mobility Strategic Goal target areas to provide an update on work efforts:', 'A. Increasing the number of trips made by walking, biking and transit', 'B. A 2-year strategic action list that advances Vision Zero', 'C. A Connected and Complete Transportation Network', 'A. Increase the number of trips made by walking, biking and transit', 'Increasing transit, walking and biking trips takes a combination of street improvements, and programs to encourage use. Street improvements should create better people-oriented places with high quality walking, biking and transit facilities, while programs create a culture in which active transportation is seen as a part of daily life.', 'Santa Monica has made great strides in more inclusive street design, but streets change slowly so the majority of our streets still reflect the last 100 years of investment in automobiles. Recently-adopted plans describe a new vision for streets that are more complete with safer crossings, well-lit walkways, dedicated transit facilities, protected bikeways and full tree canopies. Specific implementation projects are included in plans like the Bike Action Plan, Pedestrian Action Plan, Downtown Community Plan, Bergamot Area Plan, and Urban Forest Master Plan.', 'The work of creating and maintaining complete streets has never been more important. Technology is transforming transportation, and while there remain many unknowns, there is widespread confidence in the need for complete streets and the continued role of walking, biking and shared mobility in the future of our cities and personal wellbeing. This requires continued renovation to provide wider sidewalks, a protected bike network comfortable for kids and families, streamlined vehicle lanes that move people in less space, and dedicated transit facilities for efficient shared vehicles.', 'With an ever-evolving landscape of new transportation, as discussed later in the report, the capital budget will be crucial for enabling projects that maximize efficiency and equity in the street network as the number of mobility options continues to evolve. For example, how can we move people smoothly, comfortably, and safely with the smallest per-person footprint such as in a dedicated high-occupancy vehicle network, or in a protected bikeway.\u202fOr as electric bikes and scooters are increasingly available, how can these space-efficient devices have safer travel lanes. Similarly, with the growing challenges of climate change adaptation, how can streets encourage low- and no-emission mobility options and cluster options into convenient mobility hubs. This will take concerted efforts and investments in the existing infrastructure to create the transportation future our community envisions.', 'City programs like Transportation Demand Management (TDM), GoSaMo, parking management, and public outreach efforts maximize the return on investment in street improvements. These programs provide the “carrots and sticks” that motivate people to use multiple mobility options. Incentives include Breeze bike share discount days, employer transit pass subsidies, or personalized travel planning services; disincentives are often financial like parking pricing or congestion pricing. This section ends with an overview of current and upcoming programs that support mode shift.', 'A1. Projects Recently Completed', 'The Mobility Strategic goal benefitted from many long-awaited transformative projects. The opening of the Expo Light Rail connected Santa Monica to a county-wide network of rail lines, and the Colorado Esplanade transformed an auto-oriented street to an enticing people-oriented street. These and other projects create a momentum on which the Mobility Strategic goal could build. Other recent efforts include:', '· Evolution of Blue integration of Expo and service increases (2016, 2017)', '· Lincoln Boulevard Peak Bus Lanes (2017)', '· 12 Downtown Pedestrian Scrambles (2016)', '· Creative Crosswalks Pilot (2016)', '· California Incline and Protected Bikeway (2016)', '· Downtown Community Plan - requiring wider sidewalks on Lincoln Blvd (2017)', '· Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway lighting - 9th to 19th Streets (2017)', '· 4th Street Sidewalk widening and pedestrian lighting (2017)', '· Safe Routes to School - Samohi protected and green lanes, network connection from Michigan to 6th Street on Pico (2016, revised 2017)', '· Green bike lanes on Main Street and Broadway (2014)', '· Safe Routes to School - 15mph speed limit & striping refresh at 4 schools\u202f(2018)', '· Blue @ Night service at 17th/SMC Expo station (2016-present)', '· Santa Monica Free Ride operations (2014-present)', 'Encouragement and TDM:', '· Buy One, Get One Free (BOGO) Promotion, GoSaMo Campaign, CarFree Friday (2016, 2017)', '· COAST Open Streets Festival (2016, 2017)', '· GoSaMo Transportation Management Organization launch (2016)', 'Adopted plans developed with community input generated the momentum behind these projects. Specifically, the LUCE policies and actions, Bike Action Plan 5-year and 20-year project lists, and Pedestrian Action Plan 5-year list provide guides. Attachment A identifies the progress made on the Bike Action Plan program and project lists, and Pedestrian Action Plan 5-year project list.', 'This work has yielded dividends - from 2016 to 2017 the number of resident drive-alone trips dropped 4 percent, from 64% to 60%, replaced by a combination of biking, riding Expo, carpooling and taking car services [Resident Travel Surveys 2016, 2017]. Breeze bike share reported over one million bike trips taken in the first 18 months of operation.\u202fExpo Light Rail also introduced people to new transit, and transit to new people; reaching the 2030 ridership projections in just one year.\u202fGoSaMo campaign got people in touch with these services. Through community engagement at over 15 community events, social media outreach, Seascape, and a GoSaMo website, the campaign achieved over 60 million impressions, including over 15,000 people in person and had over 25,000 website visits. Understanding of how to use Expo jumped 27%, and how to use Breeze jumped 21% according to a GoSaMo before/after survey.', 'A2. Mobility-Related CIP Projects Underway', "Santa Monica's Capital Improvement Program (CIP) organizes, prioritizes, and allocates funding for the numerous infrastructure maintenance and improvement efforts taking place each year. The CIP includes over 200 active projects addressing multiple health and safety requirements, infrastructure needs, and community and Council priorities. Mobility is an ongoing focus of the CIP, and over a dozen mobility projects are currently in process. The projects are in various stages of design and construction including administrative processes with procurement and Caltrans approvals. In addition to contributing to Mobility Strategic Goal mode shift targets, the mobility projects also create safer streets that contribute to the Vision Zero target. See Attachment B for more project details and maps.", 'Current Mobility Project', 'Cost (approx.)', 'Primary Funding Source', 'Est. Complete', '17th Street Pedestrian Lighting, Crossings, and Protected Bikeway: design of safer connections to Expo Light Rail, Santa Monica College, and the hospitals', '$7.2m', 'CMAQ', '2021', 'Lincoln Boulevard new pedestrian crossings with refuge islands, and lighting', '$3.3m*', 'TIF', '2020', '26th St/Bergamot Connectivity - Olympic Boulevard Sidewalks 26th to Stewart, and Stewart Street lighting and protected bike lanes, Colorado to I-10', '$2.8m', 'STPL', '2020', 'Michigan Ave Greenway - 20th Street Bike Connection: Bridge improvements and reconnecting Michigan over I-10 for pedestrians and bikes.', '$1.2m', 'ATP 1', '2021', 'Bike Network Linkages to Expo upgrading miles of bikeways between Wilshire and Pico Boulevards with high visibility green paint, bike detection, and 1,000 bike racks.', '$3.4m', 'Metro CFP', '2018', '4th Street Phase II bicycle and pedestrian improvements between Colorado and Olympic Boulevard.', '$2.0m', 'ATP 2', '2020', 'Real-time Downtown Parking availability sign system, and pedestrian/bicycle wayfinding in ½ mile radius around each Expo station.', '$1.5m', 'Metro CFP', '2019', 'Pier Deck to Beach Bike Path Connection for bicyclists and pedestrians', '$1.4m', 'Metro CFP', '2022', 'Safe Routes to School: crossing, sidewalk and curbside improvements adjacent to 4 schools.', '$1.5m', 'General Fund', '2019', 'Safe Routes to School - Edison Language Academy access improvements on Kansas, Stewart, Delaware Streets', '$700k', 'SRTS', '2018', 'Airport Avenue Sidewalk and protected bike facility - Bundy to 23rd Street', '$2m*', 'Airport Fund', '2021', 'North Beach Trail improvements creates separate parallel paths for bicycle and pedestrian traffic.', '$1.6m*', 'Beach Recreation Fund', '2021', 'Wilshire Boulevard Corridor Safety Enhancements Study', '$500k', 'Caltrans Planning grant', '2020', '*Project may request additional funding in later phases.', 'Many of the mobility projects leverage limited City funding for external grant funding like Metro Call for Projects (CFP), the Active Transportation Program (ATP), or Safe Routes to School (SRTS). To be more competitive, grant match is usually proposed of 10-20% of project construction cost which comes from a combination of Prop C, Prop A, TDA Article 3, Transportation Impact Fee (TIF), or general funds. The grants and their match funds are also programmed through the biennial CIP. Most recently, grant agencies have favored transit access projects such as first/last mile connections to rail stops and allocated funds to “disadvantaged communities” as defined by a third party source like CalEnviroScreen 3.0. This has resulted in Santa Monica being less competitive, and may be a concern for future grant funding. Nonetheless, staff has tried to advance projects that build a complete citywide network of infrastructure, pedestrian lighting, landscaping, and other improvements.', 'The timing of project completion is determined by many factors including grant administration requirements, local procurement processes, project complexity and staff availability. For example, in order to use ATP grant funds for design or construction, each phase must receive funding authorization from the California Transportation Commission prior to release of our local Request for Proposals. Administration and procurement can easily add 1-2 years to each project. While the Mobility Division has been successful in winning over $20 million in grant funds for a dozen projects, the availability of staff to implement them has been a challenge. Reallocation of time from regulatory work has helped relieve some of the pressure, but there is still a backlog of projects and slow progression that has to accommodate competing priorities.', 'Not shown on the list of projects is the City’s significant and on-going maintenance work. When maintenance necessitates the reconstruction of street sections, there is an opportunity to rebuild with multi-modal improvements. The result may occasionally be improvements outside of priority areas or networks, but the cost and time needed for the improvements are significantly reduced. PW and PCD staff share the goal of aligning maintenance and multi-modal facility construction efforts, and are identifying the tools needed to do it effectively such as maps and communication protocols. Staff has yet to undertake the work to develop systems that would make this possible.', 'A3. Goals for Future Mobility-Related Capital Projects', 'Council will consider a Biennial Capital Improvement Budget in May and June. Broader capital priorities will be presented to Council for consideration at the Budget Study Session in the context of wider-ranging infrastructure needs. Mobility Staff prepared a number of proposed feasibility, planning, design and construction efforts for consideration in context of all the requests. The staff approach to prioritizing proposals for mobility projects in this cycle is:', '1. Complete Streets projects identified in adopted plans that complete bike, pedestrian and transit networks. These projects are based on a community input process and consideration of network and modal connections. Projects come from Bike and Pedestrian Action Plans, LiNC Plan, Downtown Community Plan, Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway. Examples: Ocean Avenue Protected Bikeway (California to Colorado) identified in the Downtown Community Plan; Safe Routes to School improvements at 6 schools identified in the Pedestrian Action Plan.', '2. Project development for Vision Zero and Neighborhood Greenway improvements. Pursue crash evaluation and feasibility study for improvements on the Vision Zero priority network, and initial Neighborhood Greenways in Bike Action Plan. Examples: Ocean Avenue Safety Assessment and Preliminary Design; Pico Boulevard Crossing Enhancements - Stewart to Urban Streets; Washington Avenue Neighborhood Greenway Preliminary Design and Outreach.', '3. Projects that leverage outside transportation funds. Stretch local dollars with state and federal funds, with the tradeoff that grant funds constrain project scope and introduce additional administrative steps (usually with Caltrans) that delay project delivery.\u202fExample: Programming grant funds recently received for Wilshire Boulevard pedestrian safety investigation.', '4. Projects that are coordinated with adjacent maintenance or new projects. If work is being done by the City or an adjacent property, leverage work to maximize public outcomes. For example, when a road is being repaved add new lane striping, or when a property is being redeveloped coordinate construction of adjacent sidewalk and intersection upgrades. This may reorder projects identified in an adopted plan.\u202fExamples: Pearl Street preliminary design adjacent to Santa Monica College and JAMS Auditorium reconstruction; Addition of 26th Street/Olympic Boulevard northeast corner pedestrian crossing to the Olympic Boulevard sidewalk construction.', "Recent legislative changes have created additional transportation funding opportunities through Local Return funds from Measure M, the countywide sales tax that passed in 2016, and Senate Bill 1 that increased statewide gas taxes, a portion of which flow back to local governments. These complement prior local return sources from Proposition A, Proposition C, Measure R, and dedicated State and Federal transportation programs which get allocated through the City's budget process. Supplementing existing staff and resources with these funds will help offset other capital funding limitations and will help address expectations for mobility improvements and other community priorities.", 'The speed of delivering these projects directly affects progress on the Mobility Strategic Goal. For example, efforts to grow walking and biking trips depend on increasing evening lighting and protected lanes and crossings. Project delivery schedule is driven by the numerous steps in procurement and approvals, and staffing availability. As the city endeavors to reach Vision Zero (discussed more below) and to facilitate significant mode shift, streamlining of procurement methods, alignment of staffing resources, and better interagency collaboration will be needed to reduce project delivery schedules and enable more facilities to be built in a timely fashion.', 'A4. TDM Efforts to Increase Walking, Biking and Transit', 'Transportation Demand Management is the term often given to the suite of efforts, both “carrots and sticks,” which are used to transfer drive-alone trips to other modes. TDM helps to reduce demand to manage the roadways as a limited resource, enabling more people to move in the same amount of space. Santa Monica has a TDM program to enforce trip-reduction regulations on employers, and does educational and promotional events focused on Safe Routes to School. The City’s programs in parking and traffic management need to work together with TDM so that the systems reinforce the policy goals. Recent accomplishments in TDM include:', 'Project Name', 'Project Description', 'GoSaMo Mobility Campaign (FY16-17)', 'Timed with Expo Light Rail opening, the City piloted a campaign designed to help people get "excited, equipped, and trying" new mobility options. Timeless elements from the campaign continue to be used as collateral material in other work efforts. GoSaMo helped make the City\'s diverse and sometimes disparate mobility efforts legible to community members.', 'Transportation Management Organization (TMO)', 'A Citywide Transportation Management Organization was created in 2016, called the "GoSaMo TMO" available to assist residents, employees, and businesses with mobility information. They have one full-time contracted specialist, under contract until 2019.', 'TDM Ordinance Increases (eff 1/1/16)', 'Council updated the TDM Ordinance in 2016 that requires the promotion of transportation options. The Update added regulations for developments over 7,500 square feet, to decrease the threshold for employers that must implement site reduction programs, and to increase the employer reduction targets. Prior to update, the ordinance reduced over 4,000 trips in the AM and PM peak.', 'Events and Promotions', "Monthly Ride with the Mayor, Santa Monica Family Bike Festival, National Night Out, Kidical Mass, and dozens of outreach events brought information to people. Breeze Bike Share promotional days like free Breeze Birthday and Valentine's Day rides bring new people to the system.", 'Efforts are concurrently underway to improve the customer experience of compliance with the TDM Ordinance. Using the CityGrows platform (from the 2016 Hack the Beach winner) staff is working to create an online employee survey tool and Emission Reduction Plan tool. These are big steps forward that enable data collection and data-informed decision-making as staff advises employers on what incentives and measures are most effectively working locally.', 'In the next two years, two programs will be piloted based on Metro grants that the City was awarded. An Active Aging pilot program, also known as Safe Routes for Seniors, will outreach to seniors with mobility information, training, and to seek input on access concerns. A Localized Travel Planning effort is also funded, to provide personalized “concierge” service to residents and employees regarding travel route planning and testing new modes. Both efforts are already programmed into the budget, and will be tracked and evaluated with performance metrics.', 'Both the GoSaMo TMO and GoSaMo mobility campaign could be leveraged for more reach to compel behavior change. Each could also be expanded to outreach to specific market segments, such as people who currently drive to Santa Monica for recreation, a group not currently addressed with the TDM Ordinance or resident outreach programs. Currently the TMO contract extends to early 2019. The GoSaMo campaign funds have been expended, but the graphic identity continues to be used in other efforts. Reactivation of the GoSaMo campaign would require staff and outreach resources.', 'Parking and Pricing Tools', 'Santa Monica has a rich reserve of on-street and off-street parking in Downtown and therefore plays an important role in the parking market. Parking has been historically under-priced in busy areas, providing a hidden subsidy for driving alone that undermines efforts for sustainable transportation and transit. Actively managing parking pricing is an effective tool that is supported by local policy and can play a role in facilitating mode shift. Parking revenue should help to facilitate mobility options, with continued reinvestment of parking revenue in transportation alternatives, and their on-going system operations.', 'On May 10, 2016 Council reviewed and approved revised Downtown parking rates that are better aligned with market rates, and that support the LUCE target of 85% parking availability through pricing and incentive structures. On August 8, 2017 Council eliminated parking minimums in Downtown through the Downtown Community Plan, and established maximums that will encourage more sharing of existing parking spaces. Action: Continue to actively review and adjust parking prices citywide as market rates change, and revisit parking management and construction policies to encourage sharing existing resources.', 'B. Initiate a 2-Year Program Pursuing “Vision Zero” in Santa Monica', 'The second component of the Mobility Strategic Goal is Vision Zero, the elimination of all fatal and severe injury roadway collisions by 2026. A testament to the City’s commitment to wellbeing, Vision Zero will ensure that our streets are safe for all, regardless of age, ability, income or mode. While audacious in scope, anything less would be unacceptable.', 'The notion of Santa Monica promoting safety on our streets is hardly new. Policies in the Land Use & Circulation Element, programs in the Bicycle and Pedestrian Action Plans, and daily staff work across all departments encourages safety. For example:', '· Police Traffic Services daily patrol, speeding enforcement, distracted driving operations, DUI checkpoints and community engagement.', '· Roadway maintenance and cleaning which among many benefits ensures visible striping and functioning signals, and reduces bicycle crashes, vehicle damage and unpredictable driver behavior; and maintains safety lighting for intersections and roadways.', '· Sidewalk and crosswalk monitoring and regular maintenance.', '· Safe Routes to School education and encouragement programs that raise awareness of student safety and driver behavior in school zones.', 'These efforts, coupled with a long history of safety projects and a host of capital projects in the pipeline reflect the on-going commitment to community wellbeing and protection.', 'But more must be done to achieve Vision Zero, as evidenced by the 9 people killed and 25 severely injured on Santa Monica’s streets in 2017 (two pedestrians were killed on Pacific Coast Highway, which is under State jurisdiction, and one person was killed by a driver in a public parking lot). Both the 2017 death and injury figures represent increases from the 2006-16 average of 4 deaths and 22 severe injuries per year.', 'This unfortunate trend is not unique to Santa Monica. According to the National Safety Council, between 2014 and 2016, fatalities involving automobiles in California were up 19 percent, even worse than the lamentable national increase of 14 percent. Notable exceptions are New York City and San Francisco which embarked on comprehensive and far-reaching Vision Zero programs of education, speed management, and safer facilities to protect people. According to Governing Magazine, both cities experienced the fewest number of traffic fatalities in 2017 since records started being kept in 1910 and 1915, respectively. Notably, New York City experienced a 32 percent reduction in pedestrian fatalities between 2016 and 2017.', 'Vision Zero reframes priorities of how we design, manage, and enforce our roads. For decades, street performance has been measured primarily in vehicle capacity and delay, encouraging policies and designs that prioritize vehicle speed and throughput over people’s overall safety. Vision Zero changes ideas about what streets must accomplish, prioritizing the health and safety of people above all else. Achieving Vision Zero will necessitate that all departments take a role - such as placing traffic calming to manage speeding, reallocating roadway space to barriers that protect people walking and biking, targeting enforcement on dangerous distracted driving, adapting emergency response, and prioritizing engagement efforts to focus on safety education, and communication tools.', 'Staff has created a work plan of strategic actions for achieving Vision Zero by 2026, included as Attachment C, and complemented by the Priority Network Map. The map was created by evaluating 11 years of fatal and severe injury data starting in 2006. The map identifies areas where fatal and severe injury incidents have occurred, and is a guide for subsequent efforts. These areas would be the first to receive more detailed evaluation of collision reports, so that any necessary countermeasures can be identified. This interim step is crucial to better understand the conditions occurring, the factors contributing to crashes, and what countermeasures would be effective.', 'The strategic actions also identify a number of process and information improvements that can help to align city work efforts to the Vision Zero goal. Aligning these work efforts with a priority for eliminating severe and fatal collisions will help to leverage existing resources toward the Vision Zero goal. When reviewing the work plan, what quickly comes into focus is that these efforts touch many City functions, and will require a committed inter-departmental team to achieve it.', "The Vision Zero strategic actions represent a 2-year work plan, with elements that are specific, measurable and concrete. This approach allows sufficient time to test new tactical interventions and strategies, and is necessary to adapt and realign departmental work plans. Progress will be tracked in SaMoStat, the City's performance management system in order to have relentless follow-up and assessment. Based on the first 2 years, work efforts that are producing results will be reinforced while any resources allocated to tactics that are not working will be redirected to other efforts. The constant assessment will be used to guide a longer-term action plan.", 'The Vision Zero work plan is organized into five key areas:', '· Data-driven decision making: Develop a precise, data-driven decision-making system. Identify the locations of highest need and evaluate collision reports to identify the most effective countermeasures. Share data between departments and regularly convene a safety task force of key City departments. Evaluate capital improvement projects and programs to learn what works and where changes are needed.', '· Safer streets for all ages and abilities: Speed is the biggest factor in whether a collision is minor or fatal. Design and enforce street operations so that drivers travel at appropriate speeds where people are walking and biking. Build a network of neighborhood greenways, low-stress routes that parallel busier corridors and connect to parks, schools, jobs and services. Conduct regular enforcement operations targeting speeding and distracted driving, especially along the Priority Network.', '· An engaged and alert community: For too long, collisions have been accepted as an unfortunate cost of travel, so long as our friends and loved ones are not among the victims. Cause a shift in awareness by engaging with the community through presentations about roadway safety.', '· Supporting policies: Institutionalize Vision Zero principles in our daily work to support the work in other categories. Ensure roadway safety is a prioritized metric in the City’s budget process, create policy to minimize construction impacts to road users, and advocate for safety improvements to Pacific Coast Highway, which is managed by Caltrans.', '· Safer vehicles: Improve the safety of City fleet vehicles and their operators. Educate drivers about cyclists and the maneuvers they make to improve predictability and safety. Establish local policy regarding autonomous vehicles and identify smaller-footprint fleet vehicles to enable slower street designs.', 'In 2017, Council allocated $500,000 for a first phase of Vision Zero projects including:', 'Vision Zero Jump Start Efforts', 'Cost (approx.)', 'Est. Complete', 'Status', 'Improve the Pico/Stewart crossing with a curb extension at the southeast corner to increase pedestrian visibility and reduce exposure to collisions.', '$100k', '2019', 'Procurement', 'Improve either the Santa Monica Boulevard/6th Street or Broadway/5th Street intersections with curb extensions and leading pedestrian intervals.', '$180k', '2018-19 (temporary)', 'Procurement & outreach', 'Install Rapid Rectangular Flashing Beacons to increase vehicle yielding at two Wilshire intersections and near two school locations.', '$120k', '2018', 'Devices no longer approved for new installs; looking at alternatives', 'Pilot bicycle and pedestrian protections on Arizona Avenue at McKinley Elementary, and near Franklin Elementary.', '$80k', '2018-19', 'Procurement & outreach', 'Install leading pedestrian intervals at 25 signalized intersections throughout Santa Monica (based on volumes, crash history and adjacent destinations)', 'Staff time', '2018', '27 intersections, with plans for approximately 25 additional locations', 'Continue enforcement and education operations', 'Staff time', 'On-going', 'On-going', 'There are numerous dispersed lane striping, crosswalk, and signage projects that could help mitigate the speeding and driver behaviors leading to collisions. Some Vision Zero cities have developed streamlined implementation teams for these projects, including New York City and Austin, Texas. The teams vertically integrate the evaluation, design and construction functions to expedite implementation within these larger cities with dedicated transportation departments. On-call contractors could serve a similar function to design and construct countermeasures, and supplement staff for outreach.', 'Vision Zero cities are working on realigning processes, work plans and budgets for managing the public street. This significant coordination effort leverages existing work efforts to deliver new results, and changes business as usual. Options to relocate or add staff capacity to lead Vision Zero alignment efforts and to provide quicker response would advance Vision Zero. Concurrent creation of on-call or pre-qualified contractors and design consultants and an on-going operating budget for this work would enable staff to more rapidly respond to community requests and install pilot countermeasures.', 'This month, the City began work on the Vision Zero communications and outreach effort building from the GoSaMo campaign. The work will focus on creating and implementing an outreach plan that will inform the community of how the City is taking steps to make streets safer for all modes, how to be safe and attentive while traveling, and what everyone can do to participate in saving lives, highlighting that speeding and distracted driving are the leading causes of collisions. As this work develops, we will keep the community informed.', 'C. Connected and Complete Transportation Network - A New Model for Mobility', 'Creating a "Complete and Connected Transportation Network" is the third target of the Mobility Strategic Goal, and seeks to provide people with a suite of adaptable options to meet the varying needs of the traveler and the situation.\u202fNew tools for creating a connected and complete transportation system are being unlocked by technology and innovation.\u202fPeople now have on-demand ride-hailing (Uber/Lyft), bike share and car rentals available on their smart phone. And driverless vehicles are in rapid development. This section discusses the benefits and challenges of these new technologies with a focus on the intersection of vehicle automation, shared mobility, and electrification, and how transportation technology can be shaped to achieve Santa Monica’s community goals.', 'The cultural changes generating these transformative technologies extend well beyond the scale of Santa Monica, but the City can choose how to engage and incorporate them. Their effects on streets, transportation systems, safety, congestion and emissions are still very much local issues. This section provides links to the work of lead cities that are developing flexible adaption strategies. Ideas for short-term (1 year) and mid-term (2-3 year) activities for Santa Monica are in Attachment E, and summarized below along with a list of current staff work efforts that support the overall approach.', 'Benefits and Challenges of New Transportation Technology', 'There is unprecedented levels of private sector investment in transportation technology development, fueled by the market demand for easier and cheaper mobility. Technology companies and auto manufacturers are investing heavily in research and development of new computer-driven vehicles and business models based on providing mobility services (not just vehicle sales). Transportation services have multiplied with the help of venture capital funds, which reportedly continue to subsidize operations. Access to mobility options, increased convenience, and a competitive cost per mile (whether subsidized or not) have been game-changers for individuals and cities. Vehicle automation, shared mobility, and electrification are associated with a number of environmental, social and transportation benefits, as well as a number of challenges in those same categories.', 'Vehicle Automation:', 'Partially automated vehicles are in testing, and some predict fully driverless vehicles as early as 2020. Autonomous vehicles could transform the way people and goods move through cities. How automation rolls out will depend on many choices. For example, will people primarily own their automated vehicle, or will they be commercial fleet services for hire; will automated vehicles be more or less able than human drivers to safely interact with people on the streets; will transit and goods delivery jobs be replaced or complemented? For some, automated vehicles are a technological innovation that will eliminate congestion and barriers to free movement, for others automation is an extension of the auto-dependence that has generated the congestion we have today and will have the same result.', 'Benefit', 'Challenge', 'Riders would gain productive use of driving time. Driverless fleet services could offer reduced per mile costs due to staff savings. Youth, seniors and people without a license could travel independently.', 'AVs would induce new and longer trips (measured in vehicle miles traveled or VMT) and emissions. Cars traveling more miles will increase congestion, requiring appropriate countermeasures to curb negative externalities. Professional drivers could lose gainful employment.', 'Action: increase vehicle sharing to mitigate increased VMT (shared rides, and shared ownership if applicable), create tools to maximize street person-capacity and vehicle efficiency.', 'Shared Mobility:', 'Shared Mobility refers to a very diverse collection of services that facilitate the sharing of rides and/or vehicles, including car-sharing, ride-hailing, bike-sharing, micro-transit, etc. A helpful list of types and definitions from the Shared Use Mobility Center is included in Attachment D. Shared mobility services are typically pay-per-use services based on a credit-card enabled account. Some services are new and some are duplicative but add consumer convenience or other amenities. Similarly, some shared devices are new but others just operate in a new way. These services are coming from the private sector, which raises some concerns about longevity and equity. For example what happens when new services cannibalize public transit but then go out of business? How can people without credit cards get access? And what should cities do when private sector car-services create so much congestion that no vehicles can move, and even bike lanes are blocked? And as new devices proliferate, how can space be created for safe movement and access? The principles discussed above can help inform the process of answering these questions, and the continued work of managing street space for the movement and access of all.', 'Benefit', 'Challenge', 'Riders get as-needed access to transportation services. Increases travel options, including replacing short trips with zero- or low-emission devices that also require less right-of-way space to move. Research shows reduced vehicle ownership and VMT among people who use multiple shared services. Can reduce overall cost of transportation per capita.', 'Shared services are drawn to activity centers, adding to congestion and slowing public transit service where it is most needed. Ride-hailing services add to VMT and emissions, and rarely offer zero- emission options. Some services and devices add functionality or convenience, but some cannibalize transit riders. New shared mobility devices can clutter public rights-of-way. Lack of access by users without smart phones or credit cards.', 'Action: support public mass transit through infrastructure and service improvements, prioritize the highest-capacity shared ride services and lowest-emission modes.', 'Electrification:', 'Improved battery quality and longevity are reducing electric vehicle (EV) and fuel costs, and improving range - leading to consumer savings and increased EV use. There are positive signs that market forces will propel on-going EV market penetration. Santa Monica recently adopted an EV Action Plan to catalyze electrification.', 'Benefit', 'Challenge', 'Reduced consumer cost of vehicle ownership and fueling. Using renewable energy supply can significantly reduce net transportation emissions compared to non-renewables. New smaller electric mobility devices such as electric shuttles and electric bicycles/tricycles can reduce overall power load and space needs.', 'Reduced consumer travel costs typically induce use and miles traveled. EVs still add to congestion and suffer from it.', 'Action: maximize renewable energy sourcing, encourage diverse electric mobility choices.', 'Safety: Cars driven by a computer would eliminate driver error as a cause of collisions. Since driver error is a factor in 95% of incidents and distracted driving is on the rise, automation is expected to save lives. The system of software, sensors, communication and equipment necessary for a computer to drive a vehicle is complex. Technology is progressing rapidly, but premature deployment is life-threatening. Auto makers are adding passenger protections, but automated response to less predictable roadway users like people walking and biking, and construction workers remains a challenge. Action: Advocate for a focus on the safety of people in the public streets from the private sector.', 'Data: As cars get smarter, the amount and type of data they process, collect and produce increase exponentially. Fast and stable communication networks are the backbone of an AV’s location and orientation systems. Cars will also increasingly produce information about roadway conditions, travel speeds, vehicle operations, origins and destinations, and much more. Who owns the data (automakers, software providers, or customers), and who has access to it (private sector, public sector) are important policy discussions happening at the highest government levels. Action: Advocate for consumer privacy as well as secure public access to operational data that can assist with roadway management and maintenance.', 'What have other Lead Agencies done?', 'Cities across the country are grappling with these new opportunities and challenges. They have initiated new work efforts and areas of exploration to guide change so that it best fits within their communities. Many have developed pilots and other strategies to test and reflect on the results. Some have crafted policies and plans to guide the myriad efforts on data, communications, regulation, operation and maintenance.', '· Seattle Department of Transportation "New Mobility Playbook" - Outlines a series of collective efforts to advance safety, justice and sustainability and avoid congestion, unsafe streets and expensive, exclusive services. SDOT is restructuring to create a New Mobility Program partially funded by new mobility permit revenues, and align staff and resources with the playbook strategies.', '· Los Angeles Department of Transportation "Transportation Technology Strategy”- The strategy defines a roadmap for integrating shared mobility, technology-enabled transportation experiences, and AVs into department planning and operations to maximize the benefits to public safety, sustainability and roadway efficiency. LADOT is integrating recommendations from the technology strategies into the 2018-2020 work program including investments to modernize equipment, using data driven metrics to guide decisions, and creating a citywide plan for autonomous and shared mobility services.', '· North American City Transportation Officials (NACTO) "Blueprint for Autonomous Urbanism" - The blueprint describes the critical role that cities play in designing safe streets that provide for more modes of travel and people, encourage more active and shared travel, and that maximize space for people concurrent with deploying autonomous vehicles.', '· Shared Use Mobility Center "Shared Mobility Action Plan for Los Angeles County" - The plan focuses on strategies and tactics to reduce the number of vehicles by 2% in LA County. The plan stipulates that this modest but impactful change can be achieved by expanding existing networks including transit, car sharing, bike sharing, and building mobility hubs throughout the County.', 'Two themes in the work of lead cities are to proactively renovate streets and to continue to provide crucial transportation services, to ensure that there is service equity and continuity. Many also note that cities can strategically influence mobility choices through system management and pricing structures so that the most sustainable, equitable, and efficient systems are the most convenient and cost-effective. For example, cities are considering how to organize roadways so that higher-occupancy vehicles and low-emission modes receive lane or intersection priority. Another theme is the realignment of work groups to adapt to the significant changes in policy questions, public/private partnership, data, and outcomes. Cities are staying engaged in this environment of rapid change so they can be proactively ready for new challenges.', "Santa Monica has already engaged with some of the changes, forging partnership with Lyft for Dial-a-Ride services and launching a successful citywide bike share system. However examples like the arrival of electric scooters this fall provided perspective on the scale and complexity of these challenges, particularly when initiated by the private sector. Existing regulations, infrastructure (both operational and physical), and resources aren't suited to shared mobility options. Staff will be coming forward in the upcoming months with a proposed trial program for shared mobility services. But the scale and scope of this challenge necessitates a much broader strategy including a range of actions, investments, and management tools.", 'What can Santa Monica do?', "At this early stage, Santa Monica can start with identifying priorities for engaging with both automated vehicles and shared mobility so that each contribute to, rather than detract from, our community's shared vision for the future. Applying the principles articulated earlier, Santa Monica should specifically work toward:", '· Vehicle automation that is safer for people on the street, and which does not increase local congestion and emissions, and', '· Shared mobility that supports transit and shared rides, expands mobility options, increases roadway efficiency, and reduces emissions.', 'As succinctly stated in the NACTO Blueprint: "The New Mobility network has public mass transit as the backbone of the transportation network, while autonomous vehicles, biking and walking complement the core parts of the network and provide service where mass transit is not as efficient. Public agencies and private companies could work in tandem to actively manage the network with volume, mode and speed thresholds controlled through real-time pricing and curbside demand management." By pursuing this vision, Santa Monica streets can move more people with fewer vehicles which creates opportunity to repurpose road space for community members. With more people on the street, our streets become safer and we get closer to eliminating tragic injuries and fatalities. And when clean energy powers the vehicles we use, we can eliminate the 65% of Santa Monica\'s emissions that come from transportation and achieve carbon neutrality by 2050.', "Many of the City's existing work efforts already support new mobility because of Council and executive leadership over recent years. Continuing the following efforts will help support the long-range goals:", 'Existing Work Efforts', 'Departments', 'Investing in transit, especially on high volume routes, and regularly evaluating transit system performance', 'BBB', 'Renovating streets with additional safety measures and protections for vulnerable people on the street, and streets that prioritize sustainable and active modes like transit, walking and biking', 'PCD, PW', 'Collaborating among departments in planning for autonomous and shared mobility through AV and Shared Mobility working groups', 'PCD, ISD, PW, PD, CMO, CAO', 'Collaborating regionally on interoperability efforts and transportation planning through the Westside COG and Metro', 'PCD, CM', 'Using parking pricing and parking sharing tools to maximize use of existing parking resources', 'PCD', 'Expanding EV charging and implementing occupancy management tools', 'PW', 'Fostering a culture of mobility innovation through the Mobility Strategic Goal', 'PCD, CM', 'Developing the Citywide Economic Strategy to identify new transportation funding mechanisms that build fiscal stability', 'HED, CM', 'Providing mobility information to support travel diversity and behavior change', 'PCD, BBB', 'In spite of this good work, new technology has disrupted "business as usual" for transportation planning and management, and the complementary efforts of other departments. Similar to Vision Zero, cities are having to adjust structures, work plans, budgets and procedures to maintain effectiveness. Attachment E outlines a number of new short-term (1-year) and mid-term (2-3) year steps in advocacy, infrastructure, data management and policy for Council consideration and feedback such as:', 'Advocacy', '· Join State and Federal legislative advocacy for multi-modal safety, equity and sustainability', '· Engage the public in discussions about new mobility', '· Outreach to senior, low-income, communities of color, and people with disabilities to reduce barriers to new mobility', 'Infrastructure & Services', '· Pursue additional transit and high-capacity vehicle prioritization', '· Pilot low-emission micro-transit service for shorter intra-city trips', '· Fill in service gaps with flexible providers with low- or no-emission vehicles', '· Co-locate multiple shared mobility and EV charging\u202fin on-street Mobility Hubs', '· Develop a long-term permitting system for shared mobility devices with performance criteria', '· Consolidate sensor and communications equipment for streetscape quality', '· Develop connectivity strategies for Purple Line subway extension to the VA', 'Policy', '· Create performance metrics for street efficiency that move people in fewer vehicles', '· Develop a new curbside management strategy, starting with Downtown', '· Consider transition strategies needed during periods of partial automation', '· Develop new street design criteria and operational targets', '· Create criteria for reallocation of underutilized street space to protect pedestrians, and create green space in neighborhoods and gathering areas', '· Reorganize and expand capacity to successfully engage with mobility changes', 'Data', '· Develop data-sharing, partnership, and performance protocols for new mobility', '· Engage with third-party data platforms for secure open data', "Council input on the priorities listed in Attachment E and summarized above, including input on the city's desired level of engagement and leadership on these issues, would help to guide next steps. Each effort could be worthwhile, but is also above and beyond the existing work of staff. A prioritization will help staff to allocate appropriate time and resources. Additional study session could also help to determine a strategic work plan with staffing, budget and resources.", 'In the near term, PCD is preparing a pilot program for Council consideration that would enable permitted shared mobility devices to use portions of the public right-of-way. This was an unplanned effort, and accommodated due to unforeseen private actions and significant community concerns. The pilot will enable testing of permit conditions and operating options, to be followed with revisions and updates based on lessons learned and data evaluation.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of this study session’s policy discussion. However, pursuing a new model of mobility involves a significant shift of capital and staff resources to achieve, including transportation-related funding sources, grant opportunities and private investment. Staff will use comments received at this study session to inform priorities for mobility-related projects and allocation of staff resources and return to Council as specific budget actions are required in the future. Council will consider the FY 2018-20 Biennial Capital Improvement Program Budget at a Budget Study Session in May.']}
{'Title': 'First Modification with ChargePoint to Provide, Install and Operate Electric Vehicle Charging Stations; Resolution to authorize application for MSRC funds', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '11. Resolutions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to agreement #10507 in the amount of $493,247 including 10% contingency with ChargePoint, a California-based company, for the purchase and operation of 45 electric vehicle charging stations. This will result in a five-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $666,372 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.2. Adopt the attached resolution authorizing the application for incentive funds in the amount of $121,500 from Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) for Clean Transportation Funding for the 2017 Local Government Partnership Program to accelerate the transition to zero and near-zero emission vehicles. 3. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to apply for and accept the incentive funds, if awarded.4. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report, for the agreement modification and the incentive funds, in the event that the incentive funds are awarded.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'To advance the goal of having 300 electric vehicle (EV) charging ports in Santa Monica by 2020 as called for by the recently adopted Electric Vehicle Action Plan (Attachment A), the City plans to add 81 EV charging ports (45 stations) across the City. This includes 44 public and one fleet charging station. The City currently has 89 public charging ports (53 single-ports and 18 dual-ports) available at 71 charging stations (the City has a mix of single-port and dual-port stations). Staff recommends modifying the agreement with ChargePoint to procure the new charging stations for a total amended amount not to exceed $493,247, resulting in a new contract for an amount not to exceed $666,372 over five years.', 'Staff have identified incentive funding of $121,500 through the Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) Clean Transportation Program (Attachment B) to partially offset the one-time procurement and eligible installation costs. In order to be eligible to receive MSRC funding, cities must deliver a brief MSRC-provided presentation (Attachment C) to Council about the Clean Transportation Program and obtain an approved resolution from Council (Attachment D).', 'Background', 'Santa Monica has been a leader in adopting low emission vehicle technology and providing public charging infrastructure.', 'On November 8, 2011, Council held a study session on electric vehicle (EV) infrastructure (Attachment E). Staff presented the challenges to accommodating EV charging for residents, visitors, and employees as well as the pending installation of charging infrastructure.', 'Since then, the City has expanded its public charging infrastructure from 20 charging ports to 89 throughout the city. This total includes seven dual-port charging stations at the Civic Center Structure that were provided by UCLA through a grant-funded research project and one solar-powered charging station at the Airport Administration Office.Nine charging stationsat City Yardsare used exclusively for theCity’s vehicle fleet, whichnow includes over 130 electric vehicles.', 'On July 25, 2017, Council awarded a bid to ChargePoint for the installation of charging stations through Southern California Edison’s Charge Ready pilot program (Attachment F). Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with ChargePoint to install smart charging stations (16 stations, 31 charging ports) at the Civic Center Parking Structure roof for fleet vehicle charging Table 1). Smart charging stations are network connected, which allows for a range of functions including station usage monitoring, cost recovery (charging a fee), maintenance alerts, dynamic pricing, and customer notifications when batteries are full.', 'Table 1: New EV Charging Stations – Original Contract', 'Location', 'Notes', 'Dual-port Stations', 'Single-port Stations', 'Total Available Ports', 'Civic Center Parking Structure', 'Fleet', '15', '1', '31', 'Total Fleet Stations', '16', 'Discussion', 'The EV Action Plan is a guiding document for expanding the infrastructure needed to support the growing demand from EV vehicle owners. The plan establishes goals to expand the number of places where charging is available as well as set out policies for installing charging stations in apartment complexes, private residences, and other privately held locations. The proposed modification to this contract would allow the City to take the next important step to expand the number of charging stations, and provide them in more neighborhoods across the City.', 'The modification includes a capital cost, not to exceed amount of $278,197, including 10% contingency, and an operating cost, not to exceed amount of $215,050 for a total additional not to exceed amount of $493,247 over five years (Table 2). The capital cost includes a one-time purchase of equipment. Operating costs include ChargePoint network services and the ChargePoint Assure maintenance and warranty program (Assure is included at no cost the first year). After the first year staff will analyze maintenance costs and may choose not to proceed with the Assure maintenance program if it fails to prove cost effective.', 'Table 2: Original Contract + Modification', 'Capital Cost + 10% Contingency', '$278,197', 'Operating Costs', '$215,050', 'Total (Modification)', '$493,247', 'Original Contract Amount', '$173,125', 'New total not to exceed', '$666,372', 'The majority of existing charging stations are located in City-owned parking structures and surface lots; two charging stations are located on-street at Montana Avenue. All stations experience a high amount of usage, and staff regularly receive requests to add more charging stations.', 'Staff from the Office of Sustainability & the Environment, Street & Fleet Services, and Architecture Services divisions of the Public Works Department have proposed 27 sites for new and replacement charging stations (Table 3).', 'In response to community feedback to add new stations, rather than begin with replacements, most stations will offer brand new service. Staff are proposing to replace four stations that are obsolete and no longer useful to most EV drivers at Virginia Avenue Park, the Pier, the Solar Port & Water Resources Department. These existing stations are incompatible with EV models produced after the early-2000s.', 'In addition, staff recommends replacing the two existing stations at Montana Avenue, and adding one at this site in order to expand charging access in this area. The existing charging stations on Montana Avenue are highly utilized, however this older technology has no pricing mechanism to deter drivers from overstaying their allotted charging time. Staff frequently receives requests for additional stations and enforcement to encourage vehicle turnover. Costs to add electrical infrastructure for new EV charging sites on Montana Ave would be prohibitively expensive due to the necessary trenching and new service requirements. Replacing the older stations is a cost-effective way to enable more drivers to utilize the stations. The existing older charging stations will be repurposed to charge City fleet vehicles. The new station added at this site will utilize available electrical capacity in the existing service panel. These replacement stations also take advantage of a promotional rate offered by ChargePoint in order to improve charging facilities at a reduced cost.', 'Combined with the new stations, there will be a net gain of 79 publicly available charging ports and a citywide total of 168 public charging ports once all of the 45 stations are installed. The original contract and modification will add 32 fleet charging ports, for a new total of 46 charging ports designated for city fleet vehicles.', 'Table 3. New EV Charging Stations - Modification', 'Location', 'Notes', 'Single-Port Stations', 'Dual-Port Stations', 'Total Available Ports', 'Annenberg', 'New', '1', '2', 'Main Branch Library', 'New', '6', '12', 'Montana Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Ocean Park Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Fairview Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Memorial Park - Curbside', 'New', '5', '10', 'Marine Park', 'New', '1', '2', 'Virginia Ave Park', 'Replacement', '1', '1', 'Various – Ocean Park neighborhood (8 curbside sites)', 'New', '8', '16', 'Various – Wilmont neighborhood (8 curbside sites)', '15 New, 2 Replacement', '4', '13', '30', 'Santa Monica Pier', 'Replacement', '1', '1', 'Civic Solar Port', 'Replacement', '1', '2', 'Water Resources Division', 'Replacement (Fleet)', '1', '2', 'Total', '9', '36', '81', 'Total Stations', '45', '*Station locations are subject to change.', 'Curbside Charging Stations', 'The recently adopted Electric Vehicle Action Plan recommended adding curbside charging infrastructure in multi-unit residential neighborhoods.', 'Upgrades to the City’s streetlight network present opportunities to provide electrical infrastructure for EV charging. Staff is leveraging an existing project to modernize the streetlight electrical circuit in the Ocean Park neighborhood and install up to eight dual-port charging stations in the public right-of-way.', 'Staff have also proposed adding charging stations at up to eight new curbside locations in the Wilmont neighborhood and are working with Southern California Edison to determine feasibility of this effort. This area was selected based on the high density of the area and large volume of requests for charging stations.', '2017 Local Government Partnership Program (MSRC Funds)', "Funding for EV charging stations is partially available through the 2017 Local Government Partnership Program, which is funded by the Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) Clean Transportation Program. Funds are set aside for each city and county within the South Coast Air Quality Management District (SCAQMD) jurisdiction that participates in the AB 2766 Motor Vehicle Registration Fee (Subvention Fund) Program. The Local Government Partnership Program directly supports implementation of SCAQMD's 2016 Air Quality Management Plan (AQMP) by focusing MSRC investments on AQMP measures.", 'The MSRC allocated $121,500 to the City of Santa Monica through this program. Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure Installation is an eligible project category, and MSRC contributes up to 75% of the cost to purchase and install publicly accessible EV charging stations. Eligibility for MSRC incentive funding would require the City to enter into a reimbursement contract and meet specific deliverables.', 'Under the MSRC funding requirements, public EV charging sites must meet a 24-hour access requirement (no facility closures) in order to qualify for the 75% funding contribution. Facilities that do not meet the 24-hour access requirements are eligible to receive up to a 50% funding match. MSRC funds would be distributed on a reimbursement basis upon completion of approved project milestones and submittal of all required reports and invoices.', 'In order to participate, cities must obtain an approved resolution from City Council that acknowledges receipt of the MSRC-supplied presentation from city or county staff, authorizes the proposed project, and allocates the necessary matching funds. The program presentation must be presented to Council live as part of the application process. The application must also contain a project implementation plan, proposed budget, and implementation schedule. All projects must be completed within 60 months of contract execution. Program applications must be submitted by March 2, 2018.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On May 19, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals for the furnishing, delivery and installation of smart electric vehicle service equipment to replace existing charging stations, install new charging stations, and provide ongoing management services, such as networking and maintenance, in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirty-nine vendors downloaded the RFP. Ten firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Parking Division, Information Systems Department, Street & Fleet Division and Office of Sustainability & the Environment.', 'Evaluation was based on price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff then interviewed six shortlisted firms, evaluated the proposals, and conducted interviews. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, ChargePoint was selected as the best qualified firm. The original RFP allowed for sites to be added in addition to the initial specified sites.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to ChargePoint is $493,247 for an amended contract amount not to exceed $666,372. In addition to funds of $78,703 available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019157.589000, the contract modification requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', '1. Release the fund balance of $414,544 from reserve account 4.380236;', '2. Establish a transfer budget of $414,544 from 04695.570321 to 01695.570321;', '3. Appropriate $70,077 to account C019157.589000;', '4. Appropriate $121,500 to account C019157.589100; and', '5. Appropriate $222,967 to account 014261.555010.', 'The total amount of incentive funds available from MSRC is $121,500. If awarded, a revenue budget will be established at account 44426.407830 and an interfund transfer from account 44695.570140 to account 01695.570140 will be included in the Proposed FY 2018-19 Budget. The incentive funding will cover up to 75% of total project costs and requires local match funding to cover the remaining balance. Funds to cover remaining costs are included in the appropriation to account C019157.589100 above.', 'Future funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Request of Councilmembers McKeown and Himmelrich that staff return to City Council with an ordinance stating that it shall be a defense to an eviction if a child under the age of 18 or any educator resides in the unit, the child or educator is a tenant in the unit or has a custodial or family relationship with a tenant in the unit, the tenant has resided in the unit for 12 months or more, and the effective date of the notice of termination of tenancy falls during the school year, as upheld in the attached case.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer and Mayor Pro Tem Davis that the Council direct staff to draft a resolution reaffirming the City’s position against offshore oil and gas drilling, seismic oil exploration, oil and gas leasing, fracking and other well stimulation in Federal and state waters off the Pacific coast.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer, Mayor Pro Tem Davis and Councilmember O’Day that the Council allocate up to $20,000 of discretionary funds to the establishment of a Bob Holbrook scholarship fund, in recognition of his 32 years of public service to the City of Santa Monica (8 years as a SMMUSD board member and 24 years as a member of the City Council). The funds will be used to establish a scholarship fund for a Santa Monica student interested in pursuing an education in civic engagement or public service and for an ad campaign to solicit additional funding.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'City Manager Report: Trades Interns Program', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Modification to Trapeze EAM Maintenance Contract', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support', 'Sponsors': 'Director Edward F. King', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to agreement #9508 (CCS) in the amount of $179,613 with Trapeze, Inc., a Canadian corporation, to complete a business process review, workflow improvements that include software upgrades, and implement a State of Good Repair and Capital Planning module. This would result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $1,295,370, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'BBB must make system upgrades to comply with recently published Transit Asset Management (TAM) guidelines from the Federal Transportation Administration (FTA). Therefore, staff recommends executing a fourth modification to the agreement with Trapeze in the amount of $179,613 to complete a Business Process Review (BPR), workflow improvements that include software upgrades, and implementation of the State of Good Repair and Capital Planning (SGR/CP) module that BBB currently owns. This would result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $1,295,370.', 'Background', 'Big Blue Bus utilizes several products from Trapeze. These products integrate to provide support to BBB for fleet maintenance, and fueling. On November 2011 (Attachment B) City Council authorized the purchase of the Trapeze EAM (Enterprise Asset Management) Fleet Maintenance Software, which went live in March of 2013. In January 2013 (Attachment C), City Council authorized the upgrade of the Fuel Focus fuel management system to fully integrate its fuel system with the maintenance system. In October 2017 (Attachment D), City Council authorized additional years of maintenance services for the EAM product. BBB continues to use the modules of the EAM system for tracking work orders, preventative maintenance management, warehouse inventory management, fueling controls, and other maintenance management functions.', 'Discussion', 'On July 26, 2016, the Federal Transportation Administration issued its final rule requiring transit agencies to maintain—and document—minimum TAM standards. The rule requires public transportation providers to develop and implement out transit asset management (TAM) plans, to include an asset inventory, condition assessments of inventoried assets, and a prioritized list of investments to improve the state of good repair of their capital assets. The final rule also establishes state good repair standards and four state of good repair (SGR) performance measures. Transit providers are required to set performance targets for their capital assets based on the SGR measures and report their targets, as well as information related to the condition of their capital assets, to the National Transit Database. The rule sets an October 1, 2018 deadline for completing a TAM plan.', 'On February 9, 2017, BBB conducted a review of its software to ensure compliance with the established guidelines. The assessment identified opportunities for enhancements in the areas of asset management, warranty, and reporting functions, including the implementation of the SGR/CP module, which BBB currently owns but has not implemented. BBB is in the midst of completing a comprehensive TAM plan that includes improvements to meet the established guidelines. This modification would allow staff to work with Trapeze to implement additional services required to address critical needs within the system, complete a business process review (BPR), and implement the SGR/CP modules of the EAM software. Implementation of these enhancements would ensure that BBB complies with the TAM guidelines by the October 2018 deadline.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Trapeze is $179,613, for an amended contract total not to exceed $1,295,370. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget. The contract will be charged to account C410113.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award of Property Tax Information and Audit Services', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #148 to HdL Coren & Cone, a California-based company, to provide property tax information consulting and audit services.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with HdL Coren & Cone for an estimated amount of $141,000 over a five-year period with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Since 1997, HdL Coren & Cone (HDLCC) has provided the City with property tax information consulting and audit services needed to ensure that the City receives all property tax revenues due for economic planning and analyses, property tax revenue trend reports to forecast City property tax revenues, bond disclosure report updates, and other consulting services as needed.  In November 2017, the City solicited bids for property tax information and audit services. Based on evaluation responses to the Request for Proposals (RFP), staff recommends that the City negotiate a new five-year contract with HDLCC. The annual amount for information and consulting services is $25,000. The annual amount for auditing services is approximately $3,200 based on average actual costs over a five-year period.  Based on these figures, the estimated total value of the contract over the next five-year period will be approximately $141,000.', 'Background', 'Since 1992, the City has contracted for property tax information consulting and auditing services. Services provided also included fiscal consulting services associated with tax allocation bonds issued by the former Redevelopment Agency (Agency). The City’s current contract with HDLCC (Contract #9686 CCS) was authorized by Council on January 22, 2013 (Attachment A). The contract provided a five-year term and expires on February 20, 2018.', 'Discussion', 'Local taxes represent approximately two-thirds of the projected fiscal year 2017-18 General Fund revenues, with property taxes projected to account for 16% (14% property tax and 2% real property transfer tax) or $64.4 million.  Property tax revenues result from a 1% levy on the assessed value of all real property in the City. The base property tax levy of 1% of property assessed valuation is collected by the Los Angeles County Tax Collector and is distributed to various public agencies located in the County including cities, school districts, and special districts. The City’s share of the 1% levy is approximately 14-17% depending on the area of the City where the property is located.  The City’s real property transfer tax is assessed on the sale of real property in the City at a rate of $3.00 per $1,000 of transfer value.  Property tax information and audit services are specialized in nature and require in-depth knowledge of local and state government operations and legislation.', 'HDLCC would work with the Finance and Housing and Economic Development Departments to prepare annual tax reports and property tax audits; reconcile the Annual Auditor Controller Assessed Valuation reports; and prepare assessment appeal information.  As part of its property tax service, HDLCC would prepare preliminary and final property tax reports for all City tax districts and former Redevelopment project areas and present the data to the City and Agency. Consultant staff would assist the City in forecasting property tax revenues and the City’s share of residual payments, calculating statutory pass-through payments to taxing entities, preparing fiscal consultant reports, and updating bond disclosure schedules and reports.  Property tax auditing services would assist in identifying misallocated property tax revenues and enhance the revenue recovery process.  Audits conducted on secured and unsecured property tax rolls would ensure that each parcel is coded to the appropriate tax entity.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On November 13, 2017, the City published a Request for Proposals (RFP #148) for property tax information and audit services.  The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding website and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions.  A total of 579 vendors were notified and 20 vendors downloaded the RFP. Proposals were received from the following two firms:', '· HdL Coren & Cone', '· MuniServices, LLC', 'An evaluation panel composed of representatives from the Finance and the Housing and Economic Development departments reviewed and ranked the proposals using the criteria set out in the RFP.  Based on the selection criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, HDLCC was recommended as the best qualified firm to provide property tax information and audit services.  HDLCC was selected based on the firm’s long standing and documented success in audit recoveries, ability to meet project work plan goals in a timely manner, experienced and qualified staff, methodology that would be used to maximize City revenues, financial stability, pricing, available resources, and compliance with City scope of work.  Staff thoroughly reviewed and analyzed each proposal’s methodologies for improving process efficiencies to ensure that the City maximizes the collection of revenues and takes advantage of new and existing technologies.  HDLCC’s estimated annual cost to provide property tax information consulting services is $25,000 plus a one-time 25% fee for property tax audit recoveries.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to HDLCC is for an estimated annual amount of $25,000 for property tax information consulting services plus $3,200 for audit recovery services (based on historical averages), resulting in an estimated five-year total of approximately $141,000. Funds are available in the FY 2017-19 biennial budget in the Finance Department.  The contract will be charged to account number 012241.555060 and future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Second Modification to Agreement with Avolve Software for System Customization Services', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement No. 10279 (CCS), in the amount of  $66,199 with Avolve Software, an Arizona-based corporation, for professional services related to ProjectDox system customizations. This will result in a three year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $224,871, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City uses Avolve Software’s Electronic Plan Check Management System, ProjectDox, to enable the public, design professionals, and architects to upload and track their electronic plan submittals through the City’s plan check process. Staff can review and comment on submitted plans, compare original submittals against subsequent submittals, and approve the plans online. Last year, ProjectDox was upgraded to improve functionality and enable integration with the City’s permitting and plan check review systems. Staff now recommends executing a second contract modification with Avolve Software to complete system customizations to improve building plan check processes and expand system functionality for use by other City processes, such as City Planning’s entitlement review process.  The total cost of these additional services would be $66,199, resulting in a three year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $224,871.', 'Background', 'The City uses a suite of software tools for permitting and plan check review. Since 2009, the City has used Avolve’s ProjectDox as its Electronic Plan Check Management System. Avolve Software ceased support and maintenance of the City’s version of ProjectDox in 2015 due to the obsolescence of certain technical components. After evaluating potential solutions, staff determined that the upgraded version of ProjectDox was the only system that provided the essential functionalities to review and approve plan checks within a user-friendly interface and integrate with the City’s permitting software, Accela Automation.', 'Vendor Selection', 'Based on staff’s evaluation of available software options, the City recommended Avolve’s ProjectDox to provide upgrade, implementation and integration services on a sole source basis. The advanced technology and features that Avolve Software has developed for its ProjectDox system are only supported and can only be maintained by Avolve Software. On April 12, 2016 (Attachment D), Council authorized the sole source professional service agreement with Avolve Software in the amount of $158,672 for services related to implementation and integration services to upgrade ProjectDox. The City subsequently modified the professional agreement to extend the contract term for one additional year under the same contract terms.', 'Discussion', 'In October 2017, staff upgraded ProjectDox to the latest version and implemented a new Building plan check workflow process. Since then, staff has identified several emerging issues which would require Avolve Software to modify the integration. Not resolving these issues will require staff to manually fix data and increase the risk of human error.', 'To date, construction developers are required to submit 27 sets of paper plans to the City for a City Planning’s entitlement review. These plans are routed manually for review by various departments and/or committees. This paper-based review process is cumbersome, inefficient, and environmentally unsustainable. As part of the current ProjectDox upgrade project, staff recommends expanding the scope of services with Avolve Software to facilitate the integration and implementation of the City’s entitlement review process.', 'The standard City Planning entitlement workflow provided by Avolve Software does not integrate with the City’s permitting system. The lack of integration will require staff to perform redundant data entry in both ProjectDox and City’s permitting system. Therefore, staff recommends Avolve Software for implementation and integration services of the planning entitlement process.', 'These enhancements will enable staff to leverage the full benefits of the ProjectDox system and eliminate the need to submit paper plans.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Avolve Software is $66,199, for an amended contract total not to exceed $224,871. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department and FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts:', '01321.533580  $54,450', 'C018008.589000  $11,749', 'TOTAL  $66,199', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Approval of Design Agreement for the Fire Station No. 5 Dormitory Tenant Improvement Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #SP2469 to HH Fremer Architects Inc., a California-based company, to provide design services for the Fire Station No. 5 Dormitory Tenant Improvement Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with HH Fremer Architects Inc., in an amount not to exceed $138,895 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City seeks to remodel Santa Monica Fire Station No. 5, located at 2450 Ashland Avenue, to reconfigure dormitories to provide privacy, gender separation and sound insulation for firefighters assigned to various shifts; repair water rot and other plumbing issues, and bring the building into compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) and other building codes. The Fire Station No. 5 Dormitory Tenant Improvement Project was approved in the 16/17 CIP biennial budget. Staff recommends Council approval of an agreement with HH Fremer Architects Inc. in an amount not to exceed $138,895 (including a 10% contingency) for this project.', 'Discussion', 'The main dormitory and adjacent restrooms at Fire Station No. 5 have not been renovated since the building was constructed in 1982. The existing dormitory is a large, single room separated into individual, semi-private spaces that are divided by wooden lockers. In this current configuration, the semi-private rooms do not allow shift changes to occur without disturbing firefighters utilizing the dormitory, nor does the layout consider privacy or gender separation. The proposed design would minimize disruptions during shift changes and incorporate the new fire station alerting system, designed to reduce overall response times and properly zone separate alerting areas in the fire station.', 'Additionally, other adjustments would be made to Fire Station No. 5 in this project. The existing three restrooms would be renovated to meet current code requirements including the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA), California Building Code (CBC) and all other applicable code requirements. Moisture in the bathrooms over time has caused plumbing issues and rot which would be addressed with new finishes along with appropriate water protection.  The intermediate distribution frame (IDF) closet used for computers and communications equipment would be reorganized. Finally, the consultant would design an updated heating, ventilation and air-conditioning (HVAC) system and electrical and lighting systems for the newly configured space.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On November 6, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide design services for demolition and renovation of the Fire Station No. 5 dormitory and adjacent restrooms. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.075(a) provisions. A total of 63 vendors downloaded the RFP. Eight firms responded:', '· BOA Architecture', '· (fer) studio', '· HH Fremer Architects Inc.', '· Kitchell', '· Lewis Schoeplein Architects', '· March Studio', '· MINARC', '· William Loyd Jones Architect', 'Responses to the RFP were reviewed by staff from the Public Works Department. Evaluation was based on fees, previous work experience on similar projects, track record performing public sector work, hourly rates for services, demonstrated understanding of the project scope, work approach, project team qualifications and proposed schedule. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends HH Fremer Architects Inc. as the best qualified firm to provide design services for this project. HH Fremer Architects Inc. provided a clear fee structure, exhibited a solid understanding of the project scope, and has completed projects of similar size and scope. In addition, the project team displays good composition with required skills, and has experience working with governmental agencies. Staff contacted references that had previously worked with HH Fremer Architects and all highly recommend the firm.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to HH Fremer Architects Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $138,895. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C010162.589023.']}
{'Title': 'First Modification to Agreement with Innovative Resources Consultant Group for Staff Development, Team Building, and Coaching Services', 'Department': 'Human Resources Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Agreement #10421 (CCS) in the amount of $150,000 with Innovative Resources Consultant Group (IRCG) for staff development, team building and coaching services. The amended agreement would be for a new total amount not to exceed $270,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. The five-year term of the contract would remain unchanged.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City is committed to providing staff with leadership training and coaching, both in for teams, with and small work groups, and with individuals. For over the last 15 years City Departments intermittently have worked with Innovative Resources Consultant Group (IRCG) to provide such services. Through the proprietary Personalysis® methodology, IRCG gathers information on an individual’s staff’s work style and strengths to improve team dynamics and communication through workshops and smaller sessions. IRCG also assists individuals to improve leadership and management skills, and facilitates strategic planning. Council last approved a contract award to IRCG in January 2017, which is set to expire in March 2020. However, due to on-going and greater than expected demand for IRCG’s services citywide, staff recommends increasing this contract by $150,000 for a new not to exceed amount of $270,000. The five-year term of the contract would remain unchanged.', 'Background', 'Innovative Resources Consultant Group (IRCG) through individual department agreements, has provided teams leadership training and coaching to teams and individual staff in the Planning and Community Development, Housing and Economic Development, Finance, Community and Cultural Services, Information Services, and Human Resources Departments and the City Manager’s Office with facilitation and leadership training and coaching. The City paid approximately $222,000 to IRCG across six separate agreements through October 2016. On February 4, 2014, the City entered into a 10-month agreement (No. 2814) for coaching for the Community and Cultural Services (CCS) Department in an amount not to exceed $7,500. Between December 2014 and June 2016, three modifications were executed to expand the scope of the project, increase the contract authority to $79,000, and to extend the term to June 30, 2017. On October 25, 2016, Council approved a fourth modification to the agreement in the amount of $120,000 (Attachment A). This modification, agreement No. 10386 (CCS), extended the contract terms through 2020 and provided a more centralized agreement for use citywide. On January 24, 2017, Council approved a new agreement (Attachment B), with IRCG to recognize that the organization dissolved as a corporation but no other changes were made. As of January 2018, there is approximately $44,000 remaining on the contract.', 'Discussion', 'The $120,000 contract amount provided in the fourth modification back in October 2016 was based on an estimate of staff need. This estimate was based on previous years’ engagements with ICRG, which were typically done department by department. Since execution of that fourth modification, which consolidated the use, City staff have requested and used approximately $76,000 in services, outpacing the original estimates and providing a more accurate reflection of the need for assistance in building stronger teams and better communication between staff . The additional increase reflects this more accurate use and now accounts for services on a City-wide basis. It also takes into account the ongoing necessity for these services as the City continues to regularly integrate new staff members with current members at all levels of the organization. In addition, it allows for the significant changes in executive leadership in the City and the desire to strengthen relationships among these leaders. Finally, it is essential that the City continue to strengthen its work teams as staff progresses towards a more open and modern working environment where communication and work style will be of key importance.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'Staff has determined that IRCG is exclusively qualified to perform this work because of the proprietary methodology and IRCG’s extensive experience with the City’s professional culture and staff relationships, both recently and historically. Although there are other vendors that use the Personalysis® method, they would not have the same level of expertise nor access to IRCG’s institutional knowledge and experience of the organization. Training and coaching effectively requires the establishment of trust and the building of strong relationships. Other vendors would need to gather more information and build relationships to be effective which would lead to higher costs and seriously delayed time in responding to coaching and leadership needs. Therefore, staff believes that IRCG is the most effective provider of these Personalysis®-based services to the City and is uniquely qualified to continue to provide those services. For these reasons, Council approved the October 2016 agreement as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Municipal Code Section 2.24.080 (d). Competition does not exist because only one vendor possesses the unique ability or capability to meet the particular requirements of the solicitation, such as a good or service that is copyrighted, patented or otherwise only available from one license holder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The first modification to Agreement #10421 (CCS) to be awarded to IRCG is $150,000, for an amended total compensation not to exceed $270,000. The contract amounts would be charged to various accounts as departments identify a need for services. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 budget within the department operating budgets and would be encumbered as needed. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Second Modification to Police and Fire Dispatch Software Maintenance and Support Agreement', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to;1. Negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement #9087-CSS in the amount of $1,200,000 with Public Safety Systems, Inc. (PSSI), a Maryland-based company, to provide software maintenance and support for the public safety dispatch, records management and mobile data systems. This five-year extension will result in a 15-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $2,453,390 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval and;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue purchase orders with PSSI for the purchase of software and software licenses utilizing an exception to the competitive process per SMMC 2.24.080(d), in an amount not to exceed $750,000 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Police and Fire Departments utilize highly sophisticated and specialized software for dispatching, records management and mobile data systems developed by and purchased from Public Safety Systems, Inc. Police and Fire periodically need to purchase new software modules and additional software licenses and to have interfaces (also developed by Public Safety Systems, Inc.) to connect to other third-party systems associated with dispatching, records management and mobile data systems. Staff seeks to extend the existing Software Maintenance and Support Agreement with Public Safety Systems, Inc. in an amount of $1,200,000 combined with additional authority to purchase software and software licenses for use with mobile phones/tablets and integration with the City’s Computer Aided Dispatch system, Closed-Circuit Television System, 9-1-1 System and Fire Station Alerting System, as needed, in an amount of $750,000. This would result in a new total contract amount not to exceed $3,203,390 over a 15-year period.', 'Background', 'Public Safety Systems, Inc. provides the Computer Aided Dispatch (CAD) and mobile data systems used by the Office of Emergency Management Public Safety Communications Center, the Police and Fire Departments to allow for comprehensive public safety resource management from a single software platform. The integrated CAD and mobile data systems also integrate Police’s Records Management System (RMS). The RMS enables Police to electronically process incident/crime reports and related information from computers and mobile phones/tablets, fulfill various statistical reporting needs both locally and to State and Federal agencies and interface systems with various third-party applications used for crime mapping, data management and data sharing.', 'On July 14, 2009 (Attachment A), Council authorized a contract with Public Safety Systems, Inc. for software maintenance and support in an amount not to exceed $560,000 for a period of five years, through June 30, 2014.  Council subsequently approved a modification to the contract with Public Safety Systems, Inc. on October 14, 2014 to extend maintenance and support services through June 30, 2019, in an amount not to exceed $693,390 (Attachment B).', 'Discussion', 'During the last year, the Police Department has purchased additional software from Public Safety Systems, Inc.  through the issuance of purchase orders not exceeding the threshold that would require Council approval. The software was purchased for use with mobile phones/tablets issued to Police Officers and field-based civilian personnel. The newly purchased software enables the Police Department personnel to retrieve data from and/or enter data into the CAD and RMS systems. The software also enables the Police Department personnel to perform routine queries of various Federal and State law enforcement computer systems such as checking for wanted persons, validate restraining orders and confirm driver license status. The warranty period for the new software ends in March. Staff seeks approval to add the new software to the remaining term of the Software Maintenance Agreement to ensure ongoing support.', 'Staff seeks the authority to purchase software and software licenses from Public Safety Systems, Inc. as required in an amount not to exceed $750,000 over a five-year period. Plans exist to expand the use of the software applications provided by Public Safety Systems, Inc., including deployment of new iOS-based mobile data software for the Fire Department, integration of the CAD system with the City’s Closed-Circuit Television (CCTV) system, integration of the CAD system with a new Fire Station Alerting System planned for 2018, integration of the CAD system with the Fire Department’s new contract ambulance company, and expansion of mobile device deployment for Police. All of the planned expansion will result in more efficient use and better integration of existing systems. The implementation requires complex integration with the existing systems which can be provided only by Public Safety Systems, Inc.', 'Staff seeks the authority to extend the Software Maintenance Agreement for an additional five-year term for an amount not to exceed $1,200,000. The proposed extension would include maintenance of the existing CAD, RMS and mobile data systems, the recently purchased software for the Police Department’s mobile phones/tablets and for the future planned purchases of mobile data software for Police and Fire, CCTV, station alerting and CAD integrations and related applications. The mission critical software provided by Public Safety Systems, Inc. is highly specialized for emergency services and is tightly integrated with the various other computer systems utilized by the Office of Emergency Management, Police and Fire, including the City’s 9-1-1 system, newly implemented radio system and various business applications. The CAD, RMS and mobile data systems have been enhanced and modified over the years to fully meet the City’s needs. In order to ensure the planned projects can be completed and ongoing support and maintenance of the existing systems provided by Public Safety Systems, Inc., and to protect the significant investment that has been made into the systems to date, an extension of the maintenance contract is needed.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'A sole source maintenance with agreement with Public Safety Systems, Inc. is necessary to ensure ongoing support for the software systems. Purchase of additional licenses, software modules and interfaces for integration with the CAD, RMS and Mobile Data systems are available only from Public Safety Systems, Inc. as the License Holder of the source code. As specified in SMMC 2.24.080(d) Competition does not exist because only one vendor possesses the unique ability or capability to meet the particular requirements of the solicitation, such as a good or service that is copyrighted, patented or otherwise only available from one license holder.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Public Safety Systems, Inc. is $1,200,000 for an amended contract not to exceed $2,453,390. Funds for FY 2017-18 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Police Department, Fire Department and other departments as required. The maintenance and support portion of the contract will be charged to accounts 01304.533580 and 01312.533580. Additional software purchases are funded from various budgets, including department operational budgets, grants and capital improvement projects. Software will only be purchased if funds are available in the appropriate account. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award of Replacement Mobile Computers for Police', 'Department': 'Police Department', 'Sponsors': 'Chief Information Officer Joseph Cevetello', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4309 to Lehr Auto Electric Inc., a California-based company for the purchase of 75 mobile computers for the Police Department.2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order to Lehr Auto Electric, Inc. for 75 mobile computers for the Police Department in the amount not to exceed $367,230.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Police Department utilizes highly rugged mobile computers in its vehicles to enable officers to access the Computer Aided Dispatch (CAD) system to receive calls for service, query various Federal and State databases for wanted vehicles and persons, enter incident/crime reports into the Records Management System, and operate the in-vehicle camera system. The existing mobile computers, installed in 75 vehicles primarily assigned to Patrol and Community Services Officers, are now in need of replacement. Staff recommends a purchase order with Lehr Auto Electronic in an amount not to exceed $367,230 to replace the existing computers.', 'Discussion', 'The Police Department has utilized mobile computers in its vehicles for approximately 20 years. On January 20, 2012, Council authorized purchase of 75 mobile computers from Lehr Auto Electric, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $565,292 (Attachment A). The mobile computers currently installed in police vehicles have been in use for more than five years and are no longer supported by the manufacturer. The computers are incapable of running current versions of the Windows operating system and various software applications used by Police, limiting the ability to properly apply the latest software security. The computers need to be replaced.', 'The proposed new mobile computers would support the latest version of the Windows operating system and other software applications, ensuring that the latest available security is being utilized and would continue to integrate with the existing Automatic Vehicle Location system and recently purchased in-car camera systems. The selected model will also integrate with the existing computer mobile computer docks installed in the Police vehicles, thereby saving the expense of new computer docks and related hardware. Furthermore, the existing mobile computers cannot be removed from the vehicle thereby limiting their use for some functions, such as field-based reporting. The new computers could be used in and out of Police vehicles, thereby allowing officers to enter reports while working at an incident scene.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On December 4, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver 75 Panasonic CF-31 mobile computers in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 47 prospective vendors downloaded the bid. 4 bids were received and publicly opened on December 21, 2017:', 'Lehr Auto Electric, Inc.', '$367,230', 'Southern Computer Warehouse, Inc.', '$406,665', 'Hypertec USA, Inc.', '$447,075', 'IT Gurus of Atlanta, LLC', '$663,855', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price and compliance with City specifications. Based on these criteria, Lehr Auto Electric, Inc., is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The purchase order to be awarded to Lehr Auto Electric, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $367,230. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019172.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Construction Change Order for the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to construction contract #4418 in the amount of $50,000 with STB Stone, Inc., a California-based company, for additional construction services for the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project. This will result in an amended contract with a new total amount not to exceed $207,300. 2.  Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to agreement #10531 (CCS) in the amount of $107,845 with Plumbing by Todd R. Marsh, Inc., a California-based company, for additional plumbing contractor services for the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project. This will result in an amended contract with an amount not to exceed $307,845 for one year, with two additional two-year renewal options in the amount of $840,808 including an increase of 2% each year, for a total amount not to exceed $1,148,653, over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On December 20, 2017, STB Stone, Inc. began demolition of the existing tile and associated drywall substrate in the locker rooms at the Santa Monica Swim Center as part of the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project. During construction, the contractor discovered extensive corrosion and deterioration of the existing metal stud framing throughout both the male and female locker rooms. The damage was so severe that the existing metal stud framing members were no longer attached to the floor. Moreover, during the demolition of the wall that separates the men’s and women’s locker rooms the contractor discovered that the plumbing drains, vent systems and water lines were compromised. Repair of these severe structural and plumbing issues were not part of the original scope of the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project; however, it was critical that it be completed immediately. Due to the urgent nature of the repairs and to avoid extensive delays to the public programming that occurs at the Swim Center or to use by Santa Monica College, staff directed the contractor to proceed with the urgent repairs and is now seeking formal Council approval. Staff requests Council authorization to execute first modifications to: construction contract  #4418 in the amount of $50,000 with STB Stone, Inc. to repair the locker room framing and first modification to agreement #10531 in the amount of $107,845 with Plumbing by Todd Marsh to repair the locker room plumbing. The City anticipates reopening the Swim Center to the public and resuming regularly scheduled programming in February 2018.', 'Background', 'On December 14, 2017, the City Manager executed construction contract no. 4418 with STB Stone, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $157,300 (includes 10% contingency and $5,800 allowance for unforeseen conditions) for the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project. The contracted scope of services is for construction services for the removal and replacement of the existing tile and drywall substrate in the locker rooms at the Santa Monica Swim Center located on the campus of Santa Monica College. This project is being completed as part of the annual facility renewal that occurs during the closure of the Swim Center at the end of each year. The project was bid formally, but because the selected best bidder was below the Council threshold of $175,000, Council approval was not required to initiate the project. As the unforeseen structural issues are so extensive, the cost of repairs will result in a modified contract amount which will require Council approval.', 'On September 12, 2017, (Attachment C), Council authorized the City Manager to execute an agreement with Plumbing by Todd R. Marsh, Inc., for citywide plumbing contractor services, in an amount not to exceed $200,000 for the first year and a total contract amount not to exceed $1,040,808 over a five-year period. Due to unforeseen plumbing repair costs, a first modification to the first-year contract amount is also needed.', 'Discussion', 'In December 2017, STB Stone, Inc. began demolition of the existing tile and associated drywall substrate in the locker rooms at the Santa Monica Swim Center. It became evident that the condition of the existing metal stud framing and plumbing would not be able to accommodate the reinstallation of new drywall and tile due to extensive rust, corrosion, and deterioration that was uncovered.', 'The Santa Monica Swim Center Tile Replacement Project was originally planned to be completed in 30 calendar days, in order to not produce adverse impacts or extensive delays to the public programming that occurs at the Swim Center or to facility use by Santa Monica College. City staff determined that immediate repairs to the framing and plumbing were required to complete all construction work in a timely manner. Staff directed the contractor to proceed with the urgent repairs and is now seeking formal Council approval.', 'Staff recommends:', '· A first modification to construction contract #4418 in the amount of $50,000 with STB Stone Inc. to add framing repair to the original scope of work at the Santa Monica Swim Center, which will extend the structural life of the locker rooms for up to 15 years. This will result in an amended construction contract total amount not to exceed $207,300.', '· A first modification to agreement #10531 (CCS) in the amount of $107,845 with Plumbing by Todd R. Marsh, Inc. for the plumbing repairs of drains, vent systems and water lines at the Santa Monica Swim Center locker rooms. This will result in an amended agreement total amount not to exceed $1,148,653.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On October 11, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish construction services for a tile replacement project at the Santa Monica Swim Center in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24071(a) provisions. Twenty-three vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on October 30, 2017.', 'Vendor', 'Bid Amount', 'STB Stone, Inc.', '$137,200', 'P & P Develop, Inc.', '$177,956', 'Bids were evaluated based on criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. The bid submitted by STB Stone, Inc. demonstrated an understanding of the approach, tasks, and methodology necessary to complete the required services. Based on these criteria, STB Stone, Inc., the lowest bidder, was recommended as the best bidder.', "On May 9, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for citywide plumbing contractor services that included multi-year renewal options in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.100(a). A total of 20 vendors downloaded the bid. Four bids were received and publicly opened on May 25, 2017, per Attachment D. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Todd R. Marsh Inc. was not the lowest bidder when considering the hourly labor rates, but offered competitive pricing, the fastest guaranteed response time and the second lowest pricing for renewal options. Moreover, Todd R. Marsh, Inc. has provided the City with responsive and satisfactory service. Amgreen Solutions offered the lowest hourly labor rate, but its pricing is significantly lower than the established Prevailing Wage rates required by state law, demonstrating non-compliance and thus its bid was inadmissible.", 'Construction Schedule', 'Staff originally anticipated construction at the Santa Monica Swim Center to be completed in early February 2018. However due to the unforeseen structural issues, staff now anticipates construction to be completed in late February 2018.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The first modification to be awarded to STB Stone, Inc. is $50,000, for an amended construction contract total amount not to exceed $207,300. Funds are available in FY 2017-2018 Capital Improvement Program budget in account M014078.589000.', 'The first modification to be awarded to Plumbing by Todd R. Marsh Inc. for an amended agreement not to exceed $307,845 for one year, for a total amount not to exceed $1,148,653 over a five-year period. Funds are available in FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account M010085.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Award Contract to Transpo Group for Engineering Design Services for the Downtown Real-Time Parking Project', 'Department': 'Traffic Management (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP#141 to Transpo Group, Inc., a Washington-based company for Engineering Design services for the Downtown Real-Time Parking Signs Project.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Transpo Group, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $94,730 for one year, with two-additional one-year renewal options in the subtotal amount of $10,270, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $105,000 over a three-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Downtown Real-Time Parking Project is identified in the City’s Downtown Community Plan as a means to reduce traffic congestion and help drivers more quickly find available parking. This project will develop construction-ready plans, specifications, and estimates for real-time parking and traveler information signs for motorists traveling to Santa Monica’s Downtown parking garages adjacent to 2nd Street, 4th Street, and the Pier that conform to the City’s wayfinding standards. Staff recommends Transpo Group, Inc. prepare the engineering design and construction documents in an amount not to exceed amount of $105,000 over a three-year period.', 'Background', 'In 2014, the City completed the Real-Time Beach Parking Project that installed 21 digital signs that direct motorist to the beach parking lots. These signs operate daily to display wayfinding messages and lot occupancy and space availability on a real-time basis.', 'In 2016, City staff began coordinating with key Downtown stakeholders and other City Departments to explore the expansion of the current real-time system into the Downtown. Discussion topics included location, size, and aesthetics of the proposed signs. Several meetings were held including staff from Downtown Santa Monica Inc., Santa Monica Place (Macerich), and Santa Monica Pier Corporation.', 'In 2017, the City completed the installation of 100 static wayfinding signs in Downtown. The signs vary in size and conform to the City’s latest wayfinding sign standards.', 'Discussion', 'This project involves the engineering design of two types of dynamic message signs (DMS) to be located within the Downtown area bounded by Ocean Avenue, California Avenue, Pico Boulevard, and 6th Street. Both types of signs will conform to the City’s latest standard for wayfinding signs. The first type is a small, two-sided DMS proposed at the entrance to seven Downtown parking garages indicated in Attachment A. The second type of DMS is a full matrix sign that can display multiple lines of text and graphics.These DMS will be placed at 18 strategic locations near City entrances indicated in Attachment B. The DMS will be integrated with the City’s parking availability system and display messages directing motorists from the freeway off-ramps to the nearest available parking facilities based on real-time occupancy conditions.', 'The DMS will also have the capability to display custom messages and will assist the management and diversion of traffic during special events, planned closures, or unexpected incidents.The final locations for sign installation will be determined in coordination with other City departments, including Community and Cultural Services, Finance, Information Services, and Public Works.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On October 17, 2017, the City published a Request for Proposal (RFP) to obtain engineering design services for the Downtown Real-Time Parking Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 41 vendors downloaded the RFP. Four proposals were received on November 9, 2017 from the firms listed below.', '· Advantec Consulting Engineers', '· Kimley-Horn and Associates', '· Michael Baker International', '· Transpo Group Inc.', 'Proposals were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073 and as outlined in the RFP, which included Experience/Technical Competence, Ability to Meet Work Plan and Timelines, Project Approach, Cost of Services and Cost Control, Stability/ References, and the Value Added/ Breadth of Service.', 'In January 2017, the selection committee, comprised of staff from Planning and Community Development, recommended Transpo Group, Inc. to provide the engineering design services for this project. Transpo Group demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with real-time parking projects, and similar capital improvement projects in the City of Seattle, Puget Sound Transit, and San Francisco. Transpo Group also demonstrated through past projects its ability to offer project design on schedule and at a competitive price. Based on thesecriteria, Transpo Group is recommended as the best qualified firm.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Transpo Group Inc., is for an amount not to exceed $105,000. Funds of $105,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget. The contract will be charged to account C010994.589000 – Parking Guidance System.']}
{'Title': 'Proposed Use of 10 Parking Spaces in Parking Structure 7 by Electric Automotive Dealer Tesla', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a modification to the Agreement for Lease, Operation, and Maintenance of Parking Facilities executed July 28, 2010 with Macerich SMP LP to designate 10 parking spaces within Parking Structure 7 for use by Tesla, a proposed electric automotive tenant of Santa Monica Place/Macerich, Inc.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Macerich currently leases Parking Structures 7 and 8 from the City. As part of this lease, Macerich is responsible for all maintenance and repairs, and has a revenue sharing arrangement with the City. The lease requires Macerich to provide 1,852 parking spaces on a non-exclusive basis for members of the general public. It is also entitled to purchase a certain number of parking key cards for general and valet parking use. Macerich is seeking a modification to the Lease Agreement that would allow Macerich to sublease 10 of the public parking spaces in Parking Structure 7 to Tesla, a proposed tenant of Santa Monica Place, to park vehicles to be used for test driving. If Tesla does not move forward with the sublease, the modification to the Lease Agreement would not be implemented. The modification of the Lease Agreement would allow Macerich to sublease 10 parking spaces only during the term of Tesla’s sublease.', 'Discussion', 'Macerich currently has an Agreement for Lease, Operation, and Maintenance of Parking Facilities (Lease Agreement) and other license agreements with the City that generally provide for the following:', '· Parking revenue from Structures 7 and 8 are split equally between Macerich and the City after parking facilities taxes and certain expenses (e.g. Parking Operator) are deducted as agreed to in the lease agreement.', '· Macerich is responsible for all maintenance and upkeep costs and utilities for the structures, including cleaning, painting, and repairs.', '· Macerich contributes to the cost of the Parking Access and Revenue Control Equipment.', '· Macerich has the right to purchase 278 keycards for general parking on the 5th and 6th levels in Structures 7 and 8. However, please note, the requirement that individuals who purchase one of these key cards park on the 5th and 6th levels of the parking structure is not actively enforced by City staff due to limits on staff’s ability to track where these individuals park. Without additional technology or manual tracking which is resource intensive, it is cost prohibitive and not practical for staff to ensure compliance with this provision.', '· Forty-three (43) of the 278 key cards are licensed to be used for valet in designated spaces on the ground floor of Parking Structure 8 (see Attachment A).', '· Macerich has the right to install and operate an interior parking guidance system.', '· Macerich is required to provide 1,852 public parking spaces', 'Contract Modifications', 'Staff recommends a modification of the Lease Agreement and to allow Macerich to sublease 10 of the public parking spaces in Parking Structure 7 to Tesla in connection with Tesla subleasing space situated on the first and second levels of the Santa Monica Place shopping center, at the entrance to the shopping center at the intersection of Broadway and 3rd Street Promenade. This location serves as the entrance to Santa Monica Place from the 3rd Street Promenade.', 'Tesla will be engaged in sales of electric vehicles similar to how it operates in other shopping malls, using the 10 parking spaces for parking and charging of the tenant’s test drive vehicles and for parking by its customers. Tesla currently has a number of California sales locations in malls, such as The Village at Corte Madera, Americana at Brand in Glendale, Westfield Century City, Fashion Island in Newport Beach, Fashion Valley in San Diego, and The Grove in Los Angeles. Following are two examples of Tesla locations with vehicles available for test driving, although these are not reflective of what would be within Structure 7, particularly since the parking spaces would not be allowed to be roped off as they are in these locations. A more accurate reflection is provided later in this report.', 'Brea Mall located in Orange County  Westfield Century City in Los Angeles', 'The spaces will be located on the 3rd level of Parking Structure 7 immediately adjacent to the 2nd level of the tenant’s space (see attachment B). The tenant space has an exit door for easy access to the vehicles, however, this door will not be permitted as a customer entrance to the tenant space and no showroom furniture would be allowed in the parking area. Additionally, no employee parking will be allowed in the spaces.', 'Under this modification, Macerich would also purchase an additional 10 parking key cards for use by Tesla for the daily maximum rate established by Council for the Parking Structure. Replacement fees for key cards will also apply. The maximum daily amount is currently $17.50. This would be an annual revenue of $6,387.50 for each space for a total annual revenue of $63,875 for all 10 parking spaces; revenues that would otherwise not be collected based on current occupancies. These revenues will be included in gross revenues and subject to the revenue sharing provisions of the Lease Agreement, less applicable Parking Facilities Tax, consistent with all other parking revenues generated in Parking Structure 7. The agreement includes a fixed parking rate that is based on the current daily maximum daily rate established by Council, which changes from time to time, therefore the revenue could increase or decrease if Council adopts a different daily maximum rate in the future.', 'Average peak parking occupancy recorded in Parking Structure 7 for the last fiscal year was 68% on the weekdays and 82% on the weekends. The highest peak occupancy recorded in Parking Structure 7 last fiscal years was 97% for limited periods of time on certain days in July and August of 2016, and the next highest was during the LA Marathon in March 2017 when occupancy reached 91% at times. During periods of peak occupancy, more than 250 parking spaces are open at all times on weekdays and 150 spaces on the weekends in the structure, and staff does not anticipate any disruption to parking availability for the general public or loss of revenue.', 'Macerich and Tesla will be responsible for the cost of all improvements necessary. Proposed improvements would include:', '· The Tesla name on the west wall above three of the spaces', '· Painting of the door area from the tenant space to the parking facility and other minor aesthetic enhancements', '· Lighting', '· Installation of 10 Electric Vehicle (EV) Chargers', 'Although the following picture is of a Tesla charging station, it is a representative example of what Tesla has proposed for the west wall.', 'Domain Northside Mall Tesla Charging Station – Austin, Texas', 'If Telsa does not move forward with the lease, this modification would not be implemented. The term of the modification would be set to the same term as the lease agreement between Tesla and Macerich, and would terminate if Tesla vacates the space.', 'Providing this option would assist with securing a tenant for a space that has been empty since December 2015 after Kitson vacated the space, with a couple of pop-up stores having occupied the space short term. Providing the spaces would not disrupt parking availability.', 'CEQA', 'The proposed parking management public valet program is exempt from the provision of CEQA pursuant to CEQA Guidelines Section 15061(b)(3) in that it can be seen with certainty that the proposal will not result in significant adverse environmental impacts since the modification only represents an operational change to the use of the existing parking spaces and will not result in the creation of any new parking demand.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future. Approval of the modification of the agreement will generate gross annual revenues in the amount of $63,875. These revenues will be subject to the revenue sharing provisions of the Lease Agreement, less applicable Parking Facilities Tax, consistent with all other parking revenues generated in Parking Structure 7. The agreement includes a fixed parking rate that is based on the current daily maximum daily rate established by Council, which changes from time to time, therefore the revenue could increase or decrease if Council adopts a different daily maximum rate in the future.']}
{'Title': 'Second Reading and Adoption of Interim Zoning Ordinance Amending Portions of Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.07.030 to Revise Development Standards for Maximum Parcel Coverage, Maximum Building Height, and Additional Minimum Stepbacks for Upper Stories in the R1 Single-Unit Residential District', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance amending portions of Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.07.030.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'At its meeting on January 23, 2018, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending portions of the Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.07.030 to revise development standards for maximum parcel coverage, maximum building height, and additional minimum stepbacks for upper stories in R1 single-unit residential district.', 'The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption.']}
{'Title': 'Approval of minutes for the December 12, 2017 Housing Authority meeting.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council/Commissioners approve the minutes for the Housing Authority December 12, 2017 meeting.'}
{'Title': 'Financial Status Update and FY 2017-18 Midyear Budget', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Budget Division', 'Sponsors': 'Director Susan Cline, Director Donna Peter', 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council, Housing Authority, and Parking Authority:Appropriate FY 2017-18 midyear revenue and expenditure budget adjustments and approve corresponding adjustments to the FY 2018-19 budget plan (Attachment A).Staff also recommends that the City Council:1. Receive the FY 2017-18 through FY 2021-22 Financial Status Update;2. Adopt a Resolution establishing new classifications and adopting salary rates for various positions (Attachment B) and approve the position and classification changes (Attachment C);3. Adopt a Resolution authorizing the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $450,000 with a required local match of $60,000 from Caltrans Sustainable Communities Planning Grant Program for a Wilshire Boulevard Safety Enhancement Study, and to accept all grant renewals (Attachment D);4. Authorize the City Manager to accept an additional grant awarded in the amount of $200,852 with a required local 12% match from Caltrans for the Safe Routes to School program;5. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $28,595 from the State of California for software and hardware improvements to maximize patron benefits from library internet connections, and to accept all grant renewals; and6. Receive public comment on federal Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnership Act (HOME) Program funds.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The midyear budget update (The Update) provides an opportunity to apprise Council and the community on the City’s five-year financial forecast and new information on longer-term trends for the City, as well as present proposed midyear budget changes. The Update informs the City Council and community of the City’s current and projected fiscal status as the City begins the budget process that will result in the adoption of the FY2018-19 budget as well as the Capital Improvement Plan Biennial Budget. Overall, the forecast has improved since the last update, and restraint shown in midyear expenditure changes contributes to this. However, signs of changes in certain areas of the local economy are becoming more pronounced, and uncertainties related to high-value expenditures and revenues persist. Moreover, the recent stock market volatility reminds us that the current national economic expansion will not go on forever and is already one of the longest on record.', 'This upcoming budget is the second year of the operating biennial budget and the first year of the capital improvement program (CIP) biennial budget. In the second year of the biennial budget process, staff reviews and adjusts the plan for the next year to account for changes in revenue and operating expenses necessary to complete the two-year workplan.', 'The Update shows three years of positive General Fund structural balances before an anticipated shortfall in FY 2020-21 and in FY 2021-22. The projected funding gaps are due primarily to anticipated increases in pension costs in spite of the City’s significant prepayments to the retirement system. It is important to highlight that the gaps would be significantly greater if the prepayment had not been made. This represents a change from the last forecast as indicated in the following table:', 'FY 2019-20', 'FY 2020-21', 'FY 2021-22', 'May 2017 Projected Shortfall', '$3.8 million', '$10.3 million', '$18.8 million', '(3.7% of the GF budget)', 'February 2018 Projected Shortfall', 'Positive fund balance', '$0.3 million', '$10.6 million', '(2.4% of the GF budget)', 'These improved estimates are due primarily to projected lower costs for retirement and healthcare. These lower than previously projected costs are a result of the City’s $45million pay down of unfunded pension liability and a negotiated one-year rate maintenance with the City’s primary health insurance provider.  On the revenue side, staff has converted some revenue sources from one-time to ongoing streams based on recent years’ actuals (e.g., partial Transient Occupancy Taxes from short-term home rentals, Building and Safety fees).', 'The financial status of other funds remains relatively stable.  As previously reported, the Housing Authority Fund is projected to require subsidies through the end of the forecast period.  The Cemetery Fund is projecting operating structural deficits, and staff are assessing operations to provide a long term plan for the fund.  The Pier Fund is also projected to require subsidies as the combination of operating and large capital expenditures are outpacing the growth of revenues during the forecast period.', 'Proposed FY 2017-18 midyear revenue adjustments result in a $11.8 million, or 1.7%, increase over the citywide revenue budget, and expenditure adjustments result in a net $4.9 million or a 0.8% decrease over the citywide expenditure budget.', 'This strong performance allows the City to fully fund the future $8 million construction cost of the Civic Center Multi-Use Sports Field with $1 million in additional funding. The report also includes a staff recommendation to accept grants for the Safe Routes to School program, Wilshire Boulevard Safety Enhancement Study, and software and hardware improvements at the Santa Monica Public Library.', 'Finally, the City must hold two public hearings prior to the adoption of a One-Year Action Plan allocating federal CDBG and HOME Program funds.  This public hearing will satisfy one of the two meeting requirements to receive public input and recommendations for the Proposed FY 2018-19 Action Plan.  The City will hold another public hearing prior to the adoption of the Proposed FY 2018-19 Action Plan.', 'Background', 'On June 27, 2017 (Attachment E), Council adopted the first year and approved the second year of the FY 2017-19 Biennial Budget; and adopted the second year of the FY2016-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget.  On October 24, 2017 (Attachment F), based on year-end financial results, Council approved certain revisions to the FY 2017-18 Adopted Budget that adjusted expenditures and staffing.  Since October, staff completed a midyear review of all revenues and expenditures and is proposing budget adjustments for programs, activities, and revenues that have changed significantly.  These adjustments will align the FY 2017-18 Revised Budget with current operations.', 'Discussion', 'Economic Update', 'While the City’s General Fund forecast continues to show revenue growth, the City, along with cities across the country, has entered a period where changes in the economy at large, such as on-line sales, and regional factors such as alternative transportation choices, are beginning to impact our traditional revenue streams.', 'The U.S. economy continues to grow at a consistent pace.  Economic growth as measured by GDP was positive in 2017 for the eighth consecutive year with the recent quarter averaging growth of nearly 3%. Most economists are projecting continued growth (2.5-3% range annually) over the next two years.  Unemployment is at its lowest level since 2000.  The housing market remains strong, and inflation, while showing some signs of increase, continues to be low.  The Federal Reserve has begun to increase interest rates and is expected to continue these increases over the next one to two years in an effort to “normalize” rates.', 'However, the economy is not without risks.  The current economic recovery period is one of the longest in the post WW II period, and history would indicate that the economy is likely to head into a recession sometime within the next five years.', 'The State economy recovered strongly from the “Great Recession.” While the State budget has also expanded in recent years to attempt to correct long term issues, and the Governor’s FY 2018-19 Budget predicts a healthy surplus, the State budget is not without risks. A recession could reduce State revenues by an estimated $20 billion annually over several years. Also, the effect of Federal tax law changes cannot yet be measured.', 'Santa Monica’s economy remains relatively strong due in large part to its geographic location and its diversified tax revenue base.  However, there are signs of moderation in the local economy’s growth rate. General Fund revenue growth has begun to slow after several years of strong increases.  Average annual growth the last three years has been less than 4% following growth rates of over 8% in the three years of recovery following the recession. Also, as with the State and national economies, the threat of a recession could significantly alter revenue projections.  More information on some of the City’s key revenue sources is provided below.', 'Property values in the City remain the third highest in Los Angeles County for a City with the 19th largest population.  The FY 2017-18 assessed value increase was 5.8%, the third consecutive year in the 6% range.  Moderate increases of 3-4% are projected over the next five years.', 'Sales tax, which includes both sales and use and transaction and use tax, growth rates are expected to be modest, reflecting the loss of several large tax generators and the global shift of retail activity from brick and mortar businesses to on-line businesses. City taxable sales are projected to grow by less than 2% in FY 2018-19 and with future annual growth rates of less than 3%.', 'Tourism, which provides a major stimulus to the local economy by creating jobs and producing revenues, continues to show strength.  Transient Occupancy Taxes have increased at an average annual rate of over 9% over the last seven years, and revenues are expected to continue having healthy increases over the forecast period, reflecting the recent opening of two new hotels and another one that is under construction and anticipated to open within the next three years. One area of uncertainty over the forecast period is the impact that new registration requirements for home share hosting platforms will have on current revenue projections.', 'Business License Taxes are expected to show some weakness over the forecast period, reflecting the anticipated loss of at least one major taxpayer as well as a moderating of the local economy.  Utility Users Tax revenues are expected to remain relatively flat over the forecast period as revenues from telecommunication services continue to drop.  Parking Facility Taxes are expected to grow by approximately 1.7% per year over the forecast period as declines from City downtown parking facilities are offset by increases from private parking facilities and beach parking.  Interest rates have risen sharply over the last year after the historically low levels over the prior seven years resulting in greater investment income. While a gradual increase is expected over the forecast period, rates are still expected to remain at relatively low levels.', 'Staff is closely monitoring parking revenues, a consistently strong revenue source for the City that is projected to decrease by 7% in FY 2017-18, reflecting a significant shift in how people travel into and around the City, primarily as a result of EXPO light rail and ridesharing services providing alternative modes of transportation for visitors and community members.', 'General Fund Financial Status Update', 'The General Fund Financial Status Update reflects revised revenue projections as well as staff’s proposed operating and capital budget changes included in this staff report.  Increased revenues, primarily Transient Occupancy Taxes and Building and Safety fees, the City’s pre-payment of pension contributions (paying down the City’s unfunded liability) and lower than anticipated increases in medical benefit costs significantly reduce the timing and size of projected future shortfalls.', 'Staff has completed three forecast scenarios that contemplate Best, Probable, and Worst Case impacts on the General Fund.  The chart below shows the three forecast scenarios.', 'The Probable scenario, which serves as the baseline for the forecast, shows the General Fund experiencing a potential shortfall of approximately $0.3 million in FY2020‑21 that increases to $10.6 million (2.4% of the General Fund budget) in FY2021-22.  The major challenges to the City’s budget continue to be pension, health insurance and workers’ compensation costs, which are projected to grow at average rates of 6.3%, 8.5%, and 10% per year, respectively, over the remaining four full years of the forecast.  Overall, operating expenditures are anticipated to grow an average of 3.6% per year during this period, while ongoing revenues are anticipated to grow an average of 2.8% per year.', 'In the Best Case scenario, bolstered by higher increases in revenues, the General Fund would be positive throughout the forecast period, with a positive balance of $3.9million in FY 2021-22.  In the Worst Case scenario, which shows the effects of a possible recession as well as intensification of some potentially negative trends in the areas of parking and sales, transient occupancy and business license tax, the General Fund would experience a shortfall of $0.6 million in FY2018-19 that would increase significantly to $29 million in FY 2021-22.', 'Other Funds', 'Other major funds that are included in the Financial Status Update fall into two categories: 1) funds that operate with sufficient revenues to sustain necessary operating and capital needs, and 2) funds that have a structural deficit where ongoing revenues are not sufficient to cover ongoing expenditures.', 'Self-Sustaining Enterprise Funds', 'The Water and Wastewater Funds have sufficient revenues to cover current operations.  Based on existing analysis, rate increases in the Water Fund allow the implementation of the Sustainable Water Master Plan while also maintaining reserve levels.  As noted at the recent public hearing to adopt the current rates, additional studies are underway to further assess the financial needs to achieve Water Self-Sufficiency and those reports are scheduled to be presented to the Council this summer.  The Wastewater Fund continues to have adequate revenues and reserves to meet current operational and capital expenditures.', 'The Resource Recovery and Recycling (RRR) Fund will maintain a positive fund over the next five years.  There are several upcoming proposals that may potentially have a substantial impact on the financial stability of the fund, including various solid waste and recycling initiatives and pilot programs, the Fund’s share of costs to complete the Corporate Yards modernization project, and the displacement of the recycling contractor at the Corporate Yards that will result in additional costs for transporting the City-collected recycling materials to an offsite location.  Staff will continue to monitor fund performance and consider the need for a rate increase in the future.', 'The BBB Fund will also maintain a positive fund balance over the next five years.  BBB, like most transit agencies in the country, continues to be confronted with reduced ridership, and BBB staff is focused on strategies to improve ridership and ensuring that services are cost effective and relevant.  The fund will receive additional revenues from the voter-approved Measure M, which allocates an additional ½ cent sales tax to agencies in order to improve traffic congestion, keep transit fares affordable and improve bus systems.', 'The Airport, Beach, and Community Broadband Funds will generate adequate revenues to sustain their operations throughout the next five years.', 'Funds Requiring Subsidies', 'The Housing Authority Fund has a projected operating structural deficit of approximately $0.7 million to $1 million annually throughout the forecast period.  The Housing Authority will require an annual operating subsidy from the Special Revenue Source Fund.  This assumes that U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) funding to housing authorities will not be reduced.', 'The Cemetery Fund is projecting an operating structural deficit of approximately $0.2million to $0.6 million annually during the forecast period.  The implementation of the green burial program has not realized the anticipated growth in the fund.  The fund required a General Fund loan at the end of FY2016-17 and is projected to require General Fund loans throughout the forecast period.  Staff is assessing operations to provide a long term plan for the Cemetery Fund.', 'The Pier Fund is not able to sustain an adequate balance to cover both its operating costs and large capital expenditures.  Capital needs that are unable to be funded by the Pier Fund during the forecast period must compete with General Fund-supported capital needs.', 'FY 2017-18 Midyear Budget Adjustments', 'At midyear, staff recommends revenue budget changes based on actual performance and new information, and proposes adjustments to the expenditure budget as necessary to most effectively maintain operations.', 'Revenue Adjustments – General Fund', 'Recommended revenue adjustments to the FY 2017-18 budget result in a net increase of $9.4 million.  However, only $1.4 million of the net increase is expected to be ongoing. Significant increases include:', '· $3.1 million in Transient Occupancy Taxes', '· $1.3 million in Documentary Transfer Taxes', '· $1.5 million from Building & Safety/Planning fees', '· $1.0 million in Business License Taxes', '· $0.9 million in Interest Earnings', '· $8.0 million pay down from Gillette settlement (one-time)', 'Significant decreases include:', '· -$3.9 million in parking related revenues', '· -$1.1 million in Sales Taxes', '· -$0.9 million in Transaction and Use taxes', '· -$0.5 million in Other Fees/Charges', 'Revenue Adjustments – Other Funds', 'Significant revenue adjustments in other funds include:', '· Housing Authority Fund (12) – decrease of $1.9 million in Section 8 Housing Assistance Program revenues.  An explanation is shown in the expenditure section below.', '· Community Development Block Grant (19) – increase of $1.2 million primarily reflects changes in timeline for certain projects.', '· Pier Fund (30) – increase of $0.8 million reflecting actual Pier tenant rentals and vendor rents.', '· Local Return (45) – increase of $1.1 million to reflect the first annual allotment of Measure M Local Return funds.', '· Parking Authority (77) – increase of $0.7 million to reflect interest on promissory note repayments from the Successor Agency.', 'A full listing of revenue adjustments is included in Attachment A.', 'Operating Expenditure Adjustments – General Fund', 'FY 2017-18 proposed General Fund operating expenditure appropriations result in a decrease of $2.6 million.  Significant appropriations include:', '· $3 million decrease to reflect PERS pay down savings.', '· $2.4 million addition to reflect first year debt service payment for the City Services Building.  Future year debt service payments will be paid from the CIP allocation.  Due to timing, first year payment would adversely impact projects already underway.', '· $1.7 million decrease to reflect health insurance savings due to negotiated one-year maintenance of premium rates.', '· $0.7 million decrease to reflect lower than anticipated Measure Y and GSH Transaction and Use Tax funds to the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District and Measure GSH funds for the affordable housing program.  This is a direct result of the flattening of sales and use and transaction and use tax revenue.', '· $0.5 million decrease to adjust the portion of Parking Structure 7 and 8 revenues paid to Macerich as a result of lower than anticipated parking revenues.', '· $1.5 million increase to appropriate prior year savings previously set aside in reserves to pay for the defeasement of the 2009 Public Safety Facility lease revenue bond.', 'In addition, funds of $1 million are recommended to be set aside to fully-fund the construction of the Civic Center Field, increasing the funding set aside for design and construction to $8 million (anticipated total project budget).', 'Operating Expenditure Adjustments – Other Funds', 'FY 2017-18 proposed midyear appropriations include a net $2.2 million decrease in other funds. Significant changes reflected in the request include the following:', '· Other funds will decrease by $2.1 million to reflect health insurance savings ($1.1million) and PERS paydown savings ($1 million).', '· In the Housing Authority Fund, a $1.9 million decrease to reflect reduction in Section 8 program expenditures.  Voucher issuance and voucher utilization rates are lower than anticipated due to highly competitive market rental rates available to voucher-holders;', '· In the Wastewater Fund, a $2 million decrease to correct the budgeted amount for amalgamated system sewerage charge, based on updated information.', '· In the Special Revenue Source Fund, a net $0.6 million increase to the budget resulting from a decrease in an interfund transfer in (shown as a budget credit) to reflect lower than anticipated GSH funds set aside for the affordable housing program ($0.2 million) and to reflect transfer of Lantana development agreement funds to the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District for costs associated with construction of playground facilities at the Edison Language Academy ($0.4 million).', '· In the Airport Fund, a $0.8 million increase for additional lease brokerage and property management services, reflecting the substantial number of properties now under the management of the Airport Division due to the elimination of master leasehold agreements.', 'Personnel Changes', 'This report includes staffing adjustments to reflect ongoing operational changes and the results of classification and compensation studies.  A Salary Resolution detailing new classifications and salary rates is reflected in Attachment B.  Staffing adjustments are detailed in Attachment C.  These changes result in no net increase of Full-Time Equivalent (FTE) employees.  Together, position changes result in a net decrease of $0.01 million – an increase of $0.02 million in the General Fund and a decrease of $0.03 million in the other funds.  Changes reflecting reorganizations to accommodate changing needs include the replacement of the vacant Transit Community and Government Engagement Manager position with a Strategic Transit Planner in the Big Blue Bus Department (a net budget decrease of $30,000), and the replacement of a vacant Human Resources Assistant position with a Senior Human Resources Analyst in Human Resources (a net increase of $22,000).', 'Capital Improvement Program Budget Adjustments', 'The midyear changes to the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget are largely grant funded appropriations and budget adjustments to enterprise fund projects that result in a total net increase to the CIP budget of approximately $0.9 million.  The changes include three key projects that can advance as a result of available grant resources.  Budget changes are detailed in Attachment A, and the most significant changes are summarized below.', 'Metro Grant Funds', 'On September 26, 2013, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Authority (MTA) notified the City of its successful grant application for the Citywide Signal Detection project. Funding for this project was projected to be available in FY 2018-19; however, MTA has notified the City of the availability of funding for FY 2017-18. Staff recommends expediting the timeline for this project and allocating the $540,480 of Metro grant funds and $135,120 of TDA Article III local match funds, which are also available now, in FY2017-18.', 'Caltrans Safe Routes to School Grant', 'The City was awarded funding for an Edison Safe Routes to School project in 2012 to design and construct curb extensions, dual curb ramps and pavement striping in the vicinity of Edison Language Academy.  In September 2017, City staff was awarded additional funding in the amount of $200,852 from Caltrans and recommends appropriation of those funds to the Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School project at this time.  The required localmatch of $48,135 is fundedby the Pedestrian Action Plan Implementation CIP project and isbudgeted in the FY2017‑18 CIP Budget.', 'Caltrans Sustainable Communities Planning Grant Program', 'The Caltrans Sustainable Communities Planning Grant Program is a competitive grant program that provides funding for transportation and land use planning projects to reduce transportation-related GHG emissions.  On October 20, 2017, staff submitted an application for a Wilshire Boulevard Safety Enhancement Study to evaluate collisions and identify targeted safety enhancements along the Wilshire Boulevard Corridor.  The application was prepared based on priorities of the City Council, adopted plans and programs.  On December15,2017, the City was awarded $450,000 in grant funds.  Staff is requesting authorization to accept the grant funds and budget the required local match of $60,000 from Transportation Impact Fees (TIF) revenues, for a total project cost of $510,000.', 'Other CIP budget increases include augmenting the budget for several existing projects which include the following projects:', '· Irrigation Control Replacement project funded by water demand mitigation fee revenues for water conservation measures;', '· Auto Meter Reading Pilot project to fund software costs of expanding the program, funded by the Water fund;', '· Computer Equipment Replacement Program to purchase replacement network switches and security enhancement solutions, funded by the Computer Equipment Replacement Fund;', '· Pier Carousel ADA Upgrades project that will implement required improvements, funded by the Pier Fund; and the 4th Court Bike Connection project to implement the construction phase, funded by the Special Revenue Fund.', 'Included is a budget reduction to the Hyperion Capital Payment project which funds payment to the City of Los Angeles Bureau of Los Sanitation due to savings as a result of recalculated charges based on actual sewer flows and a reconciliation credit back to the City.', 'Acceptance of Grants', 'Caltrans Safe Routes to School Grant', 'As mentioned above, in September 2017, City staff was awarded additional funding in the amount of $200,852 from Caltrans.  Staff is requesting authorization to accept the additional grant funds from Caltrans.', 'Caltrans Sustainable Communities Planning Grant Program', 'As mentioned above, on December15,2017, the City was awarded $450,000 in grant funds.  Staff is requesting that Council adopt a resolution authorizing the City Manager to accept the grant funds from Caltrans.', 'State of California Library Grant', 'Santa Monica Public Library was awarded a Libraries Illuminated grant of $28,595 to support the purchase of cutting-edge technology that helps libraries provide innovative services and programming that fulfills the potential of their broadband connections.  The goal is to use these technologies to design unique learner-centered experiences – 3Ddesign workshops that support personal application of iterative design processes, virtual reality experiences that stimulate creative self-reflection, and family technology challenges to develop critical thinking and promote family-togetherness.  The grant is supported by the California Library Services Board and funds are managed through the Southern California Library Cooperative.  Staff is requesting authorization to accept the grant funds from the State of California.', 'Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnership Act (HOME) Program', 'To receive federal Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnership Act (HOME) Program grant funds, the City must prepare and submit a Council-approved One-Year Action Plan to HUD by May 15, 2018.  The Action Plan outlines how the funds will be expended and confirms that the funded activities are consistent with the City’s Five-Year Consolidated Plan adopted by Council on May12,2015.  The City must hold two public hearings prior to the adoption of a One‑Year Action Plan allocating federal CDBG and HOME Program funds.  This public hearing will satisfy one of the two meeting requirements to receive public input and recommendations for the Proposed FY 2018-19 Action Plan.  The City will hold another public hearing prior to the adoption of the Proposed FY 2018-19 Action Plan.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Recommended FY 2017-18 midyear budget adjustments result in a $11.8 million, or a 1.7% increase over the citywide revenue budget, and expenditure adjustments result in a net $4.9 million or a 0.8% decrease over the citywide expenditure budget.  Details for FY2017‑19 midyear adjustments are in Attachment A.']}
{'Title': 'Future of COAST Open Streets Festival', 'Department': 'Community & Cultural Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council review and comment on the future of COAST and direct staff to proceed with the following proposal to:1. Present the COAST Open Streets event annually through 2020, as an evolution of the Santa Monica Festival and the City’s signature event 2. Hold future COAST open streets events in the samelocation and 2-mile route asthe 2016 and 2017 events(i.e.,Ocean Ave.from WilshireBlvd.to ColoradoAve.,Colorado Ave.betweenOcean Ave. and5thSt.,Main St.fromColorado Ave.toMarineSt.).3. Evaluate the event at the five-year mark (2020) for continuance and location. This evaluation will be informed by the updated Cultural Plan for the City, which will assess strategies for citywide events.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', "COAST is a distinctly Santa Monica community celebration thatuses art to transformtwo miles of city streets into a fun, car-free experience that empowers people to take action against climate change, embrace a pro-planet lifestyle and experience thecity on foot and bicycle.The event reinforces the City's commitment to sustainability, the arts, and mobility.", 'COAST began in June 2016, when the City initiated a new open streets event to celebratethe opening of the Expo Lineand Colorado Esplanade and give the community new ways to experience the city and its streets. Over 50,000 attendees participated in the event’s first year.', "In 2016 COAST took the place of the Santa Monica Festival (SMF) which is usually held in early May. Instead, an Expo opening ceremony and station celebrations were held in late May 2016. The open streets event followed a few weeks later in early June 2016. Many elements of the SMF were integrated into the first COAST, such as educational elements, experiences and hands-on activities that reinforced the City's commitment to sustainability, the arts and mobility.", 'The similar and overlapping event goals, components, partnering departments and staff for the SMF and COAST would have made production of both events in 2017 duplicative. Due to its success, popularity, and alignment with the City’s Strategic Goals, COAST was repeated in 2017 and the SMF was not held. Additional SMF components were included in COAST in 2017, including a performance stage and community resource booths.', 'After two years of presenting COAST, staff evaluated both the SMF and COAST through the lens of the City’s Budget Framework for a Sustainable City of Wellbeing; the City’s Strategic Goals; the policies of the Bike and Pedestrian Action Plans and the City’s Cultural Plan. Staff believes that COAST furthers the City’s desired outcomes, goals, and policies beyond the SMF’s impact and is a new model of civic participation in the arts, sustainability, and mobility. Therefore, staff recommends Council adopt COAST as the City’s new signature event, with the same route through 2020, as an evolution of the SMF. An evaluation of COAST at the five-year mark (2020) would look at its future frequency and location. This evaluation would be informed by the vision for citywide events and creative experiences that will be detailed in the next iteration of the City’s Cultural Plan. Some\u202ffunds\u202fhave been secured\u202ffor each year through 2020,\u202fbut\u202fan annual funding gap remains.\u202fStaff anticipates closing that gap by securing new ongoing funding sources.', 'Background', 'The City presented the SMF annually for 24 years, from 1991 until 2015. The SMF started on the Santa Monica Pier and moved to Clover Park in 1994. Over the years, the SMF evolved into a celebration of the community’s commitment to the arts, culture and the environment and became the City’s signature event. Through the performing and visual arts, workshops, food and a range of family activities, the SMF honored the cultural richness of Santa Monica as well as the environmental practices that sustain it. The SMF was a partnership between the Cultural Affairs Division of the Community and Cultural Services Department and the Office of Sustainability and the Environment and was produced by Community Arts Resources (CARS), in collaboration with city staff.', 'On May 20, 2016, the second phase of the Expo Metro Line, which connected Santa Monica with Downtown Los Angeles opened. Santa Monica’s first COAST open streets event was held on Sunday, June 5, 2016 from 9 am – 3 pm, as the hallmark community celebration of the opening of the Expo Light Rail and Colorado Esplanade. Given the timing of the Metro opening ceremony and station celebrations in late May, COAST in early June, and limited staff and financial resources, the SMF, which normally tookplacein May or June,was cancelled that year (Attachment A).', 'COAST planning was led by an interdepartmental team consisting of staff from the Cultural Affairs Division, Mobility Division, Office of Sustainability and the Environment,and the Office of Communications. Through the bid process, staff designated and hired the event production team Community Arts Resources (CARS) to produce both 2016 and 2017 events. Staff from nearly all City departments contributed to making the event happen, including 193 staff members who worked the day of the event.', 'The event gave pedestrians and bicyclists access to twomiles of car-free city streets, running the length of Ocean Ave. and Main St. between Wilshire Blvd. and Marine St.. Artists and performers along the route created opportunities to enjoy music, dance and visual art. COAST featured thematic hubs that engaged thousands of people in activities and discussions around mobility, art, sustainability and current issues such as the Downtown Community Plan.', 'An estimated 50,000 participants attended COAST 2016. The total cost of $354,000 was funded by multiple sources, including a grant from Metro, funds that had been allocated to the SMF in prior years from the Cultural Affairs Division and Office of Sustainability and the Environment, and funds from the Office of Communications.', 'Following COAST 2016, staff solicited feedback. Enthusiastic responses from people who participated in the event were received, noting how satisfying it was to walk and bike freely in the middle of Santa Monica streets. Because the overall response to the event was so positive, and so many requests to repeat it were received, an interdepartmental staff committee evaluated the feasibility of continuing COAST. Staff reviewed the City’s existing calendar, community participant and stakeholder feedback, available staff and financial resources, the overall impact of the event and the City’s current goals, as well as the resources required to support other city-produced events.', 'As a result of the evaluation, as outlined in the Coast Open Streets Festival 2017 Information Item (Attachment B), staff concluded that combining the SMF and COAST in 2016 created efficiencies for the staff, budget and community resources needed for both events. In 2017 COAST was held a second time providing an opportunity to fine tune the event by addressing some of the issues that were identified during the first COAST.', 'While the first COAST was held in June to coincide with the arrival of the Expo Line, the business community, particularly those along the COASTroute, indicated a preference for fall, since the summer is already a busy time. City staff adjusted accordingly. The second open streets event was held on Sunday, October 1, 2017. The hours for the 2017 event were also adjusted to respond to the flow of attendees in 2016; there was lighter attendance in the morning and higher attendance in the afternoon. The 2017 event was held from 10 am – 4 pm, instead of from 9 am – 3 pm.', 'COAST 2017 had an estimated 40,000 participants and cost $390,000. The $36,000 costincreasefrom 2016was due to the addition of a stage and booths for community organizations, as well as enhanced activities on the OceanAvenueportion of the route. The event was fundedwith$150,000 of Pedestrian Action Plan implementation funds,grant funds fromNational Endowment for the Arts, support from partner organizations focused on activating Ocean Avenue, and funds usually allocated for the SMF.', 'The second iteration of COAST built on lessons learned from the first year including making the Ocean Avenue leg, which had been lightly attended in 2016, more dynamic and engaging with a stage, picnic tables and interactiveart experiences outside of the Camera Obscura Art Lab in Palisades Park.The stage and community and City resource booths reflected elements of the SMF and were added in lieu of hosting both events.', 'During Council’s March 28, 2017 consideration of a contractual services agreement with Community Arts Resources (CARS) to produce COAST 2017, Council asked staff to return for a discussion on the future of the SMF and COAST. The timing of this report allows staff enough time to produce either event in 2018, based on Council direction.', 'Discussion', 'The purpose of COAST is to be a distinctly Santa Monica community celebration thatuses art to transformtwo miles of city streets into a fun, car-free experience that empowers people to take action against climate change, embrace a pro-planet lifestyle and experience thecity on foot and bicycle.', 'Many of the City’s key priorities are in direct alignment with COAST, as articulated in the City’s Budget Framework for A Sustainable City of Wellbeing, the City’s Strategic Goals, the Bike Action Plan, the Pedestrian Action Plan, and the City’s Cultural Plan, Creative Capital.', 'COAST intersects with all six of the outcome areas within the budget framework for A Sustainable City of Wellbeing. Theevent:', '· Engages and connects the Community through free, interactive elements and creates a safe space for everyone;', '· Encouragesawareness and action through inspiring hands-on experiences directly related to taking care of our PlaceandPlanet;', '· IntegratesLearning opportunities asa part of the COAST experience, includingtours and art and bike workshops;', '· Offers a safe and fun way for the community to experience biking and walking,whichimprovesHealth;', '· Allows attendees to exploreDowntownand Main Streetstoresand restaurants,and encourages spending locally,supporting Economic Opportunity;and', '· Allowsattendees, whether residents or not,toexperience the City and interact with approximately 200 staff, City Council and Commissioners in a different way, giving them firsthand experience of the City’s values and therefore its Governance.', 'COAST also meets three of the City’s Strategic Goals. Through its Mobility Strategic Goal, Santa Monica is actively working to encourage mobility options in support of walking and biking, enabling residents to get around comfortably without depending on their cars. Inspiring people to enjoy and support Santa Monica’s uniquely walkable andbikeableenvironment is a foundation of the target to increase active transportation, transit and shared rides inthe new model of mobility. This vision includes enjoyable events wherecommunity members can gatherandsocialize in our shared streets like they did during COAST.', 'Santa Monica’s Bike Action Plan and Pedestrian Action Plan discuss open streets events as “signature encouragement” programs.', 'Encouragement programs complement education, enforcement and new physical improvements like enhanced crosswalks, bikeways and protected facilities to make getting around on foot and bicycle in Santa Monica comfortable, convenient, safe and attractive.Openstreets eventsdraw participants into experiences of walking and biking that help them gain confidence and comfort using these modes.Research from across the US shows that open streets events engage a more diverse population in active transportation than other efforts.', 'In addition to advancing new models of mobility by recasting streets for walking and biking, the event supports local businesses and offers hands-on educational and cultural programming designed for people of all ages. These activities further the City’s goals of creating an Inclusive and Diverse Community and one where people Learn and Thrive.', 'COAST also meets a key goal of the City’s Cultural Plan, Creative Capital, to "develop major new arts and cultural festivals, to celebrate and explore Santa Monica\'s innovative cultural identity and address the community\'s desire for more festivals." The event is a celebration unique to Santa Monica which demonstrates the City’s commitment to art, mobility and preserving our planet.', 'Staff Recommendations', 'Presenting COAST as the City’s Signature EventStaff recommends presenting COAST as the City’s signature annual event through 2020. City goals have evolved since the inception of the SMF. In addition, audience participation trends show that, increasingly, people want to attend events that provide unique experiences they cannot readily find elsewhere. Although both COAST and the SMF are community focused and encourage people to participate locally in an active environment that is both fun and educational,COAST is more in alignment with the City’s current goals, while providing a unique way to experience Santa Monica. Open streets events didn’t exist when the SMF started. These events are now a key and recognized way to engage the community in trying new modes of mobility with success. Of the 157 COAST 2017 attendee surveys, 54% said how they choose to get around might change based on their participation in COAST, and 83% said they feel more comfortable cycling, walking or using Metro, Expo or Big Blue Bus after attending an event like COAST.', 'The City produces or co-produces over 30 events throughout the city annually. Combining the SMF and COAST in 2016 and 2017 created efficiencies in the staff, budget and community resources needed for both events. Staff believes that this single event done exceptionally well provides broader community engagement and community-building opportunities in a much more effective manner. COAST is an evolution of the SMF that is reflective of the City’s current priorities and contributes to achieving desired goals.', 'Participant reviews and utilization statistics reinforce that COAST had a greater benefit and impact than the SMF. COAST offers a celebration that draws a broader audience and a higher percentage of residents than the SMF.Attendance at COAST is roughly four times that of the SMF with COASTestimatesat 50,000 in 2016 and 40,000 in 2017. Attendance at the SMF was estimated at 12,000 in 2014 and 13,500 in 2015. While there is a perception that the SMF draws more Santa Monica residents than COAST, event surveys show otherwise. Based on SMF attendee surveys from 2014and 2015, 37% of attendees (5,002 people) were residents compared with 50% for COAST 2017 (20,000). Although the cost of COAST is greater than the cost of the SMF, it serves more people, has a bigger footprint, offers expanded opportunities for civic engagement, and promotes a range of cultural experiences, sustainability education, and mobility options.', 'Responses from the COAST 2017 attendee survey also highlight the event’s success in meeting its objectives,such as inspiring people to experience Santa Monica’s uniquely walkable andbikeableenvironment,increasing active transportation,and bringing the community together and creating more of a sense of connection.Overwhelmingly (94%), survey respondents indicated that they “perceived COAST as improving Santa Monica.”', 'Attendees elaborated further, writing that COAST improves Santa Monicaby:', '· Building community, promoting sustainable transport', '· Feelingmore connected to the city and my neighbors', '· Bringingthe community together, great for families, promotes active living', '· Gettingto meet potential new merchants &city personnel', '· Making biking and walking part of a lifestyle option possible', '· Engaging more directly with City of Santa Monica – awareness and experiences', '· Spreading awareness about different transportation methods, environmental/sustainability concerns, resources for the community & energy', '· Encouragingpeople to spend quality time together while exercising anddecreasing theircarbon footprint', 'Although the SMF had a unique sense of community and offered opportunities for residents to connect with City staff and learn about City resources, these meaningful and valuable experiences occur throughout the year, in multiple locations. Community organizations and city services are well represented at various annual City produced events, including: the Arts & Literacy Festival; the Climate Fest; National Night Out; the Buy Local Health & Fitness Festival, and the Fall Festival.Community-building also happens at the new Meet Me at Reed cultural programs, Jazz on the Lawn, and year-round programming at Virginia Avenue Park.', "Oneprized aspect of both COAST and the SMF is the ability to interact with City Council members and leaders. Given COAST's large footprint, staff has been working to explore ways to provide meaningful interaction between attendees and City elected officials and leaders. Staff will continue to refine this element and develop new ways to facilitate this engagement, such as riding a “multi-person bike” (Attachment C) with a City Council member and other fun and interactive activities.", 'Holding COAST Annually Through 2020', 'Since it can take a few yearsof iterativeadjustmentsand refinements to find the right balance of programming for an event, staff recommends that COAST be held annually through 2020. Staff also recommends thata reviewbe implementedafter the fifth year of COAST toevaluate its future frequency and location. This evaluation will be informed by the vision for citywide events and community-building experiences that will be detailed in the next iteration of the City’s Cultural Plan.', 'The Contractual Services Agreement with Community Arts Resources (CARS) for COAST Open Streets Festival Production for 2017 has an option to extend. If Council approves moving forward with COAST, staff would extend the contract for the production of COAST 2018.', 'Proposed COAST Route Through 2020', 'Staff recommends keeping the same location and route through 2020.  Holding the event in the same location allows attendees to get familiar with the area, route andexperience. The current COAST route is exceptionally community-oriented and is a shared space.The routehas the infrastructure to support the event, including parking and City facilities. COAST also engages Main Street’smany communitydestinations such as the Farmers Market, Ocean Park branch library, community garden and parklets. The route showcases many of the City’sdestinations, including the Civic Center, Pier, Palisades Park and downtown Santa Monica.', 'Staff considered shortening the two-mile route by removing Ocean Avenue or Main Street in order to concentrate activities and reduce the budget and production needs. However, reducing the footprint would make it more of a street festival and less of a car-free experience. The current route and length arepart ofthe requirements for Metro’s $149,000 grant to support COAST 2018. These include providing opportunities for people to ride transit, walk or ride a bike possibly for the first time; for civic engagement to foster understanding and support for walking and biking infrastructure at the local level; and opportunities for people to see that biking and walking is good for business, and community health. According to Metro, of allof the open streets events that they fund, Santa Monica’s is one of the most successful. It also happens to be the shortest. During the planning phases of both COAST 2016 and 2017 staff were deliberate that this event be unique to Santa Monica, reflect its priorities and showcase its landmarks and businesses. Shortening the route would no longer meet event goals or Metro’s grantgoals. Further, shortening the route would weaken the connection to the City’s Mobility Strategic Goal.', 'Re-Envision Community Involvement', 'To incorporate elements and involvement from past participants of the SMF, COAST 2017 introduced booth spaces for community organizations and city services. The addition of these booths provednot to be the most effective way to reach the public. The booth model was one of the more passive elements of a highly interactive event. It took away fromanddiminished the mobility, sustainability and art focus of the event and ultimately impacted the energy and flow of the event. The booth element also impacted allocation of resources related to cost as well as set up and tear down.', 'In future COAST events, staff would strive to re-envision community involvement that is not tied to stationary booths but inclusion that encourages engagement along the route such as a decorated bike parade, interactive games, and program integrated activities. This would allow city staff, community organizations and civic leaders to volunteer andshare information about services and programs and build relationships and new connections in a fun, and organic way.', 'Alternatives', 'Alternating COAST and the Santa Monica Festival', 'One option staff considered was alternating COAST and the SMF every other year. With this approach, the events may lose the attendee momentumand event awareness,thusnegatively impacting attendance. Annual events build from year to year without the challenge of starting again, can be quickly iterated and improved, and become anticipated traditions. People come to know what to expectand when to expect it. It is for these reasons that staff does not recommend alternating years for COAST and the SMF.', 'Changing the Route', 'Staff also explored the idea of changing the route for COAST. Staff recognizes that changing the route could engage new communities, create cross-neighborhood connections and invigorate and highlight different neighborhoods. However there are significant downsides, especially for such a new event. Each move requires a new traffic management and outreach plan, which means more time, money,staff resources,and complications. A move also means needing to establish new relationships with the businesses and residents along the route. Efficiencies of building on what works at a specific site isdiminished. Also, if the new location isn’t along the train route, the connection to public transportation is lost.Therefore staff recommends COAST have five years to establish its footing on the existing route before considering changing the route.', 'Holding the Santa Monica Festival Annually', 'Reverting to the SMF would mean returning to a familiar event held each May in Clover Park. Based on the experience with past Santa Monica Festivals, staff anticipates this model of event would continue to draw a smaller audience with fewer residents than COAST.  While less expensive to produce, there would also be less business engagement and less of the city itself being showcased. The SMF is limited by its location and scale. Its location is also not as convenient using public transportation as COAST. Main St. and Ocean Ave. are more of a communal, shared space and are welcoming to a broader cross section of people. COAST includes a platform for people to experience mobility and streets in a new way, discover businesses, enjoy a cultural event and the City’s iconic landmarks and vistas.', 'Holding Both COAST and the Santa Monica Festival Annually', 'Staff sees COAST as an evolution of SMF, not a replacement for it. There is a fair amount of overlap in terms of messaging and reach between the two events. The events take the same amount of time and staff time to produce, but COAST gets a broader draw. Since many of the staff and funding sources are shared for both events, in order to be able to sustain both with current resources, the level of engagement and planning would need to be spread among the two events, likely decreasing the total resources available for each.', 'Another option is to allocate enough funds for the full production of two signature events and designate different staff to lead each one. Since each event requires about six months to produce, has the same staff leads and the same production team, it would be essential to spread the events out, identify different staff leads, and potentially a new event production team. The City may need to look at reducing the amount of smaller citywide events in order to present two signature events. As it is, the City has a full annual event calendar including the Arts & Literacy Festival, the Climate Fest, National Night Out, the Buy Local Health & Fitness Festival, and the Fall Festival, in addition to the new Meet Me at Reed cultural programs, Jazz on the Lawn, Dia de los Muertos, the Airport ArtWalk and year-round events at Virginia Avenue Park.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'COAST 2016 and 2017 were funded by both general fund dollars and outside sources, including grants and partnership funding, which provided a necessary and substantial amount of the event funding. Funding for 2018 would follow the same model. The budgeted amount for COAST 2017 was $400,000. The actual event cost was $393,000. For 2018, staff has determined that a budgeted minimum of $415,000 (with a target amount of $450,000 if additional outside funding can be secured) is necessary to produce a community-wide event of this scale, allowing the event to grow, activate more of the route with programming and allow for cost fluctuations.', 'As outlined in the document\u202fCOAST Funding\u202f2016 – 2020 (Attachment D), funds\u202fhave been secured\u202ffor each year through 2020\u202fbut\u202fa gap in funding\u202fremains for each year, ranging from\u202f$101,000 in 2018\u202fto $250,000 for 2019 and\u202f2020.\u202f The City general fund dollars will continue to be $165,000 annually. Outside sources of funding that are expected to continue are provided by in-kind matches of services from multiple departments, grants, and partnership funding. New funding sources will also be explored and may include Measure R and Measure M Local Returns, fundraising through the Santa Monica Arts Foundation and grants. The COAST Funding 2016 – 2020 (Attachment D) does not include these anticipated outside sources of funding.', 'The increase in budget from the $400,000 in 2017 to $415,000 for 2018 would allow for necessary adjustments to grow the event programming such as adding more interactive installations and performers targeting areas of the route that were more sparsely populated, and to respond to stakeholder and attendee suggestions for improvement. This budget also allows for Consumer Price Index (CPI) increases and a possible increase in safety costs.', 'Once staff has direction from Council to move forward with COAST, staff will work to secure sustainable funds through 2020. While there are financial impacts to producing COAST as presented with this report, there is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future.']}
{'Title': 'Establishment of Preferential Parking Zone OO on portions of Centinela Avenue, Franklin Street, Berkeley Street, Stanford Street, Yale Street, Harvard Street, Princeton Street, Lipton Avenue, and Montana Avenue, and adoption of a Resolution establishing Preferential Parking Regulations.', 'Department': 'Mobility (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '11. Resolutions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Establish Preferential Parking Zone OO to include:· Centinela Avenue and Franklin Street between Lipton Avenue and the north City limit, · Berkeley Street between Lipton Avenue and Stanford Street, · Stanford Street between Lipton and Montana Avenues, · Yale, Harvard, and Princeton streets between Washington and Montana Avenues,· Lipton Avenue between Stanford Street and Centinela Avenue, and · Montana Avenue between 26th and Stanford streets. The parking regulations on these streets shall be: “Two hour parking 9 A.M. to 6 P.M., daily, except by permit.”Approve the attached Resolution (Attachment D) establishing Preferential Parking.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Residents of two blocks of Lipton Avenue between Stanford and Franklin streets have submitted qualifying petitions requesting creation of a new preferential parking zone. The residents assert that non-resident parking is impacting their ability to find parking near their homes. As installing preferential parking regulations on individual blocks has the possibility of spillover impacts on the surrounding area, community meetings were held to consider preferential parking for the entire neighborhood. Parking studies conducted in the area in October 2015 and September 2017 confirm that street parking on non-permitted streets in the area have high to moderate usage during daytime hours with the highest usage on streets near Wilshire Boulevard and Montana Avenue.', 'Staff recommends creating Preferential Parking Zone OO, approving preferential parking regulations for the following blocks:', '· Centinela Avenue and Franklin Street between Lipton Avenue and the north City limit,', '· Berkeley Street between Lipton Avenue and Stanford Street,', '· Stanford Street between Lipton and Montana avenues,', '· Yale, Harvard, and Princeton streets between Washington and Montana avenues,', '· Lipton Avenue between Stanford Street and Centinela Avenue, and', '· Montana Avenue between 26th and Stanford streets.', 'The parking regulations on these streets shall be “Two hour parking 9 A.M. to 6 P.M., daily, except by permit.”', 'Should Council approve the recommended action, it is estimated that permit sales for the 3000 and 3100 blocks of Lipton Avenue, the only two blocks that have completed a qualifying petition to date, would generate approximately $515 annually, which would offset, but not fully recover, the cost to the City of issuing permits to residents. Additionally, new signage would be required at an estimated one-time cost of $1600.', 'Background', 'Preferential parking is a tool the City uses to manage non-resident parking on residential streets, as authorized bySanta Monica Municipal Code Chapter 3.08and the California Vehicle Code. Preferential parking regulations manage the use of on-street parking to make parking more available for residents near their homes. Only residents who live on a block with preferential parking restrictions are eligible to purchase a permit. Permits may be used within two blocks of the permit holder’s address.', 'Residents may petition to initiate a preferential parking zone at any time. Upon receipt of a petition representing two-thirds of the residential units on a block, a parking occupancy study of the neighborhood is conducted and a community meeting is held. In evaluating petitions, staff typically evaluates the larger neighborhood, rather than an individual block, due to the potential for parking displacement when regulations are established or changed. As a result, staff typically recommends that the Council pre-approve preferential parking regulations for more than one block to streamline and expedite the process for adjacent blocks should some displacement occur. SMMC 3.08.030 provides Council with the authority to create preferential parking zones.', 'Once Council approves preferential parking regulations, they are implemented on the blocks that have submitted qualifying petitions. Preferential parking regulations are not implemented on blocks that have been pre-approved by the Council until the time that the residents of those blocks submit qualifying petitions representing two-thirds of the residential units on the block.', 'Discussion', 'The residents of Lipton Avenue between Stanford and Franklin streets have submitted complete petitions requesting creation of a new preferential parking zone. The existing preferential parking regulations in the area were approved at various times in the City’s history, with the earliest zone dating back to 1986, and are not consistent from block to block. In general, the surrounding area includes different iterations of the preferential parking regulation type: “Two hour parking, except with permit.” The surrounding preferential parking regulations are:', '· Zone LL (to the south of Lipton Avenue)', 'o “Two hour parking 9 A.M. – 6 P.M. Monday to Saturday, except by permit,”', '· Zone YY (Washington Avenue and to the south of Washington Avenue)', 'o “Two hour parking 9 A.M. – 10 P.M., daily, except by permit,”', '· Zone QQ (Washington Avenue and to the south of Washington Avenue)', 'o “Two hour parking 9 A.M. – 6 P.M., Monday to Friday, except by permit,”', '· Zone BB (Yale Street south of Washington Avenue)', 'o “One hour parking 9 A.M. – 6 P.M., Monday to Friday, except by permit,”', '· Zone TT (26th Street between Montana and Washington avenues)', 'o “Two hour parking 9 A.M. – 10 P.M., daily, except by permit,” and', '· Zone D (Stanford Street south of Lipton Avenue)', 'o “No parking all day Saturday and Sunday, No parking 9 P.M. – 2 A.M. Monday to Friday, two hour parking 9 A.M. – 6 P.M. Monday to Friday, except by permit.”', 'The existing area regulations and petition blocks are shown in Attachment Existing parking regulations and petition blocks map.', 'Parking demand in the area is high due to its proximity to the Wilshire Boulevard business district. An on-street parking occupancy survey for the Northeast Neighborhood area was conducted in October 2015 for both weekend and weekday time periods from 7 A.M. to 10 P.M. Due to staff turnover, there was a delay in moving forward with the initial parking study results. To confirm that the data from the study was still representative of parking usage in the area, staff conducted a follow-up study in May 2017. Based on input from residents and the Northeast Neighbors Neighborhood Organization, the area under consideration for preferential parking was subsequently expanded to include the remaining streets west of Stanford Street and east of 26th Street without preferential parking. To analyze this new area, an additional parking study was conducted in September 2017. To evaluate the effectiveness of existing regulations, the streets between Wilshire Boulevard and Lipton Avenue which currently have preferential parking regulations were included in this study. A summary of the data is included as Attachment Parking occupancy data. The following were the key findings of the studies.', '· Street parking usage was consistently higher during the weekday period with the highest parking usage overall occurring during the time period 9 A.M. to 6 P.M. During this time period the street parking usage was moderately high in the range of 65% to 85% with the exception of Lipton Avenue.', '· Lipton Avenue had the highest parking occupancy in the area with street parking reaching 100% usage on weekdays during the midday. The Lipton Avenue blocks are about a quarter of the length of the other blocks in the area and comparatively have a smaller supply of on-street parking available. Unlike the other blocks, a change of two to three cars parking on one of the Lipton Avenue blocks would significantly change the respective block’s parking occupancy by 10-20%.', '· The evening and weekend periods typically had lower parking occupancies at or below 65%; there would be at least several spaces available on each block during this time period.', '· The study showed that the existing “Two hour parking 9 A.M. to 6 P.M. Monday to Saturday, except by permit” regulations on blocks near Wilshire Boulevard such as Centinela Avenue and Franklin Street were effective in maintaining a substantial amount of street parking for residents throughout the day.', 'Additionally, staff reviewed anticipated future development along Wilshire Boulevard to get an estimate of future on-street parking conditions and needs. The majority of anticipated new development would be along Wilshire Boulevard and is planned as fast casual food restaurants along with a marketplace. Both development types would be expected to generate the highest parking demand during the midday and early afternoon for the weekday and weekend. There is currently no proposal for the area that would include bars or other venues, which typically have peak parking demand in the evening. The parking data and review of proposed developments for Wilshire Boulevard indicates street parking demand is and would be in the future highest between the hours of 9 A.M. and 6 P.M. and that open street parking spaces are and would in the future be more consistently available during the evening period.', 'Community Input', 'Residents, businesses, property owners, and the neighborhood organization were notified of the proposed preferential parking zone by mail and invited to a July 17, 2017 community meeting at the Montana Branch Library to discuss preferential parking. At this meeting there was a request by residents and the Northeast Neighbors Community organization to consider additional nearby blocks west of Stanford Street and east of 26th Street for preferential parking. A follow-up meeting was held on November 13, 2017 to discuss inclusion of this new area. The main themes from the two meetings were:', '· general consensus from the community that street parking is an issue on some streets, particularly on streets closer to Wilshire Boulevard, with the majority of the attendees in support of preferential parking regulations that would allow two hour parking without a permit;', '· there were differing opinions on the appropriate time frame for preferential parking regulations; some residents thought Monday through Friday during the day would be appropriate while others thought regulations should be daily and extend into the evening;', '· residents expressed concern that new development on Wilshire Boulevard would increase non-resident use of street parking during the weekend and night and make it more difficult for residents to park; and', '· some residents expressed that on-street parking is not an issue and that they would prefer no preferential parking regulations.', 'A list of the comments received at the two meetings and in writing is included as Attachment Community comments.', 'Recommended Preferential Parking Regulations', 'The parking studies conducted in the area showed the highest parking usage between 9 A.M. and 6 P.M. Additionally, the parking study showed the existing regulations “Two hour parking 9 A.M. – 6 P.M. Monday to Saturday, except by permit” for blocks between Wilshire Boulevard and Lipton Avenue are effective in maintaining street parking spaces for residents throughout the day, and indicate that night time regulations are not necessary to maintain adequate street parking for residents. Based on this and to maintain consistency with surrounding regulations, the recommended preferential parking Zone OO would consist of the following blocks:', '· Centinela Avenue and Franklin Street between Lipton Avenue and the north City limit,', '· Berkeley Street between Lipton Avenue and Stanford Street,', '· Stanford Street between Lipton and Montana avenues,', '· Yale, Harvard, and Princeton streets between Washington and Montana avenues,', '· Lipton Avenue between Stanford Street and Centinela Avenue, and', '· Montana Avenue between 26th and Stanford streets.', 'The recommended regulations are “Two hour parking 9 A.M. to 6 P.M., daily, except by permit.” The recommendation is to apply the regulations daily as the surrounding area has a variety of existing preferential parking regulation time-periods Monday to Saturday, Monday to Friday, and daily. Daily is typically the easiest for residents and visitors to understand as it is consistent day to day, and residents cited increased weekend activity for both Saturday and Sunday.', 'For Montana Avenue, which straddles the border of Los Angeles and Santa Monica, Los Angeles residents living on the north side of the street would be eligible for parking permits similar to nearby Zone E on 26th Street. Additionally, Franklin Avenue becomes Bristol Avenue once it crosses the border between Los Angeles and Santa Monica. Preferential parking signage would not be installed on Bristol Avenue as it is controlled by Los Angeles, but to avoid area residents inadvertently getting parking tickets it is recommended that Los Angeles residents of Bristol Avenue be eligible for preferential permits. There is no clear demarcation, such as a cross street, when Franklin Street becomes Bristol Street. To a typical person Bristol Street and Franklin Street would appear to be the same street block. The Bristol Street segment is short with 12 single family residential parcels bordering the street.', 'Alternatives', 'The Council could maintain the existing conditions or adopt different hours and types of restrictions than those recommended.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The proposed project has been determined to be categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA), pursuant to Article 19, Section 15301 (c) which defines Class 1 exempt projects in the following way: “Class 1 consists of the operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination.” The exemption includes: “Existing highways and streets, sidewalks, gutters, bicycle and pedestrian trails, and similar facilities.” Preferential parking zones involve only the issuance of permits for the use of an existing public street and include negligible or no expansion of the existing use.', 'Next Steps', 'If preferential parking regulations are approved, regulations would be implemented on the 3000 and 3100 blocks of Lipton Avenue within approximately ten weeks. This allows time for residents to apply for permits, staff to process applications, signs to be ordered, manufactured, and installed, and a grace period between the installation of signs and the enforcement of preferential parking regulations. Additional blocks within the zone would have preferential parking implemented approximately ten weeks after receipt of a qualifying petition signed by residents representing two-thirds of the residential units of that block.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The approval of Preferential Parking Zone OO would generate $515 in ongoing revenues beginning FY 2017-18 from the sale of an estimated 19 new resident and visitor permits. Funds for the one-time cost related to the purchase of new signage for Preferential Parking Zone OO totaling $1600 are included in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department.']}
{'Title': "Recommendation to accept Victor Davich's resignation from the Santa Monica Library Board and authorize the City Clerk to publish the vacancy.", 'Department': 'City Clerk 13-Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer and Councilmember McKeown that the Council allocate $19,000 of discretionary funds to Beautify Earth, a 501(c)(3) non-profit, to match funds aiding in the production of murals at three businesses in the Pico neighborhood and four Santa Monica public elementary schools, and for the establishment of “Civic Love,” a new beach trash cleanup and marketing campaign.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer and Mayor Pro Tem Davis that the Council allocate $10,000 of their discretionary funds as a matching grant to retain Bergamot Station’s City Garage, a facility crucial to our community’s long-term plans for a cultural campus at Bergamot, where City Garage has continued to struggle with a 2017 100% rent increase from the private entity holding the master lease.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'Request of Councilmember O’Connor that the Council direct staff to notify owners and residents of properties located in the R1 Zone, by mailing, of the adoption of the Interim Ordinance changing the development standards in the R1 Zone and provide contact information and links to a website where residents can get more information and sign-up to be notified about future public hearings regarding the process and changes to the R1 development standards.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items'}
{'Title': 'Award Construction Contracts for Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2429 to Sully-Miller Contracting Company, a California-based company, for construction services for the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project, an Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) grant-funded project (Grant No. XP-00T79601 and XP-96945401);2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Sully-Miller Contracting Company in an amount not to exceed $2,785,300 (including a 15% contingency);3. Award RFP #2429 to Willdan Engineering, a California-based company, for construction management and inspection services;4. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Willdan Engineering in an amount not to exceed $219,791 (including a 10% contingency);5. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'To maintain safe and reliable water delivery to Santa Monica homes and businesses, the Water Division routinely replaces the oldest water mains that are nearing the end of their useful lives. The Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project would replace approximately 4,755 linear feet of water distribution pipelines on Ocean Park Boulevard, 17th Street, Ocean Avenue, Ashland Avenue and Grant Street.  Staff identified the pipelines for replacement from a long-term replacement and maintenance plan based on service records, condition, capacity demands, and age.', 'On October 26, 2017, the City issued a Notice Inviting Bids for construction services. Staff recommends Sully-Miller Contracting Company as the best bidder for the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project for an amount not to exceed $2,785,300 (including a 15% contingency). Additionally, on November 2, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals for construction management and inspection services for this project. Staff recommends Willdan Engineering to provide construction management and inspection services for this project in an amount not to exceed $219,791 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Background', 'In 2006, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) awarded a $529,900 reimbursable grant (Grant Number XP-96945401) to the City of Santa Monica, with $460,700 in matching City funds for a total of $990,600.', 'On September 12, 2006, the City Council accepted the grant funds (Grant Number XP-96945401) from the EPA for the Santa Monica Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project (Attachment A).', 'In January 2012, the EPA awarded another grant to the City for the Santa Monica Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project (Grant Number XP-00T79601) which included $848,000 in reimbursable grant funding and $693,818 in local match funds for a total of $1,541,818', 'On June 14, 2016, the City accepted the grant funds (Grant Number XP-00T79601) for the Santa Monica Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project (Attachment B) and awarded a Professional Services Agreement to Cannon Corporation to provide engineering design services, develop construction documents and provide engineering support during the construction phase of the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project. The remaining balance of these grants in the amount of $965,803 will be used to offset some of the $3,005,091 in project costs. The table below summarizes the grant funds, local matches and the expenditures for each.', 'Grant Amount', 'Local Match Amount', 'Balance', 'Grant No. XP-96945401', '$529,900', '$460,700', '$990,600', 'Expenditure', '($412,097)', '($348,677)', '($760,774)', 'Grant No. XP-00T79601', '$848,000', '$693,818', '$1,541,818', 'Expenditure', '($0)', '($0)', '($0)', 'Remaining Balance', '$965,803', '$805,841', '$1,771,644', 'To date, the City has spent $348,677 of the $460,700 local match funds and $412,097 of the $529,900 Grant Fund Number XP-96945401. The remaining balances of the grant funds and local match funds for this grant are $117,803 and $112,023, respectively, and both of these balances were rolled over to fund the Water Infrastructure Reliability Project.', 'Both grants were made pursuant to the Federal Water Resources Development Act and titled Water Infrastructure – Santa Monica Reliability Improvement Project. Initially, the project comprised both a potable and recycled reservoir.', 'Discussion', 'The City operates and maintains a 205-mile (1,082,400 linear feet) network of water distribution mains with pipeline sizes ranging from 6 to 36 inches. The City’s water system serves over 93,000 residential and business customers, providing approximately 12 million gallons of water per day.', 'The water distribution system consists of transmission main lines, distribution main lines, service laterals, water meters, valves, and fire hydrants. Over time, the useful life of all these components diminish due to aging, soil conditions, and corrosion buildups. To ensure the continuous delivery of an adequate, high quality and reliable supply of water to customers, the City takes a proactive approach in identifying and replacing pipelines that are approaching the end of their useful lives. In 2011, the Water Resources Division developed the Five-Year Capital Improvement Program Business Case Evaluations Study Report to identify and prioritize the replacement of aged cast iron water mains (Attachment C). The study focused on the oldest cast iron pipe installations built prior to the 1970s. The study provides the estimated cost and likelihood of potential water main breaks while making recommendations to replace and upgrade the aged water mains throughout the city.', 'In July 2017, the City hired JD7 Technologies to conduct a video inspection and pipeline condition assessment for potable water mains while in service and under full pressure. JD7 Technologies performed the video inspection on pipeline segments identified by City staff in the Business Case Evaluation Study Report as potential candidates for replacement. This video inspection of pipeline condition assessment was a subsequent effort to confirm that the segments previously identified by City staff for replacement are indeed the most vulnerable pipelines in the system. Staff also reviewed maintenance records to identify the most problematic areas where unexpected low water pressure occurs.', 'Using the information gathered from the Business Case Evaluation Study Report, Video Inspection and Pipeline Condition Assessment Report, and the City’s maintenance records, staff selected the following segments for replacement and upgrades:', '· Ocean Park Boulevard - from 14th Street to 18th Street', '· 17th Street - from Pearl Street to Ocean Park Boulevard', '· Ocean Avenue - from Pico Boulevard to Bay Street', '· Ashland Avenue - from 3rd Street to 4th Street', '· Grant Street - from Lincoln Boulevard to 6th Street', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The project is statutorily exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 21080.21 of CEQA, which exempts pipelines of less than one mile. In addition, Section 15302 (Class 2 -Replacement/Reconstruction) of the CEQA Guidelines provides exemption for a class of projects involving the replacement/reconstruction of existing facilities, including the replacement of existing utility systems involving negligible or no expansion of capacity. The project would replace existing water mains that are aging and inadequate. Two of the new water mains will be moderately upsized, but would not represent a substantial increase in capacity. In addition, none of the exceptions specified in Section 15300.2 of CEQA Guidelines would apply that would preclude the use of this CEQA exemption – the project site is not located in a sensitive environment, the project will not have a significant effect on the environment, the project would not damage scenic resources, the project would not be located on a hazardous waste site, and the project would not cause a change to a historical resource.', 'California Coastal Commission De Minimis Waiver', 'On January 31, 2017, the California Coastal Commission issued a Notice of “Permit Exemption/No Permit Required” (Commission Reference Number: 5-17-0035-X), allowing for development of the project as described.', 'Contractor Selection – Construction', 'On October 26, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 67 vendors downloaded the bid and 3 bids were received and publicly opened on November 30, 2017. Bid results are as follows:', 'Bidder', 'Bid Amount', 'Sully-Miller Contracting Company', '$2,422,000', 'AMPCO Contracting, Inc.', '$2,493,525', 'Colich & Sons', '$3,248,175', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff recommends Sully-Miller Contracting Company, the lowest bidder, as the best bidder based on price, quality of services offered and experience with similar projects. Sully-Miller Contracting Company provided four references for recently completed projects, and a number of ongoing projects. All references contacted reported that the work performed by Sully-Miller Contracting Company was completed in a timely and cost-effective manner while maintaining consistent quality. The Contractors State License Board also verified that the contractor and subcontractors’ licenses are current, active and in good standing.', 'Consultant Selection - Construction Management/Inspection', 'On November 2, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for construction management and inspection services for the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Forty firms downloaded the RFP. The following seven consulting firms submitted proposals: Berg & Associates Inc., CivilSource, GK & Associates, KOA Corporation, SA Associates, Wallace & Associates, and Willdan Engineering.', 'Responses to the RFP were evaluated by a selection panel of staff from the Civil Engineering Division. The EPA’s guidelines for professional services require that services agreement be awarded based on demonstrated competence and professional qualifications. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience, references, proposed project work plan, proposed project team, creativity, demonstrated technical competence and understanding of the project scope. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Willdan Engineering as the best qualified firm to provide construction management and inspection services, for an amount not to exceed $219,791 (including 10% contingency). Willdan Engineering demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with similar projects in the cities of Santa Monica, Downey and Pomona. Through past projects, Willdan Engineering also demonstrated its ability to offer experienced construction management and inspection teams that can conduct high quality construction management and inspection at competitive hourly rates.', 'Services provided by Willdan Engineering would include construction management, continuous inspection of the contractor’s work, verification and management of field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts resulting from construction activities, attending the contractor’s safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings, keeping records of all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work performed during construction and conducting public outreach.', 'Public Outreach', 'Public outreach during construction of this project would be provided by Willdan Engineering, the City’s construction management consultant. Weekly updates on the City’s “Know Before You Go” (aka KBUG) website and Monday editions of the Santa Monica Daily Press would be provided. In addition, updates regarding the project would be provided on the City’s social media network.', 'Properties impacted by the project would receive two construction notices. The first general notice would be mailed to properties adjacent to the proposed work site two weeks prior to the start of construction. Two days prior to the start of construction, a second notice would be subsequently hand-delivered to each adjacent property with detailed information regarding the planned construction activity, potential impacts, and contact information. The notices would be prepared by Public Works staff and Willdan Engineering and would be distributed by the contractor (Sully-Miller). A project-specific outreach campaign, including one-on-one coordination with impacted businesses on Ocean Park Boulevard and Ocean Avenue, would commence prior to the start of construction and continue throughout the project.', 'Construction Timeline', 'Staff anticipates that construction would begin in March 2018 and would be completed by January 2019. To mitigate traffic impacts in the areas of Ocean Park Boulevard between 14th and 18th streets and Ocean Avenue south of Pico Boulevard, construction would be completed at nighttime from 8 p.m. to 6 a.m. Monday to Friday and on Saturdays as needed. Staff anticipates no more than three weeks of after-hours work. Nighttime work would help alleviate lane closures and traffic impacts during the day, thus mitigating impacts to residents and commuters traveling to and from Santa Monica College and John Adams Middle School.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Sully-Miller Contracting Company is for an amount not to exceed $2,785,300 (including a 15% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:', 'Account Number', 'Account Name', 'Amount', 'C200609.589000', 'Water System Improvement', '$ 117,803', 'C209196.589000', 'EPA Water Main Replacement', '$ 848,000', 'C250609.589000', 'Water System Improvement', '$ 112,023', 'C259196.589000', 'EPA Water Main Replacement', '$ 693,818', 'C250136.589000 City Match Fund', 'Water System Improvement', '$1,013,656', 'TOTAL $2,785,300', 'The contract to be awarded to Willdan Engineering is for an amount not to exceed $219,791 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C250136.589000 (Water Funds).', 'The City will be reimbursed for the remaining $965,803 EPA grant balance.']}
{'Title': 'Approval of Fourth Modification to Agreement with Aeroplex Group Partners, LLC. for Santa Monica Airport Commercial Real Estate Management', 'Department': 'Public Works, Airport Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification toProfessional ServicesAgreement No. 10262 (CCS) in the amount of $50,325 with Aeroplex Group Partners, LLC (“Aeroplex”), a California-based corporation. The modification will eliminate provisions for Aeroplex to provide minor repairs and maintenance of City-owned properties (reducing the contract by $180,675) and add services for additional commercial leasing, property management and consulting services for the Santa Monica Airport (increasing the contract by $231,000, including a 10% contingency). This will result in a three-year amended agreement, expiring on June 30, 2018, for a new total amount not to exceed $1,328,340.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City currently contracts with Aeroplex to assist City staff with commercial real estate leasing, property management and consulting services for City-owned aviation properties at the Santa Monica Airport. Staff anticipates that the need for commercial real estate leasing and property management services for City-owned real estate assets in the current fiscal year will exceed the current agreement with Aeroplex.', 'Currently the City is negotiating a lease with Atlantic Aviation, a former master tenant located at 2828 Donald Douglas Loop North. Under the proposed lease agreement, the City would assume control of 22 properties previously subleased by Atlantic Aviation. Additional real estate brokerage and property management services will be required for these properties, since the Airport is not currently staffed to effectively manage 22 additional direct tenants. The additional real estate brokerage services and property management services are estimated to cost $210,000 plus 10% contingency for a total additional cost of $231,000 in FY 2017-18.', 'Staff recommends that Council approve afourth modificationin the amount of $50,325. The modification would eliminate provisions for Aeroplex to provide minor repairs and maintenance of City-owned properties (reducing the contract by $180,675) and add services for additional commercial leasing, property management and consulting services for the Santa Monica Airport (increasing the contract by $231,000, including a 10% contingency). This would result in a three-year amended agreement, expiring on June 30, 2018, with a new total amount not to exceed $1,328,340.', 'Background', 'On March 24, 2015, Council directed staff to contract out professional services to assistCity staff with commercial real estate leasing and property management services for City-owned properties at the Santa Monica Airport (Attachment A). Following the Request for Proposals for commercial real estate firms to act as a leasing andproperty managementagent and provide real estate consulting, on July 13, 2015 the City entered into Professional Services Agreement No. 3022 (CCS) with Aeroplex for an amount not to exceed $79,990 to provide assistance to City staff in negotiating leases for City-owned properties located at the Santa Monica Airport, including brokerage services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period, and to provide property management and consulting services for those properties.', 'Due to the acquisition of additional properties that required property management services, on March 1, 2016, Council approved a first modification to the agreement, increasing the amount to $404,990 for year one with two one-year renewal options in the amount of $325,000 in FY 2016-17 and $325,000 in FY 2017-18 at the sole discretion of the City for a total amount not to exceed $1,054,990 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval (Attachment B).', 'On September 26, 2016, the City Manager authorized a second modification to Agreement No. 10262 (CCS), increasing the minimum monthly property management fee paid to Aeroplex from $4,000 to $15,000 to account for increased workload. The modification did not require additional funds.', 'On July 1, 2016 the City exercised its first option to renew the agreement, adding $325,000 for brokerage and property management services.', 'On November 22, 2016, Council approved a third modification to Agreement No. 10262 (CCS), increasing the amount by $223,025for FY 2017-18, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $1,278,015 (Attachment C). The modification was requested for Aeroplex to assume responsibility for minor repairs and maintenance ofthe City-owned properties, using its own employee and contracted resources, and to assist the City in developing a business plan for a City-owned and -operated Fixed-Base Operator (FBO) at Santa Monica Airport. Of the modification amount, $63,340 was allocation to non-aviation maintenance, and $16,335 to aviation maintenance in FY 2016-17.', 'On July 1, 2017 the City exercised its second option to renew the agreement, adding an additional $99,000 for maintenance and repairs, and $325,000 for brokerage and property management services.', 'Discussion', 'The Airport manages 500 leases and license agreements for City-owned assets and properties including offices, hangars, and land leases. Of these 500 leases, staff is currently responsible for 420, and Aeroplex is responsible for the remaining 80 properties. There are four full-time employees on Airport staff dedicated to property management and various administrative tasks related to properties including management of events and filming at the airport. The property management tasks include but are not limited to:  acquiring new tenants, negotiating and executing new leases, generating courtesy notices to tenants monthly; recording of payments; collection of late fees and security deposits monthly; preparing billing journal entries regarding lease and license agreements monthly; tracking of tenant insurance documentation; tracking of lease/license expiration dates; maintaining tenant contact information; processing tenant leases and commercial operation permits, and assessing Consumer Price Index increases annually. In addition, staff manages the day-to-day communication with tenants regarding repairs and maintenance needs, and works with facilities and the CIP Project Manager to address concerns in a timely and cost-effective manner. Airport staff is currently working at capacity to provide the above services in accordance with the City’s expectations for customer service.', 'Lease Brokerage and Property Management', 'Currently the City is negotiating a new lease with Atlantic Aviation, located at 2828 Donald Douglas Loop North. Atlantic Aviation currently holds a master tenancy for the property. On August 12, 2014, Council approved Airport Leasing Guidelines that, among other things, requires the phase out of master tenant agreements and prohibits sub-leasing. Therefore, the negotiations with Atlantic will transfer management of its subtenants for hangars and office spaces to the direct control of the City. Once the new lease is executed, 22 previously subleased tenancies will be reverted back to direct oversight by the City (Attachment D).', 'The formerly subleased properties consist of 4,000 square feet of office space and 56,887 square feet of hangars.', 'Staff recommends that Aeroplex negotiate new leases on behalf of the City, and provide property management services for the said properties. In order to provide brokerage and commercial property management and consulting services for the additional 22 properties staff anticipates that the need for additional funding in the current fiscal year will exceed the current agreement amount of $1,278,015.', 'The current agreement with Aeroplex awards them commissions for completing any renewal, new lease, or other occupancy agreement at the Santa Monica Airport during the contract period. The commission for a month-to-month lease term is a one-time payment equal to the first month’s rent, but in no case less than $1,000. Commission for longer lease terms is calculated at 5% of the gross rent and fees paid by the tenant to the Santa Monica Airport for the term of the lease or agreement. For property management services, Aeroplex receives a fee of 5% of the gross rent. Aeroplex is reimbursed for out-of-pocket property management expenses that are authorized by the City. All expenditures for maintenance and capital improvements to properties managed by Aeroplex would be the responsibility of the City.', 'Staff anticipates additional brokerage service costs of $155,500 and property management service costs of $54,500 for a total of $210,000 plus a 10% contingency for a total additional expense of $231,000 in FY 2017-18.', 'Maintenance', 'Staff recommends amending the scope of services to eliminate provisions for Aeroplex to provide minor maintenance needs for leased facilities at 3100 Donald Douglas Loop North including,butnot limited to minor roof repairs, flooring, painting, addressing mold issues, fire extinguisher annual maintenance, hangar door repairs, pest control, minor plumbing repairs, and minor electrical services using its own employees and contractors, consistent with the City’s procurement policy and procedures and in accordance with any federal, state and local labor laws. It has proved difficult for Aeroplex to provide these services, and the funds have largely remained unused. In FY 2016-17, none of the $81,675 in allocated funds were expended. These funds were rolled over to FY 2017-18. The City exercised its one-year option to renew, adding an additional $99,000 for maintenance services in FY 2017-18, for total of $180,675. None of the funds have been expended year-to-date.', 'On November 13, 2017, the Airport hired a full-time CIP Project Manager whose duties include supervising the maintenance and repair of City-owned properties at the Airport. Releasing the funding for maintenance and repairs from this contract would allow staff to ensure that funds are available to ensure that the work is completed in a timely manner. Staff recommends that the scope of services be modified to eliminate Aeroplex’s responsibility for minor repairs and maintenance. This change to the scope of services would reduce the total contractual amount by $180,675.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On April 1, 2015, the City published a Request for Proposals for commercial real estate firms to act as a leasing andproperty managementagent. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in theSanta Monica Daily Pressin accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-one vendors downloaded the RFP. Five firms responded: Aeroplex Group Partners, CBRE Group Inc., Corporate Realty Group, PAR Commercial Brokerage, and Property Management Associates Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff fromthe Airport Division of the Public Works Department and Housing and Economic Development. Staff evaluated proposals based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073 andlisted in the RFP.Based on these criteria, staffrecommendedAeroplex as the best qualified firmto assist City staff in negotiating Airport leases, including broker and property management services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to Aeroplex is$50,325for an amended agreement total not to exceed $1,328,340. No budget modification is required for the elimination of maintenance services as City staff will utilize the budget to perform the required maintenance.', 'A budget appropriation for the additional leasing and property management services will be included in the FY 2017-18 Midyear Budget for Council approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award Contract for Engineering Design Service for Runway Pavement Removal and Repurposing', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP# 2533 to AECOM, a California-based company, to provide engineering design services for excess runway, taxiway and infield pavement removal and repurposing at Santa Monica Airport (SMO);Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with AECOM, in an amount not to exceed $267,575 (including a $24,325 contingency), with an allowance of $25,811 for optional Airport Geographic Information System (AGIS) work, for a total amount not to exceed $293,386 over a one-year period.Authorize the budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Santa Monica Airport (SMO) Runway Shortening Project was completed in December 2017, leaving 736 feet of excess pavement on each end of the runway after the runway was reduced to an operational use of 3,500 feet. The excess pavement cannot be used by aircraft and is no longer an integral part of operations at SMO. As required by Federal Aviation Administration guidelines, 300 feet of this 736 feet immediately adjacent to the runway ends is needed for the Runway Safety Area (RSA) to protect aircraft should they exceed the runway. The remaining 436 feet of excess runway that falls outside the RSA will be hydroseeded. On September 26, 2017 (Attachment A), Council directed staff to proceed with the procurement of engineering design services to pulverize in-place and stabilize the existing pavement within the RSA as well as remove all unused pavement outside the Runway Safety Area (RSA) and treat the graded surface with hydro seeding.', 'Staff recommends the award of RFP# 2533 to AECOM, a California-based company, to provide engineering design services for excess pavement removal and repurposing at SMO in an amount not to exceed $267,575 (including a $24,325 contingency), with an allowance of $25,811 for optional Airport Geographic Information System (AGIS) work should the repurposing project require an update to the FAA’s AGIS records pertaining to SMO, for a total amount not to exceed $293,386 over a one-year period.', 'Background', 'On February 28, 2017, Council awarded Feasibility Professional Services Agreement 10436 (CCS) to AECOM to study reducing the length of Runway 3-21 at the Santa Monica Airport (SMO) from 5,000 to 3,500 feet (Attachment B). The agreement included an initial feasibility phase to provide runway shortening options for Council consideration and selection.', 'On April 24, 2017, staff issued an Information Item responding to Council’s inquiry about a potential phased interim project for the removal of pavement at the ends of the runway and evaluation of future uses of the excess runway area (Attachment C). The Information Item provided an update on those topics, as well as the overall status of the runway-shortening project.', 'On May 24, 2017, Council selected the center-aligned shortened runway option from the two options presented for runway shortening construction (Attachment D). At that meeting, Council also:', '· Authorized staff to proceed with further design of the preferred option to establish a guaranteed maximum price (GMP) for a design-build agreement between the City and AECOM to complete runway shortening construction prior to December 31, 2017;', '· Adopted Resolution No. 11044 stating that the runway shortening project is categorically exempt from review under the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA); and', '· Directed staff to investigate pavement removal options for the unused and abandoned portions of the runway, taxiways and adjacent in-field pavement that could be implemented as a separate and distinct project once the runway shortening project concluded.', 'On August 8, 2017, Council authorized the City Manager to execute a design-build agreement with AECOM for a GMP of $3.52 million to complete runway shortening construction by December 31, 2017 (Attachment E). Construction began in early October 2017 and was completed on December 23, 2017.', 'On September 26, 2017, City Council selected Option 1 from the three options presented by staff (and listed below) for excess pavement removal and repurposing at SMO (Attachment A).', '· Option 1 - Remove all unused pavement outside the Runway Safety Area (RSA) and hydro-seed. Pulverize in-place and stabilize pavement within the RSA.', '· Option 2 - Remove all unused pavement outside the RSA and install artificial turf. Pulverize in-place and stabilize pavement within the RSA.', '· Option 3 - Pulverize in-place all unused pavement outside and within the RSA and stabilize.', 'All options involve removing unused pavement outside and within the RSA. Hydro-seeding (or hydraulic mulch seeding) is a planting process that uses a thick fluid mixture, called a slurry, of seed and mulch which is sprayed over prepared ground. The slurry typically has other ingredients including fertilizer and fiber mulch that accelerate the growing process by maintaining moisture around the seeds. The hydro-seeding mixture would be composed of drought-tolerant grasses and other low-lying ground cover native to southern California and suitable for installation around airport runways and taxiways. Figure A below depicts how the hydro-seeded areas are likely to appear once completed.', 'Discussion', 'Figure B below depicts the abandoned pavement that is potentially eligible for removal, and shows its relation to the Runway Protection Zone (RPZ) and Runway Safety Area (RSA). The RPZ is located at ground level beyond the ends of the runway to enhance the safety and protection of people and property on the ground. For airports in urban areas, due to historical circumstances, the RPZ often extends beyond the airport boundary and into the surrounding neighborhood. At the Santa Monica Airport (SMO), the RSA extends 300 feet beyond the active runway.', 'Figure B - Abandoned pavement removal options at SMO.', 'The existing runway pavement consists of approximately 6 inches of asphalt surface pavement over approximately 8 inches of concrete pavement. The abandoned taxiways, shoulders and in-field areas consist of variable asphalt and concrete pavements ranging from 3 to 8 inches thick.', 'The runway shortening project reduced the runway length on both ends by 736 linear feet, which is unusable for aircraft operations and can be repurposed. The blue shaded areas in Figure B above represent the pavement that will be removed and repurposed as part of this project. The rectangle outlined in orange within the blue shaded area delineates the RSA, which is adjacent to each runway end and is 300 feet long and 150 feet wide. The RSA must be consistent with the City\'s obligation to comply with the terms of the Stipulation and Order/Consent Decree ("Consent Decree") filed in the matter of City of Santa Monica v. United States of America, et al., Case No. 13-CV-8046-JFW (VBKx) (C.D. Cal.). Furthermore, the RSA must be well-graded with no ruts, humps or surface depressions and capable of supporting Aircraft Rescue and Fire Fighting (ARFF) equipment. Additionally, the first 150 feet of the RSA adjacent to each runway end, which includes the blast pad, must be essentially non-erodible under jet blasts to minimize the generation of Foreign Object Debris (FOD) that represent a major hazard to all aircraft.', 'The project will repurpose over half a million square feet of pavement and to ensure proper drainage and keep the runway clear of debris, especially during rain events, a comprehensive civil site design is required. By June 2018, AECOM will perform the following duties to deliver construction plans and associated documents needed for the removal of the runway:', '· Conduct pavement investigations, including borings, to characterize the thickness and structural characteristics of the existing pavement in the removal areas', '· Conduct a survey of the pavement removal areas and prepare design base maps', '· Research to identify existing utilities within the removal areas', '· Perform a hydrology analysis of the airport site to identify drainage considerations as a result of the proposed pavement removal project', '· Prepare preliminary and final construction plans, specifications, and cost estimates, including civil, electrical, drainage, landscaping and irrigation plans as required', '· Prepare construction phasing, safety and erosion control plans as required', '· Conduct meetings with the FAA and Airport stakeholders to present preliminary design materials as necessary during various stages of the project', '· Respond to Requests for Information (RFIs) from prospective bidders during the bidding period', '· Review submittals and respond to RFIs from the selected contractor during construction', '· Provide a complete set of As-Built plans that reflect the final project as it was constructed', '· Complete Airport Geographic Information System (AGIS) survey and design work, if required, and submit to the City and FAA', 'Consultant Selection', 'On March 22, 2016, staff issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQs) for Consulting Aviation Services in anticipation of any future planning, environmental, and engineering projects at SMO. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Sixty-eight vendors downloaded the RFQ. Two proposals were received, one from Mead & Hunt, and the other from AECOM. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Both consultant teams were pre-qualified to provide aviation consulting services at SMO.', 'On November 23, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP #2533) to provide engineering design services for Santa Monica Airport Runway Repurposing. The RFP was emailed to the two pre-qualified aviation consultants: Mead & Hunt and AECOM. Both consultants submitted proposals on December 14, 2017.', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience, references, work plans, project team, cost, and delivery schedule. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends AECOM as the best qualified firm to provide engineering design services for Santa Monica Airport Runway Repurposing Project based on their extensive experience with some of the largest airports in the country including Los Angeles International Airport and John F. Kennedy International Airport. In addition, AECOM was pre-qualified and selected for the Runway Shortening Project for the City. AECOM’s expertise and efforts were instrumental in allowing the City to implement the runway shortening design and construction prior to the end of 2017.', 'Anticipated Schedule', "Staff anticipates the following completion schedule for implementing excess pavement removal, based on the City's design-bid-build procurement process. The schedule has been extended by approximately two months to allocate additional time during design. Completion of construction is anticipated for April 2019.", 'Contract Execution – January/February 2017', 'Final Design Completion – June 2018', 'Construction Award – October 2018', 'Construction Completion – April 2019', 'California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) Determination', 'It has been determined that removal of the excess runway pavement at the Santa Monica Airport (SMO) would be categorically exempt from CEQA pursuant to Sections 15301 and 15304 of CEQA Guidelines. Section 15301 provides a Class 1 exemption for the minor alteration of existing public or private facilities involving negligible or no expansion of use. Section 15304 provides a Class 4 exemption for minor public or private alterations in the condition of land and/or vegetation. The project would make improvements to existing unusable pavement at SMO, which will include the removal of existing pavement and the installation of a stable surface (hydro-seeded soil and mulch). Therefore, the project qualifies as a Class 1 and Class 4 exemption. In addition, none of the exceptions specified in Section 15300.2 of CEQA Guidelines would apply that would preclude the use of this CEQA exemption - the project site is not located in a sensitive environment, the project will not have a significant effect on the environment, the project would not damage scenic resources, the project would not be located on a hazardous waste site, and the project would not cause a change to a historical resource. Therefore, this project is determined to be categorically exempt from CEQA. A Notice of Exemption for this project was filed with the Los Angeles County Registrar-Recorder/County Clerk on October 6, 2017.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to AECOM is for an amount not to exceed $293,386. Award of this contract requires an additional FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget appropriation of $293,386 from the Airport (33) Fund to Airport Runway Repurposing Account C339222.589000. Future maintenance costs could range between $20,000 and $50,000 annually and would be paid from the Airport (33) Fund. Upon completion of the final design and selection of the final hydroseed mix, a more definitive maintenance budget will be established.']}
{'Title': 'Agreement Modification No. 2 to Provide Schematic and Construction Documents, Bidding and Construction Administration Services for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': '1. Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement #10553 (CCS) in the amount of $364,859 (including a 10% contingency) with RJM Design Group, Inc., a California-based company, for the preparation of construction documents, bidding and negotiation, and construction administration services required to complete the design for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project. This would result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $534,997.2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'To ensure the timely completion of the next steps to keep the City’s commitment to construct the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field, staff requests authorization to execute a second modification to the existing design agreement with the consultant, RJM Design Group, Inc. (RJM). The additional scope of work to be added to the original agreement would include the preparation of construction documents, bidding and negotiation, and construction administration services for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project. As the schedule was reported to Council in June 2017, this modification is being delivered a month early and would allow final design services to keep the project on schedule to open the sports field by (or before) spring 2021.', 'Background', 'On February 9, 2016, staff presented the Civic Working Group’s Final Report and proposed next steps for the Civic Auditorium to Council (Attachment A). Council directed staff to explore the possibility of placing a temporary synthetic turf sports field including temporary restroom facilities at the corner of 4th Street and Pico Boulevard, to work with partners such as the Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD) and Santa Monica College (SMC) on funding options, and to return to Council with cost estimates for design and construction of the field.', 'On June 14, 2016, Council approved the second year of the FY16-18 Capital Improvement Program budget, in which $200,000 was identified for design services for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project (Attachment B).', 'On October 25, 2016, staff presented a quarterly update on the project at a Council Study Session (Attachment C). At that meeting staff was directed to initiate a discussion with the California Coastal Commission regarding the temporary sports field project and its removal of approximately 600 spaces of surface parking; to continue discussions with SMMUSD regarding a potential partnership project to include subterranean parking and a possible permanent field with a possible softball component having a clay infield; and reissue the Request for Proposals (RFP) to a wider range of potential firms for the design of the sports field in an effort to identify a fee proposal that aligned with the $200,000 approved budget.', 'On January 17, 2017, staff issued an information item per Council direction to provide an interim progress update for the sports field project (Attachment D).', 'On February 28, 2017, staff delivered an update to Council regarding discussions with the California Coastal Commission, and negotiations with SMMUSD to develop a permanent multipurpose sports field with the possibility of a clay infield for softball and subterranean parking, and intent to award feasibility and concept design services for the field project to RJM (Attachment E). Council directed staff to continue negotiations with SMMUSD for the partnership project and set a definitive deadline of June 17, 2017 to either reach an agreement for development of a permanent field over subterranean parking or end negotiations and proceed with advancing the temporary field.', 'On June 27, 2017, following completion of the site analysis and conceptual design study by RJM, staff presented an economic study, design feasibility analysis and two concept design options for a multipurpose sports field at the Civic Center (Attachment F). Option one was a temporary field with a synthetic turf overlay for softball with no new parking spaces. Option two was a permanent field with a synthetic turf softball overlay with subterranean parking. Council directed staff to advance plans for a temporary field with no added parking and continue discussions with SMMUSD to determine if softball accommodations, including a synthetic turf infield overlay and softball-related amenities, should be included in the final project program.', 'On September 26, 2017, following notification that SMMUSD was not interested in pursuing a softball field overlay, Council authorized a first modification to the agreement with RJM in the amount of $94,198 for schematic and design development services required for future submission of the project to the California Coastal Commission, which resulted in an amended agreement not to exceed $170,138 (Attachment G).', 'Discussion', 'To advance plans for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project, as directed by Council, staff recommends that Council authorize a second modification to the agreement with RJM for final design services. Staff entered into a contract for design services in a phased approach, rather than awarding complete design services, to maximize flexibility and cost savings for the project. The additional scope of work to be added to the original agreement would include the preparation of construction documents and bidding and construction administration services in the amount of $364,859 (including 10% contingency).', 'This second modification would allow RJM to complete all design services required for construction of a 120-yard by 75-yard California Interscholastic Federation (CIF) soccer field, suitable for lacrosse, with 5-yard buffer zones, security and ball containment fencing, equipment and maintenance storage and modular restroom facilities.', 'This second modification would result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $534,997 and would allow the project to expeditiously secure a construction permit upon notification of approval by the California Coastal Commission.', 'Next Steps', 'Staff anticipates the following next steps:', '· Return to Council in fall 2018 for amendment of the Civic Center Specific Plan following the completion of a parking study.', '· Return to Council in summer/fall 2019 for authorization to award the construction agreement upon securing California Coastal Commission approval.', 'Staff anticipates that construction will be completed on schedule in spring 2021.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On October 31, 2016, the City published a Request for Proposals for feasibility concept study and design services for design of the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 92 vendors downloaded the RFP. Nine firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works and Community and Cultural Services departments.', '· AHBE Landscape Architects', '· BFS Landscape Architects', '· Brightview Design Group', '· David Volz Design', '· Hirsch & Associates, Inc.', '· HOK', '· Pleskow Architects', '· Rios Clementi Hale Studios', '· RJM Design Group', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: cost of services, understanding of the project, experience on similar projects and feedback from references. Staff then interviewed three shortlisted firms. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommended RJM Design Group, Inc. as the best firm to provide professional design services for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project based on the firm’s expertise with field design, cost of services, understanding of the project, and feedback from references.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to RJM Design Group, Inc. is $364,859 (including a 10% contingency), for an amended agreement total not to exceed $534,997. The agreement modification requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', '1. Release of fund balance from reserve account number 1.380255 of $364,859.', '2. Appropriate $364,859 to account C019194.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Recommendation to Remove Santa Monica Public Library Fines for Youth (0-18 years)', 'Department': 'Library Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council approve the proposed change in Library policy to remove fines for youth (ages 0 to 18) and eliminate outstanding fines previously accrued for these cardholders estimated to be $50,300 (inclusive of current Library records). The removal of fines will ensure access to the wealth of information, learning and cultural exploration available to them at Santa Monica Public Library with a Library card, further supporting literacy and success in school from an early age.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Santa Monica Public Library (Library) ensures access to digital and physical learning resources for all ages. The Library is often a primary place to build a foundation of early literacy and learning for our youngest customers. Students rely on Santa Monica Public Library as a place to study and meet curricular as well as entertainment and extracurricular needs.', 'Current active youth (0-18 years) accounts total 7,100. The number of those unable to use their accounts to access databases, checkout materials, and use the internet due to overdue fines is 766 for an estimated $12,627 in fines. This means that they have accrued fines of at least $5.00 and therefore cannot use the Library until after they pay the fine. This impacts youth’s ability to access and utilize library resources needed for developing literacy skills, building homework support, and other educational pursuits.', 'The Library recommends elimination of youth fines going forward and a one-time waiver of all outstanding fines, which are estimated to be $50,300 (inclusive of current Library records) for youth Library accounts. If approved the change will take place with inception of Fiscal Year 2018-19 and will decrease annual fine revenue by $24,000 –11% of the revenue received for all fines annually. Outstanding items will still be subject to fees resulting from lost or damaged items. The Library asks for Council’s support in this important initiative to overcome the hurdle created by library accounts blocked by fines for youth to guarantee their success in the future. The City could make no better investment. The reduction of youth fines has worked successfully in other local communities such as Altadena, City of Los Angeles (Student Success Card) and most recently throughout Los Angeles County, thus, encouraging stronger youth use of library services.', 'This effort reflects the City Council’s goal to invest in learning opportunities at all stages of life through the Learn + Thrive strategic goal as well as ensuring the wellbeing of youth through learning and their success later in life.', 'Background', 'Santa Monica Public Library active youth cardholders number 7,100, with 766 as of this writing, blocked because they owe $5.00 or more in fines. In this discussion, “fines” refers to the monetary penalties incurred by returning library materials past their due date. “Fees” are those penalties resulting from lost or damaged items, along with associated processing fees. Several studies have indicated that fines are not prohibitive in the quick return of materials, as youth must rely on various means, including adults for access to the library. Instead, youth and their adults usually make a decision not to return and associate the library with a poor experience. This recommendation is for the elimination of fines only for youth cardholders, regardless of the material type borrowed.', 'Current fines by item type – Table 1', 'Item type', 'Fine per day', 'Children’s materials', '15 cents', 'Adult/Teen materials', '25 cents', 'DVDs all users', '$1.00', 'Discussion', 'The Library’s mission is to provide resources, services and a place to encourage the community to read, connect, relax and learn. As a recognized longstanding learning institution, the Santa Monica Public Library embraces policies and practices that remove barriers to information access. Anecdotally, it has been reported that patrons stop using the library when cards are blocked due to fines.', 'At the November 8, 2017 special Santa Monica Public Library Board meeting, the Board voted 4-0 with one member absent to endorse the report recommendation from Library staff and recommend the elimination of fines for youth cardholders.', 'Circulation of Youth Materials', 'A notable downturn in circulation for children and teens material is apparent since 2012. Many factors may contribute to that decrease, access to more information digitally, adoption of the non-resident fee, which was in effect July 1, 2013 through February 1, 2016, and the decreasing youth population in the City.', 'Decline in youth material circulation – Table 2', 'Youth Material Circulation', 'FY13/14', 'FY14/15', 'FY15/16', 'FY16/17', 'Juvenile', '-9.12%', '0.50%', '-8.49%', '-1.64%', 'Teen', '-15.68%', '4.36%', '-11.66%', '-11.72%', 'Total', '-11.14%', '1.63%', '-9.44%', '-4.59%', 'According to the 2014 Youth Wellbeing Report Card (see attached weblink 2014 Youth Wellbeing Report Card) those 18 years and under comprised 15% of Santa Monica’s total population, which was then 92,987. There is a decline in youth in the community based on the 2000 census for Santa Monica showing 14,057 youth. That number currently is 13,340 according to the 2016 estimated census for Santa Monica in American FactFinder.', 'A potential cause in the decline in use among youth could be tied not just to the primary factors noted above, but to fines that might prevent their using the Library regularly.', 'Outstanding fines on Youth cards are minimal according to the Library’s Integrated Library System and date back to 1998.', 'Outstanding fines for Children and Teen Accounts previously accrued and currently due in Polaris the Integrated Library System – Table 3', 'Patron Code', 'Status', '#', 'Balance', 'Juvenile (0-11)', 'Active', 'blocked', '373', '$6,064', 'unblocked', '805', '$1,533', 'Inactive', 'blocked', '424', '$8,818', 'unblocked', '313', '$758', 'Total', '$17,173', 'Teen (12-18)', 'Active', 'blocked', '393', '$6,563', 'unblocked', '666', '$1,305', 'Inactive', 'blocked', '1311', '$22,945', 'unblocked', '841', '$2,271', 'Total', '$33,084', 'Total Outstanding Fines for Children and Teen Accounts', '$50,257', 'Student success programs and fine free status', 'The largest public library in Southern California, Los Angeles Public Library (LAPL), has a newly adopted Student Success card (see attached weblink for Student Success Card) for children and teens in partnership with the Los Angeles Unified School District. Essentially, all students enrolled in the District receive a special category LAPL Student Success card that is exempt from fines and renewal requirements.', 'On December 19, 2017, The Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors instructed the Los Angeles County Librarian to implement a fine-free student library card for students 17 years old and under.', 'Santa Monica Public Library and the Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District are in the process of developing a program that ensures all students receive a library card to support their success all through school. Removing fines for youth is a first step in the process.', 'Fine Free Movement', 'A robust nationwide movement is afoot in support of fine-free public library services. There is no indication, according to current data, that fines serve as a deterrent or promote return and use of library materials. With increasing frequency, libraries point to the value of fine-free accounts, especially for youth.', 'Library Journal published “Doing Fine(s)? / Fines & Fees” by Jennifer A. Dixon and Steven Gillis on April 4, 2017 (see attached weblink Library Journal). Because most libraries moving to fine-free accounts have done so in the past 2 years, the authors found that the impact on circulation of library materials was less discernable at this point. Instead, they focused on the good will benefits and how so far, the removal of fines brought people back to the library and improved staff interactions with patrons at the point of return. Habitually late library users would probably continue to behave in the same manner. The immediate impact for youth would be a positive experience and surprise at learning there were no fines upon returning late items.', 'A number of local libraries have adopted fine free status for youth including Altadena Library District, City of Los Angeles Public Library, and LA County Library.', 'Plan to implement fine free status', 'The Library has formed an ad hoc committee to implement outreach to children through Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District, Santa Monica private schools, Community Corporation, Housing and Economic Development family clients, and Community and Cultural Services to increase library registration and use. The fine free status for youth accounts for those ages 0-18 will have a significant impact on the number of youth accounts. A general marketing campaign is expected in collaboration with the Office of Communications and local news outlets.', 'Financial Impact and Budget Actions', 'The approval of eliminating overdue fines for youth cardholders will decrease ongoing Library Fines revenues by $24,000 per year and remove approximately $50,300 in outstanding fines previously accrued and currently due in Polaris the Library’s Integrated Library System. Fiscal Year 2018-19 budget for account 01613.401600 should be decreased by $24,000 and an updated fine resolution will be submitted during the Fiscal Year 2018-19 Exception-Based Budget.']}
{'Title': 'Award of Design Agreement for the Memorial Park Feasibility Study and Master Plan', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #SP2509 to AHBE Landscape Architects, a California-based company, for the feasibility study and master plan design of the Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with AHBE Landscape Architects, in an amount not to exceed $326,706 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project would combine the existing 10.3-acre Memorial Park with an adjoining City-owned 2.9-acre site to the north into a newly renovated and expanded community park. The recommended feasibility study and master plan would examine existing conditions and park program elements, and propose a single cohesive park program and layout with a focus on sports fields, particularly baseball and softball. Staff recommends entering into an agreement with AHBE Landscape Architects to provide feasibility study and master plan design services for an amount not to exceed $326,706 (includes a 10% contingency). Staff will return to Council in fall 2018 to present the preferred master plan option for final approval.', 'Background', 'Santa Monica’s Parks and Recreation Master Plan, adopted in 1997, (Attachment A) stated that it was necessary to consider redefining the role of Memorial Park to better serve the community. Staff recommended the development of a Memorial Park Master Plan as part of the 1997 Recreation and Parks Master Plan (Attachment B). However, the City did not take control of the Fisher Lumber site until 2005, and in lieu of a viable alternate site, the Fisher Lumber site has since housed the City’s Colorado Yards and Public Landscape Division’s equipment and staff.  A Memorial Park Master Plan has not yet been developed.', 'In October 2004, Council adopted resolution 9987 (CCS) approving a negative declaration and authorizing the City Manager to negotiate and execute a purchase of sale agreement for the property located at 1601 14th Street, at the time occupied by Fisher Lumber. The acquisition would preserve the possibility of expanding Memorial Park, although no project to expand Memorial Park was contemplated at that time (Attachment C).', 'On March 22, 2016, Council adopted the recommendation of the Recreation and Parks Commission and staff and formally selected the City’s highest priority park projects to be included in the Los Angeles Countywide Parks Needs Assessment Report (Attachment D). The Recreation and Parks Commission’s Recommendations included the expansion of Memorial Park to include the former Fisher Lumber Site as a priority project to be included in the Countywide Needs Assessment Report.', 'Today, Memorial Park is Santa Monica’s primary public park for diamond sports, including little league baseball, Santa Monica High School softball and baseball teams, and adult league softball and baseball. The park also houses the only public gymnasium in Santa Monica.', 'Funding for preliminary planning and design for the Memorial Park Expansion Project was included in in the 2016-2018 Capital Improvements Program Adopted Biennial Budget. Funding options for construction will need to be explored and identified pending the completion of the Master Plan.', 'Discussion', 'The Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project consists of two adjacent land parcels. Parcel 1 is the existing 10.3-acre Memorial Park site. Parcel 2 is the adjoining 2.9-acre former Fisher Lumber site to the north of the existing park. The two adjoining parcels are bound by Colorado Boulevard to the northwest, 16th Street to the northeast, Olympic Boulevard to the southeast and 14th Street to the southwest.', 'Parcel 1 includes six baseball/softball fields, a skate park, four tennis courts, gated children’s play structures, on-site parking, restrooms, a dog run area and three City-owned and operated community buildings. The existing buildings house the Santa Monica Police Activities League (P.A.L.), the community fitness room, staff offices and the Memorial Park gymnasium. Along the proposed project’s Northwest boundary sits Parcel 2, the former Fisher Lumber site, which currently houses the City’s Public Landscape Division offices, covered storage areas and vehicle and equipment storage lots. The City is considering relocating the Public Landscape Division offices to a site at the Santa Monica Airport.', 'The core objective of this feasibility study and master planning process is to complete site analysis, define the project program requirements and study options to arrive at a conceptual master plan.  The master plan is intended to inform the design and phased construction of the Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On August 22, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide feasibility study and master plan design services for the 13-acre Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.075(a) provisions. A total of 120 vendors downloaded the RFP. Ten proposals were received and publicly opened on September 28, 2017. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works, Planning and Community Development (PCD) and Community and Cultural Services (CCS) departments. The 10 firms that submitted proposals are listed below:', '· AHBE Landscape Architects', '· Brightview', '· Design Workshop', '· Koning Eizenberg', '· KSA Design Studio', '· MIG', '· Studio-MLA', '· Rios Clementi Hale Studios', '· RJM Design Group', '· SWA Landscape Architects', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: fees, previous work experience on similar projects, track record performing public sector work, hourly rates for services, demonstrated understanding project scope, work approach, community outreach, project team qualifications and proposed schedule. Staff then interviewed two shortlisted firms, AHBE Landscape Architects and SWA Landscape Architects, for interview. Based on the above criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends AHBE Landscape Architects as the best qualified firm to provide feasibility study and master plan design services for the Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project. AHBE Landscape Architects provided a clear fee structure, exhibited a full understanding of the project scope, and has completed projects of similar size and scope. In addition, the project team displayed good composition with required skills, and has experience working with governmental agencies and conducting community outreach. Staff contacted references that had previously worked with AHBE and all highly recommend the firm.', 'Next Steps', 'Pending Council approval, staff expects to begin design work in March 2018. Staff would return to Council in October 2018 to present a preferred design option and to solicit Council’s comments and recommendations. The selected design would be further developed, and staff would return to Council in January 2019 for approval of the Final Master Plan document.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to AHBE Landscape Architects is for an amount not to exceed $326,706. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019154.589000.']}
{'Title': 'Contract Approval for Design Services for Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Pedestrian and Bicycle Improvements', 'Department': 'Mobility (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP #133 to KOA Corporation, a California based company, to provide engineering and design services for the Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project.Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with KOA Corporation in an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 15% contingency) for an initial two-year term and a one-year renewal option.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'One of the City Council’s five Strategic Goals is the creation of a new model of mobility to improve access for Santa Monica residents to get around within and beyond their community.', 'To promote pedestrian and bicyclist safety and access to the Expo 26th Street/Bergamot Station and Expo Corridor Bike/Ped Path, the Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project (the “Project”) would enhance linkages to the Expo station, facilitate walking and biking, and support a safer and barrier-free network. Specifically, the Project would install sidewalks on Pennsylvania Avenue between 26th and Stewart Streets where no sidewalks currently exist; create a protected bikeway along Stewart Street between Colorado and Kansas Avenues; and reconfigure the atypical 3-street, 5-leg Olympic/Nebraska/Stewart intersection.', 'These Project elements are identified as a priority in the Bike Action Plan adopted in 2011 and the Pedestrian Action Plan adopted in 2016 because they increase access to transit, and make biking and walking easier and safer. Staff recommends KOA Corporation (KOA), a planning and engineering consultant, to provide the design services for the Project in an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 15% contingency).', 'Background', 'The City began planning for the arrival of Expo light rail nearly a decade ago when updating the General Plan Land Use & Circulation Element (LUCE). Adopted in 2010, following a six-year community engagement process, the LUCE puts forth a land use, urban design, and transportation vision for the City that both establishes new districts comprised of mixed residential and commercial land uses and creates a multi-modal transportation system that provides safer access and mobility options for all. Building on LUCE recommendations, and with community input, the 2011 Bike Action Plan prioritized a Stewart Street protected bike facility; the 2013 Bergamot Area Plan identified preliminary streetscape recommendations for Pennsylvania Avenue and Stewart Street and developed a concept for reconfiguring the Olympic/Nebraska/Stewart intersection; and the 2016 Pedestrian Action Plan identified Pennsylvania Avenue sidewalk gap closure and the reconfiguration of the Olympic/Nebraska/Stewart intersection as priority projects.', 'In the Fiscal Year 2016-2018 Capital Improvement Project (CIP) Budget, Council budgeted CIP Funds of $2,800,000 comprised of local and federal funds for the design and construction of both this Project and the adjacent Olympic Boulevard Improvements Project. The Olympic Boulevard Improvements Project will create a sidewalk along the north side of Olympic Boulevard between 26th and Stewart Streets and install pedestrian amenities. Due to the procedural requirements and extended timeline related to federal-funded projects, only local funds are being applied to the Olympic Boulevard Improvements Project so that it may be designed and constructed in advance of the Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project. At the December 12, 2017 (Attachment A) Council meeting, Council authorized staff to execute a contract with KOA Corporation to provide engineering and design services for the Olympic Boulevard Improvements Project in an amount not to exceed $200,000 (including a 15% contingency). The Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project will proceed on a separate, but coordinated, timeline using a mix of local and federal funding.', 'Discussion', 'The Project area is located within formerly industrial lands with wide roadways and limited pedestrian and bicycle infrastructure. Now adjacent to an Expo light rail station, the Project is needed to meet the changing needs and uses for the Project area. The Bergamot Area Plan designates Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue as “Complete Streets.” Complete Streets serve station linkages and provide access for all: pedestrians, vehicles, bicycles, and transit. This Project will create new pedestrian connections along Pennsylvania Avenue between 26th and Stewart Streets and enhance bicycle facilities along Stewart Street between Colorado and Kansas Avenues (see Attachment B). Improvements include:', '· Installation of new ADA-compliant sidewalks on Pennsylvania Avenue.', '· Creation of a protected bikeway on Stewart Street.', '· Enhanced bike connection on Colorado Avenue between Stewart Street and Yale Avenue.', '· Improved crosswalk and curb ramps at the north leg of the Stewart Street/Olympic Boulevard intersection.', '· Pedestrian-oriented lighting to enhance visibility, increase safety, and accommodate increased pedestrian volumes.', '· Reconfiguration of the atypical 3-street, 5-leg Olympic/Nebraska/Stewart intersection to reduce/eliminate left-turn conflicts from Nebraska Avenue.', '· Pedestrian and/or bicyclist amenities, such as benches, shade structures, bike racks, and trash containers, as needed.', 'This local- and federal-funded Project will coordinate with the adjacent Olympic Boulevard Improvements Project, but will follow on a separate timeline.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On September 19, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) #133 to obtain design services for the Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 250 vendors downloaded the RFP request. Three proposals were received on October 19, 2017. Following a review of submittal requirements, all three proposals were accepted and evaluated to determine the best qualified person or firm based on the criteria outlined in the RFP, which included understanding of the work to be done, experience with similar kinds of work, quality of staff for work to be done, capability of developing innovative or advance techniques, familiarity with state and federal procedures, financial responsibility, and demonstrated technical feasibility.', 'On November 6, 2017, the Evaluation Team comprised of staff from Planning and Community Development and Public Works recommended KOA to provide the design services for this project based on its team composition and experience with similar projects in the Cities of Claremont, Long Beach, San Diego, and Temple City; project approach and understanding; and commitment to deliver the project to the City on schedule and within budget. Based on Section 2.24.073 of the Municipal Code and these criteria, KOA is recommended as the best qualified firm.', 'Next Steps', 'KOA would initiate background research and data collection; conduct required survey work; and identify design alternatives to be considered. Following the public outreach process, KOA would develop and deliver a City approved, community supported, and technically vetted final design and construction documents. Due to the federal funding component of this Project and required environmental clearance and Caltrans coordination, staff anticipates 12-18 months for the design phase of the project depending on Caltrans coordination, with public outreach beginning summer 2018 and construction beginning summer 2020.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The professional services agreement to be awarded to KOA for the Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project is for an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 15% contingency) for an initial two-year term and a one-year renewal option.  Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:', 'Account   FY 17/18', 'C459141.589000 $215,000', 'C019094.589000 $100,000', 'Total   $315,000']}
{'Title': 'Approval of Agreement for Water and Wastewater Consulting Services for SCADA Systems Integration and Support', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP# 125 to Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC, a California-based company for professional services to conduct a comprehensive survey of the City’s Supervisory Control and Data Acquisition (SCADA) system for water and wastewater facilities, development of a SCADA Master Plan, development and implementation of SCADA Standards, and consulting services on future water and wastewater related capital improvement projects.Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC, in an amount not to exceed $560,750 (including $50,977 in contingency) over a five-year period with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Like most water utilities, the City of Santa Monica manages water production, treatment, and distribution via a Supervisory Control and Data Acquisition (SCADA) system. SCADA is an automated computer control system for remotely monitoring, operating, and storing data for a process. Currently, SCADA exists for City water and wastewater facilities, but the component systems are disparate, unstandardized, and isolated from one another. Centralization and standardization of potable and wastewater system hardware and software is necessary to enhance operational and reporting efficiencies of the City’s water systems. The City has established a goal of complete water self-sufficiency by the year 2020 achieved by the combined effects of water conservation, advance treated water reclamation, and increased storm water reuse, though this goal is also reliant on the efficient deployment and operation of current and future water resources. Modern SCADA provides diagnostics and user-friendly means of controlling plant processes to help achieve optimal plant performance and operational decision-making. At this time, staff recommends executing an agreement with Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC (Vertech) to complete a comprehensive survey of the City’s SCADA system, develop a SCADA Master Plan, establish and implement system standards for modern SCADA, and provide maintenance and on-call system support. The contract would be for an amount not to exceed $560,750 (including 10% contingency) over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'The City’s water production, treatment, and distribution system consists of over 250 miles of pipeline, the Arcadia and Charnock water treatment facilities, four reservoirs, ten wells, a wastewater collection system of over 150 miles of pipeline, the Moss Avenue Pumping Station (MAPS), the Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF), two sewer flow monitoring stations, and five remote urban runoff diversions to sewer. These facilities are located both in the City and the City of Los Angeles. From the 1990’s through the early 2000’s, the City’s water and wastewater telemetering and remote control systems were limited in their abilities to control many of the critical operating functions and monitored only basic functions such as reservoir and wet well levels, pump speeds, and intrusion alarms. On September 16, 2008 (Attachment A), Council authorized a contract to provide SCADA system design and improvements for the MAPS and SMURRF facilities to enhance operational efficiencies for the two sites. This included purchase of the required hardware and software for SCADA system implementation at the facilities.', 'On July 27, 2010 (Attachment B), Council authorized a contract to purchase and integrate additional hardware and software for SCADA at Water and Wastewater facilities. Council later authorized extension of this contract on September 24, 2013 (Attachment C). The work performed under these contracts improved process efficiency by adding limited remote site monitoring from the Arcadia Water Treatment Facility and integrating water and wastewater systems onto a common SCADA software platform. However, communication with remote sites via unreliable telemetering systems still remains inconsistent, control abilities remain limited, and process graphical representation is outdated. If not addressed, these limitations could hinder implementation of two major initiatives, the Clean Beaches Initiative (CBI) and the Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP), which require enhanced system control and functionality, including robust monitoring and forecasting tools for system optimization.', 'Discussion', 'Accurate and timely reading and recording of water and wastewater facility data is crucial to operating the systems effectively. As the City’s SCADA system exists today, its graphics do not present data to operators according to present-day International Society of Automation (ISA) standards for Human Machine Interfaces (HMI). Use of high-performance HMI enables operators to monitor and keep systems running at optimal levels and allows them to foresee treatment plant upsets. Such functionality can aid operators in mitigating plant shutdown severity and duration, if not prevent shutdown altogether due to its reporting of useful statistics, metrics, and diagnostics. Monitoring functionality is also limited, particularly for the remotely operated sites. This limitation results in response personnel having to travel to the sites to determine the nature of a problem when an alarm rings on the phone. With more reliable system communication and improved monitoring and control capability, an operator could remediate issues remotely.', 'To enhance system functionality, staff recommends hiring the expertise of Vertech, a qualified industrial-process-control-integration consultant to undertake a holistic system survey and generate a SCADA Master Plan that is relevant to the present state of the City’s Water and Wastewater control systems. Such a report would highlight the strengths and weaknesses of the current state of the City’s SCADA infrastructure and reveal gaps to overcome. Staff would then use this information to implement measures that enhance operation in accordance with present-day standards and available technology. Furthermore, staff would work with the consultant to develop SCADA standards for programming and developing graphical interfaces. Such an approach has been proven to be successful in other public agencies, such as the City of Guelph Water Services Department in Ontario, Canada which shows favorable results in reliability of automatic control schemes, ease of operating equipment from SCADA and troubleshooting automation problems, and efficiency in future automation development due to implementing SCADA standards. Integration of future City projects, such as the CBI and the SWIP, would be implemented in accordance with the established standards. Improving SCADA-provided operational-awareness would aid the City in its goals of water self-sufficiency due to increase in potable water and reclaimed water facility operating efficiency.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On July 14, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposal for professional services to perform an assessment of the City’s water and wastewater SCADA system, provide a roadmap for implementing upgrades/enhancements to the system, and provide on-call integrator services, training, and user documentation. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 2,537 vendors were notified, 66 vendors downloaded the RFP, and 11 firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department and the Information Services Department. Bids were received from the following firms: ACS Engineering, Inc., Aspect Engineering Group, Beavens Systems Inc., Cannon Corporation, Control Automation Design, Enterprise Automation, KDC Systems, Northern Digital, Inc., ProUsys Inc., Technical Systems, Inc., and Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC.', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: technical competence, experience, staffing capability, project timeliness, cost of services, quality control, cost control, company stability, client references, value added, and breadth of service. Staff then interviewed three shortlisted firms. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC as the best qualified firm to provide SCADA services based on favorable feedback from reference checks and their proven track record of working with municipalities to generate comprehensive SCADA Master Plans, develop SCADA standards, and successfully implement system improvements. Vertech has performed Programmable Logic Controller (PLC) and SCADA system hardware and software upgrades for multiple public agencies. Their project history includes developing PLC and SCADA standards, performing retrofits of outdated software and hardware, and migrating old SCADA systems to modern systems with minimal downtime for municipalities, including Irvine Ranch Water District, Adelanto Public Utilities Authority, Orange County Sanitation District, City of Buckeye, International Boundary and Water Commission Nogales, and City of La Verne.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC is for an amount not to exceed $560,750 (including 10% contingency). Funds of $174,334 for expenses estimated to be incurred in FY 2017-18 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Public Works Department as listed below:', 'Account', 'FY 2017-18', 'Total Contract', '25671.560010', '$ 49,800', '$ 174,603', '31661.560010', '$ 49,800', '$ 174,603', '31661.566450', '$ 37,367', '$ 105,772', '31661.566631', '$ 37,367', '$ 105,772', 'Total:', '$ 174,334', '$ 560,750', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Modification to Software License Agreement for Performance Portal', 'Department': "City Manager's Office, Administration", 'Sponsors': 'City Manager Rick Cole', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that Council:1. Amend the existing contract (#10452) between the City and Socrata, Inc. (#360108);2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract amendment with Socrata, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $56,000; and3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In Fiscal Year 2017-2018, the City of Santa Monica (“the City”) established SaMoStat, a performance management program designed to set outcomes and goals and use data to drive the achievement of results towards those goals. The City undertook such an effort to establish outcomes and goals for the 2017-19 budget, developing the Framework for a Sustainable City of Wellbeing. The SaMoStat program is designed to effectively and efficiently manage City resources towards those established outcomes. To facilitate the SaMoStat program, staff would like to leverage the City’s existing relationship with Socrata, which it uses for its open data platform, to use Socrata Performance, a software program designed to allow governments to track and manage performance metrics.', 'The requested funding would allow the City to amend its existing agreement with Socrata to begin the process of developing a citywide dashboard to manage and track progress on metrics. This dashboard will allow the City to track key performance metrics towards outcomes in the Framework for a Sustainable City of Wellbeing. This will result in a second modification to add $56,000 amount to the contract for a new five-year agreement not to exceed $272,264. In the first modification, written in April of 2017, the City merged all agreements with Socrata into one contract. This staff report seeks to modify this agreement to provide for additional funding and scope to develop a citywide dashboard.', 'Background', 'In May of 2014, the City entered into an agreement with Socrata, Inc. (“Socrata”), for the purposes of developing an open data program. The initial agreement was for a three-year term at a cost not to exceed $105,000, below the threshold requiring Council authorization. On April 25, 2017, Council authorized the first modification to this agreement to extend the term of the agreement for two years at a cost of $111,264, resulting in a new total contract amount not to exceed $216,264 (Attachment A). This modification also merged all existing contracts with Socrata under one master agreement.', 'In 2014, the City also contracted with Socrata for two-project specific projects – the Youth Wellbeing Report Card and the Sustainable City Plan. These agreements were done under separate contract from the main agreement. The Youth Wellbeing Report Card is no longer available, as it was a pilot project, but the Sustainable City Plan site can be found at data.sustainablesm.org.', 'SaMoStat project will utilize the Open Performance platform. As efforts are underway to connect all performance management plans and activities, the long-term goal is for the inclusion of metrics from the Sustainable City Plan into a larger City-wide dashboard.', 'Discussion', 'The City restructured the 2017-2019 budget into the Framework for a Sustainable City of Wellbeing. Under this new construct, the City identified six outcomes, based on principles of sustainability, the Wellbeing Index, and principles of good governance as follows:', '1. Foster a save, connected, and engaged community (“Community”);', '2. Protect natural resources and cultivate an exceptional and resilient built environment (“Place and Planet”);', '3. Champion lifelong education achievement and opportunities for continuous personal growth (“Learning”);', '4. Nurture opportunities for enriched physical, social, and emotional health (“Health”);', '5. Support community needs through a stable, vibrant, and diverse local economy (“Economic Opportunity”); and', '6. Cultivate a trustworthy and participatory local government through equitable, transparent, and effective process (Governance).', 'More on the SaMoStat and the Framework can be found at https://beta.smgov.net/samostat.', 'In July of 2017, the City held its first SaMoStat meeting, relative to the Homeless Strategic Goal. Based on best practices from other cities, SaMoStat is a management tool designed to identify goals and outcomes, and use data to track success, monitor progress, and make decisions. SaMoStat is administered by the Chief Performance Officer (“CPO”) Tim Dodd and is based on four tenets:', '1. Accurate and timely intelligence;', '2. Effective tactics;', '3. Rapid deployment of resources; and', '4. Relentless follow-up and assessment.', 'Several other cities, such as Baltimore, Maryland, and Louisville, Kentucky successfully implemented similar programs. During the 2017-2018 fiscal year, the “stat” process includes all five strategic goals. Each goal team has met at least once and will begin meeting monthly in January 2018.', 'Departments will begin to participate in SaMoStat, based on both readiness and interest. The CPO is now working with departments across the City to develop a suite of metrics tied to activities in the Framework, with a completion date of January 10, 2018.', 'Socrata Performance will provide the City with a dashboard through which departments can track progress towards metrics associated with activities in the Framework. This dashboard will allow for back-end data systems to support metrics, and provide for display functionality that will allow users to access a variety of information associated with metrics. The metrics will be organized according to the Framework and will be used by departments to measure progress.', 'Under this modification, Socrata will provide the Socrata Performance toolkit and provide consulting services to help deploy the dashboard and integrate it with the City’s open data platforms. Staff will work with Socrata to begin the implementation process this spring, with a goal of 15 metrics included in the platform by summer 2018. The plan is to make the site publically available in FY 2018/19.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In May 2014, the City entered into an agreement with Socrata to provide robust open data hosting capabilities. The agreement was entered into as an exception to the competitive process per SMMC 2.24.080(d) as the exception to competitive bidding because the Socrata Open Data service is copyrighted, patented, or otherwise only available through Socrata. At the time, Socrata was the only open data provider capable of delivering the functionality, interoperability, and user experience deemed acceptable by the City. In particular, Socrata was the only provider that would allow end-users to create their own data visualizations. Moreover, Socrata had then, and still maintains today, a large foothold in the open data software space. Many large, complex organizations utilize Socrata to power their open data portals. Socrata customers include the Cities of New York, Chicago, Los Angeles, San Francisco, and Seattle.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to Socrata, Inc. is $56,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $272,264. Funds of $18,801 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in account SO015601.589000. Award of the contract modification requires a budget transfer of $37,199 to account SO015601.589000 from accounts SC015501.589000 ($36,925) and SC015502.589000 ($274).', 'The agreement will be charged to account SO015601.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Appeal 17ENT-0186 of the Planning Commission’s approval of Conditional Use Permit 17ENT-0075, Variance 17ENT-0147, and Fence/Wall Modification 17ENT-0148 permitting the establishment of a Child Care and Early Education Facility for up to 20 children at 2953 Delaware Avenue', 'Department': 'Development Review 3', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '06. Administrative Proceedings', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council deny the appeal and uphold the Planning Commission’s approval by taking the following actions:1. Approve Conditional Use Permit 17ENT-0075 2. Approve Variance 17ENT-01473. Approve Fence Modification 17ENT-0148 4. Adopt the Statement of Official Action, pursuant to the draft findings and conditions.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On May 18, 2017, the applicant, Laila Taslimi, filed a Conditional Use Permit (17ENT-0075), Variance (17ENT-0147), and Fence Modification (17ENT-0148) for a change of use of a 1,478 square-foot, single-unit dwelling located at 2953 Delaware Avenue (R1 Single-Unit Residential zoning district) to a Child Care and Early Education Facility. On September 6, 2017, the Planning Commission approved these applications. There would be no additional floor area. The facility would serve up to 20 children with four classrooms and outdoor play areas in the front yard (765 square feet) and the rear yard (1,833 square feet, including decks). The CUP allows year-round operation with a regular program between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 5:30 p.m., with possible early drop-off from 7:30 a.m. and late pick-up by 6:00 p.m. In addition to the Director, the applicant anticipates employing up to five staff. The project includes three on-site parking spaces, a loading space, an on-street short-term parking space and two short-term bike parking spaces. The approval included three variances to allow:', '1) Parking that is not located in a garage as required by SMMC Section 9.28.070.A.1.a.', '2) Parking in the front yard setback as prohibited by SMMC Section 9.28.070.A.1.', '3) One on-site passenger loading space instead of the two passenger loading spaces as required by SMMC Section 9.28.080.E.4.', 'In addition, the Planning Commission approved a Fence Modification to allow a front yard fence of more than four feet in height. The Planning Commission approved the fence to a maximum of five feet with specific design requirements for transparency and landscaping, subject to staff approval prior to building permit issuance. The fence runs along the front yard property line for 29 feet, after which it turns in 18 feet and continues behind the proposed car and bike parking spaces.', 'Appeal', 'On September 20, 2017, Nada Shamonki filed an appeal (17ENT-0186) of the Planning Commission’s decision to approve the CUP, Variance, and Fence Modification applications. The appeal form states that Ms. Shamonki represents “Residents for the Preservation of Gandara Park Neighborhood,” and requests that City Council overturn the Planning Commission’s decision based upon the strong opposition by the entire neighborhood; new traffic generated by the childcare facility; that the proposed childcare facility violates the LUCE; that the area is already well-served by preschools; and that the childcare facility does not meet mandatory CUP findings.', 'The appellant expressed objection to the manner of the hearing and strongly disagrees with the Planning Commission’s exercise of its discretionary authority in the matter to approve the application despite a large contingency of neighbors who testified or submitted written testimony opposing it. The full appeal narrative is provided in Attachment C.', 'A public hearing before the Council was scheduled to be held on December 5, 2017, and noticing was provided as required by the Zoning Code. At the December 5, 2017 Council meeting, prior to opening the public hearing, the Council continued the item to January 23, 2018. This is a de novo hearing and the Council may consider all aspects of the application as well as matters raised in the appeal. This report includes project description and analysis, the Planning Commission’s action, and the points of appeal together with staff responses. This report concludes with a recommendation from staff to uphold the Planning Commission’s decision on the CUP, Variance, and Fence Modification, based upon the findings and subject to the conditions in the Draft Statement of Official Action provided in Attachment B.', 'Background', 'Existing Conditions and Setting', 'The following table provides a brief summary of the project location. Additional information regarding the project’s compliance with applicable municipal regulations and the General Plan is available in Attachment A.', 'Site Location Map & Aerial View (park added, not to scale)', 'Zoning District:', 'R1 (Single-Unit Residential)', 'Land Use Element Designation:', 'Single Family Housing', 'Parcel Dimensions (Area):', '50’ x 130’ (6,500 square feet)', 'Existing On-Site Improvements (Year Built):', 'Single-family home (1940)', 'Rent Control Status:', 'N/A', 'Adjacent Zoning Districts and Land Uses:', 'North: R2 (Multiple-Unit Dwelling) East: R1 (Single-Unit Dwelling) South: R1 (Single-Unit Dwelling) West: R1 (Single-Unit Dwelling)', 'Historic Resource Inventory', 'Not listed on HRI.', 'Zoning Code', 'SMMC 9.08.020: CUP required for a Child Care and Early Education Facility in the R1 zoning district.', 'The subject property, on the north side of Delaware Avenue between Dorchester Avenue and Yorkshire Avenue, contains a 1,478 square foot home built in 1940, and expanded with a 375 square foot rear addition in 1951. A 366 square foot, two-car garage is accessed from the rear alley. All properties on this block of Delaware Avenue are developed with single-family residential uses, most of which are one-story structures. The adjacent block to the north, which is zoned R2 (Low-Density Residential), contains two-story apartment buildings, and shares a rear alley with the subject property. Ishihara Park on Exposition Boulevard is across the street from that block.', 'Project Description', 'The applicant requests a Conditional Use Permit (CUP) to allow the establishment of a Child Care and Early Education Facility for up to 20 children, ages 4-6. The facility’s regular program hours are proposed to be between 8:00 a.m. and 5:30 p.m., Mondays through Fridays. The facility would have four classrooms and outdoor play space in the front and back yards totaling 2,598 square feet, exceeding the State minimum standard of 75 sq. ft. per child (1,500 sq. ft. total). The applicant plans to allow early drop-off from 7:30 a.m. for parents who need to maintain their work schedules, and those children must remain indoors until 8:00 a.m. (see Condition #4). Late pick-up until 6:00 p.m. may be offered. In addition to the Director (applicant), the facility would employ three or four childcare staff initially, who would be scheduled to ensure that staff-child ratios comply with or exceed State requirements. With full enrollment, an additional teacher is anticipated, for a total of six staff including the applicant.', 'The existing garage would be demolished and replaced with two surface parking spaces and one passenger loading space, including spaces that comply with ADA requirements. In lieu of one of the two required loading spaces, the applicant requests to use one on-street parking space in front of the property for short-term (15-minute) parking during the facility’s operational hours. Mobility and Transportation Engineering staff indicated that this on-street, short-term parking request is feasible, but they can only consider a request if Council approves this application. Parking restrictions on the street allow two-hour parking during the day except by permit. There are also street-cleaning restrictions. Parking would be allowed in the same manner in this proposed short-term space outside of the use’s authorized hours.', 'Requested Variances', 'Variances from three Code requirements are requested as part of this proposal. SMMC 9.28.070 requires that all parking in the R1 District must be located in an enclosed garage, which is appropriate for single-unit dwellings but is not practical for the functioning of a childcare use. SMMC 9.28.070 also precludes using the existing front driveway for a required parking space, as this application proposes in order to provide the three required parking spaces on-site. These requirements are the subjects of two of the variances being requested.', 'The third requested variance addresses a technical conflict between the Zoning and Building Codes. Although SMMC Section 9.31.120(D) anticipates allowing the Director to approve a passenger loading space on the street in front of the property, the Building Code would require extensive modifications to the sidewalk to provide full ramping for ADA access for that loading space, which would necessitate the removal of a mature street tree and impact the character of the street. To avoid this, in consultation with Mobility staff, the applicant requests to provide a short-term parking space instead of the on-street passenger loading space that the Director is allowed to approve, also on the street in front of the property. In this way, the variance facilitates a way to meet the intent of the requirement while maintaining compatibility with the neighborhood.', 'In addition to City permits, childcare facilities are closely controlled by the California State Department of Social Services, which imposes its own requirements and limits the number of children based on spatial or other considerations. The project will be required to meet all State licensing requirements.', 'Planning Commission Action', 'On September 6, 2017, the Planning Commission held a public hearing on this application. Following staff’s presentation, the applicant provided testimony and 27 members of the public addressed the Commission, of which 21 were neighborhood residents speaking in opposition. Project opponents cited:', '· Complaints about traffic, which has greatly increased over the last year since the introduction of the Expo Line with at-grade crossing at Stewart Street. Many expressed fear that additional trips generated by the use at morning and evening peak hours would block the alley or increase the time it will take them to leave the street in the mornings;', '· Objection to using a residential home for a non-residential business;', '· Concern that the applicant’s proposal to bring children to Ishihara Park would displace residents’ access;', '· Concern that a front yard fence, requiring a modification, is incompatible with the neighborhood character on a street that is largely without fences; and', '· Worry that the facility will lead to neighborhood deterioration and reduced property values.', 'Members of the public who supported the project cited:', '· The need for more accessible, high-quality preschool programs to serve families in the Santa Monica community;', '· Support for the economic diversity aspect of the project;', '· Personal connection with and respect for the applicant’s character and vision; and', '· Personal testimony that living near a school is typical for the city’s neighborhoods and is not detrimental for neighbors (speaker living near elementary school).', 'The Planning Commission discussed the project’s merits, neighborhood concerns, draft findings and conditions. By a vote of 6-1, the Commission approved the Conditional Use Permit for the childcare facility use. Also by a vote of 6-1, the Commission approved a front-yard fence modification up to five feet (one foot less than requested), with conditions requiring that the fence step back from the property edge and have increased transparency and greenery. By unanimous vote, all three variances were approved. The Commission revised the conditions of approval to direct the applicant to explore the feasibility of revising the site plan to add another parking space at the rear, to require encouragement and assistance to employees to bike to work, and to conduct recruitment outreach to try to find qualified staff living locally within the City and particularly in the 90404 zip code. The applicant has accepted the Commission’s conditions of approval. Subsequent to the Planning Commission meeting, the applicant explored the feasibility of revising the site plan to add another parking space at the rear but found that this option was not feasible.', 'Additionally, the applicant voluntarily agreed to offer tuition assistance to low and moderate income families within the 90404 zip code to ensure that 1/3 of the children at the facility live within a ¼-mile radius. The applicant also voluntarily agreed to consult with Connections for Children and other members of the Early Childhood Wellbeing program to serve children most in need of services.', 'Entitlement Summary', 'The following summarizes the purposes for the requested entitlements in this application (statutory findings for all permits are included in Attachment B):', 'Conditional Use Permit (CUP): Pursuant to the findings contained in SMMC Section 9.41.060, a CUP may be approved to allow a use that is generally consistent with the purposes of the Zoning District where it is proposed but requires special consideration to ensure that it can be designed, located, and operated in a manner that will not interfere with the use and enjoyment of surrounding properties', 'Variance: Pursuant to the findings contained in SMMC Section 9.42.040, variances provide a mechanism for relief from the strict application of the Zoning Ordinance where the Ordinance would deprive the property owner of privileges enjoyed by similar properties because of the subject property’s unique and special conditions.', 'Fence Modification: Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.31.120.A, the Code allows childcare facilities to have front yard fences up to four feet in height by right, in order to comply with State regulations for enclosing play yards. Additional height requires a formal modification request, pursuant to the findings contained in SMMC Section 9.43.080. The applicant requested up to a six-foot fence, designed with stepback and landscaping. The Planning Commission approved a modification to allow a semi-transparent front yard fence with a maximum height of five feet, stepping back from the front retaining wall to provide sufficient greenery.', 'Site Plan with Landscaping', 'Discussion', 'The following analysis of the project’s consistency with the City’s General Plan goals and policies and compliance with the Zoning Code is followed by analysis of the appeal.', 'Childcare Uses: City Policies to Reflect a Priority Community Need', 'The City Council has acknowledged and addressed a community need to provide more high quality childcare in Santa Monica through prioritizing supportive policies in the General Plan Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE, Goal CE9) and the Child Care Master Plan. The goal reflects the community’s recognition that education begins prior to kindergarten. In fact, one of Council’s five strategic goals adopted in August 2015, Learn + Thrive, aligns with the decades of collaboration between the City, School District, College, non-profits, and residents to foster a lifelong learning community that thrives.', 'The Council has also established a Child Care & Early Education Task Force that meets regularly to actively support quality programs and access for all economic groups. Childcare is the first “step” in Santa Monica’s Cradle to Career initiative to support healthy development and well-being for the City’s youngest residents. According to Connections for Children (CFC), a regional childcare resource and referral agency that receives funding through the City’s Human Services Grants Program to improve access to quality early care, there are always low and moderate-income families seeking subsidized childcare on their waitlist. Typically, about 60% of these families are in the 90404 area code. The number changes constantly, but at recent points in time, there have been between 50 and 60 families with 80-100 children on the list. This data does not include families seeking childcare that are able to pay full tuition. There are no statistics on these families, which may be either residents or those who work in the City and desire childcare near work. CCS staff reviewing the proposed project have also noted that the applicant has outlined an operating plan that offers a full-day program, acceptance of children in need of tuition assistance, and collaboration with Connections for Children to accept families who qualify for childcare subsidies. In this way, the proposed facility particularly caters to the strongest need in the childcare network for high quality programs that accept subsidies and lower income children as participants.', 'Addressing Potential Use Conflicts through the CUP and Specific Use Standards', 'During the 2015 Zoning Ordinance revision, the Council implemented LUCE Goal CE9 and Policy CE9.1 to integrate childcare uses into the neighborhoods, by adopting specific use standards for compatibility and fee incentives. The Council expanded the potential locations for childcare facilities to all neighborhoods, including R1 Zoning Districts, through the discretionary CUP process. Childcare facilities are among the very few non-residential uses permitted in single-family zoning districts. The CUP requirement and Specific Use Standards, outlined in SMMC Section 9.31.120, reflect the expectation that there are potential conflicts to be addressed when allowing a childcare use in a residential neighborhood. Potential issues include daily vehicle trips and parking, noise, and the appearance and changed use of a residential home with a non-residential use. The Planning Commission’s approval of the application included conditions to address these issues, as discussed further below.', 'Compliance with Childcare and Early Education Facilities Specific Use Standards', 'The Zoning Ordinance Specific Use Standards were developed to address the particular characteristics, needs and potential impacts of childcare uses in order to facilitate development of high quality childcare while promoting compatibility with surrounding uses. In residential zones, through the CUP process, additional conditions can be included as appropriate to reflect the specific circumstances of the proposed facility in proximity to residential uses. The CUP conditions should protect neighborhood residents while ensuring that the facility is able to operate its educational and developmental program to provide high quality childcare and early education that meet the needs of working families.', 'The proposed project is required to be consistent with specific standards regulating Childcare and Early Education Facilities (SMMC 9.31.120). These standards pertain to: allowing a four-foot front yard fence, or higher with approval of a modification, to enclose a play yard; providing a minimum amount of outdoor play area space in compliance with State licensing requirements; limiting outdoor activity hours; allowing the Director to approve one required passenger loading space on the street adjacent to the facility; requiring compliance with State and other licensing requirements; and designating a neighborhood liaison to address concerns during both construction and operation of the facility. Draft conditions #2, #6, #9, #12 and #13 incorporate the Code’s operational requirements.', 'The specific use standards that reflect the facility’s physical design include providing sufficient indoor and outdoor space as required by State law, providing a passenger loading plan, and allowing higher front yard fences than typically allowed in residential zones to enclose a play yard. The proposal complies with the space requirements and the Mobility Division has reviewed and determined that the parking and passenger loading spaces shown on the site plan comply with the Code’s dimension, access and visibility requirements.', 'The Planning Commission approved a modification to allow the front yard fence up to five feet in height in order to facilitate the need for the fence to be four feet in height from the interior as required by State law due to the grade differential between the street and the property. The fence would be offset by 18” from the existing two-foot retaining wall at the property line, with landscaping required to soften the interface with the sidewalk. The fence height would be considered to be five feet per SMMC 9.04.050.D (Measuring Fence, Wall and Hedge Height), which states that the height of a fence located within five feet of a public sidewalk is measured from the closest point on the sidewalk. The fence would run for 29 feet along the front property line from the southwest corner. It would then turn back for 18 feet and continue at the full five foot height to the east property line. Fencing in the rear and side yards is permitted to be up to eight feet.', 'State requirements for childcare facilities specify that a fence must be designed to “keep children from leaving the outdoor activity area unnoticed but will not in and of itself present a hazard.” Accordingly, a fence need not be solid, but must ensure that children are not able to climb over it (see Fence/Wall Modification, below). The Planning Commission’s approval requires maximum transparency within these guidelines.', 'Conditions for Special Events', 'Quality childcare programs promote strong communications with the children’s parents. The applicant plans to hold regular Family Forums, which may be held during or outside of operational hours. These meetings gather parents who are familiar with the site and the rules for neighborhood consideration, but it is important for neighbors to receive communications about them if they are planned outside of regular operational hours. Condition #1 requires notice to properties within a 300-foot radius of the property at least one week in advance in such cases.', 'In addition, Condition #5 allows the PCD Director to approve up to two events annually based on the same findings required for Temporary Event Permits for activities related to the childcare but not specifically for the families, such as a fundraising event that is typical for non-profits. Notification would be required to neighbors within a 300-foot radius of the property. A request to hold the event must be submitted at least 45 days in advance. Although the applicant has stated that at this time, they do not anticipate doing these types of events, this condition sets forth appropriate limits and conditions to avoid disruption to the neighborhood should such an event be contemplated in the future.', 'Transportation/Parking', 'As described above, the applicant is providing the number of automobile and short-term bicycle parking spaces that the Code requires for this use. The Mobility Division has reviewed the parking dimensions and access and the proposed bike racks, determining that they are acceptable. Passenger loading is satisfied with one on-site space and a request (by variance) to substitute an on-street short-term parking space for the second loading space, which the Code allows the Director to approve on the street adjacent to the property. The main reason for requesting this substitution is to avoid passenger loading space standards that would negatively affect the neighborhood by changing the sidewalk and requiring removal of the street tree in front of the house.', 'The childcare use would introduce new weekday traffic patterns on the street in that up to 20 children would be dropped off in the mornings and picked up in the evenings Mondays through Fridays. Although some may be siblings, and some may carpool, walk or bicycle, it is inevitable that the childcare facility will result in additional trips to the location.', 'The peak morning drop-off time for the childcare facility would take place between 7:45 and 8:30 a.m. Parents are required by law to bring their children into the facility and sign them in, and to sign them out in the afternoon/evening when they pick them up.', 'Prior to the Planning Commission hearing, staff heard from several neighbors who expressed frustration about increased traffic on Delaware Avenue since the Exposition Line became operational last year. Their input indicates that Delaware Avenue has become a popular cut-through street during morning and evening peak hours when traffic on Stewart Avenue tends to back up. Changes to traffic patterns that have occurred since opening the Expo Line are unrelated to the current request, but are considered as an existing condition in terms of analysis of this request.', 'Neighbors sharing the alley with the property expressed concern about having their access blocked by parents’ cars in the mornings. A project condition (#10) requiring a drop-off and pick-up plan was developed in order to help control the additional trips to the street and alley to access the childcare facility and avoid inconvenience to the neighboring residents at these times. The drop off and pick up plan, subject to the Mobility Division’s approval prior to Certificate of Occupancy issuance, requires specific assignments to all parents to use either the street or the alley, with consideration to the anticipated arrival time of each family, in order to distribute trips. Parents would need to sign an agreement to drive and park in a manner that respects and avoids inconvenience to the neighborhood. The condition also requires all parents to sign a Drop-Off and Pick-Up Agreement, agreeing to abide by its terms.', 'The total number of 20 children is small enough that there is capacity between the rear loading space, the front short-term space and other nearby street parking or on-site parking spaces for parents to safely park and sign in their children. Parents do not generally bring their children to daycare all at the same time, and bringing or retrieving a child generally takes no more than 10 minutes, although it could be more if parents need to speak with staff or settle in their children. At times that staff has visited the site and observed use of street parking, it appears that the two-hour parking restriction keeps employees of nearby businesses from parking on the street, leaving ample street parking for the short-term needs of parents coming to the childcare. Based on the above, staff concludes that the proposed plan for dropping off and picking up children from the center is feasible and through its implementation, disruption to the neighborhood can be substantially avoided.', 'The applicant has stated that she intends to encourage alternatives to driving to the site, although the decisions that parents make are largely out of the applicant’s control. The applicant can actively encourage employees to rideshare, which could make on-site parking spaces available to meet other needs.  Condition #15 requires rideshare encouragement including transit passes and encouraging bike commuting. Condition #17 also encourages the applicant to demonstrate that a good faith effort has been made to recruit qualified staff that reside within the 90404 zip code.', 'Variance Analysis: Key Findings and Justification', 'Approval of the proposed Variances requires that the City Council make all nine of the required Variance findings pursuant to SMMC Section 9.42.040. All findings have been drafted to support the variances in Attachment B. Some findings of special note in considering approval of this Variance include:', '· There are special circumstances or exceptional characteristics applicable to the property that do not apply to other properties in the vicinity.', '· Granting of such variance will not be detrimental or injurious to the property or improvements in the general vicinity and District.', '· Strict application of the provisions of this Ordinance would result in practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships, not including economic difficulties or economic hardships.', '· Strict application of the provisions of this Ordinance would result in unreasonable deprivation of the use or enjoyment of the property.', 'Special Circumstances or Exceptional Characteristics', 'Finding 9.42.040(A) states the following:', '“There are special circumstances or exceptional characteristics applicable to the property involved, including size, shape, topography, mature trees, location, surroundings, identification as a Historic Resource, or to the intended use or development of the property that do not apply to other properties in the vicinity under an identical zoning classification.”', 'This finding is supported because the proposed childcare is an exceptional use in the R1 District so the “special circumstances” are due to the intended use of the property. The R1 parking standards are oriented toward compatibility of single-unit uses, which is the predominant use in the zoning district. While childcare facilities are conditionally permitted, the standards do not really consider the very different functioning of parking and loading for these uses as compared with single-unit homes. Enclosing the parking in a garage is not practical for this use, and it would necessitate a very large structure in order to meet ADA requirements, which are not applicable to single-unit homes. The childcare use must accommodate three parking spaces as well as at least one loading space on the property. Use of the front driveway in a similar manner to the previous residential use, which had a driveway that could be used for additional parking, meets the needs of the use. However, as a required space, it is not permitted, which is again a special circumstance occasioned by the proposed use. The last variance, to reduce one loading space and provide instead an on-street, short-term parking space, is also justified by the special circumstance of the childcare use, which is the only such use in the district that is allowed an on-street loading space. However, the Building Code requirements for passenger loading, as opposed to short-term parking, create a special circumstance because it would compel the applicant to modify the sidewalk and provide ADA-compliant ramps that would be incompatible with the neighborhood’s character, particularly because they would require removal of a mature street tree. Granting this variance addresses the conflict caused by these requirements, given the special circumstances of the childcare use.', 'Not Detrimental nor Injurious to Surroundings', 'Finding 9.42.040(B) states the following:', 'The granting of such variance will not be detrimental nor injurious to the property or improvements in the general vicinity and district in which the property is located.', 'The project provides all required parking, and one passenger loading space on-site. The Director may approve a second passenger loading space for a childcare facility on the adjacent street, but a short-term street parking space is requested in place of the on-street loading space in order to avoid the need to make right-of-way modifications that would be inconsistent with the character of the residential neighborhood street. In making this finding, it should be considered that neighborhood residents typically park their cars on front driveways, although driveways are not considered their required parking. Designating the front driveway as one of the three required parking spaces for the use supports the childcare’s activity while resulting in essentially the same use of the driveway as it served for the previous use as a residence and does not substantially alter the relationship of the property’s access to the street. Concerning the reduction of one loading space, with substitution of a short-term parking space, the Code already allows the Director to approve one on-street loading space in front of a childcare. The short-term space would not be injurious to the surrounding improvements in the general vicinity because it would function similarly and thus meet the intent of the Code requirement, while avoiding the interruption of the consistent, residential streetscape and street tree pattern. Furthermore, the space will be available for general use outside of the facility’s operating hours. Thus, this finding can be made for all three of the requested variances.', 'Practical Difficulties or Unnecessary Hardships', 'Finding 9.42.040(C) states the following:', '“The strict application of the provisions of this Ordinance would result in practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships, not including economic difficulties or economic hardships.”', 'The strict application of the Code, requiring alley-accessed parking in a garage and prohibiting parking in the front yard setback area, would result in hardship for the childcare use, which is required to provide a total five parking and loading spaces rather than the usual two spaces needed in this district. The requirement for parking in a garage accessed from the alley, combined with ADA requirements that do not normally apply to single-family homes, would result in the need to develop a large three-car garage structure. Providing such a structure would then leave insufficient space along the 50-foot property width to provide the required refuse, recovery and recycling storage and an accessible passenger loading space. Additionally, the childcare facility might be forced to reduce the amount of play area and possibly the number of children served in order to meet all parking location and access requirements in the rear of the property in an enclosed structure.  Furthermore, the garage structure would increase lot coverage and be less compatible with the surrounding properties. Concerning the reduction of one loading space, with substitution of a short-term parking space, the Code’s nomenclature that designates only a loading zone and not a short-term parking space option, would result in practical difficulties due to Building Code requirements to modify the sidewalk with ramps for ADA access that are not compatible with the single-unit residential area and not required for short-term parking. However, the short-term parking will provide equivalent service for the drop off and pick up of children at the childcare facility. Therefore, this finding can be made for all three of the requested variances.', 'Unreasonable Deprivation of the Use or Enjoyment of the Property', 'Finding 9.42.040(J) states the following:', '“The strict application of the provisions of this Ordinance would result in unreasonable deprivation of the use or enjoyment of the property.”', 'The General Plan encourages childcare and the Zoning Code conditionally permits the use in this single-family zoning district, but requires more parking than a residential use, while still within an enclosed garage. These locational requirements reflect residential needs and character, but on a typical lot such as the subject property, the requirements taken together become unreasonable for the establishment of a childcare facility. Requiring the applicant to construct a three-car garage in the rear of the property, as well as providing an ADA-compliant loading space would preclude optimal siting to meet the needs of the childcare, which deprives the applicant of the property’s use, including a potential reduction in play area and enrollment. Furthermore, due to the need for one space more than the typical single-family residential use in the R1 District, allowing the additional space to be located on the existing front driveway is necessary to allow the facility to serve 20 children, making it possible to develop a viable facility. In this way, the variances in combination provide relief from the strict application of the Zoning Ordinance to avoid unreasonable deprivation of the property’s use for providing childcare to the community, a use that is conditionally permitted in the R1 District.', 'Neighborhood Compatibility', 'In terms of form and physical appearance, the Code’s CUP findings require that a childcare facility have a physical design that is compatible and relates harmoniously to the surrounding neighborhood.', 'The proposed facility will utilize a structure that has been part of this single-family neighborhood for 67 years, making only minor changes to the exterior in order to comply with building code exiting requirements. Demolishing the existing garage would change the property’s appearance from the alley, but would have relatively little impact on the neighborhood’s appearance since it is a secondary structure not visible from the street, and surrounding properties have high rear walls. The applicant is developing a landscaping plan that creates a garden setting, with emphasis on a natural appearance in the front yard. This type of landscaping design is typical in front yards in single-family neighborhoods throughout Santa Monica and compatible with this street.', 'Placement of the required third parking space, discussed above, on the driveway (by variance) would be compatible with the pattern that exists on the street because it involves minor modification to the existing front driveway and follows the neighborhood pattern. It is typical in this neighborhood to park cars on the front driveway.', 'The most atypical feature of the childcare facility in relation to the surrounding street is the front yard fence, which State law requires in order for the area to be utilized for outdoor play yard space. Due to the slope of the lot, the existing front yard is raised two feet above the sidewalk level, and is held back by a retaining wall. The five-foot fence that the Planning Commission approved by modification would require some excavation of the front yard so that the interior of the fence would be no less than four feet to comply with State law. The fence would run along 29 feet of the property line and would be set 18” back from the existing front retaining wall. The setback space would be used to create a bench and landscaping that softens the effect that the fence will have on the street, which otherwise is mostly free of fences. As designed and conditioned, the fence maintains compatibility with the neighborhood to the greatest extent possible while meeting State requirements.', 'Landscape Architect’s rendering of proposed front fence and landscaping', 'The fence/wall modification findings, as summarized at the beginning of this report, are made to assure that the increased height of the fence is compatible and necessary to mitigate impacts from adjacent land uses, and that it will not be detrimental to the property, neighboring properties and the overall integrity of the neighborhood. These findings can be made because the Specific Standards for Childcare and Early Education Facilities explicitly recognize the potential need for higher front yard fences to enclose play yards that are required to meet State standards for these uses, which justifies the need for the fence. The design as conditioned is sensitive to the surroundings and therefore the fence would not be detrimental to the surrounding uses and neighborhood.', 'Condition #9 would require the Director to review the materials and style of the fence prior to issuance of building permits to ensure that it has the greatest possible transparency. The condition also requires removal of the fence should a residential use be reestablished in the future.', 'Noise', 'The proposed facility will provide full-time childcare (8:00 a.m. to 5:30 p.m.) for up to 20 children. Children dropped off earlier, between 7:30 a.m. and 8:00 a.m., would be required to remain indoors (Condition #4) as would those children still present after sunset (Condition #6). Some children may stay for an extended day until 6:00 p.m. Simultaneous activities would take place both indoors and outdoors, such that at any given time, groups of children are distributed around the center, utilizing the classrooms, and play yards on both sides of the property. The application states that the planned operations and itinerary would be such that it would be a highly unusual occurrence to have all children outside at the same time.', 'SMMC 4.12.025 (Noise Ordinance) provides the following general regulation:', 'It shall be unlawful for any person to make, produce, maintain, cause or permit to be made any noises or sounds in such manner so as to unreasonably disturb the peace, quiet and comfort of persons of normal sensitivity within the area of audibility or which are so harsh or prolonged or unnatural or unusual in their use, time or place as to cause physical discomfort to any person of normal sensitivity within the area of audibility.', 'The neighborhood is within Noise Zone 1, which restricts maximum daytime exterior noise standards (SMMC 4.12.060) to exceeding 60 dBA for a 15-minute continuous period and prohibits noises that exceed 65 dBA from continuing for more than 5 minutes. (For scale, 55 dBA measures a normal conversational level at close proximity and 60 dBA compares to being in the same room with a television on.)', 'The sound of children playing in their yards is a typical occurrence in a residential neighborhood, and the sound of children playing in a childcare setting is a similar type of normal, usual noise. Although sounds of children playing at the childcare would be more consistent during the daytime than at a typical single-family home, the premises would be quiet at night and on the weekends. The noise potential from the normal patterns of children’s play would not constitute the type of noise referred to above. Nevertheless, the conditions of approval specify compliance with the Noise Ordinance, and prohibit organized outdoor activities before 8:00 a.m. and after 6:00 p.m. or after sunset, whichever comes first, consistent with SMMC Section 9.31.120. Should noise reach a level that disturbs nearby neighbors, the on-site contact person (Condition #13) is required to be available to resolve conflicts during all hours of operation.', 'General Plan Consistency', 'LUCE goals and policy objectives seek to balance community priorities to achieve a vision of a sustainable city that promotes health and well-being for residents and non-residents who work, study or play in Santa Monica. In evaluating whether this project is consistent with the General Plan, it is necessary to look at policies for residential neighborhood preservation and for provision of an educational continuum that supports a healthy community, as both are LUCE goals. The CUP findings for General Plan consistency require considering how these goals, which address differing components of creating strong communities, are achieved.', 'The subject property is located within the Single Family Residential land use designation of the LUCE. LUCE Goal N1 aims to “protect, preserve and enhance the residential neighborhoods.” This goal’s policies aim to respect and preserve existing housing stock (N1.1), connect residents with local services within walking distance (N1.2), create places that promote sociability and human interaction (N1.3), and other policies to protect and adapt neighborhoods over time.', 'The LUCE emphasizes preservation of neighborhood character and scale, promoting the rehabilitation and long-term maintenance of existing structures and allowing only new development that is of a scale and character consistent with the existing neighborhood. The LUCE also strives to retain tree-lined streetscapes to conserve the character of the City’s neighborhoods.', 'This application demonstrates sensitivity to its location in a R1 single-unit residential zone through the preservation of the existing residential structure, design of the fence with transparency, the proposed limitation on the number of children, the drop-off and pick-up plan and the programming and design of indoor and outdoor play spaces for small groups of children to distribute activity and reduce noise levels.', 'The LUCE description of Single-Family Residential Districts does not specify childcare facilities as a typical use, as childcare centers were not previously allowed as a free-standing use. However, Policy CE9.1 LUCE, page 3.5-17) provided a policy foundation for Council to evaluate whether to permit such uses in all City neighborhoods:', 'CE9.1: Support the development of high quality child care and early education facilities and small and large family child care in homes to meet the needs of those who work or live in Santa Monica. Maintain streamlined processing and permit regulations, encourage harmonious integration with the neighborhood, and fee reductions as incentives.', 'A finding of consistency with the General Plan is also supported by the project’s consistency with LUCE and Child Care Master Plan goals to nurture the optimal growth, development and education of children and to support families. The Master Plan states that childcare and early education continue to be one of the most pressing concerns of contemporary family life and acknowledges the importance of quality, affordable and accessible child care and early education by committing to protect existing resources and expand their supply. LUCE Goal CE9 strives to integrate the childcare and early education needs of those who live or work in the community into the City’s land use planning process. This goal is implemented through Policy CE9.1 (above). Providing a safe place for children to spend their days learning and growing in a stimulating environment during hours that support working parents, implements City policies that aim to provide nurturing facilities for every baby born in Santa Monica “from cradle to career.”', 'The Planning Commission approval, as conditioned, is consistent with the LUCE objectives to encourage and prioritize childcare and to maintain the integrity of existing single-unit residential neighborhoods.', 'Appeal Summary', 'On September 20, 2017, Nada Shamonki, a Delaware Street resident who testified at the hearing and submitted written comments, filed an appeal of the Commission’s decision. Ms. Shamonki’s appeal notes that she represents “Residents for the Preservation of Gandara Park Neighborhood.” In an e-mail to staff, Ms. Shamonki described this group as “formed by a group of neighbors in the Gandara Park Neighborhood to inform and advocate for issues related to our neighborhood. We have not filed any formal formation documents and have relied on neighbors signed up. We currently have over 100 members that all live within our neighborhood. Members have all signed on in support of our appeal.” In the following language from the appeal statement (Attachment C), the appellant summarizes six primary reasons for requesting that the Council overturn the Commission’s decision:', '“1. Strong Opposition by Entire Neighborhood: The Proposed Preschool is opposed by almost every neighbor in the surrounding neighborhood, including all immediate neighbors. Gandara Park Neighborhood, although recently named, has a long history with some residents, especially those of Japanese-American descent that moved to the neighborhood, as it was one of the few places to allow Japanese-Americans to buy homes following their internment during World War II. Many of most impacted residents are Japanese-American internment camp survivors in their 80s and 90s.', '2. New Traffic: Traffic and parking in Gandara Park Neighborhood have already reached unmanageable levels, with local businesses using this stretch of Delaware for parking for their employees and Waze designating our streets as cut-throughs to avoid traffic on the 10 freeway, Olympic, Exposition and Centinela. Introducing at least 50 new car trips during peak hours on our small residential street will push it over the tipping point.', '3. Violates the LUCE: The Proposed Preschool violates the LUCE, because it eliminates existing housing stock and allows for the encroachment of commercial uses into quiet residential neighborhoods.', '4. Area is Already Over-Preschooled (sic): According to the 2014 RAND Study, Santa Monica has a "surplus of preschool spaces for city residents." There are already 46 preschools within 2 miles of the Proposed Preschool, 20 preschools, and 15 existing daycares located within a mile or less from the site. A new preschool in a residential neighborhood that already has too many preschools does not make sense and is not good City planning.', '5. Does Not Meet Mandatory CUP Findings: Before a CUP is granted, the SMMC requires that nine mandatory findings MUST be met. These findings are not met, including findings that it would not have an immediate adverse impact on the quality of life of the neighborhood and the fact that the Applicant is asking for changes that are inconsistent with the character of the existing neighborhood.”', 'The Appeal statement supports these points with further explanation in the 20 pages that follow in the appeal statement. A sixth point introduced on page 8 states that:', '“(C) The Planning Commission relied on inaccurate and unsubstantiated claims within the Report and did not perform its duty to properly investigate valid legal challenges and concerns raised by Gandara Park Neighborhood residents.”', '(Note that (A) and (B) on Page 8 of the appeal statement further detail points #3 and #5 above). The appeal analysis below responds to these six points to address all topics raised in the appeal narrative.', 'The Council’s hearing on the appeal is de novo, and as such, the Council may consider all aspects of the proposed project in rendering its decision, including the points of appeal, additional evidence presented by the applicant, appellant, staff and the public, and the draft findings and conditions.', 'Appeal Analysis', 'The following states and responds to each of the six points summarized above.', '#1: Strong Opposition by Entire Neighborhood:', 'The appellant states that she speaks for the entire neighborhood, which the appeal refers to as the Gandara Park Neighborhood. She references a number of elderly neighbors and states: “All of them strongly oppose the proposed preschool.” She also references families in the neighborhood with small children that are opposed and states: “All of us - regardless of race, ethnicity or socio-economic background - strongly oppose the Proposed Preschool…”', 'Response: The public hearing process is structured to allow an applicant to propose an allowed use on a property that requires a discretionary permit, subject to compliance with specified Code standards and findings. As a conditionally permitted use, findings for compatibility test whether the application meets the intent of the Code section that allows its use, is consistent with the general plan, and is compatible with the neighborhood. Decision-makers and the public receive all information in a transparent manner. In this case, variances and a fence modification were also requested, requiring consideration of additional findings. In addition to staff’s analysis, the hearing process provides opportunities to consider all points brought up by the applicant and any member of the public with an interest in the outcome of the decision. Often, there are both opponents and supporters of a project, as there were in this case, and all are given an opportunity to be heard, whether in writing prior to the hearing, in person at the hearing, or both.', 'In this case, the appellant’s opposition to the proposal and the testimony of many in the neighborhood objecting to the preschool were articulated both in writing and in person at the hearing. The Planning Commission was aware of this opposition when it made its decision. Weighing public testimony against other considerations of the project’s merits and compliance with the Code and General Plan, as well as justification of the variances and fence modification, the Commissioners used their discretion and voted to approve the use.', 'As a de novo hearing, the Council, like the Planning Commission, will hear all input, and will consider the statements of opposition together with the merits, findings and recommended conditions for approval. The Council must weigh the considerations of the application to provide a preschool on the applicant’s property against the appellant’s evidence of strong neighborhood opposition to this new use. The Council is often required to make difficult land use decisions and weighs all evidence before doing so. In terms of legal responsibility, the appellant’s statement that all neighbors oppose the application does not necessitate the reversal of the Planning Commission’s approval of the project.', '#2: New Traffic:', 'The appellant states: “Traffic and parking in Gandara Park Neighborhood have already reached unmanageable levels, with local businesses using this stretch of Delaware for parking for their employees and Waze designating our streets as cut-throughs to avoid traffic on the 10 freeway, Olympic, Exposition and Centinela. Introducing at least 50 new car trips during peak hours on our small residential street will push it over the tipping point.”', 'Response: A discussion of existing and anticipated traffic issues brought up by the appellants is provided below in response to #6. The 50 new car trips referenced is over the full day, not during each peak period, as the proposed childcare facility is estimated to introduce a maximum of 26 trips in the a.m. period and 26 in the p.m. period. These trips would be staggered, with employees arriving at different times based on schedule and children arriving in a controlled pattern based on assigned loading place and time. Unfortunately, the City does not have recent data on this street to compare this number to the current daily trip count.', 'Staff does not have any evidence to confirm the claim that Delaware Avenue is used for parking by nearby businesses. However, the street does have preferential parking restrictions, and is limited to two-hour parking during the day. Staff’s observations of the street during the daytime have indicated a great deal of available street parking.', '#3: Violates the LUCE:', 'The appellant states: “The Proposed Preschool violates the LUCE, because it eliminates existing housing stock and allows for the encroachment of commercial uses into quiet residential neighborhoods.”', 'Response: The proposed preschool will utilize the existing house and adapt the interior for compliance with State requirements for early education facilities. As such, it does not eliminate existing housing stock, although it does change the use. While a preschool is a business, it is qualitatively different from typical commercial businesses. The Zoning Code includes Child Care and Early Education Facilities within the “Public and Semi-Public” use classification, implying that its character is similar to a public use, such as a school. Preschools are conditionally permitted in the R1 zoning district while other commercial uses are not permitted. As such, approval of a preschool is not a harbinger of commercial encroachment. Furthermore, preschools have enrollment processes and admit a specific group of children who come regularly to the location. The use does not invite walk-in traffic or transient customers into the neighborhood.', 'LUCE policies for the Pico Neighborhood focus on neighborhood character through maintenance of existing structures and adoption of development standards. (Policy N11.5, p. 2.2-27). This is consistent with the citywide land use policy (LU1.4, p. 2.1-11) of “Retention of Existing Structures” to conserve neighborhood character. The proposed project maintains the existing structure, which is currently vacant and in need of maintenance to become habitable again. By conserving the existing home, and using it to provide a community service for the Pico Neighborhood, the proposed project is consistent with the LUCE approach to neighborhood conservation. Support for the finding of General Plan consistency for this project is also discussed earlier in this report.', '#4: Area is Already Over-Preschooled', 'The appeal cites a 2014 RAND Study that stated that Santa Monica has a surplus of preschool spaces for City residents. “There are already 46 preschools within 2 miles of the proposed preschool and 20 preschools and 15 existing daycares located within a mile or less from the site. A new preschool in a residential neighborhood that already has too many preschools does not make sense and is not good City planning” (p. 2).', 'Response: The RAND Study sought “to provide the City and SMMUSD with the data and analysis required to deliver effective and sustainable early and school-age care programs…” (Rand Report, page 3, included in Attachment C) The report was based on 2011 data, and cited a population of approximately 3,600 children under the age of five. The most current available data on the US Census site (www.census.gov/quickfacts <http://www.census.gov/quickfacts>) for July 2016 estimates that this number has grown somewhat since this time to 4.1% of the population of 92,478, or 3,800 children under five years old.', 'In noting a “surplus of preschool places for city residents,” the RAND study did not infer that there were too many preschools in Santa Monica, but rather that at that particular point in time, the available preschool age childcare facilities met resident needs and still had some room for nonresidents seeking childcare near their jobs in Santa Monica. The context of the statement in the RAND study was to note that high quality childcare is an important economic development tool in terms of attracting a skilled workforce. The report also contrasted the availability of preschool places with the City’s lack of toddler places for ages 0-2 and suggested ways to improve access and participation as well as support development of high quality facilities.', 'The significance of the two-mile radius noted in the appeal statement is unclear, as that distance encompasses most of Santa Monica and extends into the City of Los Angeles. According to State Community Care Licensing database (as of 10/12/17), there are 54 preschool centers (ages 2-5), 12 infant/toddler centers (0-2 years), 19 large family day care homes, and 11 small family day care homes in Santa Monica. Of the preschool centers, 18 are located in 90404. The two closest centers to the proposed preschool are located just south of the 10 Freeway on Virginia Avenue and Pico Boulevard.', 'It is generally difficult to provide accurate estimates for total childcare need as there is no central mechanism that gathers this data for the entire community. Connections for Children (CFC), a regional child care resource and referral agency that is funded through the City’s Human Services Grants Program to improve access to quality early care, keeps an eligibility waiting list of lower income families looking for subsidized childcare. This list changes constantly, even daily, reflecting family circumstances for parents and many other factors. Working families eligible for subsidy often have a hard time locating providers that will accept this subsidy and offer full-time care. Of those waiting to place children ages 0-5, generally about 60% reside in the 90404 zip code, according to CFC. The City’s Human Services Division, which administers City programs in support of childcare and staffs the Childcare Task Force agrees that there is a clear need for more childcare centers, such as the proposed facility, that offer full-time slots and accept subsidies.', 'Notwithstanding the above discussion of childcare supply and demand, establishing that a childcare facility is “needed” in the City is not a criterion for its approval. While the City adopts general plan goals and zoning regulations, individual property owners, businesses and developers initiate projects and implement development on their properties within the framework of the regulations. In doing so, applicants indicate their assessment that there is demand for the service they propose to provide. The Zoning Code may incorporate incentives for desired uses and it may prohibit or limit less desired uses. The zoning process assumes that the market will generally balance supply and demand. If an application complies with Code requirements and the findings can be made in a positive manner, the demand or need for the use is not a review criterion unless the Code contains a quota for a particular use. There is no such limitation on childcare facilities.', '#5: Does Not Meet Mandatory CUP Findings:', 'The appeal statement states that findings were not made to support the issuance of a CUP, and in one place, on page 19, states that findings were not provided to support the Variances. The appeal finds fault with the report, which focused on key variance findings and summarized CUP findings and did not further elaborate on other required findings. The statement claims that the Commission “did not perform its duty to properly investigate the valid ethical, moral and legal objections raised by Gandara Park Neighborhood residents to the Preschool.”', 'Response: The staff report narrative summarized the approach to analyzing the request in terms of the mandatory findings of fact and highlighted key issues for Commissioners to consider, including neighborhood compatibility. The narrative discussed issues of compatibility such as noise, trips and parking, the proposed fence, and site design matters. The staff report also included attachments with more detailed information and application materials, which are also considered an integral part of the staff report. Attachment B to the staff report, the draft Statement of Official Action (referred to as the STOA), contained language for making all findings for the CUP, variances, and modification in a positive manner for the Commission’s consideration. By adopting those findings with small adjustments that were read into the record, the Commission performed its legal duty to make all findings required in the Zoning Code. The final signed STOA, reflecting the decisions made on September 6, 2017, was approved at a subsequent meeting on October 4, 2017 and accepted by the applicant (Attachment F).', 'The appeal statement does not specify which findings the appellant believes were not made, but the narrative indicates particular disagreement with findings of neighborhood compatibility (CUP finding #5 and Variance finding #5). The appellant indicates that a childcare use located in one of the single-family homes on the street is fundamentally incompatible with the residential uses that occupy all other properties. The appellant states that “this tiny neighborhood cannot stand to lose its right to retain its strictly R1 zoning” (Appeal, p. 6), and that “the Proposed Preschool cannot be designed, located and operated in a manner that will not interfere with the use and enjoyment of the surrounding properties as required by applicable law (p. 13). These statements, and other statements opposing the project made during the Planning Commission review process, appear to indicate the appellant’s contention that any childcare facility in one of the homes on this street or within the neighborhood would be incompatible and would impair the integrity and character of the district.', 'While the appellant asserts that a childcare facility is fundamentally incompatible in a R1 residential district, the Council has determined that childcare and early educational uses can be compatible in a R1 District when it revised the Zoning Ordinance in 2015 to allow the use through the CUP process, and established specific use standards. Once established as a conditionally permitted land use, the finding is properly made by examining the individual request and characteristics of the proposed site development and operations to ensure that it meets the standards and intent of the Code. In this particular case, the Planning Commission considered the proposed operation serving 20 children in the existing structure, with a drop-off/pick-up plan and restrictions on hours and outdoor play in the early morning along with other specific conditions of approval and found that, as conditioned, the proposed project meets all the findings of compatibility for the CUP, variance and modification.', '#6: The Planning Commission relied on inaccurate and unsubstantiated claims within the Report and did not perform its duty to properly investigate valid legal challenges and concerns raised by Gandara Park Neighborhood residents.', 'The appellant claims that the report was deficient in the following way (p. 18 of appeal statement):', "§ The Report mischaracterizes the neighbors' knowledge of the Proposed Preschool before the August 20 informational meeting hosted by the Applicant. The Report also omits or minimizes the negative reactions of residents to the Proposed Preschool.", 'o Response: The report provided information about neighborhood outreach efforts that the applicant documented in the application and about the neighborhood meeting at which staff was present.', 'In terms of notification of this request prior to the August 20th meeting, staff can confirm that the application, submitted on May 18, 2017, included proof of the required site notice posted on the property, and staff received some phone calls around the time that it was posted. The hearing date was added on June 27, 2017. Although callers expressed concern and had questions, and concerns expressed at the August 20th meeting were noted in the staff report along with one letter of opposition that had been received, the level of vocal neighborhood concern increased significantly after the report was released and at the hearing. There was no intent to mischaracterize opposition to the proposal.', '§ The Report fails to provide any credible evidence for its purported justification for the school.', 'o Response: Although the appellant clearly disagrees with the analysis in the staff report, the report does cover all relevant topics associated with analysis of potential impacts that may be attributable to the use. The report and findings, taken together, provided sufficient justification to support the Commission’s conclusion that the application may be approved.', '§ The Report makes conclusory statements minimizing the impact of the Proposed Preschool on the traffic and safety of the neighborhood… Despite the obvious disruption that this business will bring to the neighborhood, the Report casually dismisses those disruptions and concludes - without any evidentiary support and often by relying on the “evidence” provided by the Applicant - that the disruptions will be minimal to neighborhood or solved by the “solutions” suggested in the Report…', 'o Response: Staff analysis focused on this project’s potential trip generation and its effects on the neighborhood and does not either minimize or inflate the expected trips to the street from up to 20 children being dropped off and picked up five days a week, and up to six staff arriving as scheduled. The project provides the Code-required number of parking and loading (or short-term) spaces, and the conditions of approval require transit subsidies and encouragement of non-driving alternatives. Because the use is not residential, childcare staff will not be eligible for permit parking placards, so staff will not be able to use street parking for more than two hours. Street parking by parents will be for short periods that will not impact the parking supply for the neighborhood because in the mornings the neighborhood residents will be parked first and in the evenings, if loading spaces are taken, parents will use street parking for short stays only. After 6:00pm and on weekends, there will be no change from the present conditions on the street.', 'To address neighborhood concerns and distribute these trips, a drop-off and pick-up plan is required as a condition of approval. With optimal utilization of front and rear loading spaces, considering the facility’s maximum enrollment of 20 children, adhering to this plan can ensure that trips to the childcare avoid overwhelming the street and alley. Parents will have specific assignments and will sign binding agreements as a condition for sending the children to Untitled #1.', '§ The Report completely ignores the already impacted condition of the neighborhood … and (fails) to even mention the Traffic Plan implemented in the past by the City to keep traffic out of our R1 neighborhood.', 'o Response: Staff analysis does not minimize or ignore resident concerns regarding cut-through traffic in the neighborhood. The Traffic Engineering Division has not yet studied these impacts and thus no data exists to substantiate the claims of cars using the street in the mornings and evenings that did not exist prior to the Expo Line.', 'The appeal cites large projects in the pipeline in the area north of Exposition Boulevard (the Bergamot Area Plan area) as another justification to deny the preschool and states that the approval did not consider these projects. Staff disagrees that current traffic and anticipated traffic that may be generated by new commercial projects north of this neighborhood are factors for consideration in this application, which is a small-scale reuse of an existing building that is categorically exempt from CEQA and thus does not require a traffic study.', 'The City’s Traffic Engineering Division has confirmed that it does not have a “Traffic Plan” for this neighborhood. Traffic-calming measures referenced by the appellant were implemented as part of the 2004 Lantana Development Agreements, including bulb-outs and turning restriction signs that were installed in 2008. However, the Expo Line extension project did not introduce new traffic measures. At this time, further study or development of a Traffic Plan in this neighborhood is not in the division’s approved budget and work plan.', '§ The Report concludes, without any evidentiary support, that the significant increase in noise from this business will not impact the neighborhood. However, a large percentage of the residents on Delaware are elderly retirees who will be home during day when this business is operating. All our elders oppose the Proposed Preschool. Our elders crave and cherish what calmness and tranquility remains in our neighborhood after years of watching new developments spring up around their home.', 'o Response: The appellant does not substantiate claims that elderly residents will suffer from the sounds of children playing. The Commission staff report did state that the sound of children playing is not incompatible in a residential area, and staff reaffirms this analysis because residential neighborhoods are places for children to live, gather and play. At the Planning Commission hearing, there were seniors who voiced concern about the potential noise from children’s play, and the approval is conditioned to require compliance with the Noise Ordinance, and more importantly, for the applicant to maintain a Good Neighbor policy with a contact person to address any nuisance of which they are made aware.', 'Many of these same concerns were included in a 21-page letter emailed on the evening of September 5, 2017, to the Planning Commissioners and staff. Although the timing precluded inclusion of the letter’s points in the Planning Commission staff report, which had already been released, Commissioners received the information and thus were able to review that information as part of their deliberations. If the Commissioners had determined that the information presented in the letter warranted additional investigation, the hearing could have been continued with direction to staff. The Commission chose not to take up appellant’s suggestion to conduct further study and declined to delay their action.', 'In conclusion, the Planning Commission and the public received full information about the application, the Zoning Code and General Plan, the conditions proposed to ensure compatibility between the use and surrounding neighborhood and the public hearing. Neighborhood opposition and community support were expressed using the transparent public hearing structure and a decision was made. The appellant, representing a large group in the neighborhood, has expressed ongoing opposition to allowing this type of use in an R1 neighborhood, and the above discussion has responded to the specific points, concluding with staff’s recommendation to approve the application, upholding the Commission’s decision.', 'Community Outreach and Comments', 'In the application materials, the applicant provided documentation of her communications with neighbors about proposing a new childcare center prior to purchasing the property and submitting the application (see Attachment D).', 'Soon after the site was posted for the Planning Commission hearing, staff received three phone calls from neighbors expressing concerns that the proposed center would lead to loss of residential stock in this relatively small neighborhood and increase car trips on Delaware Avenue. These neighbors noted that since the establishment of the Expo Line and delays on Stewart Street when the gates close to allow trains to pass, Delaware Avenue has experienced increased cut-through traffic at certain times of day. Callers expressed concern that the facility would add trips to the street’s current traffic flow at times that they stated are already becoming problematic.', 'On the afternoon of August 20, 2017, the applicant, Laila Taslimi, held a neighborhood meeting at the subject site attended by 29 neighbors, as well as her design team and the co-chair of the Childcare Task Force. City staff was also present and answered technical questions about the application and hearing process. At the meeting, Ms. Taslimi and her team provided details of the site, building and operational plans and then opened the meeting to questions and comments. Ms. Taslimi explained her plan to open the center as a registered non-profit organization next year with 12 children of mixed economic backgrounds, expanding gradually to reach the maximum of 20 children.', 'Meeting participants, some of whom had previously spoken with staff as discussed above, brought up several concerns about the proposed childcare facility. Some stated that they oppose the use entirely and are concerned that it would set a precedent for the replacement of single-family homes with business uses. They were concerned about neighborhood traffic and additional use of the street in the mornings and evenings. Some cited recent increasing crime, and stated that bringing the families of children served by the use would introduce more people to become familiar with the neighborhood, which may lead to more crime on their quiet street. Furthermore, they expressed that they were not favorable toward the applicant’s plans to take small groups of children to Ishihara Park, which they viewed as belonging to the nearby residents. The applicant and others present noted that Ishihara Park is a public park and not highly utilized on weekdays.', 'Other neighborhood participants at the meeting expressed support for having this childcare in the neighborhood to meet the needs of working parents and create a sense of community through the concept of a preschool based on economic integration and pluralistic education.', 'To reduce the impact on morning and evening traffic volumes, the applicant suggested at the meeting that it would be reasonable and feasible to assign parents to specific drop-off/pick-up locations, balancing use of the front and back parking spaces. She stated that employees would park in the three on-site spaces and that she planned to provide transit passes to those who would commute by transit rather than drive. Condition #10 includes distribution of child drop-off and pick-up, and Condition #15 requires the applicant to offer rideshare incentives to employees.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The proposed change of use from a single-family home to a childcare facility is exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act pursuant to CEQA Guideline Section 15303(a). This Class 3 exemption applies to the construction of small structures including single-family homes or to the conversion of existing small structures from one use to another where only minor modifications are made in the exterior of the structure.', 'The property is not listed on the City’s Historic Resources Inventory.', 'Alternative Actions', 'As an alternative to the staff recommendation, the Council may choose to grant the appeal based on revised findings and deny the CUP (17ENT-0075), Variance (17ENT-0147) and Fence Modification (17ENT-0148).', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Introduction for First Reading of an Interim Ordinance Establishing Interim Development Standards in the R1 Zoning District Pending Adoption of Permanent Revisions to the R1 Development Standards', 'Department': 'City Planning (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading an interim ordinance establishing interim development standards in the R1 zoning district.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'A core principle of the City’s adopted Land Use and Circulation Element, as stated in LUCE Goal LU1, is that the diversity and uniqueness of the City’s residential neighborhoods are protected by a policy framework under which the existing housing stock and character is respected, conserved, and enhanced. The LUCE identifies retention of the existing single-unit housing stock and design standards that allow for compatible development as important tools that promote the long-term stability of existing R1 neighborhoods. As stated in Policy LU1.1, the protection of neighborhoods is part of a balanced land use strategy that redirects investment pressure away from existing neighborhoods by providing opportunities for housing production and local-serving uses on commercial boulevards and transit-adjacent areas. Policies LU1.2 and N4.1 also call for establishing conservation strategies that manage and control the scale, type, rate, and compatibility of change occurring in existing neighborhoods. Reducing the development potential, as proposed by this interim ordinance, may discourage land speculation.', 'Drawing from the policy framework set forth in the LUCE, a key purpose of the R1 zoning district is to ensure that the scale and design of new development and alterations to existing structures are consistent with the scale, mass, and character of the existing residential neighborhood. Recent trends in permit activity in R1 neighborhoods show that new home construction is often double or triple the size of existing homes, resulting in substantial changes in the existing character of R1 neighborhoods.', 'As part of Council’s discussion on City Planning Division priorities, on January 9, 2018, City Council directed staff to bring back interim zoning standards in the R1 zoning district that would temporarily reduce the size and scale of new single unit dwelling construction in order to ensure the character of existing R1 neighborhoods is preserved. Council specifically directed staff to consider reducing maximum parcel coverage by 20%, limiting maximum building height to 25 feet, and excluding accessory dwelling units from parcel coverage calculations. Staff has considered the Council direction, the public input received, and completed their own analysis. In keeping with the Council’s interest to reduce the size of new single unit dwellings and for consistency in implementation of the interim standards, staff has added associated changes to upper level stepback requirements.', 'Background', 'As part of Council’s discussion on City Planning Division priorities, Council determined that a revision to the R1 standards was of high importance. Council directed staff to prepare an interim ordinance that would temporarily reduce the size and scale of new homes pending a public process to study revisions to the R1 zone development standards.', 'In addition to the input at the January 9, 2018 City Council meeting, staff has received numerous inquiries from concerned community members regarding the size of new home construction and the redevelopment of older housing stock. There is overall concern that the sizes of new single-unit dwellings are changing the character of existing R1 neighborhoods. On October 5, 2016, in response to public correspondence and testimony, the Planning Commission held a discussion about the rapid change occurring in the R1 zoning district citywide. At the time, the Commission had previously reviewed Variances for homes 9,000-11,000 square feet in size. On December 1, 2016, the Planning Commission submitted a letter to the City Council requesting that Council direct staff to prepare a comprehensive review of citywide R1 zoning standards. A comprehensive review of R1 development standards has not occurred since selected amendments were made approximately 20 years ago.', 'In a review of permit data from the last five years, staff has found that the number of  permits issued for new home construction has remained relatively consistent. The average floor area of new homes has been approximately 5,000 square feet. The average parcel coverage has been approximately 55%. In a comparison of new home size compared to existing homes over the past three years, staff found that new homes have been approximately two to three times larger than existing homes (while 2013-2014 data is available for average existing home size, due to time limitations in preparing this staff report, staff was only able to compile 2015-2017 data). In looking at demolition data over the past three years, the City has received approximately 70 applications per year. The number of demolition permits issued regardless of when the applications were submitted has remained relatively consistent at approximately 40 per year. As of the writing of this staff report, there are currently 33 pending demolition permit applications. Table 1 summarizes permit activity for new single-unit dwellings.', 'Table 1: Summary of Permit Activity for Single Unit Dwellings in R1 Zone 2013-2017', 'No. of Building Permits Issued', 'Average New SUD Size', 'Average New Parcel Coverage', 'No. of Demo Permits Issued', 'Average Existing SUD Size', '2013', '34', '5,480 SF', '52%', '36', '-', '2014', '51', '5,386 SF', '54%', '35', '-', '2015', '34', '4,735 SF', '55%', '36', '1,588 SF', '2016', '30', '4,828 SF', '59%', '41', '2,140 SF', '2017', '38', '4,809 SF', '55%', '36', '1,835 SF', 'As put forth in SMMC Section 9.07.010, the relevant key purposes of the R1 zoning district are to:', '“B. Preserve and protect the existing character and state of the City’s different residential neighborhoods and the quality of life of City residents against potential deleterious impacts related to development—traffic, noise, air quality, and the encroachment of commercial activities.', 'C. Ensure adequate light, air, privacy, and open space for each dwelling.', 'E. Ensure that the scale and design of new development and alterations to existing structures are consistent with the scale, mass, and character of the existing residential neighborhood.', 'G. Promote the rehabilitation and long-term maintenance of existing structures.”', 'The number of demolition permits has kept pace with building permits issued for new home construction. Based on research of redevelopment that has occurred in R1 neighborhoods over the past five years, the average size of new homes is at least double the size of the demolished homes that they replaced. In these instances, the parcel coverage, mass, and scale of the new home were increased compared to the prior home. As shown in Figure 1, mapping the locations of building permits issued for redevelopment in R1 neighborhoods demonstrates that there are areas where entire blocks of neighborhoods are undergoing irreversible change in character due to the size and scale of new homes. If prior trends continue, the existing character of existing R1 neighborhoods would be permanently changed, inconsistent with the stated purpose of the R1 zoning district.', 'Figure 1: Building and demolition permits issued in R1 neighborhoods 2013-2017', 'Discussion', 'The proposed interim zoning ordinance includes changes to development standards that are intended to reduce the overall building envelope including parcel coverage, building height, and upper story stepbacks. In order to ensure that accessory dwellings units are not inadvertently affected by the parcel coverage limitations, detached accessory dwelling units would be excluded from parcel coverage.', 'Parcel Coverage', 'Maximum parcel coverage is a ratio of building footprint to parcel size. The interim ordinance proposed that parcel coverage be reduced by 20% from existing standards. In the North of Montana and Sunset Park R1 neighborhoods, maximum cumulative parcel coverage is currently 61%, which is allocated to a maximum of 35% on the first floor and 26% on the second floor. Second floor parcel coverage may be increased to 30% with a corresponding decrease in first floor parcel coverage. As a general standard that is applicable citywide unless specified in particular geographic areas, maximum parcel coverage is currently 50%. In the Expo/Pico R1 neighborhood, maximum parcel coverage is currently 40%, except that parcels between 3,001 and 5,000 square feet in area may have a parcel coverage of no more than 50 percent, and parcels of 3,000 square feet or smaller may have a parcel coverage of no more than 60 percent.', 'The proposed interim ordinance would reduce overall maximum parcel coverage and maximum first and second floor parcel coverage by 20%, consistent with Council’s direction. Table 2 outlines the existing parcel coverage and the proposed parcel coverage with the 20% reduction applied.', 'Table 2: Comparison of Existing and Proposed Parcel Coverage', 'General Standard (citywide)', 'North of Montana', 'Sunset Park/', 'North of Wilshire', 'Expo/Pico', 'Existing', 'Proposed', 'Existing', 'Proposed', 'Existing', 'Proposed', 'Existing', 'Proposed', 'One-story structure not exceeding 18 feet in height', '50%', '40%', '50%', '40%', '50%', '40%', '--', '--', 'Maximum Cumulative Parcel Coverage', '--', '--', '61%', '48%', '61%', '48%', '40%', '3,001-5,000 sf parcel – 50%', '3,000 sf or smaller – 60%', '32%', '3,001-5,000 sf parcel – 40%', '3,000 sf or smaller – 48%', 'Ground Floor', '--', '--', '35%', '28%', '35%', '28%', '--', '--', '2nd Floor', '--', '--', '26%', '20%', '26%', '20%', '--', '--', 'Maximum 2nd Floor Increase (Resulting Ground Floor Max)', '--', '--', '30% (31%)', '24% (24%)', '30% (31%)', '24% (24%)', '--', '--', 'Maximum Ground Floor Increase (Resulting 2nd Floor Max)', '--', '--', '40% (21%)', '32% (16%)', '40% (21%)', '32% (16%)', '--', '--', 'Maximum Building Height', 'Maximum building height is generally 28 feet citywide. An exception is in the North of Montana neighborhood where maximum building height is currently 32 feet.', 'The proposed interim ordinance would reduce maximum building height in all R1 zoning districts to 25 feet. This revised building height would still permit two-story homes but would reduce the scale and mass of new buildings, particularly from neighboring properties.', 'Additional Minimum Stepbacks for Upper Stories', 'This development standard is intended to require modulation on the front, rear, and sides of upper portions of new buildings. An upper story stepback is currently required above 14 feet in height on all sides.', 'In order to make this requirement consistent with the reduced building height in the interim ordinance and relevant to the upper portions of new buildings, the upper story stepback would apply starting at the second story, instead of commencing at an arbitrary 14-foot height. This change is necessary to be consistent with the reduced maximum building height, should the second story start at less or greater than 14 feet.', 'Detached Accessory Dwelling Units Parcel Coverage Exemption', 'Accessory Dwelling Units (ADUs) are encouraged by State law. In order to ensure that ADUs continue to be encouraged, Council directed that ADUs be exempted from parcel coverage calculations. ADUs may either be attached (i.e. included within the envelope of the primary dwelling) or detached (i.e. separated from the primary dwelling). In reviewing this direction more carefully, staff found that it would be prudent to limit the parcel coverage exemption to only detached ADUs or portions of detached accessory buildings that contained ADUs. If attached ADUs were exempted from parcel coverage calculations, it could subvert the intent of the interim ordinance to reduce the sizes of primary residences.', 'Applicability of Interim Ordinance', 'An interim ordinance is effective 30 days after second reading of the ordinance. However, the applicability of the ordinance is a Council policy decision. Since Council’s direction to staff to prepare an interim ordinance on January 9, staff has received numerous public inquiries regarding the applicability of the interim ordinance. The greatest concern has been expressed by property owners who have been working on plans for some time and are preparing to submit plan check applications but would be significantly impacted with re-design if the interim ordinance were applied retroactively. Staff is unable to speculate as to how many homeowners are in the situation of having invested significant time and expense in preparing plans based on existing standards. However, at present there are currently 23 pending plan checks for new single unit dwellings in the R1 zone. All projects that have obtained a building permit, are currently under construction, or are in plan check would not be subject to this interim ordinance. Council could consider the following options for applicability of the interim ordinance:', '· Option A (Staff’s Recommendation) – “Reachback”: The interim ordinance would apply to all development projects located in a R1 zoning district that have not submitted complete plan check applications as of January 23, 2018, as that will be the first date that Council holds a public hearing on the interim ordinance.', '· Option B – “Regular Applicability”: The interim ordinance would apply to all development projects located in a R1 zoning district that have not submitted complete plan check applications as of 30 days from second reading of the ordinance. The concern of delaying the applicability date of the interim ordinance is that there would likely be a rush to file plan check applications before the interim standards could take effect. This could have the effect of undermining the opportunity to study revised standards in the R1 zone.', 'Comprehensive Update to the R1 Development Standards', 'The proposed interim ordinance would represent a temporary measure to reduce the maximum allowable size of new single-unit dwellings in the R1 zoning districts. A more comprehensive update to the R1 Development Standards, which was identified as a high City Planning priority by Council on January 9, 2018, will require a significant public engagement process regarding the appropriate character and scale of new construction and additions in R1 neighborhoods which could begin in the second half of FY2018-19.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The proposed interim ordinance is categorically exempt from the provisions of California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to 15061(b)(3) of the State Implementation Guidelines (common sense exemption). Based on the evidence in the record, it can be seen with certainty that there is no possibility that the proposed interim ordinance may have a significant effect on the environment. The recommended interim ordinance represents a temporary change to regulatory standards and would not allow more mass or floor area within the Zoning Ordinance than existing regulations. Therefore, no further environmental review under CEQA is required.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. The proposed interim ordinance has the potential to impact property tax revenue, however staff is unable to predict the exact impact at this time.']}
{'Title': 'Proclamation: 2018 Homeless Count Week', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': "Recognition of Santa Monica Fire Fighters' Fortitude, Dedication, and Valor in Fighting the Skirball, Creek, and Thomas Fires", 'Department': "City Manager's Office, Administration", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items'}
{'Title': 'Authorization for final payment to the City of Los Angeles for the Cost-sharing Monitoring Plan Memorandum of Agreement for the Santa Monica Bay Beaches Bacterial Total Maximum Daily Load', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to approve the cost-share payment in the amount of $75,485.30, including $66,888.62 for Fiscal Year 2016-17 and exceedances of $8,596.68 for Fiscal Year 2015-16, to the City of Los Angeles to comply with the cost-share monitoring plan with the Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board’s Bacterial Total Maximum Daily Load requirements for the Santa Monica Bay Beaches.2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'As a municipal agency within the boundaries of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit system of Los Angeles County, the City of Santa Monica is part of a regional partnership of cities responsible for improving water quality for Santa Monica Bay. As a partner, the City is obligated to comply with requirements of a Total Maximum Daily Load (TMDL) to reduce pollution from urban runoff into the Bay. A TMDL requires a monitoring plan to collect data on water quality prior to and after a TMDL is implemented to demonstrate compliance with water quality objectives. As a member of the jurisdiction that drains into the Bay watershed, the City is responsible to share the costs of implementing a water quality monitoring plan for the Santa Monica Bay Beaches Bacterial TMDL that has been established for this watershed. Thus, the City has had a three-year renewable Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) with the City of Los Angeles since 2003 to share these costs.', 'The most recent Santa Monica Bay Beaches Bacterial TMDL cost-sharing MOA 2013-17 expired on June 30, 2017. Unlike past three-year MOAs, the 2013 MOA was a four-year term. However, when Council approved the 2013 MOA, funds were encumbered to cover the costs for the first three years, but not the fourth year. Therefore, staff is asking Council to approve the recommended action to increase the budget, and allow the City to pay the charges incurred during the fourth year (FY 16-17) of the MOA. The one-year FY 16-17 cost, to be paid during FY 17-18 from the Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax Fund, is not to exceed $75,485.30.', 'Background', 'The Federal Clean Water Act (CWA) requires the California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region (Board), to develop water quality standards that identify beneficial uses, and criteria to protect beneficial uses, for each water body found within its region. Beneficial uses include swimming, fishing, drinking water, navigability, and wildlife habitats and reproduction. Section 303(d) of the CWA requires states to prepare a list of water bodies that do not meet water quality standards and establish for each of these water bodies pollutant load allocations known as total maximum daily loads (TMDLs), which will ensure attainment of water quality standards. A TMDL represents an amount of pollution that can be released by anthropogenic and natural sources of a watershed into a specific water body without causing a decline in water quality and beneficial uses.', 'The Santa Monica Bay watershed is listed on California’s 2006 Section 303(d) list due to impairments by bacteria, and its beaches are subject to postings and closures due to elevated concentrations of this pollutant. The Board adopted bacterial TMDLs for wet and dry weather runoff into the Bay in 2003. These TMDLs regulate the amount of bacteria found in discharges of runoff from the cities within the Bay watershed.', 'In accordance with the Bacterial TMDLs, the City of Los Angeles submitted a Coordinated Monitoring Plan (CMP) for compliance with the TMDLs on behalf of the agencies within the Bay watershed. The City of Los Angeles currently performs all required monitoring and reporting to the Board, and annually invoices the City of Santa Monica for its share of monitoring costs.', 'The City Council approved the initial Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) for cost-sharing bacterial monitoring on July 8, 2003 (Attachment A). The last MOA renewal was approved by Council on August 13, 2013, and included a three-year term and a provision allowing for a fourth year (Attachment B). However, when Council approved that agreement, funds were budgeted to cover the costs for the first three years, but not for the fourth year. Staff inadvertently failed to allocate the fourth year funds during the 2013 staff report process.', 'Discussion', 'On November 28, 2012, the California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region approved a new National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit with additional monitoring requirements beyond the previous permit. Though a new cost-sharing MOA was approved by City Council on August 13, 2013, the City only budgeted for the three-year term of the MOA. Article V, Section 4 states, “This MOA shall continue on a month to month basis after expiration date as stated in Article V, Section 1 . . . not to exceed 12 months.” The City of Los Angeles sent the City an invoice for $75,485.30 for the month-to-month term covering FY 2016-17, which includes $8,596.68 for exceedance monitoring in FY15-16. Staff is requesting to appropriate the necessary funds to pay this invoice. A new cost-sharing MOA was approved by the Santa Monica City Council July 11, 2017, for FY 17-18 and beyond; this MOA is going through the signature phase, at this time (1/2/2018) with the City of Los Angeles, before it can be executed (Attachment C).', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Santa Monica’s share of the monitoring costs for the fourth year of the Memorandum of Agreement is not to exceed $75,485.30, which includes additional costs for exceedance monitoring. Payment of the invoice requires a FY 2017-18 appropriation of $75,486 to the Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax Fund (account 06402.555170).']}
{'Title': 'Adoption of Resolution Authorizing the City Manager to execute Memorandum of Understanding with The International Association of Sheet, Metal, Air, Rail, and Transportation Workers - Transportation Division, Local 1785', 'Department': 'Human Resources Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1.  Adopt the attached Resolution authorizing the City Manager to execute a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) between the City of Santa Monica and the International Association of Sheet, Metal, Air, Rail, and Transportation Workers – Transportation Division, Local 1785 (SMART-TD).2. Approve the attached revised salary schedule effective as a result of the agreement reached for the classifications represented by SMART-TD.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The agreement with the International Association of Sheet Metal, Air, Rail and Transportation Workers – Transportation Division, Local 1785 (SMART-TD) expired on June 30, 2017. SMART-TD includes the Motor Coach Operator and Motor Coach Operator Trainee classifications. The City currently has 351 employees who are members of SMART-TD. With the direction from City Council to continue Santa Monica’s commitment to competitive compensation for the City’s workforce while keeping costs within the City’s Five Year financial forecast, the City and SMART-TD, have met and conferred in accordance with the Meyers-Millias Brown Act (MMBA). The terms of the tentative agreement are summarized below.', 'Background', 'The Meyers-Millias Brown Act requires that local public agencies negotiate with their respective bargaining units regarding wages, hours and working conditions. Agreements with ten of the City’s eleven bargaining units expired at the end of June 2017 and, under direction from the City Council, staff negotiated for new terms.', 'On June 27, 2017, Council approved agreements with the Executive Pay Plan (EPP) and set the terms and conditions for medical insurance for most City employees (Attachment A). On July 11, 2017 Council approved the terms for the agreements with the Police Officer’s Association (POA) (Attachment B). On August 8, 2017 Council approved agreements with Administrative Team Associates (ATA), Municipal Employees Association (MEA), the Public Attorneys Union (PAU), the Santa Monica Firefighters Local 1109 IAFF, Supervisory Team Association (STA), the Management Team Associates (MTA), and the Confidential Unrepresented Employees (CUE) pay plan whose contracts expired June 30, 2017 (Attachment C). On October 24, 2017 Council approved agreements with Fire Executive Management Association (FEMA) and California Teamsters Local 911 (Attachment D).', 'Discussion', 'The overall policy of the City of Santa Monica has been to maintain competitive wages, hours and working conditions in a high-cost geographic labor market in order to retain and attract a dedicated, high-quality workforce to serve our community across a wide range of specialized services. Since most, though not all, City jobs are comparable to other municipalities, the City has traditionally looked to full-service cities in our region of similar size and financial strength for labor market comparisons. Market competitiveness in recruitment, the increase in the Consumer Price Index, internal equity, and offsetting contributions to pension and medical benefits may also be factors that contribute to the setting of compensation during the negotiations process.', 'Generally, the City finds itself in first or second position among comparable cities. As a result, the City has maintained competitiveness through modest cost of living adjustments. The Council is undertaking a compensation review overseen by the City Council Audit Subcommittee that will provide a comprehensive analysis for future policy direction. The tentative agreement with SMART-TD is as described below:', '· The three-year agreement between the City of Santa Monica and SMART-TD is effective July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2020.', '· SMART-TD employees will receive at 1.7% increase effective the first pay period following City Council approval. Council policy precludes retroactive pay when contract negotiations extend beyond the expiration of a Memorandum of Understanding. In this case, the agreement includes a one-time catch-up lump sum payment that addresses the time lag between tentative agreement and final ratification.', '· The City will contribute to a 457 deferred compensation account in the amount of $50 per month effective January 1, 2018.', '· The second and third years of the agreement each include a 1.5% salary increase.', '· Employees will be eligible to receive Tuition Reimbursement up to $2750 per fiscal year effective January 1, 2018.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The total cost of the negotiated changes contained in the agreement is approximately $455,000 for FY 2017-18. The budget impact of these changes was included in the FY2017-18 through FY 2021-22 Five-Year Financial Forecast. An appropriation for the Big Blue Bus Fund will be included in the FY 2017-18 Midyear Budget for Council approval.']}
{'Title': 'Adoption of Big Blue Bus Resolution for Transit Funds', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Finance & Administrative Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Adopt the resolution authorizing the City Manager to: a. Apply for and execute grant agreements and execute related certifications and assurances with the Federal Transit Administration (FTA), L.A. Metro, or other federal, state, regional or local agencies; b. Enter into agreements for transit funds for the pass-through of funds and agreements for planning, programming, and implementing transit services and capital projects during Fiscal Year (FY) 2017-18 through FY 2019-20; and,c. Enter into agreements for transit program revenue with institutions, local agencies, and businesses for funds generated during FY2017-18 through FY 2019-20. 2. Adopt the resolution authorizing the application for grant funds from the California Department of Transportation for State Transit Assistance State of Good Repair funds. 3. Adopt the Big Blue Bus Title VI Program.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Big Blue Bus (BBB) requests that City Council adopt a resolution authorizing the City Manager to file grant applications, execute grant agreements, and enter into agreements associated with funding, planning, programming, and implementation of transit services, transit programs, and capital projects; and adopt a resolution authorizing the application for grant funds from the California Department of Transportation for State Transit Assistance State of Good Repair funds. This is an annual request for resolution adoption, as BBB’s grant funds need unique resolutions for various federal, state and local grant fundings.', 'BBB also requests that City Council adopt its Title VI Program. Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 protects people from discrimination based on race, color, and national origin in programs and activities receiving federal financial assistance. Federal Transit Administration (FTA) requires the governing body of a transit agency to adopt its Title VI Program in order to be eligible for federal grant funds. Big Blue Bus’ Title VI Program has been updated to include the adopted service standards and a Limited English Proficiency (LEP) plan.', 'Background', 'Each year, Big Blue Bus requests that City Council adopt a resolution authorizing the City Manager to file grant applications, execute grant agreements, and to enter agreements associated with funding, planning, programming, and implementation of transit services, transit programs, and capital projects. The most recent said resolution was adopted by City Council on January 24, 2017. In addition, staff requests that City Council adopt a resolution authorizing the application for grant funds from the California Department of Transportation for State Transit Assistance State of Good Repair funds. Finally, Big Blue Bus requests that Council adopt its Title VI Program, which has been updated to include the adopted service standards and a Limited English Proficiency (LEP) plan.', 'Discussion', 'Staff requests that Council authorize the City Manager to file grant applications as transit-related funding opportunities become available; to execute grant agreements to accept federal, state, regional, and local transit-related funds, as funds are approved or programmed; and to execute and file certifications and assurances as they relate to grant programs, compliance, and project implementation. These authorizations would allow the City to expedite its annual grant applications and participate in unanticipated one-time grant opportunities in a timely manner. Potential funding agencies include, but are not limited to, the Federal Transit Administration (FTA) and other federal agencies, Metro, the South Coast Air Quality Management District (SCAQMD), California Office of Emergency Services (CalOES), California Department of Transportation (CalTrans), and other state and regional agencies.', 'Staff also requests that the City Manager be authorized to enter into agreements, including but not limited to: Memorandums of Understanding (MOUs); Letters of Agreements (LOAs); Cooperative Procurement Agreements; Payment and Services Agreements and sub-grantee agreements for transit funds; pass-through funds; and other transit program revenues. Agreements may include, but are not limited to: agreements by and between the City of Santa Monica and L.A. Metro, SCAQMD, FTA, the Southern California Association of Governments (SCAG), Access Services, Playa Vista Parks and Landscape Corporation, St. John Hospital, UCLA, SMC, nonprofits, and other federal, state, local, and regional entities for the purposes of planning, programming funds, and implementing transit services and capital projects for the residents of the City of Santa Monica and greater Los Angeles area.', 'State Transit Assistance – State of Good Repair', 'In April 2017, Governor Brown signed Senate Bill 1 (SB 1), which generates new revenues from various taxes and fees and is designed to support public transit. As a result of SB 1, Santa Monica’s Big Blue Bus is an eligible recipient for State Transit Assistance (STA) State of Good Repair funds, which are managed by the California Department of Transportation. Funds will be used toward, but not limited to, bus replacements and/or preventive maintenance. As a requirement to secure the funds, an adopted resolution and an allocation request to claim the funds is required.', 'Title VI of the Civil Rights Act', 'FTA requires the governing body of a transit agency to adopt its Title VI Program in order to be eligible for federal grant funds. Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 protects people from discrimination based on race, color, and national origin in programs and activities receiving federal financial assistance. Federal Transit Administration (FTA) requires the governing body of a transit agency to adopt its Title VI Program in order to be eligible for federal grant funds. As a requirement, the program must include a Language Assistance Plan and service standards.', 'BBB has updated its program to include the adopted service standards and Limited English Proficiency (LEP) plan to meet the new requirements of the Title VI program. The original service standards were adopted at its council meeting in August 2015.  BBB now requests that City Council adopt its updated Title VI Program.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions. Local programming and transit subsidies are in the approved Big Blue Bus department budget.', 'The new funding from STA State of Good Repair will be included in the FY 2017-18 Year-End Budget review, once the final amount is released.']}
{'Title': 'Contract Modification for IPS Group, Inc.', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': 'Director David Martin', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to agreement #9496 (CCS) in an estimated amount of $4,050,000 with IPS Group, Inc., a California-based company, to add merchant processing services for parking meter transactions for the Finance Department. The ten-year term of the contract will remain unchanged. This will result in an amended agreement with a new total estimated amount of $21,594,169, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Since 2011, IPS Group, Inc. (IPS) has provided ongoing maintenance for the City’s parking meters and sensors, battery replenishment, miscellaneous parts, credit card processing communication services, and a web-based management system. Since 2003, TransFirst Health and Government Solutions, LLC (TransFirst), has provided merchant processing services, including for the City’s parking meter credit card transactions. In 2016, Council authorized staff to work with IPS in reducing the City’s significant and growing parking meter credit card transaction costs. IPS proposes a process through which the City could access IPS’s preferred interchange rate with Visa and Master Card for regulated debit transactions. This would lower transaction fee costs for parking meter transactions by an estimated $120,000 annually. The City would retain TransFirst for merchant processing services related to other parking and non-parking transactions.', 'Staff recommends a fourth modification to agreement #9496 (CCS) with IPS to add merchant processing services for parking meter related transactions. The amended contract would be for an estimated amount of $4,050,000 for the remainder of the contract, for an estimated amended total of $21,594,169. The ten-year term of the contract would remain unchanged.', 'Background', 'IPS has provided ongoing maintenance for meters and sensors, battery replenishment, miscellaneous parts, credit card processing communication services and a web-based management system since 2011. TransFirst has provided merchant processing services since 2003.', 'On October 25, 2011 (Attachment A), Council awarded contract no. 9496 to IPS Group, Inc. (IPS) to purchase and operate parking meters and in-ground sensors. The contract was for $7,560,000 for a five-year term with one five-year option to extend.', 'On March 19, 2013 (Attachment B), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification for a Battery Replenishment Program, miscellaneous parking meter parts, and increased credit card transactions processing. The modification resulted in a total not to exceed amount of $9,694,345 with no change to the five-year term.', 'On April 22, 2014 (Attachment C), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification for a one-time purchase of 350 additional parking meters with in-ground sensors for a total not to exceed amount of $10,296,950 with no change to the five-year term.', 'On April 28, 2015 (Attachment D), Council awarded Contract No. 10053 to TransFirst to provide merchant processing services, for an estimated total amount of $12.4 million over a five-year period. The contract does not require that all City credit card transactions be processed through TransFirst.', 'On May 24, 2016 (Attachment E), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a third modification to extend the term of the IPS agreement for an additional five years and to increase the contract total accordingly, for a not to exceed amount of $17,544,169. This modification also provided the authority for the City to work with IPS to find ways to reduce credit card transaction fees (merchant processing fees).', 'Discussion', 'The City currently operates approximately 6,000 single space parking meters with varying enforcement hours and rates. All meters are credit/debit card enabled and are predominantly used to manage demand and ensure turnover.', 'The City currently pays approximately $1.1 million per year to process over 5.3 million parking meter credit/debit card transactions. An estimated total of $15.6 million in parking meter revenue is collected per year. Most parking meter transactions (approximately 58%) are through credit/debit cards, and these costs represent approximately 40% of all the City’s credit card processing fees.', 'Under the City’s current contract with TransFirst, merchant processing fees consist of interchange fees assessed by the credit card companies (Visa, MasterCard, Discover) and a TransFirst fee. Small value transactions such as those made for metered parking incur a higher fee as a percentage of the actual transaction amount than other credit card transactions. For example, fees paid for metered parking equate to about 7% of the value of the transaction as compared to 2.1% for non-parking transactions. Through IPS, the City could take advantage of a preferred rate for certain debit/credit card transactions through their merchant processing services provider because of their high volume of transactions. TransFirst is not able offer the same rate for meter parking transactions.', 'Council has previously directed staff to search for ways to reduce the City’s overall merchant processing fee costs, which were $2.5 million in FY 2016-17 and which have increased an average of 10-12% annually for the past four fiscal years as the city has added more credit card enabled payment services. Staff estimates that switching to IPS for parking meter credit/debit card transactions would save approximately $120,000 annually. While this amount is small, it is a step in the right direction to ensure that city operations are as cost effective as possible.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In January 2011, the City initiated a trial program to test new single-space on-street parking meters with electronic payment options. All companies that produce credit-card enabled single or multi-space parking meters were invited to participate, and one took part in the trial. Based on customer feedback and functionality, staff recommended a single-space meter solution. IPS, a California-based company, was the only company that could deliver a functional single-space product at that time. IPS single-space meters have been widely deployed in Los Angeles, Beverly Hills, and West Hollywood and are commonly accepted and known by on-street parkers in the Los Angeles area.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Fees for merchant processing services are based on credit card usage. Staff estimates the cost for merchant processing services over the remaining 4 years of the 10-year term of the IPS contract to be $4,050,000, or $1,012,500 per year, for an amended estimated contract amount of $21,594,169. The City currently pays approximately $2.5 million annually in merchant processing fees for all transactions. Use of IPS to process debit/credit card transactions related to parking would result in a decrease in costs associated with the TransFirst contract and would save the City an estimated $120,000 per year in merchant processing fees.', 'Funds for merchant processing services are available in the FY 2017-19 Biennial Budget in the Finance Department in account 012241.522230 (credit card processing fees). Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.']}
{'Title': 'Award RFP# 144 for Emergency Medical Patient Transport and Billing Services', 'Department': 'Fire Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP#144 to Westmed Ambulance INC. DBA McCormick Ambulance, a Colorado based company, to provide emergency ambulance and billing services for the Fire Department;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a cost recovery agreement with McCormick Ambulance, for three years, with two additional one-year renewal options, on the same terms and conditions over a five-year period.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'A private ambulance contractor has provided emergency ambulance transport and billing services for the Fire Department since 2004. Following a competitive bidding process, staff recommends a contract with McCormick Ambulance to provide emergency ambulance and billing services for a three-year term beginning February 1, 2018. McCormick Ambulance bills the patient directly for transported services resulting in the Fire Department’s anticipated annual cost recovery of $800,000, as reflected in the FY2017-18 Budget.', 'Background', "On April 10, 2017, the City posted a Request for Proposals(RFP)for Emergency Ambulance Services and Patient Billing, seeking proposals fromambulance service contractors interested in providing emergency (911) ambulance transportation and patient billing services for the Santa Monica Fire Department (SMFD). One potential proposer notified the City that they would not submit a proposal due to their inability to comply withtheCity's Living Wage Ordinance (LWO). City staff subsequently reached out to other service providers and concluded that industry standard pay, including that of the City’s current provider, does not comply with the City’sLWO. In light of theinformation received, staffcancelled that RFP.", 'Staff identified that emergency ambulance services providers have specific challenges that differentiate themfrom other City contractors. Additionally, the City is not currently prepared to provide emergency transport services. As a result, on July 11, 2017, Council adopted Living Wage Ordinance amendment 2458 CCS that exempted ambulance services from the living wage for a limited time which sunsets on June 30, 2020. This action has ensured continuous provision ofeffective emergency services. Impacted vendors must still comply with the City’s minimum wage law.', 'Contractors who provide emergency ambulance services to the City aredifferent from other Citycontractorssubject tothe LWObecause emergency ambulanceproviders do not control rates for the services they provide.Rather, theLos Angeles County Board of Supervisors sets rates for all emergency transport services. The Board adjusts rates annually based on changes to the medical care and transportation line items of the Consumer Price Index forAll Urban Consumersand, starting July 1, 2017, the percentage change of the Los Angeles County minimum wage change. The County rates are the maximum allowable ambulance rates chargeable to the general public. Thus, while there is an established methodology for increasing rates that takes into account some wage changes, these factors do not include the higher Santa Monica living wage.Additionally, revenue collected by ambulance companies is dependent on the insurance payer mix of the patients transported. Payer mix varies from community to community, and in Santa Monica, approximately one third of payers are Medicare and another third MediCal recipients. These payers pay considerably less to the ambulance company than what is billed. All of these factors, in addition to employee wages, influence the bottom line of any ambulance company providing services in this community.', 'The City is currently under contract until January 31, 2018, with Ameri-Care Ambulance as its ambulance provider and ambulance-related billing services provider. Ameri-Care has successfully provided ambulance services for the past five years.However, they are not recommended as the best qualified firm based on their proposal but will continue to provide their high-level of service until the completion of their contract and until their billing services are complete.', 'Discussion', 'The City has utilized an emergency ambulance and billing service company since 2004 to provide emergency medical transport and billing services for the response, assessment, treatment and/or transportation of members of the public by Fire Department paramedics. Charges are assessed based on the Advanced Life Support Assessment Fee adopted by City Council on June 15, 2004. The Advanced Life Support Assessment Fee is the difference between the Los Angeles County approved Advanced Life Support (“ALS”) rate and the Los Angeles County approved Basic Life Support (“BLS”) rate as set forth in the most current Los Angeles County Emergency Services Agency General Public Ambulance Rates. On the City’s behalf, McCormick Ambulance will bill approximately $796.00 per transport based on the current fee structure, excepting Medi-Cal and Medicare patients.', 'The Fire Department responds to over 16,000 emergency medical calls annually and calls for patient transport have increased 5% as compared to the previous year. Currently approximately 7,500 patients are transported annually to local hospitals. The Fire Department’s response model includes six paramedic engine companies, two rescue ambulance paramedic non-transport unit, and other support units deployed as needed. The department also maintains two additional rescue ambulances that are mainly used for special events and non-transport responses. Contracted emergency ambulances are used to transport patients on behalf of the Fire Department with Santa Monica Fire Department paramedics on-board to provide patient treatment in the ambulance while en route to a medical facility.', 'Contractor Selection', 'In October 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for an emergency ambulance and billing services. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code 2.24.072 Best Bidder provisions. Two Los Angeles County approved ambulance providers submitted proposals. Proposals were evaluated on experience, technical competence, training and continuing education of staff, billing and collection systems, business stability and references, value added and breadth of service, fleet and equipment quality and maintenance, capability and completeness of proposal to meet request for proposal requirements, and operational systems. After a thorough review, the five member selection committee comprised of representatives from the Fire Department and Finance Department recommended McCormick Ambulance as the best qualified firm based on the evaluation criteria. McCormick Ambulance’s proposal demonstrated their depth and breadth of experience and their organizational structure displayed their highly qualified personnel. McCormick’s fleet is expansive including 83 ambulances, 3 specialty disaster units, 2 high-risk ambulance units which can serve as isolations units for chemical exposures or suspected infectious diseases, a mobile command and communications trailer, and a mobile generator and fuel tender all of which could be utilized by the City in the event of a large-scale emergency or for special events.  McCormick also operates an in-house, full service and fully accredited maintenance facility in Los Angeles County. McCormick currently meets all applicable minimum wage laws including the City’s Minimum Wage Ordinance (MWO), Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 4.62. McCormick’s proposal also identified their extensive employee training and continuing education program. The Fire Department is presently working with the current and prospective ambulance transport providers to ensure a smooth and seamless transition.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate budget or financial impact related to this staff report. McCormick Ambulance’s compensation is not a direct payment from the City; the provider bills the patient directly. McCormick Ambulance will also bill the patient on behalf of the Santa Monica Fire Department for services provided by the Fire Department; $800,000 in cost-recovery has been included in the Fiscal Year 2017-18 Budget.']}
{'Title': 'Approval of Minutes for the Redevelopment Successor Agency for the June 27 and October 24, 2017 meetings', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the Redevelopment Successor Agency approve the minutes for the June 27 and October 24, 2017 meetings.'}
{'Title': 'Adoption of the 2018-19 Annual Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule', 'Department': 'Housing and Economic Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the Redevelopment Successor Agency adopt resolutions approving the Agency’s draft recognized obligation payment schedule and administrative budget for July 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In compliance with the statewide elimination of all Redevelopment Agencies in 2012, the Redevelopment Successor Agency is required to prepare a recognized obligation payment schedule (ROPS) and corresponding administrative budgets to be implemented in yearly increments. The ROPS ensures that all of the obligations of the former redevelopment agency are fulfilled. The ROPS 2018-19 includes Successor Agency enforceable obligations of $29,301,630 and an administrative budget of $639,873 covering July1,2018 to June 30, 2019.', 'Background', 'Under the governing statutes that implemented the dissolution of redevelopment agencies statewide, each redevelopment successor agency is required to prepare a recognized obligation payment schedule (ROPS) on a yearly basis. The ROPS identifies a former redevelopment agency’s enforceable obligations within the following categories: 1) bond payments; 2)indebtedness obligations (including loans, housing agreements, and similar obligations); 3) contracts or agreements necessary for continued administration or operation of an agency; and 4) an allowance for an agency’s administrative costs.  The ROPS also identifies the sources of payment for the obligations, including bond proceeds, interest income, and distributions of tax increment revenue from the State’s Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund (RPTTF). Each successor agency is required to submit an approved ROPS to the California Department of Finance and the relevant county auditor-controller for the period ending June 30, 2019 (ROPS 18-19) by February1,2018.', 'Discussion', 'The ROPS 2018-19 for the period of July 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019 includes all Successor Agency enforceable obligations. All proposed ROPS2018-19 enforceable obligations have been previously listed and approved for payment on a previous ROPS.', 'Under AB 26 and SB 107, the Agency may receive an administrative cost allowance of up to three percent of the property tax allocated to the Agency each fiscal year, based upon an approved administrative budget which justifies the administrative cost allowance. Based on estimated property tax allocation to the Agency for fiscal year 2017-18, the administrative cost allowance cap would be $222,201. As a result, $417,672 of the Agency’s administrative costs would not be reimbursed. Theadministrative budget is included as an enforceable obligation on the ROPS 2018-19 (see Attachment A, Exhibit 1, Line Item 30).', 'Next Steps', 'Copies of the ROPS 2018-19, as approved by the Oversight Board, must be sent to the State Controller’s Office and the Department of Finance and posted on the Agency’s website no later than February 1, 2018. The Department of Finance must make its determination regarding the ROPS 2018-19 no later than April 15, 2018.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'On June 1, 2018 and January 2, 2019, the Los Angeles County Auditor-Controller will transfer property taxes into the Agency’s cash account from which the Agency will pay enforceable obligations listed on the approved ROPS 2018-19. Before the distributions take place, the DOF must issue a determination letter with the total RPTTF revenues to be disbursed for enforceable obligations along with a final administrative cost allowance cap amount. The administrative cost allowance, estimated at $222,201, would then be transferred to the General Fund. It is staff’s practice to share a draft ROPS with DOF staff prior to final submittal to ensure that all DOF questions are answered prior to formal review and approval.', 'There are no other budgetary impacts associated with the adoption of the resolutions approving the ROPS 2018-19 and administrative budget. The ROPS 2018-19 simply sets forth the Agency’s existing financial obligations and administrative costs for the period July 1, 2018, to June 30, 2019.']}
{'Title': 'Amendment to the Ordinance for Vehicle Weight Restrictions on the Santa Municipal Pier', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Introduce for First Reading the attached Ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 10.08.560 (Municipal Pier—Vehicle Weight Restrictions) updating load limitations for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier.2. Conduct a public hearing, on behalf of Los Angeles County and at the County’s request, to determine the appropriate load limitation for the Pier Bridge.3. Direct staff to seek authorization from the County of Los Angeles to set the Pier Bridge load limit.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In compliance with federal and state laws, the County of Los Angeles Department of Public Works (LACDPW) works with local agencies to set weight limits for bridges, such as the Pier Bridge. Following a recent inspection, LACDPW recommended posting a weight limit sign for the Pier Bridge; currently, weight limit signs are posted only for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and Newcomb Pier, both of which are entirely under the City’s jurisdiction. Upon researching the lack of a weight limit sign for the Pier Bridge and the current weight limit signs of 10 tons and 3 tons for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and Newcomb Pier respectively, staff determined that local law governing the weight limit on the Santa Monica Pier should be revised, and a weight limitation for the Newcomb Pier should be codified. Staff recommends amending local law to increase the posted weight limit for the Santa Monica Pier to 15 tons, and to set a weight limit of 3 tons for the Newcomb Pier. Staff further recommend that the Council conduct a public hearing, on behalf of Los Angeles County and at the County’s request, to determine the weight limit for the Pier Bridge. At the conclusion of that hearing, staff will forward the City’s weight recommendation to the County and seek authorization from the County to set the bridge weight limit, as required by state law.', 'Background', 'On September 19, 2017, LACDPW contacted the City requesting a copy of the load limit ordinance for the Pier Bridge. Staff clarified that load limits are not currently posted for the Pier Bridge Structure. Load limits are posted only for the Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier to protect the Pier structures from the wear and tear brought about by heavy vehicles. The signs are posted at both the top and bottom approaches to the Pier Bridge, and by inference, limited the loads for the Pier Bridge. Notwithstanding the load limits posted for the Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier, LACDPW noted that their structural analysis required a load limit to be posted for the Pier Bridge itself. In order to legally post a load limit for a bridge, the California Vehicle Code requires that a public hearing be held and an ordinance be adopted under the County’s direction.', 'Discussion', 'The LACDPW performed load rating calculations for the Pier Bridge which indicated the safe load capacity of the structure to be:', '· 22 tons per truck;', '· 22 tons per truck and semi-trailer combination;', '· 30 tons per truck and full trailer combination.', 'The LACDPW recommends that the bridge be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 22 tons. However, this exceeds the load capacities of the Santa Monica Municipal Pier (outlined in blue below in Figure 1) and the Newcomb Pier (outlined in orange below in Figure 1). The sole purpose of the Pier Bridge is to provide vehicle and pedestrian access to the Santa Monica Municipal and Newcomb Piers. There are no other adjoining structures or access points to the Pier Bridge. Despite the bridge’s structural capacity as determined by LACDPW, it is the structural capacity of the Santa Monica Municipal Pier that would dictate the operational weight limit for the Pier Bridge.', 'Vehicle Weight Restrictions', 'Traffic flows through the different sections of the piers, and the lowest rated section of each pier is the controlling limit for allowable vehicle weights. The Santa Monica Pier and Pier Deck Parking Lot have been posted for maximum weights of 10 tons and 3 tons, respectively, for nearly a decade or longer. Staff researched as-built plans and records for past upgrade and maintenance projects for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and concluded that the lowest rated section, a 200-feet-long concrete waffle structure at the west end, could support a 15-ton vehicle. The rest of the structure is rated for a 20-ton vehicle. Based on the controlling capacity of the waffle structure, staff recommends that the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and the adjoining Pier Bridge be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 15 tons.', 'The 2008 Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study by Moffatt & Nichol (Study) examined the Newcomb Pier and subdivided it into sections based on the varying substructure types and corresponding load limits. The Study further identified that the lowest rated section was capable of supporting a 3-ton vehicle. Therefore, staff recommends the Newcomb Pier, where the pier deck parking lot is located, be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 3 tons.', 'The City has exclusive jurisdiction to regulate Pier weight limitations. Accordingly, the proposed amendment (attached) codifies weight limits for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier.', 'Pier Bridge', 'Unlike the Piers, which are under the City’s exclusive jurisdiction, California Vehicle Code section 35751(a) grants only Los Angeles County the authority to set weight limitations on the Pier Bridge. Consistent with Section 35751 and longstanding practice, the County has cooperated with Santa Monica and other cities within the County to set bridge load limits. Additionally, section 35751 requires a public hearing be held before the Pier Bridge’s weight limit could be reduced beyond what the Vehicle Code otherwise requires. The County has requested that the City conduct this hearing on the County’s behalf. Upon conclusion of the hearing, Staff will transmit the City’s weight recommendations to the County and work with the County to set the correct weight limit. Once that limit is set by the County, staff will return to the Council to codify the new limit.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. The removal of existing signs and installation of the new signs will be performed by Public Works staff within the existing operating budget.']}
{'Title': 'City Planning Division Priorities', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'It is recommended that the City Council review and provide guidance on setting the upcoming City Planning Division priorities.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The adoption of the Downtown Community Plan in 2017 marked a major milestone and added to the list of significant implementation efforts completed since the adoption of the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) in 2010. These efforts include the completion of the Bergamot Area Plan, the Bike Action Plan, the Pedestrian Action Plan and the Zoning Ordinance Update. While substantial progress towards LUCE implementation has been made over the last seven years, there are additional Area Plans and ordinance updates that are necessary to fulfill the vision of the LUCE. In addition to the implementation projects recommended by the LUCE, there are new initiatives directed by City Council as well as major Development Agreement projects that are pending Planning Commission and City Council review.', 'This report summarizes pending policy and development projects, provides a general timeline of when these projects can be completed (Attachment A), and presents a recommended prioritization of these work items for Council discussion. While these projects involve collaboration between various City Divisions and Departments, they are primarily led by the City Planning Division within the Planning and Community Development Department. In addition to staffing the policy and implementation projects in this report, the City Planning division is also responsible for the processing of all development permit applications including Planning Commission review, Landmarks Commission review, Architectural Review Board, Zoning Administrator and building permit plan check. Therefore, it is necessary to consider these priorities and schedules in the context of the “day to day” work of the City Planning division and the capacity of the division to complete these projects while also maintaining its significant administrative functions and processing of numerous Development Review permits, Administrative Approvals and plan checks. Further, after approval of projects, there are typically three rounds of plan check followed by managing issues that arise through construction and occupation of new buildings. With a handful of staff assigned to the strategic planning and design and historic preservation function, there are approximately eight planners assigned full-time to development review, which includes processing planning applications, plan checks, staffing the counter, responding to phone inquiries, and reviewing business licenses. Due to volume and emerging division needs, small teams of planners normally assigned to development review are assigned to augment strategic planning and design/historic preservation projects.', 'It should also be borne in mind that planning is not an end in itself. The goal of land use and transportation planning is to help shape great places, whether they be districts, neighborhoods or streets. The identification of ambitious and laudable goals does not automatically produce results. It is critically important that planning be grounded in the capacity of City government and private real estate market forces and property owners to actually implement adopted policies. The City of Santa Monica already has a backlog of implementation activities, projects and initiatives. By focusing on the highest priorities for future land use planning and mobility enhancements, the City can produce practical, achievable policy guidance for public and private investment in the years ahead. This is the highest and best use of limited staff and financial resources.', 'This report divides the Division’s upcoming priorities into three sections, and provides a fourth section on alignment with citywide priorities:', 'I) Policy Plans and Ordinance Updates: The first section consists of major policy implementation efforts that were called for in the LUCE or subsequent policy documents, or are necessary due to legal requirements or outdated ordinances. These include the Pico Neighborhood Plan, the Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan, the Local Coastal Program Update, the Gateway Master Plan, the Landmarks Ordinance Update, and an update to the City’s Travel Demand Forecast Model and adoption of CEQA thresholds compliant with CA Senate Bill 743.', 'II) Council Directed Research: The next section includes five items that have been directed by City Council, primarily through the approval of “13 Items,” for staff and Planning Commission review and possible action by the Council. These include review of the R1 Development Standards, review of the Bergamot Area Plan to consider the percentage of housing required in specific developments, amendment of the Zoning Ordinance to prohibit the conversion of hotel rooms to residential units in the Proposition S Overlay area, and review of the development standards and entitlement processes for housing projects on the commercial boulevards and in the Bergamot area to incentivize housing over commercial development.', 'III) Major Development Agreements: The third section of this report provides a summary and status update of four major Development Agreement projects currently pending. These include the Phase Two Master Plan for Providence Saint John’s Health Center, the proposed mixed-use project at 4th/5th and Arizona, the redevelopment of the Miramar Hotel, and the proposed Ocean Avenue Hotel project located on the northeast corner of Santa Monica Boulevard and Ocean Avenue.', 'IV) Alignment of Division Workplan with Council Priorities: The final section of this report demonstrates how the City Planning Division’s ongoing work efforts align with the five strategic goals of the City Council. This section also looks at the Council-directed research through the lens of citywide priorities as a means to help the Council provide feedback on The City Planning Division’s proposed workplan priorities.', 'Planning Commission Discussion', 'On December 13, 2017, staff presented these priorities to the Planning Commission. The Commission voted 6-0 to prioritize the following:', '1) Pico Neighborhood Plan', '2) SB743 CEQA implementation', '3) Landmarks Ordinance update', '4) R-1 Interim Zoning Ordinance standards', '5) Options for housing on the boulevards and in the Bergamot area', 'The Commission identified these as key areas of focus given competing demands. The Commission also based its recommended priorities on the principle of preservation, which is why the Pico Neighborhood Plan, Landmarks Ordinance update, and review of R-1 standards rose to the top. Staff had originally proposed only a very targeted zoning effort for the Pico Zoning District that would directly address recent requests from the Pico Neighborhood Association. However, in their discussion and in response to public testimony at the meeting, the Commission indicated a broader scope to the Pico Zoning District would be appropriate. This discussion drew from the Commission’s prior review of Pico Neighborhood goals in June 2016 and LUCE Goal N11, which calls for protections for Pico Neighborhood and the Boulevard through an area planning process. This would mean that staff could proceed with the Pico Neighborhood Plan in two phases – immediate zoning changes as Phase 1 and a broader interdepartmental implementation effort as Phase 2 that would include a more intensive public engagement process. This is described in more detail in the next section of this report. SB743 is required and the production of housing remains a City priority. In order to ensure that there is sufficient capacity for these priorities, the Commission recommended delaying the Gateway Master Plan.', 'I. POLICY PLANS/ORDINANCE UPDATES', 'Pico Neighborhood Plan', 'The Pico Neighborhood Plan is a budgeted planning effort ($150,000) intended to address concerns within the Pico neighborhood. Bounded by the I-10 Freeway to the north, Pico Boulevard to the South, Centinela to the east, and 7th Street to the west, this planning area integrates the residential neighborhood of R2 and R1 District households with the commercial Boulevard. While there is a desire for a comprehensive approach to addressing concerns about enhancing quality of life, minimizing displacement of longtime residents and retaining neighborhood character through a range of activities that may include housing policies, cultural-based planning initiatives, economic development incentives, crime and safety interventions, circulation enhancement recommendations and environmental/landscaping improvements, experience has shown that land use planning tools are not ideal for tackling such challenges. The staff recommend a narrower approach led by PCD to address zoning issues related specifically to protection of neighborhood character and retaining affordable housing. If the Council wishes to pursue a more comprehensive approach, staff recommends this be a multi-departmental effort outside the scope of setting PCD priorities.', 'To ensure community participation in the land use planning effort, the bulk of the budget will be used to conduct multi-lingual outreach. Planning staff is already at work organizing and conducting dozens of meetings with staff from across many City departments to understand the context of current City services offered to Pico residents and businesses. Future outreach will involve various neighborhood organizations, residents, community groups, places of worship, cultural associations, business improvement districts and other stakeholders. Outreach and technical analysis will help staff to develop zoning revisions.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff intends to expedite analysis and recommendations for land use planning changes beginning with an in-house evaluation of potential zoning ordinance updates to provide a context-specific framework for development in Pico similar to standards that were established for the Ocean Park neighborhood. These may include revisiting the Mixed Use Boulevard Low zoning on Pico Boulevard, evaluating rules for combining residentially-zoned lots in the Pico Neighborhood, and a review of the appropriateness of Parking Overlay 2 parking requirements between Lincoln and 11th Street. Staff expects to bring forward this Zoning Analysis to Planning Commission in the second half of 2018. Community outreach for the Pico Plan will begin in early 2018.', 'Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan (MPNP)', 'The Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan was launched in 2013 to design a framework for the rezoning of approximately 70 acres of formerly industrial land centered on the Expo Light Rail station at 17th Street and Colorado. Several outreach events were conducted in 2013-2014, and a presentation was made to the Planning Commission in July 2014. A planning framework was drafted in late 2014, which ties together a desire for additional housing in this area, as well as new streetscape concepts that address permeability, landscaping, and the presence of a regional transit connector in close proximity to Santa Monica College and the city’s two hospitals. Due to competing priorities for staff time on the Downtown Community Plan, a public draft of the Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan was not completed.', 'The appropriate level of environmental review necessary to address potential changes in land use proposed by the MPNP is currently being evaluated.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff anticipates the need to rework and enrich the draft document to make it relevant to today’s regulatory environment, and to work closely with the Community and Cultural Services Department throughout the re-design process of Memorial Park, which will begin in early 2018. Outreach to re-establish communications with area stakeholders and the community at large about the MPNP can begin simultaneously. It is anticipated that the Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan and required environmental analysis will be completed in the first half of 2019.', 'Local Coastal Program Update', 'The Local Coastal Program Update is being funded through a combination of Coastal Commission grants and local funds and consists of two parts – a Land Use Plan (LUP) and Implementation Plan (IP). Over the past two years, staff has been working closely with Coastal Commission staff to discuss and resolve key policy issues with respect to coastal access, new development, and the new science of sea level rise.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'It is expected that a public draft of the LUP will be released for public review in early 2018, followed by Council review and an application to the Coastal Commission for final plan adoption. Once the LUP has been substantially completed, staff will start the IP, otherwise known as the “coastal zoning ordinance.” It is anticipated that it will take up to 24 months to complete City review of the IP.', 'Gateway Master Plan', 'The Gateway Master Plan is a funded planning effort that will address comprehensive planning for the area adjacent to the I-10 Freeway that links Downtown to the Civic Center and Samohi. There is a unique opportunity for strengthening connections over the freeway right of way. This would provide multiple benefits, including:', '· Seamlessly link the historic Downtown and historic Civic Center, removing a visual and physical divide', '· Allow for better freeway entry and exiting in the often congested traffic bottlenecks', '· Provide access to peripheral parking opportunities that could reduce vehicular impacts on the Downtown core', '· Provide a framework for design and access for adjacent properties', 'Development of the Gateway Master Plan will be an open process facilitated by staff, and include participation from the community, land owners and decision-makers as priorities for the area are refined. This key location should become an experience that reflects the city’s values of community, sustainability and pride of place.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'As established in the Downtown Community Plan, properties within the Gateway Master Plan boundaries may only request Tier 2 height and FAR until the earlier of 2021 or the completion of the Gateway Master Plan. In order to meet the timeline established in the DCP, staff would need to initiate the process for the Gateway Master Plan in the first half of 2018.', 'Landmarks Ordinance Update', 'The Landmarks Ordinance was adopted in 1976 and has not been comprehensively updated since its inception. Since that time, application of the ordinance to a variety of preservation projects has revealed some ambiguities in language that would benefit from clarification. The Landmarks Commission has long advocated for a comprehensive update to the ordinance to provide clarity on implementation and to also explore new directions, such as the potential for a second tier of designation. The Commission has identified a list of issues over a number of years that would be the starting point for the ordinance update.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Given other priorities, staff will likely start work on a comprehensive update to the Landmarks Ordinance in the second half of FY2018/19. The ordinance update will be a joint effort between City Planning and the City Attorney’s office.', 'SB743 Implementation', 'In the next coupleofyears, transportation review required under CEQA will change as a result of the adoption of California Senate Bill 743 (SB743). SB743 will require the City to adjust the way it conducts CEQA-mandated transportation analysis. The State’s publishedCEQA Guidelinesindicate thatthe City will be required to usevehicle miles traveled (VMT)as the metric for transportation analysis under CEQA. VMT measures the total distance traveled (in miles) between the origin and destination ofatrip and as such, captures the full extent of vehicle travel on the roadway network (VMT = Trip Rate x Trip Length). VMT is a more appropriate metric for assessingtransportationimpacts on the environment,because it is related togreenhouse gas emissions, the development of multimodal transportation networks, and a diversity of land uses.', 'Currently, output data of the City’s Travel Demand Forecast Model (TDFM) is used to generate Level of Service(LOS)analysis asformerly required under CEQA. Since 2008 the Model also has calculated VMT for informational purposes, but not as a threshold of significance for transportation impacts under CEQA. To comply withtheanticipated CEQA Guidelines under SB743, the TDFM will need to be calibrated to use VMT to assess transportation impacts. Furthermore, the Citywillhave to establish new transportation review procedures andadopt new VMT-based traffic impact thresholds to replace the existingLOS impact thresholds.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'City Council approved a contract with Fehr + Peers in October 2017 to update the TDFM with the 2017 citywide transportation counts, and to recalibrate the model based on network changes and horizon year land uses. Fehr + Peers will also assist with development of some of the SB743 review guidelines and thresholds. Community engagement is anticipated to educate the public regarding this change and establishing new transportation analysis thresholds, including a public workshop, focus groups and a number of public hearings.', 'The project will begin with updating and recalibrating the Model from January to September 2018. This work includes steps to complete traffic counts and quality assurance, develop horizon year forecasts, update the physical network, update and calibrate, and to evaluate TDM and VMT Performance.', 'Following the Model update, staff will work on developing transportation review guidelines and thresholds from July 2018 through April 2019. This phase will include tasks to develop CEQA significance thresholds, develop planning-level transportation metrics, and develop guidelines for transportation review of projects.', 'II. COUNCIL DIRECTED RESEARCH (“13 ITEMS”)', 'R1/Single Family Residential Development Standards', 'As part of the adoption of the zoning ordinance update, Council directed staff to further research neighborhood-specific zoning changes that would address the unique character of neighborhoods. The Planning Commission wrote a letter to the City Council requesting review of the R1 zoning standards. Staff has received complaints from neighborhood groups and individual residents expressing concern about the size of new homes. In nearly all cases, staff has found the new homes of concern to comply with existing zoning regulations for single-unit dwellings. A previous update to the R1 standards addressed “mansionization” concerns in 2000. Staff has received complaints regarding recent renovations/additions and the redevelopment of older housing stock. These have raised questions regarding the appropriateness of the existing R1 zoning standards. While the R1 standards have been in place for many years, existing homes typically do not represent the maximum buildable envelope resulting in a mismatch between new homes and existing homes. An update to the R1 zoning standards would require a significant public engagement process regarding the appropriate character and scale of new construction and additions in R1 neighborhoods.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'It is expected that staff could begin work on a comprehensive update to the R1 standards in the second half of FY2018/19. In the meantime, if directed by Council, an interim zoning ordinance that takes a more surgical approach to strategically address specific R1 zoning standards that would regulate the size of new home construction pending completion of a comprehensive update could be completed in the first half of 2018.', 'Amendment of Bergamot Area Plan to Increase Percentage of Required Housing', 'The Bergamot Area Plan (BAP) encompasses an area that includes a large amount of the city’s office space and includes the heart of the city’s creative industries with approximately 8,000 workers. The BAP established a required land use mix in the Mixed Use Creative zoning district of 40% residential and 60% non-residential with an allowance to vary by 10% in either direction. Since the adoption of the BAP, completed or under construction projects include the following:', 'Project', 'Address', 'Land Use', 'Entitled By', 'Agensys DA', '1800 Stewart Avenue', 'Research and Development', '1988 Zoning Ordinance', 'Village Trailer Park DA', '2930 Colorado Avenue', '362 units housing', '24,893 sf retail and creative office', '1988 Zoning Ordinance', 'Colorado Creative Studios DA', '2834 Colorado Avenue', '192,000 sf creative office', '1988 Zoning Ordinance', 'Pen Factory', '1681 26th Street', '203,816 sf creative office', '2013 Bergamot Area Plan', 'As demonstrated by the above table, only one of the mentioned projects was approved under BAP regulations. However, the DA’s approved under the 1988 Zoning Ordinance did provide some of the infrastructure enhancements identified in the BAP for those sites as negotiations were ongoing simultaneously with the development of the Plan. The Pen Factory project was entitled as a Tier 1 addition of 7,499 square feet converting the vacant industrial space to creative office. The only other project to have been approved (but not constructed) since the adoption of the BAP is an approximately 600-space private parking structure at 2941 Michigan Avenue.', 'In the years subsequent to the adoption of the Bergamot Area Plan, staff has heard from the development community that the BAP does not contain sufficient height and FAR incentives to attract housing or commercial development, and that uncertainty and project risk weigh heavily on larger projects. Minimal differences in the FAR allowance between Tier 1 and Tier 2 do not provide incentives to produce housing or projects that could contribute community benefits to the area’s transformation. And, while the BAP did identify certain properties as ripe for Tier 3 mix-use development projects, the uncertainty of the development agreement process has led many owners to maintain their properties “as-is.” To the extent that there is interest in creating housing incentives similar to those created in the DCP, further study and environmental analysis is required in order to determine necessary amendments.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff expects to be able to initiate work in the first half of FY2018/19. This effort would likely be folded into any options brought forward to encourage housing production on the boulevards.', 'Explore Tools to Encourage Housing Production on the Commercial Boulevards and in the Bergamot Area and Disincentivize 100% Commercial Projects', 'As part of the adoption of the Downtown Community Plan, Council gave further direction to also study incentives for housing production citywide on the commercial boulevards and the Bergamot area. It is likely that work on this item would be combined with any updates to the BAP designed to encourage housing production discussed above. It is likely that fully exploring this direction would also precipitate amendments to the Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP) ordinance if not a comprehensive update to the AHPP. Establishing a framework similar to the DCP will require additional economic feasibility analyses in addition to outreach. In relation to the issue of housing on the boulevards, staff has included a map (Attachment B) showing the under construction, approved, and pending housing projects throughout the City.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff expects to be able to initiate work in first half of FY2018/19.', 'Amendment of Zoning Ordinance to Prohibit Conversion of Existing Hotel Rooms to Residential Uses in the Proposition S Overlay Area', 'A recent change in ownership of one of the hotels in the City prompted inquiries from Council and the community as to the intentions of the new owners, who converted a hotel to for-sale condominiums in another city. New hotels are prohibited in the Prop S overlay area and therefore, the importance of preserving existing hotels has been underscored. There has been no indication of any interest in converting existing hotel rooms to residential uses nor are there any pending applications for such a conversion.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff proposes to bring this forward with the “Bucket 3” package of zoning ordinance discussions in the third quarter of 2018.', 'Explore Ordinance Denying New Discretionary Permits of Entitlements on Properties Where Ongoing Violations Remain Unresolved', 'There have been occasional instances where a property has outstanding Municipal Code violations but the property owner/applicant submits an application for a new permit. In these situations, Council has expressed concern that by issuing new permits, the applicant is not incentivized to abate the Code violation.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff proposes to bring this forward with the “Bucket 3” package of zoning ordinance discussions in the third quarter of 2018.', 'III. MAJOR DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENTS', 'Providence Saint John’s Health Center Phase Two Master Plan & Development Agreement Amendment (2121 Santa Monica Boulevard)', 'The Providence Saint John’s Health Center (PSJHC) Phase Two Project development agreement amendment includes a master plan process that will comprehensively review the circulation, land use, parking, and development potential for the Health Center’s north and south campuses located on Santa Monica Boulevard between 20th and 23rd Streets. A procedural amendment to the development agreement was approved on April 25, 2017 and established a framework that resulted in the following:', '· Changed the South Campus Master Plan to a Phase Two Project Master Plan encompassing all of Phase Two development, on both the North and South Campuses.', '· Changed the Development Agreement to require approval of the Phase Two Project Master Plan prior to approval of the individual Development Review Permits for Phase Two Project buildings.', '· Required a phasing plan and performance schedule for significant project components such as infrastructure, circulation improvements, and community benefits.', '· Established the City Council as the decision-making body for the Phase Two Project Master Plan.', '· Required that all Phase Two development be consistent with the approved Phase Two Project Master Plan.', 'Staff and the applicant team have completed their first-round review and discussion of the Phase Two Project circulation plan and started the Environmental Impact Report (EIR) for the Phase Two Project with release of a Draft EIR for public review anticipated at the end of 2018.', 'Anticipated Project Review Timeline', '· Substantive Master Plan Review and Community Benefits Negotiations – 2018', '· EIR Public Review Draft – 4th quarter 2018', '· Planning Commission Hearings – 1st quarter 2019', '· City Council Hearings – 3rd quarter 2019', '· Development Review Permits for new John Wayne Cancer Institute, Child & Family Development Center, and replacement housing (Scenario A) or West Ambulatory & Acute Care Building and replacement housing (Scenario B) – 4th quarter 2019', 'Plaza at Santa Monica (4th/5th and Arizona)', 'The proposed Plaza at Santa Monica project is a public/private partnership located on City-owned land. The current project proposal conforms to the limitations in the DCP at a height of 129’ and consists of office, hotel, retail, and cultural uses. A large public plaza intended to provide space for a seasonal skating rink and other year-round programming is a key feature of the project.', 'The site is identified as one of three Established Large Sites in the Downtown Community Plan. The project requires both negotiations on terms of the ground lease with the developer and a development agreement. The project is currently in the environmental analysis phase with the Draft EIR anticipated to be released for public review in 2nd quarter 2018. Per Council direction, the Draft EIR will be studying a range of eight project alternatives that include significantly different configurations for development of the site, particularly ones that envision a larger component of public space in the form of a central park or plaza for Downtown. Complimentary circulation alternatives are also part of the environmental analysis, including consideration of partial or periodic closure of Arizona. Formal hearings are anticipated to commence at the Planning Commission towards the end of 2018.', 'Anticipated Project Review Timeline', '· EIR Public Review Draft – 2nd quarter 2018', '· Planning Commission Hearings – 4th quarter 2018', '· City Council Hearings – 2nd quarter 2019', 'Miramar Hotel Mixed-Use Project (1133 Ocean Avenue)', 'The proposed Miramar Hotel Mixed-Use Project Development Agreement application was originally submitted in April 2011 to comprehensively redevelop the existing Santa Monica Fairmont Miramar Hotel as a new approximately 550,000 SF (2.9 FAR) mixed-use hotel with the following key components:', '· 265 guest rooms', '· food, beverage, meeting, and spa facilities', '· retail space along Wilshire Boulevard', '· approximately one-acre open space area at the corner of Wilshire Boulevard and Ocean Avenue', '· up to 120 condominiums', '· up to 40 affordable housing units at 1127 2nd Street', '· approximately 484 on-site subterranean parking spaces', '· Preservation of the site’s Landmark Moreton Bay Fig Tree', '· Preservation/rehabilitation of the Landmark Palisades Building', 'Following Planning Commission’s review of the conceptual plans in February 2012, the City provided direction regarding desired design parameters for the site and potential priority community benefits to be negotiated, and authorized staff to initiate development agreement negotiations with the applicant for the proposed project in April 2012. The project design was revised by the applicant team and resubmitted in 2013. At that time, the design strategy for the site focused on constructing a significantly taller, new building at the center of the site (approximately 262’ tall) with open space and reduced building heights on the perimeter of the property. While City staff initiated work on the EIR for the project in 2013, that work along with City review of the revised project design was put on hold pending completion of the Downtown Community Plan (DCP).', 'The Council adopted the DCP in August 2017 and included an Established Large Sites Overlay for three individual project sites in the Downtown. The DCP requires that projects for these three sites be processed as a development agreement and comply with specific development parameters (building height, floor area, and open space). For the Miramar Hotel site, the maximum building height for the project site is 130’ and a maximum floor area ratio of 3.0.', 'It is anticipated that the applicant will submit revised project plans during the first quarter of 2018 that address programmatic changes and design concept revisions compliant with the DCP’s Established Large Sites Overlay regulations. Following initial review of these revised plans, City staff will resume its preparation of the Draft EIR for the project, including hosting a second EIR Scoping Meeting for the new project design.', 'Anticipated Project Review Timeline', '· Submit Revised Project Plans – 1st quarter 2018', '· EIR Scoping Meeting for Revised Project – 1st quarter 2018', '· Substantive Project Review and Community Benefits Negotiations – 2018 through 1st quarter 2019', '· EIR Public Review Draft – 1st/2nd quarter 2019', '· Planning Commission Hearings – 3rd quarter 2019', '· City Council Hearings – 1st quarter 2020', 'Ocean Avenue Hotel (101 Santa Monica Boulevard)', 'A Development Agreement application was submitted in February 2013 for a proposed mixed-use hotel, cultural, retail, and residential development at the northwest corner of Santa Monica Boulevard and Ocean Avenue (“Ocean Avenue Project”). The applicant hosted a Community Meeting to introduce the proposed project in March 2013 which was followed by the Architectural Review Board’s conceptual discussion of the proposal in August 2013. Following completion of the Community Meeting, City review of the project was put on hold pending completion of the Downtown Community Plan. For the Ocean Avenue Hotel site, the adopted DCP specifies a 130’ maximum building height for the site and a maximum floor area ratio of 4.0.', 'The applicant submitted revised project plans last month that address programmatic changes and design concept revisions compliant with the DCP’s Established Large Sites Overlay regulations. Key components of the revised project include:', '· 115-room hotel with meeting room and banquet space;', '· 79 residential rental units, comprised of 19 new rent-controlled units to replace existing on-site units, 42 market rate units, and 18 affordable units;', '· Ground-floor restaurant and retail space;', '· Cultural/museum campus with open space;', '· Publically-accessible roof-top observation deck;', '· Subterranean parking;', '· Retention and rehabilitation of two, on-site designated City Landmark structures.', 'The applicant is scheduled to host a second Community Meeting to introduce the revised project design on January 11, 2018. Following initial review of the project plans, preliminary conceptual review will be scheduled at the Landmarks Commission and/or the Architectural Review Board during the first quarter of 2018. It is anticipated that Float-Up Discussions at Planning Commission and City Council will be completed by the third quarter of 2018 followed by initiation of environmental review for the project.', 'Anticipated Project Review Timeline', '· Community Meeting – 1st quarter 2018', '· ARB/Landmarks Conceptual Review – 1st quarter 2018', '· Planning Commission Float-Up Discussion – 2nd quarter 2018', '· City Council Float-Up Discussion – 3rd quarter 2018', '· EIR Scoping Meeting – 4th quarter 2018', '· Substantive Project Review and Community Benefits Negotiations – 2019', '· EIR Public Review Draft – 4th quarter 2019', '· Planning Commission Hearings – 3rd quarter 2020', '· City Council Hearings – 1st quarter 2021', 'IV. ALIGNMENT OF WORKPLAN WITH COUNCIL PRIORITY AREAS (STRATEGIC GOALS)', 'In order to connect desired outcomes to the day-to-day work of city government, the City Council identified five council priority areas, or Strategic Goals, that are expected to have short-term impact on community safety, quality of life, and prosperity.', 'Based on best practices from municipalities across the country, Santa Monica is now using an approach to workplan development and budgeting that connects the work of City Departments to a new Framework and SaMoStat. This process aligns departmental work efforts, measures outcomes, and ultimately ensures that the City delivers these services effectively and a transparent manner. The Framework is built around its long-term commitment to sustainability infused with its new Wellbeing Index, Santa Monica’s custom measurement tool that provides an understanding of wellbeing in our community. The Framework is built on the core beliefs, visions, and structures of these two exciting and groundbreaking approaches. The five strategic goals connect to these outcome areas through a matrix. They are the key drivers that will allow us to achieve outcomes for residents of and visitors to Santa Monica.', 'Based on these descriptions of the five priority areas, the following matrix has been developed to guide the Council’s discussion on focus areas for the City Planning Division. The matrix demonstrates where individual planning efforts or Council directed research aligns with Council priorities.', 'Council Strategic Goals', 'INCLUSIVE AND DIVERSE COMMUNITY', 'MOBILITY', 'THE AIRPORT', 'HOMELESSNESS', 'LEARN AND THRIVE', 'Policy Plans', 'Pico Neighborhood Plan', 'X', 'X', 'X', 'Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan', 'X', 'X', 'X', 'Local Coastal Program Update (Required by law)', 'X', 'X', 'Gateway Master Plan', 'X', 'Landmarks Ordinance', 'SB743 Implementation (Required by law)', 'X', 'Council Directed Research', 'R1 Standards', 'Bergamot Housing and Use Mix', 'X', 'Housing Production on Boulevards', 'X', 'Hotel/Condo in Prop S Overlay', 'Denying Permits for Properties with Unresolved Code Violations', 'The Council’s strategic goals formed the basis for how staff prioritizes the work of the City Planning Division, especially those that require staff and funding resources. A second framework for organizing priorities is based on ongoing legal requirements. This would allow projects such as the Local Coastal Program Update, Housing Element, and SB743 guidelines to be brought forward. A third framework is based the urgency of issues to be addressed. For example, staff has been bringing forward clarifications to the zoning ordinance in response to questions raised in the course of project review and implementation. As these changes directly affect the daily work of the division, these have been prioritized.', 'CONCLUSION', 'This report presents an overview of the strategic plans, land use policies, and major development agreements that are the City Planning Division’s priorities for the next two years. The significant volume of “day to day” work requires the majority of staff to be devoted to the Division’s development review function. Similarly, each of the projects in this report requires a significant investment in staff time, consultant time, and public engagement. Therefore, some of the strategic plans and comprehensive ordinance updates in addition to the major development agreements have been prioritized so that projects can be completed in a timely manner responsive to Council’s direction. Council directed-research is incorporated into the workplan as appropriate, but based on the Council’s strategic goals, staff would prioritize work on the creation of housing incentives on the boulevards and within the Bergamot Plan area. Due to the ongoing construction in R1 neighborhoods that continues to generate community concern, if directed by Council, staff could prepare an interim zoning ordinance in short order that could put in place temporary regulations pending a comprehensive update.', 'As noted in this report, staff has organized priorities based upon the following framework:', '1. Council adopted Strategic Goals', '2. Legally required policy documents', '3. Urgency of issue and impact on daily work', 'Based on this framework, staff has prioritized the Division’s work as described in the table below, which has been formatted to show a comparison of the Planning Commission’s recommended priorities. As this table demonstrates, the Pico Neighborhood Plan is the division’s top strategic planning priority, followed by the required SB743 Implementation.', 'City Planning Staff Recommendation', 'Planning Commission Recommendation', '1. Pico Neighborhood Plan', '1. Pico Neighborhood Plan', '2. SB743 Implementation', '2. SB743 Implementation', '3. Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan', '3. Landmarks Ordinance Update', '4. Local Coastal Program Update', '4. R1 Standards', '5. Gateway Master Plan', '5. Options to Encourage Housing on the Boulevards', '6. Options to Encourage Housing on the Boulevards and in the Bergamot area', '7. Landmarks Ordinance Update', 'The remainder of the strategic plans and Council-directed research will be included in the work plan as capacity allows. In these instances, staff has been reviewing interim options that might allow bringing forward changes sooner while reserving a larger effort for subsequent years.', 'Major developments projects also have a natural stagger however, processing of these applications requires a significant investment of interdepartmental staff time, time for environmental review, and community engagement. As all the development agreements are anticipated to generate public interest, it should be noted that staff devoted to processing the projects will not be able to devote attention to other potential priorities, such as the Landmarks Ordinance update.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.']}
{'Title': 'Calendar Year 2018 Water Rate Adjustment', 'Department': 'Public Works, Water Resources', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '09. Public Hearings', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Suspend the 9% water rate increase authorized to go into effect on January 1, 2018 and authorize a 5% increase to be in effect until December 31, 2018; andAuthorize the budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City of Santa Monica has historically provided water service to our residential and business customers. Given the statewide challenges surrounding safe and reliable water supply in recent years, Santa Monica has been a leader in efforts to conserve, reuse and safeguard our local water resources. This report addresses the annual water rate recommendation for calendar year 2018 and provides a progress update on various efforts undertaken to meet the City’s ambitious goal of eliminating use of imported water and becoming water self-sufficient by 2020.', 'On February 24, 2015, Council approved a series of five annual 9% water rate increases for the period of March 1, 2015 through December 31, 2019 (Attachment A). The resolution adopting the water rates provided City Council with flexibility to suspend all or a portion of each 9% annual rate increase during the five-year rate period, depending upon circumstances which demonstrate that such increases are unnecessary due to greater than anticipated revenues, decreased operating expenses or decreased capital projects expenditures. The first 9% increase went into effect on March 1, 2015. On February 23, 2016 and November 22, 2016, due to better than expected financial results, Council approved 5% increases for calendar years 2016 and 2017, respectively, partially suspending scheduled 9% increases (Attachments B and C). Review of Water Fund performance for Fiscal Year 2016-17 indicates that revenues were $0.6 million greater than anticipated and expenditures were $8.6 million less than anticipated, leaving the Water Fund with a $36.7 million fund balance. Staff therefore recommends that City Council adopt a 5% water rate increase for 2018 instead of the previously approved 9% increase. Better than expected financial performance in Fiscal Year 2016-17 has allowed for this reduced rate adjustment while still providing sufficient funds to conduct studies necessary to inform the Sustainable Water Master Plan update and future rate recommendations.', 'The recommended rate adjustment would be sufficient to allow the City to:', '1) Deliver potable water to Santa Monica customers reliably, safely and sustainably in compliance with federal and state regulations; and', "2) Fund operating and capital budgets that are necessary to implement the City's self-sufficiency goals to encourage water conservation and sustainability, as contemplated in the City's 2014 water rate analysis. Such projects include five FY 2017-18 capital projects to improve reservoir chlorination ($900,000), perform pilot reverse osmosis upgrades at the Arcadia Water Treatment Plant ($250,000), commence preparation of a Groundwater Sustainability Plan for the Santa Monica Basin ($150,000), conduct a supplemental study to refine the Sustainable Yield Analysis ($100,000), and complete a flow modelling study required for future reuse of recycled water ($300,000).", 'The recommended 5% water rate increase would be effective for calendar year 2018 on bills issued on or about March 1, 2018. Proposed and current water and fire line service rates are listed in Attachment D. Council may take action to adjust future rates at the next annual review.', 'The 2014 water rate study was prepared in conjunction with the preparation of the Sustainable Water Master Plan (SWMP). In 2014, City Council adopted the SWMP with the goal of eliminating reliance on imported water from Metropolitan Water District and achieving water self-sufficiency by 2020. Since the adoption of the SWMP and as a result of new water conservation programs/policies implemented in 2015 and 2016, the City has seen a 16 percent reduction in water use while the residential population has grown from 92,321 to 93,282 over the same period. Overall, through its efforts to address the drought, the City has achieved and continues to maintain a nearly 20% reduction in water use relative to its 2013 baseline. This reduction has allowed the City to further reduce its use of imported water by 11 percent. Currently, the City’s water supply consists of approximately 25 percent imported water and 75 percent local groundwater. Per capita water use has maintained steady at 110 gallons per capita per day (GPCD) in 2016 versus record low usage of 109 GPCD in 2015.', 'Staff initiated a comprehensive update of the Sustainable Water Master Plan earlier this year. Significant progress has been made on the completion of that plan, including completion of a preliminary Santa Monica Basin sustainable yield analysis, which evaluated the rate (volume) at which groundwater can be pumped on a perennial basis without depleting the resource, a key element in achieving the water self-sufficiency goal', 'Based on the work completed to date, staff believes further analysis is needed in order to assess whether the City will meet its water self-sufficiency goal by 2020, including what added measures are needed to eliminate reliance on imported water. . Specifically, analysis to validate the sustainable yield estimates, determine availability and costs to access potential additional local groundwater resources, and evaluate the cost and viability of additional water conservation programs as requested by the Task Force on the Environment are required. This work is currently underway and is expected to be completed in late spring 2018 and will be incorporated into an updated SWMP. The updated SWMP will be presented to Council in mid-2018 and will include a detailed progress report and timeline for achieving the water self-sufficiency goal and maintaining an ongoing sustainable local water supply.', 'Background', 'On February 24, 2015, Council approved the following schedule of water rate increases via resolution subject to an annual State of the Water Fund review analyzing fiscal performance and projected fund balances over a five-year period:', 'Calendar Year', '2015', '2016', '2017', '2018', '2019', 'Effective Date', 'March 1, 2015', 'January 1, 2016', 'January 1, 2017', 'January 1, 2018', 'January 1, 2019', 'Maximum Authorized Increase', '9%', '9%', '9%', '9%', '9%', 'Actual Increase*', '9%', '5%', '5%', '*Actual Increase adopted by Council based upon review of Water Fund performance', 'Rate increases go into effect automatically on an annual basis unless suspended, all or in part, by Council. On February 23, 2016, based on an improved financial outlook, Council partially suspended the full 9% increase and approved a 5% increase for calendar year 2016. On November 22, 2016, based on better than expected financial performance, Council partially suspended the full 9% increase and approved a 5% increase for calendar year 2017. The rate increase for 2017 provided funding to increase the City’s water main replacement budget from $2 million to $4 million per year in order to meet a 100-year replacement schedule which will increase the resilience of the water system and help to prevent water main breakages.', 'For financial stability, the Water Fund strives to maintain a $7 million minimum reserve balance with revenues sufficient to cover all operating and capital expenditures while meeting various water-related requirements and goals including:', '· 20% reduction in water use from 2013 levels mandated by the State from May 5, 2015 through May 2016, and current City Stage 2 Water Supply Shortage conditions adopted by Council on August 12, 2014 in accordance with the City’s Water Shortage Response Plan;', '· Meeting a State-required 123-gallon per capita per day usage standard per the Water Conservation Act of 2009 also known as SBx7-7;', '· Federal & State water quality and treatment requirements;', "· Achieving Santa Monica's goal of reducing the City's reliance on imported water and attaining 100% water self-sufficiency by 2020;", '· Managing Santa Monica basin groundwater contamination and utilizing groundwater resources in a sustainable manner; and', '· Maintenance and construction of water treatment and distribution systems including facilities, meters, pipelines, pump stations, reservoirs and well fields for reliable and efficient delivery of potable water for customer use.', 'The approved 9% annual increases may be suspended in whole or part if revenues are greater than anticipated or expenditures are less than expected, while maintaining a $7 million minimum reserve Water Fund balance at the end of the five-year planning horizon.', 'Any 2018 rate increase would go into effect for water consumption beginning on January 1, 2018, effective on water bills prepared on or after March 1, 2018 as water meters are read approximately every two months (e.g., a bill issued for a meter read on March 1, 2018 would reflect water usage from January 1 to February 28, 2018).', 'Water Units of Measure, as the City uses, are in units of hundred cubic feet (HCF) for water billing purposes, where 1 HCF = 748 gallons. Discussion in the first portion of the staff report related to water rates, individual customer bills, and Water Fund financial performance will reference quantities in HCF units. As the City imports water from the Metropolitan Water District (MWD) of Southern California in units of acre-feet (AF), where one acre foot = 325,851 gallons or 435.6 HCF, discussion in the second portion of the staff report related to the City’s overall progress towards water self-sufficiency will reference quantities in acre-feet.', 'Discussion', 'State of the Water Fund and Rate Recommendation', 'Fiscal Year 2016-17 Financial Performance', 'In considering whether to suspend all or part of the scheduled 9% rate adjustment for calendar year 2018, staff analyzed the FY 2016-17 actual performance of the Water Fund. The Water Fund ended Fiscal Year 2016-17 with a fund balance of $36,727,423, $9.2 million better than expected primarily due to lower than expected capital and operating expenditures while achieving revenues just above expectations. The fund balance includes the one-time infusion of $33.4 million in Charnock Fund MTBE settlement funds at the end of FY 2012-13 which is being used to fund increased capital and conservation programs; and ongoing monitoring, remediation and permitting activities for the Charnock Well Field.', '· Revenues – FY 2016-17 potable water sales of 4,991,022 hundred cubic feet (HCF) increased by 2.5% versus record low usage of 4,870,900 HCF in FY 2015-16, resulting in sales revenues exceeding budget by $0.4 million and total Water Fund revenues exceeding expectations by $0.6 million. Although overall water usage remains approximately 20% below the City’s 2013 baseline, modest year-over-year increases were observed for the three customer classes which account for approximately 93% of City usage: Multi-Family Residential (+1.7%), Commercial (+2.6%) and Single Family Residential (+2.8%).', '· Expenditures – FY 2016-17 capital and operating expenditures were $8.6 million less than expected. Key line items include:', 'o Capital Expenditures were $3.6 million less than projected – virtually all of these funds are for ongoing projects and programs which will be rolled over into FY 2017-18 and spent pending bids and completion of design work for projects related to water main replacements ($1.5 million), facility repairs ($1.25 million), irrigation controllers & turf removal at City sites ($540,000), and software and control systems ($312,000).', 'o Expenditures for Water Conservation Programs were $1.7 million less than projected – turf removal rebates ($585,000 of $1.5 million budgeted) and multi-family toilet installation program ($80,000 of $678,000 budgeted) expenditures were significantly lower than expected due to staffing vacancies and contracting delays.', 'o Water Treatment and System Maintenance Materials & Services were $900,000 less than projected – expenditures for water treatment chemicals, maintenance supplies and professional services were less than expected.', 'o Charnock Well Field Operations were $850,000 less than projected –purchases of activated carbon required to treat groundwater to remove Methyl Tertiary Butyl Ether (MTBE) and other contaminants continued to drop as clean-up of the Charnock Sub-basin continues. Only twenty-one 20,000-lb deliveries of activated carbon were required in FY 2016-17 compared to 40 deliveries in FY 2013-14, which was the highest year of carbon use.', 'o Salaries & Wages were $600,000 less than projected – the Water Resources Division experienced several key staff vacancies in FY 2016-17, including four positions vacant for longer than six months.', 'o The Cost to purchase water was $300,000 less than projected.', 'Rate Recommendation', 'Due to an improved financial outlook and the need to do additional analysis to determine the project and financial needs to achieve water self-sufficiency, staff recommends Council partially suspending a portion of the 9% water rate increase authorized by Council and authorize a 5% increase for calendar year 2018. Comparing rates with the 15 other Metropolitan Water District (MWD) of Southern California member cities, Santa Monica’s tiered rate structure would continue to offer close to the lowest costs in the region for the average user. For a single-family residence using the City average of 25 HCF (18,700 gallons) over a two-month period, a 5% increase would raise a bi-monthly water bill by $4.63 from $91.64 to $96.27, which works out to about a half-cent per gallon ($0.00515). Anaheim currently offers the best pricing at $84, followed by Fullerton at $89 and El Segundo at $95 as indicated in the following chart:', 'The 5% rate adjustment would provide for continued delivery of water service, including:', '· Sufficient funding to maintain safe and reliable water deliveries for Santa Monica customers at a reasonable cost while meeting federal and state regulations and City water usage restrictions;', '· Continued funding toward projects and programs needed to continue progress toward the City’s water self-sufficiency goal', '· Continued investment in infrastructure and conservation programs; and', '· Meeting or exceeding bonding capital requirements; and the financial stability to allow for fluctuations in water usage and to address unforeseen operating and capital budget requirements.', 'The following anticipated costs and budgeted projects are included in the Water Fund’s 5-year fund balance projection (Attachment E):', '· Metropolitan Water District (MWD) of Southern California – $5.4 million from FY 2019-20 to FY 2021-22 to ensure sufficient funding for imported water deliveries prior to achieving water self-sufficiency and ongoing access to imported water if needed in case of emergency. After 2020, the City anticipates costs for continued access to MWD water (including fixed “Readiness to Serve” and “Capacity” charges which have totaled $1.0 million to $1.2 million per year in addition to per acre-foot charges for water imported) to serve as a backup source in case of City water production interruptions or to meet peak demand requirements.', '· Coastal Sub-Basin Exploratory Borings and Well SM-7 Replacement Project –$4.2 million in FY 2017-18 to evaluate groundwater availability and quality in the Coastal sub-basin by drilling three borings/production wells at the Santa Monica Airport, Colorado Yards and 2018 19th Street; and replace an inactive well (SM-7) located near Olympic / Stewart with a new production well.', '· Water Neutrality Ordinance – added $2.1 million in FY 2017-18 costs for contractor services to implement the ordinance for new development permits and to identify/ensure compliance with water usage offsets. Staff anticipates that Water Neutrality fees effective for permit applications submitted on or after July 1, 2017 coupled with the cessation of Water Demand Mitigation fees ($3 per gallon per day of estimated new net water use collected to fund water conservation programs at municipal sites) will lead to revenues that are approximately $560,000 less than total program costs, which is due to one-time non-recoverable program start-up costs for implementing this water conservation program.', 'Staff also recommends Council approve funding for five Capital Improvement Program (CIP) projects, which would commence in FY 2017-18, and reduce budgets for two projects for a total of $549,982:', '· Potable Water Reservoir Improvements ($900,000) – To improve chlorination and reduce nitrification at the City’s three reservoirs (Mount Olivet, Riviera and San Vicente), additional mixers, chemical dosing and analyzer equipment would be installed.', '· Arcadia Water Plant Enhanced Reverse Osmosis Recovery Pilot ($250,000) - To increase the efficiency of the City’s water treatment process from the current 82% (82 gallons of finished water are produced from 100 gallons of raw water) to approximately 90%, which could yield an additional 672 acre-feet per year (AFY) from the same amount of groundwater, the City would pilot a new full-scale treatment skid on a rental basis including membranes, pumps and analyzer equipment to process reject water currently disposed into the sewer. Depending on the success of the pilot, staff would return to Council to consider purchasing the rental equipment (estimated at $2 million), with full cost recovery possible within two to four years due to savings from reduced MWD water purchases.', '· Santa Monica Basin Groundwater Sustainability Plan ($150,000) - To develop a state-required Groundwater Sustainability Plan by January 2022 to manage Santa Monica Basin groundwater in concert with the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power, the County of Los Angeles, the City of Beverly Hills and the City of Culver City, an additional $150,000 in FY 2017-18 would be added to the City’s current $50,000 budget for plan development and facilitation of regular interested party meetings. Actual costs may be higher or lower dependent on the cost-sharing agreement negotiated with the other signatory agencies of the Santa Monica Basin Groundwater Sustainability Agency.', '· Supplemental DInSAR Study ($100,000) - This study will supplement data collected as part of the preliminary Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar or DInSAR subsidence study completed earlier this year. The study is intended to better assess how the local groundwater basins and sub-basins are recharged and will allow further refinement and finalization of the Sustainable Yield Analysis (SYA) for the basin.', '· US Geological Survey (USGS) Numerical Flow Model ($300,000) – Completion of this model is required for the City to obtain a recharge permit that would allow future injection of treated recycled water from the Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP) into local aquifers for reuse. USGS has completed a detailed groundwater flow model for most of the LA Basin. Staff has met with the USGS to begin the process of working cooperatively to extend the USGS model into the Santa Monica Basin by sharing our existing modeling with the agency. These activities would utilize the City’s currently contracted modeling expert (ICF Engineers) to interface with the USGS modeling team. Work would initially focus on the Charnock and Olympic sub-basins. The objective of the modeling program is to have a preliminary calibrated model for the sub-basins the City currently pumps by 2020.', '· Arcadia Water Treatment Plant Reverse Osmosis Membrane Replacement Project ($700,000 budget reduction) – in November 2017, the City completed replacement of 1,608 reverse osmosis membranes used in the treatment of potable water. Initially budgeted at $1.5 million, actual costs were $800,000, yielding $700,000 in savings available to defray the project costs above.', '· Water / Wastewater Tenant Improvement Projects – to reflect the deferral of Water / Wastewater building modifications at the City Yards to accommodate staff currently located at 1212 5th Street not included in Phase I of the City Yards Master Plan, staff also recommends Council approve FY 2017/18 CIP reductions $450,018 for the Water Fund and $1,950,017 for the Wastewater Fund originally slated for design and construction. Pending further City Master Plan design and planning work, these modifications will be taken to Council as part of the FY 18-20 Biennial CIP budget submittal with updated cost and timing estimates (currently, approximately $3.9M apiece has been included in the 5-year budget forecasts for both the Water and Wastewater Funds).', 'Alternatives', 'As currently modeled, an increase lower than a 5% increase for calendar year 2018 would cause the Water Fund to drop below the $7 million minimum recommended reserve balance by the end of FY 2021-22. If rates are not increased at all, the fund balance would be projected to drop to $1.6 million at the end of FY 2021-22.', 'While an increase greater than 5% might provide additional resources for accelerating progress toward the 2020 water self-sufficiency goal, the completion of the ongoing studies will provide a clearer roadmap for making those decisions in the years ahead.', 'Similarly, diverting from the recommended capital investments by adding or deleting proposed projects could either delay or accelerate progress toward the City’s goal of providing safe water, meeting its water self-sufficiency goal and/or meeting the State’s Groundwater Sustainability Plan requirement by 2022. Again, the completion of the current analyses will provide a better guide for future investments beyond the ones recommended in this report.', 'Despite having a larger than normal $36.7 million Water Fund balance primarily due to the one-time infusion of $33.4 million in Charnock Well Fund MTBE settlement funds at the end of FY 2012-13, it is anticipated that significant investments in capital ($42 million) and conservation ($17 million) programs will cause expenses to outpace revenues in each of the next few years. The five-year Water Fund forecast currently models in an approved 9% rate increase for calendar year 2019, with any future changes in future years to be determined by a future rate study. However, actual rate adjustments will be set by Council for 2019 based on an annual financial performance review, which has been better than expected over the past three years leading to reduced rate increases; and for 2020 to 2024 based on an upcoming Water/Wastewater rate study to be considered by Council in 2019 and subject to Proposition 218 notifications to all rate payers and public hearing requirements.', 'Progress Toward Meeting Water Self-Sufficiency Goal', 'In 2014, City Council adopted the Sustainable Water Master Plan (SWMP) with the ambitious goal of eliminating reliance on imported water from Metropolitan Water District (MWD) and achieving water self-sufficiency by 2020. Since the adoption of the SWMP and as a result of new water conservation programs and policies implemented in 2015 and 2016, the City has seen a 16 percent reduction in water demand while the residential population has grown about 1 percent over the same period. Overall, through its efforts to address the drought the City has achieved and continues to maintain a 20% reduction in water use relative to its 2013 baseline. This reduction in water demand has allowed the City to further reduce its use of imported water by 11 percent. Figure 1 below indicates the continuing reduction in the City’s imported water supply over the five-year period from 2012 to 2016.', 'Figure 1', 'From 2007 to 2016, the population increased from 87,860 to 93,282. Nevertheless, as a result of long-standing successful conservation efforts by the City of Santa Monica, per capita water use (total city water use divided by population) has continued to decrease, as indicated in Figure 2 below.', 'Figure 2', 'Water Conservation Program Update', 'The City’s past and current water conservation efforts include a combination of incentive programs, regulations, enforcement, and outreach and education programs. For the 2014-2017 time period, the programs and policies that the Water Conservation Unit within the City’s Office of Sustainability and the Environment (OSE) has implemented and executed can be categorized as follows:', '· 2014 Sustainable Water Master Plan programs', '· New program enhancements to existing programs', '· Ordinances for new developments and water waste', 'Of all the factors shaping Santa Monica’s water conservation programs since the initial SWMP, the most significant have been the recent five-year (2012-2017) California drought and the resultant mandatory water use reductions and water conservation requirements issued by both the State and the City.', 'Although Water Conservation Unit staff resources were devoted primarily to new water conservation efforts in response to the 2012-2017 California drought, 10 of the programs defined in the 2014 SWMP were initiated with significant progress.', 'Water conservation programs implemented by the Water Conservation Unit have significantly reduced water demand since the 2014 SWMP:', '· Total annual demand shrank by 1,578 acre-feet (AF) from 2014 to 2016. Because the SWMP water conservation programs implemented to date have an estimated 317 acre-feet per year (AFY) savings, the additional 1,261 AFY in savings can be primarily attributed to new water conservation programs along with enhancements to long-standing legacy programs.', '· Drought response reduction targets of 20% mandated by the State and the City were consistently met.', '· The City’s Stage 2 Water Supply Shortage and the requirement for 20% reduction in water use remains in effect (via Water Use Allowances and Exceedance Citations), and the City continues to meet this target even with the Drought State of Emergency rescinded and the media spotlight no longer on the drought.', '· The City surpassed the State of California Water Conservation Act of 2009 (SBx7-7) target of 123 gallons per capita per day (GPCD) in 2014 and by 2016 had achieved a water demand of 110 GPCD. In September 2017, the Task Force on the Environment recommended that the City commit to further reductions in water demand to achieve a goal of 90 GPCD by 2025. As discussed later in this report, a detailed work plan for achieving this goal is being evaluated as part of a comprehensive update of the SWMP, which will be presented to Council in mid-2018. However, staff expects that increased water conservation necessary to meet this goal could be achieved in part by focusing on untapped areas such as:', 'o Yet to be implemented programs from the 2014 SWMP (most notably the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District retrofits, St. John’s fixture retrofits and coin-operated laundry machine retrofits).', 'o Increased focus on the commercial sector for rebates on water-saving devices (especially flush-o-meter toilets and urinals).', 'o Continued aggressive water-waste enforcement.', 'o Additional sustainable landscape conversions.', 'o Outreach program assisting customers to properly adjust their irrigation timers.', 'o New marketing and outreach campaign focusing on permanent conservation in line with the State’s forthcoming framework for “Making Water Conservation a California Way of Life.”', 'Additional Progress on 2014 SWMP Implementation and SWMP Update', 'Preliminary Sustainable Yield Analysis', 'As noted above, the City’s water supply currently consists of approximately 25 percent imported water and 75 percent local groundwater. Given the significant City-wide reductions in water use over the past three years and the identification of new opportunities to cultivate local water resources, the City hired Black and Veatch Corporation to complete a comprehensive update to the 2014 Sustainable Water Master Plan. Work began on this update in July 2017. To inform this effort staff also hired Richard Slade and Associates to complete a Preliminary Sustainable Yield Analysis (SYA) of the various groundwater sub-basins from which the City is pumping groundwater in the larger Santa Monica Basin. The Preliminary SYA has been completed and is included as (Attachment F) to this report.', 'The term “sustainable yield” is generally defined as the rate (volume) at which groundwater can be pumped from an aquifer or basin on a perennial basis under specified operating conditions without producing an undesirable result. Undesirable results include, among other things, the unsustainable reduction of the groundwater resource, degradation of groundwater quality, land subsidence and uneconomic pumping conditions. Groundwater in the Basin is replenished primarily from precipitation falling on the entire Basin and along the approximately 36-square-mile front of the Santa Monica Mountains adjacent to the northern boundary of the Basin. Since the Basin is heavily developed and a large portion of the available ground surface has been paved to construct roads and other infrastructure, only a limited portion of exposed soils are impervious and capable of allowing infiltration of surface water into the subsurface water-bearing geologic formation.', 'The Preliminary SYA study estimated sustainable yields for the Arcadia, Charnock and Olympic sub-basins, which are the only sub-basins currently pumped by the City. These are presented below in Table 2:', 'Table 2', 'GROUNDWATER SUBBASIN', 'CURRENTLY CALCULATED', 'SUSTAINABLE YIELD', '(AFY)', 'Arcadia', '600 to 800', 'Charnock', '4,600 to 5,900', 'Olympic', '1,600 to 1,700', 'TOTALS:', '6,800 to 8,400', 'Coastal', 'Assessment in Progress', 'Crestal', 'Yet To Be Determined', 'Previous estimates of sustainable yield of the combined Arcadia, Charnock and Olympic sub-basins by various experts retained by the City have ranged between 9,695 -13,475 acre-feet per year (AFY). These previous estimates relied heavily on literature searches and localized data. The current study provides an analysis based on actual pumping and recharge data over a period of 30 years. The information is preliminary, and conservative, based solely on the three basins from which the City currently draws water. As detailed below, additional work is currently underway to refine the preliminary SYA results. This work involves completing exploratory borings in the Coastal sub-basin, digital land mapping and remote sensing efforts; staff anticipates the safe yield estimates will be adjusted once the additional work is completed in Spring 2018.', 'Exploratory Borings', 'The City currently has no wells in the Coastal sub-basin and little reliable geologic data is available. However, based on a test well drilled adjacent to City Hall in 2017 it is anticipated that the sub-basin could hold significant groundwater reserves. To assess the availability and quality of groundwater that might be present, the City is drilling three deep (600 ft.) exploratory borings in the sub-basin to document hydrogeological conditions (Council action July 11, 2017, Attachment G). This project began in September 2017 and will be completed in early 2018. Initial results indicate that at least one of the drilling locations may be suitable for installation of a future production well. Full results and future recommended actions will be presented to Council as part of the updated Sustainable Water Master Plan in mid-2018.', 'Digital Elevation Mapping', 'A supplemental study related to the SYA addresses how surface water runoff becomes available for recharge (replenishment of the groundwater supply) and consequently, how water in storage is calculated. The recharge rates used in the preliminary SYA include a simple calculation of recharge from the mountain areas, which likely underestimates recharge to the basin. Staff has initiated a study utilizing computer-assisted modelling of irregular elevation data to provide a more accurate estimate of available runoff.', 'Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar Studies (DInSar)', 'Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar (DInSAR) is a satellite-based remote sensing technique capable of detecting minute variations (deformation) of surface topography over time. In order to evaluate if historic and ongoing groundwater withdrawals by the City may have resulted in large scale sediment compaction (land subsidence) which could adversely affect the amount of groundwater storage in the basin, a preliminary DInSAR study (Attachment H) was conducted as part of the Preliminary SYA. The study determined that historic or ongoing Basin-wide sediment compaction (land subsidence) was not evident, and also identified previously unknown groundwater recharge pathways in the basin. Two additional remote sensing studies will be completed to further evaluate this preliminary information and refine the preliminary SYA study.', 'Current and Planned Efforts to Increase Local Supply', 'In addition to water conservation programs staff have initiated or are planning several projects intended to increase local water supplies and further reduce the need for imported water in order to meet the City’s water self-sufficiency goal. These are summarized below.', 'Clean Beaches Project', 'In June 2017, Council approved a contract for construction of the Clean Beaches Project for the Pier watershed (Attachment I). The Project involves construction of a below ground stormwater harvesting tank, which will improve beach water quality by collecting stormwater discharges to the ocean at the Pier outfall. The Project will harvest up to 1.6 million gallons (MG) of storm water from any single storm event for advanced treatment, recycling and reuse. The harvested water will be treated at the Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF) for non-potable uses such as irrigation and toilet flushing. Construction began in September 2017 and is expected to be completed by August 2018.', 'Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP)', 'The SWIP is composed of three integrated project elements to help improve drought resiliency, increase water supply and enhance flexibility in the management of the City’s water resources. SWIP Element 1 involves the installation of a containerized brackish/saline reverse osmosis and enhanced disinfection treatment system at the SMURRF. When operational, the reverse osmosis/disinfection unit would be utilized to advance treat non-conventional water resources such as urban and wet weather runoff harvested by the Clean Beaches Project for later reuse. SWIP Element 2 includes the construction of a below ground Advanced Water Treatment Facility (AWTF) at a location beneath the Civic Center parking lot.The AWTF would advance treat approximately 1.0 million gallons per day (MGD) of municipal wastewater for reuse.SWIP Element 3 consists of two below-grade stormwater harvest tanks. One tank (3.0 MG) would be constructed beneath Memorial Park. The other below-grade tank (1.5 MG) would be located adjacent to the AWTF beneath the Civic Center parking lot. Together, the Project elements would produce approximately 1.5 MGD (1,680 acre-feet/year) of new water for immediate non-potable reuse, and when appropriately permitted, for indirect potable reuse via aquifer recharge.City Council approved a funding agreement for the SWIP project on September 12, 2017 (Attachment J). Following completion of all required permitting approvals construction is expected to begin in Spring 2019 and the project is expected to be operational by late 2020.', 'Enhanced Reverse Osmosis (RO) Recovery', 'Staff is exploring the use of new technologies that could cost effectively increase the production of the City’s existing Arcadia treatment plant by re-treating brine that is currently discharged to the sewer. Current recovery rates for water processed through the existing reverse osmosis treatment system stand at about 82%. In early 2018, staff will begin a feasibility study which includes a pilot test to assess the effectiveness of an emerging technology which may increase the recovery rate to 90%, and possibly beyond. Preliminary estimates are that an additional 672 AFY may be produced from the brine currently being disposed. The feasibility study that would evaluate the technology, costs, and water savings will be completed by the end of the fiscal year.', 'Numerical Groundwater Flow Modeling', 'In order to more effectively manage its groundwater resources, the City has completed numerical flow modeling of its Olympic and Charnock well fields. Numerical groundwater flow models are based on detailed hydrogeologic data which are compiled into a sophisticated modeling software program that is used by numerous government agencies and other municipalities throughout California. Once calibrated, flow models can be used to identify and plan future groundwater development, better control contamination plumes, and most importantly, provide for adaptive pumping that would allow individual wells or entire supply fields to be better managed in order to sustainably recharge without affecting the City’s overall groundwater production rates.', 'The US Geological Survey (USGS) has completed a detailed groundwater flow model for most of the LA Basin. Staff has met with the USGS to begin the process of working cooperatively to extend the USGS model into the Santa Monica Basin by sharing our existing modeling with the agency. These activities would utilize the City’s currently contracted modeling expert (ICF Engineers) to interface with the USGS modeling team. Estimated costs for these activities over the next 12 months are approximately $300,000. Work would initially focus on the Charnock and Olympic sub-basins. The objective of the modeling program is to have a preliminary calibrated model for the sub-basins the City currently pumps by 2020.', 'Advanced Metering Infrastructure (AMI) Pilot – Smart Meters', 'AMI is an integrated system of smart meters, communications networks, and data management systems that enables two-way communication between the water utility and customers and provides real-time collection and evaluation of water use data. Currently, water meters throughout the city are manually read once every two months. This infrequent and staff intensive process provides very limited data regarding actual water use patterns at individual sites and throughout the city. The real-time continuous data provided by AMI allows for the timely identification of leaks and excessive water use, allows customers to accurately budget their water use in order to meet conservation goals, provides more accurate water billing, and can help to improve customer service. In March of 2016 the City partnered with Southern California Gas Company (SCG) and Aclara Technologies (Aclara) to run a proof of concept AMI pilot. The pilot involved retrofitting some 200 City water meters (single family, multi-family, commercial) and using SCG’s network infrastructure to transmit the meter reading data to a network management database and software hosted by Aclara. Subsequently, an additional 500 meters (roughly all City of Santa Monica municipal accounts and some locations that were challenging for City crews to perform manual meter reads for billing) were retrofitted with AMI technology. The pilot will run until March 2018.', 'Preliminary indications are that 99.2% of the hourly data transmitted from the meter to the Data Management System has been received without error; the outlier may have been signal interference at one of the SCG’s data collection units. During the pilot active response to anomalies in the data received (high consumption alerts) have allowed customers to be notified of potential leaks in time to reduce significant water loss. The continuation of the pilot will address the effectiveness of those services with both smart meters and a consumer engagement overlay called WaterSmart, which helps customers manage their water usage and assists the City to comply with State mandates. The full findings of the AMI pilot will be presented to Council in 2018 along with recommendations for possible expansion of the AMI system to all Santa Monica customers.', 'Summary of Next Steps', 'As previously noted in this report, staff initiated a comprehensive update of the Sustainable Water Master Plan (SWMP) earlier this year. It is too soon to tell whether the City will meet its water self-sufficiency goal by 2020. Significant progress has been made on implementing and updating that plan, including completion of the preliminary sustainable yield analysis (SYA) and integration of new projects such as SWIP, the Clean Beaches Project and improvements in water treatment efficiencies. However, additional work is required to validate the sustainable yield estimates, determine availability and costs to access potential additional local groundwater resources, and evaluate the cost and viability of additional water conservation programs as requested by the Task Force on the Environment. As detailed above, the additional work required to update the SWMP is currently underway and is expected to be completed in late spring 2018. The results of that additional analysis will be incorporated into an updated SWMP, which will be presented to Council in mid-2018 and will include a detailed progress report and timeline for achieving the water self-sufficiency goal.', 'Upcoming Water Studies', 'Water/Wastewater Rate Study & new 5-year rate adjustment schedule (2020 to 2024)', 'The current rate schedule was approved in early 2015 and provides potential rate adjustments for calendar years 2015 to 2019. Staff is preparing to begin a water and wastewater rate study by midyear 2018 in order to bring rate recommendations to Council in the fall of 2019.', 'Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (SGMA)', 'In May of 2017, Council approved a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) and the City’s participation in the formation of the Santa Monica Basin Groundwater Sustainability Agency (SMBGSA). At approximately the same time, Los Angeles County and the cities of Los Angeles, Beverly Hills, and Culver City also executed the MOU to form the SMBGSA. After the required 90-day posting period to allow public review of the MOU, no challenges to the MOU were received and the SMBGSA was designated the exclusive Groundwater Sustainability Agency (GSA) for the Santa Monica Basin. Milestone deadlines for the SMBGSA now include:', '· Preparation and submittal of a Groundwater Sustainability Plan (GSP) for the basin, January 31, 2022', '· Following the adoption of the GSP, and annually thereafter, the GSA must submit a GSP Monitoring Report, April 1, 2023', '· The GSP must include measurable objectives and milestones in increments of 5 years to achieve sustainability within 20 years of GSP adoption, January 31, 2042', 'The SMBGSA has initiated monthly meetings, led by Santa Monica, to address moving forward expeditiously to retain consultant(s) to assist with the preparation of the GSP, as well as to identify necessary amendments to the MOU as they relate to the potential development of bylaws and cost-sharing issues. Any amendments to the MOU agreed upon unanimously by the member agencies will be brought to the respective agencies’ governing bodies for approval.', 'Task Force on the Environment and Water Advisory Committee Actions', 'Findings of the preliminary SYA, progress on the update to the Sustainable Water Master Plan, and the Rate Adjustment recommendations were presented to the Environmental Task Force on September 18, 2017 and October 16, 2017. The same information was presented to the Water Advisory Committee on October 2, 2017, and November 6, 2017. No action was taken by either body; however during discussions of funding for sustainability projects, the Task Force passed the following two motions:', 'September 18, 2017', 'The City of Santa Monica Task Force on the Environment reinforces the position that all of the water settlement funds should be used to help the City get to and maintain water self-sufficiency and water perpetuity.', 'October 16, 2017', 'WHEREAS, there is $120 million from previous settlements.', 'WHEREAS, Water Fund capital improvement program (CIP) projects are estimated at $42 million over the next five years.', 'WHEREAS, the City is borrowing $56 million from the State of California to fund the Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP) to assist in achieving water self-sufficiency by 2020. The total cost of the project is estimated at $69.9 million.', 'THEREFORE, the Santa Monica Task Force on the Environment strongly supports the projects recommended by staff, but we are not currently recommending the proposed rate increase.', 'With regard to the water settlement funds referenced in the motions from the Task Force, staff prepared an information item dated December 19, 2017 (Attachment K), which outlines the sources and uses of those funds and the remaining balance of unrestricted funds that have been set aside in the General Fund to assist with funding of other priority projects as identified by Council.', 'To date, Council has made the determination to use both pay-as-you-go and debt financing to fundSustainable Water Master Planprojects. The pay-as-you-go funding comes from a combination of ratepayer-generated revenues and the $33.6 million balance of MTBEsettlement funds after thecompletion of remediation work atthe Charnock facility. These funds have been budgeted to pay for capital projects included in the last Water Rate Study approved in February 2015. For Fiscal Years 2014-15 through 2018-19, capital projects included and will include general system improvements such as emergency generator enhancements, water main replacements, and treatment plant pressure vessel repair, among others.  In September, 2017, the City entered into an agreement with the State Water Resources Control Boardto receive a very low interest (1.8%), 30-year loan in the amount of$56.9 million, with $4 million in debt forgiveness, to fund the SWIP projects. With this loan, the City was able to leverage funds at a lower rate than would be possible through other financing, and the $4 million in principal forgiveness further lowered the price of the financing. In the current economic climate, bond financing for lease revenue bonds or revenue bonds, whether in the General Fund or enterprise funds, is approximately 4-5%. As a result, the use of a Clean Water State Revolving Fund (CWSRF) loan leveraged funds at a lower price.', 'Staff proposed to transfer $11.1 million in FY 2017-18 from General Fund reserves for the 2009 Gillette water mediation settlement funds to the Water Fund reserves in order to cover ongoing and future costs for remediation of polluted groundwater in the Olympic Well Field / Sub-basin. $6.5M would be reserved for annual ongoing remediation costs for a ten-year period including monitoring, permitting and reporting required by the State; and $4.6M would be reserved as a contingency for other Olympic remediation-related costs.', 'The larger policy issue of the mix of financing between rate payer and water settlement resources will be addressed in the upcoming Capital Improvement Plan adoption process after the completion of the currently ongoing technical studies.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', '1. FY 2016-17 water sales increased 2.5% versus FY 2015-16, slightly above the 2% increase projected by staff, resulting in sales revenue $379,440 greater than budgeted. Although the State has discontinued its mandatory conservation requirement, the City has remained at Stage 2 of its Water Shortage Response Plan (mandatory 20% reduction versus 2013 levels) and implemented the Water Neutrality Ordinance for new developments effective July 1, 2017. As of October 2017, FY 2017-18 water sales of 1,786,912 HCF are down by 1% versus the same period in FY 2016-17 (1,807,373 HCF); therefore, staff projects water sales to finish FY 2017-18 1% lower than FY 2016-17. Based on a 5% water rate increase for calendar year 2018, increase revenue budget at account 25671.402310 in the amount of $161,660.', '2. Approval of the recommended action requires the following FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget appropriations and reductions in the Water Fund:', 'Account Number', 'Amount', 'C259078.589000 – Groundwater Management Plan', '$150,000', 'C259219.589000 – Arcadia Enhanced RO Recovery', '$250,000', 'C259220.589000 – Reservoir Improvements', '$900,000', 'C259223.589000 – DInSAR Study', '$100,000', 'C259224.589000 – City/USGS Numerical Flow Model', '$300,000', 'C250162.589000 – Water Resources Tenant Improvement', '($450,018)', 'C259209.589000 – Arcadia Water Plant Membrane', '($700,000)', 'Total', '$549,982', '3. Approval of the recommended action requires a FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget reduction in the Wastewater Fund in account C310162.589000 in the amount of $1,950,017.', '4. Approval of the recommended action requires an interfund transfer of $11,100,000 from Gillette-Boeing water mediation settlement funds in account 01695.570080 to the Water Fund in account 25695.570080. This also requires a release of fund balance 1.380237 in the amount of $11,100,000.']}
[[{'Title': 'Introduction of Police Chief Cynthia Renaud', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2967'}, {'Title': 'Proclamation: Municipal Clerks Week May 6-12, 2018', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2976'}, {'Title': 'Proclamation declaring May 2018 as Mental Health Awareness Month', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2974'}, {'Title': 'Proclamation designating May 2018 as Older Americans Month', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2986'}], [{'Title': 'Contractual Services Agreement for Citywide HVAC Maintenance and Repair', 'Department': 'Public Works, Facilities Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with ACCO Engineered Systems for maintenance of City heating, ventilation and air conditioning (HVAC) systems and large-scale repairs. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080(b) and is for a total amount not to exceed $1,499,064 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Facilities Maintenance Division contracts out heating, ventilation and air conditioning (HVAC) work for various City facilities including City Hall, the Public Safety Facility, City libraries and City fire stations. This contracted work augments the City’s in-house HVAC staff and generally focuses on large scale repairs and maintenance of intricate HVAC systems. Staff recommends piggybacking off of a competitive bid completed by the Big Blue Bus (BBB) last year and awarding the contract to ACCO Engineered Systems for an amount not to exceed $1,499,064 over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'In June 2017, Facilities Maintenance staff awarded informal bid 53907-OG to ACCO Engineered Systems. Staff executed a contractual services agreement, CT-4395, for a total amount not to exceed $175,000 over a two-year period. Upon the execution of CT-4395, it became apparent that the total not to exceed amount would be exhausted in less than two years as the City’s demand for HVAC contractual services has increased due to the addition of facilities at the Santa Monica Municipal Airport and aging HVAC systems citywide.', 'Discussion', 'The City employs five permanent in-house staff to provide various HVAC services at City facilities. Typical services provided by City staff include adjusting air controls, changing fan belts and providing basic preventative maintenance. Due to the large size and complexity of some City HVAC systems, in-house staff cannot meet all citywide HVAC needs. To ensure efficient operation and safe temperature-controlled environments for the public and staff, additional services are contracted out for:', '· the larger and more complex HVAC systems located at facilities such as the Santa Monica Municipal Airport, Santa Monica Main Library and the City’s fire stations;', '· large-scale projects that are often long-term and require specialized licensing and equipment; and', '· addressing equipment failures and emergency repair work in a timely manner to prevent shutdowns.', 'Immediate contracted services are needed to address a backlog of deferred maintenance which will require significant repairs and replacements to various City HVAC systems. Internal staff will then be able to take on most preventative maintenance throughout the City. The installation of new equipment will also reduce the demand for contractors to complete repairs.', 'Staff expects to complete the large-scale projects during the first two years of the contract in an amount not to exceed $850,000, for a total amount not to exceed $1,075,000 over a five-year period. Citywide routine preventative maintenance will be performed during the first two years of the contract in an amount not to exceed $164,350, for a total amount not to exceed $424,064 over a five-year period.', 'Staff recommends piggybacking on BBB’s bid award with ACCO Engineered Systems, at the same hourly rate, in an amount not to exceed $1,014,350 for two years, with one additional three-year renewal option, for a total amount not to exceed $1,499,064 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On March 21, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide maintenance and repair services for BBB’s HVAC and Air Movement systems in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-seven vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on April 6, 2017 (Attachment A). ACCO Engineered Systems and Richardson Technologies, Inc. submitted bids, and highlights from each are as follows:', 'Bids were evaluated based on criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. ACCO Engineered Systems, the lowest bidder, was recommended as the best bidder.', 'On June 13, 2017 Council awarded bid #4266 for the maintenance and repair of HVAC systems to ACCO Engineered Systems (Attachment A). Staff recommends piggybacking on BBB’s bid award with ACCO Engineered Systems, at the same hourly rate. The proposed agreement with ACCO Engineered Systems fully complies with the exceptions to competitive bidding, pursuant to Section 2.24.080(b) of the Santa Monica Municipal Code.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to ACCO Engineered Systems is for an amount not to exceed $1,499,064. Funds of $506,330 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Public Works Department. The contract will be charged to account 01274.570060 and expenditures will be transferred to departments incurring the contracting services. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2839'}, {'Title': 'Cost-Sharing Memorandum of Agreements with the City of Los Angeles for Two Coordinated Integrated Monitoring Plans for Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute two Memorandum of Agreements (MOA) with the City of Los Angeles to implement cost-sharing Coordinated Integrated Monitoring Plans (CIMPs) to comply with the Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board's National Pollution Discharge Elimination Systems (NPDES) permit requirements. One MOA is for the Santa Monica Bay and one MOA is for Ballona Creek.", 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City is obligated to comply with the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination Systems (NPDES) permit requirements to reduce pollution from runoff into the Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek. NPDES requirements include coordinated integrated monitoring plans to collect data and demonstrate compliance with water quality objectives specified in the permit. As a jurisdiction that drains into the Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek watersheds, the City is obligated to share the costs associated with implementing the coordinated integrated monitoring plans. The costs for the five-year monitoring period (FY 18/19 through FY 22/23) of the Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek MOAs would not exceed $572,027 and $16,946, respectively.', 'Background', 'The Federal Clean Water Act (CWA) requires the California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region (Board), to develop water quality standards that protect beneficial uses for each water body found within its region. Beneficial uses include swimming, fishing, drinking water, navigability, and wildlife habitats and reproduction. Section 303(d) of the CWA requires states to prepare a list of water bodies that do not meet water quality standards and establish Total Maximum Daily Loads (TMDLs) for each of these water bodies. A TMDL represents an amount of pollution that can be released by human activity and natural sources into a specific water body without causing a decline in water quality and beneficial uses.', 'The Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek watersheds have been included on California’s Section 303(d) list since 1998 due to impairments by bacteria, trash, organic chemicals and metals. The Board has adopted multiple TMDLs for these pollutants since 2003 in order to address these impairments.', 'The City Council approved an initial Santa Monica Bay MOA for cost-sharing bacterial monitoring on July 8, 2003. The City Council approved the Ballona Creek MOAs for cost-sharing monitoring for bacteria, metals and toxics on July 14, 2009.', 'In accordance with these TMDLs, the City of Los Angeles submitted a Coordinated Integrated Monitoring Plan (CIMP) for compliance with the TMDLs on behalf of the agencies within these watersheds. The City of Los Angeles is responsible for performing all required monitoring and reporting to the Board. The City of Los Angeles invoices the City of Santa Monica annually for its share of monitoring costs for Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek. The City Council approved the most recent three-year renewal of both MOAs on February 23, 2016, which end on June 30, 2018 (Attachment A).', 'Discussion', 'On November 28, 2012, the Board approved a new NDPES permit with more extensive monitoring requirements. The expanded CIMPs require the City to enter into new MOAs with the City of Los Angeles to reflect the additional monitoring protocols and requirements. Under the terms of the MOAs, the City of Los Angeles would continue to be responsible for all monitoring and reporting activities to the Board.', 'The new MOAs include additional costs associated with tasks that the City of Los Angeles performed at its own expense, in previous years, on behalf of other cities to meet the NPDES permit requirements. However, these costs have increased and the City of Los Angeles is proposing to include these additional costs in the updated MOAs. Costs reflect the following responsibilities:', '· Annual Reporting: As the principal reporting agency, the City of Los Angeles performs a number of tasks related to the annual report, such as water quality monitoring, annual rainfall tracking, and hydrology reporting.', '· Report of Waste Discharge:  Prepare application reporting on discharge locations that could affect urban runoff. Reapplication of the permit every five years.', '· Adaptive Management: Biannual reporting stating how cities have modified their stormwater program to better meet the permit requirements.', '· Reasonable Assurance Analysis: Per the permit, this analysis was performed during the 2012 permit period to complete Enhanced Watershed Management Plans (EWMPs). It must be performed again for the renewed permit. This analysis is a computer model simulation that predicts if the stormwater harvesting projects to be built within each watershed by cities will achieve EWMP requirements. The analysis demonstrates to the Board that cities will meet EWMP requirements and water quality standards.', '· Enhanced Watershed Management Plan (EWMP) Time Extension: There is an interim EWMP Implementation milestone set for April 11, 2018. Under the terms of the EWMP, the City of Los Angeles plans to submit a time extension on behalf of the cities in these watersheds to give cities more time to comply with the EWMP. This will allow for additional work to meet some of the water quality standards that will not likely be met before the 2018 compliance milestone.', '· Time Schedule Orders (Santa Monica Bay Bacterial TMDL):The final compliance milestone for the wet-weather bacterial TMDL is July 15, 2021. Under the terms of the EWMP, the City of Los Angeles plans to submit a Time Schedule Order, on behalf of the cities in these watersheds to give cities more time to comply with the TMDL. This will allow for additional work to meet some of the water quality standards that will not likely be met before the 2021 compliance milestone.', 'The additional cost to the City of Santa Monica associated with the above administrative (non-CIMP) tasks totals $181,780 for Santa Monica Bay and $2,543 for Ballona Creek watersheds.', 'The MOA five-year budgets for the CIMP and additional permit costs are listed below by fiscal year for each watershed.', 'Santa Monica Bay', 'Fiscal Year', 'Budget', '18/19', '$93,821', '19/20', '$116,324', '20/21', '$128,205', '21/22', '$85,396', '22/23', '$96,279', 'Contingency', '$52,002', 'Total', '$572,027', 'Ballona Creek', 'Fiscal Year', 'Budget', '18/19', '$6,096', '19/20', '$2,394', '20/21', '$2,920', '21/22', '$2,075', '22/23', '$2,284', 'Contingency', '$1,177', 'Total', '$16,946', 'The budgetary difference between the two watersheds is due to the difference in drainage area of the City: Santa Monica Bay – 19.76%; Ballona Creek – 0.28%.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'Santa Monica Bay', 'The MOA cost share for the Santa Monica Bay is for an amount not to exceed $572,027 over a five-year period through FY 2022-23. Funds of $93,821 are available in the Proposed FY 2018-19 budget in the Public Works Department. The MOA will be charged to account 06402.555170.', 'Ballona Creek', 'The MOA cost share for the Ballona Creek is for an amount not to exceed $16,946 over a five-year period through FY 2022-23. Funds of $6,096 are available in the Proposed FY 2018-19 budget in the Public Works Department. The MOA will be charged to account 06402.555170.', 'Future year funding for both agreements is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2867'}, {'Title': 'Accept Funding for the Green Business Certification Program', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Adopt the attached resolution authorizing the City to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $20,000 from the California Green Business Network for the Santa Monica Green Business Certification Program, and to accept all grant renewals.2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant and all grant renewals.3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City of Santa Monica’s Office of Sustainability and the Environment administers the Green Business Certification Program in order to increase the adoption of sustainable practices in the local business community. Santa Monica has operated this program since 2007, but recently became eligible for $20,000 in grant funds through the California Environmental Protection Agency. Since this is the first year State funding has become available, a resolution authorizing acceptance of $20,000 in year one, plus any future allocations, if awarded, is required.', 'Background', 'Assembly Bill No. 913 (Feuer) requires CalEPA to develop a California Green Business Program and provide support and assistance to local governments that provide voluntary green business certification programs for small- and medium-sized businesses. In 2017, the State budgeted $1,000,000 to continue these certification programs. The California Green Business Network (CAGBN) entered into Agreement 17EPA014 with CalEPA to manage the funds for existing and new programs as well as report on usage and deliverables. CAGBN is allocating $20,000 to each network jurisdiction to reach new small- and medium-sized businesses locally. In February 2018, CAGBN informed the Office of Sustainability and Environment that $20,000 would be allocated for the Santa Monica Green Business Certification Program upon entering into an agreement with CAGBN.', 'Discussion', 'Santa Monica’s Sustainable City Plan identifies a Sustainable Local Economy as one of its nine goal areas. Participation in the Santa Monica Green Business Certification Program (Program) is one of the indicators associated with this goal area. The Program recognizes businesses that voluntarily adopt sustainable business practices into their operations. These practices include energy efficiency, reductions in greenhouse gas emissions, water conservation, and waste reduction. The Program was introduced in 2007 and to date the City has certified approximately 170 businesses.', 'Santa Monica is one of 27 jurisdictions throughout California that operate local green business certification programs that make up the CAGBN. In 2017, State funding was established within the California Environmental Protection Agency’s budget to continue and expand the network model to serve 40,000 California businesses by 2040. CAGBN is allocating $20,000 to each of the 27 jurisdictions in the network. Since this is the first year State funding has become available, a resolution authorizing acceptance of $20,000 in year one, plus any future allocations, if awarded, is required.', 'Upon agreement execution with CAGBN, the City would receive $10,000 for the Program. The remaining $10,000 would be contingent upon certification or re-certification of eight businesses by October 1, 2018. The City has certified approximately 20 businesses per year through the Program since 2010.', 'The City would be required to commit matching funds, in the amount of $20,000, which may be met in any of the following ways:', '· staff and/or consultant time to assist and track businesses through the program;', '· staff and/or consultant marketing efforts;', '· business rebates for purchases that help businesses meet Program standards; and/or', '· staff and/or consultant travel expenses for events.', 'Average Program spending over fiscal years 2015-16 and 2016-17 amounted to $39,850, and this year program costs are expected to be $38,000. No additional staff time or budget enhancement would be required to meet the matching fund requirements because the existing program budget and staff allocations exceed the match requirement.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Award of a $20,000 grant from the California Green Business Network requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', '1. Establish revenue budget at account 20426.410410 in the amount of $20,000.', '2. Appropriate $20,000 to account 20426.579998 to reflect receipt of the Green Business Certification grant.', 'If renewals are awarded, budget changes will be included in subsequent year budgets, contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2937'}, {'Title': 'Award Bid for Re-manufacturing, Overhaul, Troubleshooting, and Repair Services for Allison Transmission', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #4320 to Western States Converters & Transmission, a California-based company, for remanufacturing, overhaul, troubleshooting, and repair of Allison automatic transmissions;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Western States Converters & Transmission, in an amount not to exceed $101,676, which includes a $9,243 contingency, for one year, with four-additional contract years in the amount of $406,703, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $508,379 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends award of Bid #4320 to Western States Converters and Transmission Inc., to provide remanufacture, overhaul, troubleshooting, and repair of transmissions for transit buses and fire vehicles, at specified unit prices plus labor and applicable sales taxes for a five-year period with successive years at the same price, terms and conditions as the first contract year. Under normal operating conditions, these transmissions need to be overhauled or replaced approximately every 250,000 miles, or at least once during the life cycle of these vehicles. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $508,379, which includes a 10% contingency, over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'On August 25, 2015, City Council awarded Bid #4191 to Western States Converters and Transmissions for an amount not to exceed $450,000 over a three-year period. This contract ensured that transmission that have reached their useful life cycle or have prematurely failed would be remanufactured to Original Equipment Manufacturer (OEM) specifications and returned to service in an efficient and timely manner. The existing contract ends on June 30, 2018 requiring BBB to solicit bids for Allison transmission remanufacture and overhaul services for its fleet of transit buses and Fire Department vehicles.', 'Discussion', 'BBB requires Allison transmission remanufacturing services for transit coaches and Fire Department apparatus that are equipped with Allison transmissions. These are heavy-duty transmissions with internal hydraulic retarders that supplement the braking system and allow for a smooth down shift and bus stop approach. Under normal operating conditions, transmissions have a useful life of approximately 250,000 miles. It is essential that a transmission be remanufactured approximately every 250,000 miles, as failure to do so could cause catastrophic failure of major internal transmission parts as well as impact service reliability of the bus system as a whole. BBB staff performs troubleshooting and repairs of the transmissions as well as the removal and replacement of the transmissions. However, the requirements for remanufacturing of the transmissions exceed current in-house capabilities. The award of this bid would ensure that Allison transmissions that have reached their useful life or have prematurely failed would be remanufactured to OEM specifications and that the vehicles would return to service in a timely manner.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014, Council directed staff to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” transmission repair services were identified as meeting criteria for contractual services under the categories of specialized expertise, and capital equipment requirements.', 'The remanufacture of transmissions requires specialized expertise as well as capital equipment needed to conduct dynamometer tests in-house. Bringing this service in-house would require the purchase and storage of additional capital equipment, one additional full-time employee, and in-depth training of staff on the method and process of remanufacturing an Allison transmission. Bid #4320 requires the vendor to provide all necessary tooling and equipment to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment as well as personnel and training.', 'Based on the recommendations of the January 13, 2015 staff report, staff solicited bids for outside contracting of Allison transmission remanufacture, overhaul, troubleshooting, and repair services, for BBB transit buses and fire vehicles.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On February 15, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide transit bus and fire vehicle Allison transmission remanufacture, overhaul, troubleshooting, and repair services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fourteen (14) vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publically opened on March 6, 2018, per the table below:', 'Cost Estimate', 'Performance Truck & Trailer', 'Western States Converters & Transmission', 'Estimate 5-year Period', '$571,226', '$462,163', '10% Contingency', '$57,123', '$46,216', 'Contract 5-year Total', '$628,348', '$508,379', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Western States Converters & Transmission has had a positive history of performing Allison transmission remanufacture services for BBB and Fire Department during the course of its previous contract with the City and is able to meet all of the City’s requirements in addition to being the lowest bidder. Based on these criteria, Western States Converters & Transmission is recommended as the best bidder and staff recommends that Council award Bid #4320 to Western States Converters & Transmission for Allison transmission remanufacture, overhaul, troubleshooting and repair services. The total expenditure for the five-year period is not to exceed $508,379.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Western States Converters & Transmission is for an amount not to exceed $508,379, which includes a 10% contingency. Funds of $70,201 are included in in BBB’s proposed FY 2018-19 Budget Plan and funds of $31,474 are included in the Fire Department’s proposed budget. The contract will be charged to accounts C6004750.689000 and 01190001.529470, respectively.  FY 2018-19 and future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2902'}, {'Title': 'Approval of the Proposed FY 2018-19 One-Year Action Plan Allocating Federal Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and HOME Investment Partnerships Act Program (HOME) Entitlement Grant Funds', 'Department': 'Community & Cultural Services', 'Sponsors': 'Director Andy Agle', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Approve the Proposed FY2018-19 One-Year CDBG and HOME Action Plan (Attachments A and A1). Authorize the City Manager to submit all documents required to receive the City’s annual Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnerships Act (HOME) entitlement grant funds to the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD).', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Santa Monica is a longtime recipient of Federal block grant funding through the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD). The Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) dates to the Ford Administration and is designed to benefit the residents of eligible low and moderate income neighborhoods. The HOME Investment Partnerships Program (HOME)  was enacted in 1990 and is the largest Federal block grant to state and local governments designed exclusively to create affordable housing for low-income households. To be eligible for these program’s grant funds for FY 2018-19, the City must submit a Council-approved One-Year Action Plan to HUD within sixty days of notification of FY 2018-19 funding allocations, and no later than August 15, 2018. The purpose of the Action Plan is to outline how funds will be expended and to confirm that the funded activities are consistent with the City’s Five-Year Consolidated Plan adopted by Council on May 12, 2015 (Attachment B). The Proposed FY 2018-19 One-Year Action Plan (Attachments A and A1) allocates an estimated $1.8M in CDBG and HOME funds for capital projects, residential rehabilitation, public service programs, tenant-based rental assistance and program administration. Proposed FY 2018-19 CDBG and HOME funding allocations remain level with FY 2017-18 allocations. Specific appropriations of these funds will be included in the Proposed FY 2018-19 Exception Based Budget and the Proposed FY 2018-20 CIP Biennial Budget.', 'Background', 'In order to receive federal entitlement funds from the CDBG and HOME programs, the City must submit a five-year Consolidated Plan to HUD. The Consolidated Plan is implemented through five one-year Action Plans, prepared and adopted annually, which outline projects and activities to achieve the goals established therein. The City’s current 2015-2019 Consolidated Plan, submitted to HUD in May 2015, identifies high priority needs and the associated goals, strategies, and resources anticipated over a five-year period. Priority needs are identified through the Consolidated Plan Needs Assessment, which incorporates data from the Census and the American Community Survey; local information from the City of Santa Monica’s Housing Element, Analysis of Impediments to Fair Housing, and Rent Control Board Annual Report; and input from the public, City staff, partner organizations, and community stakeholders. The following identified priority needs align with the City’s Framework outcome areas for Community, Place & Planet, Health, and Economic Opportunity as well as strategic goals for Homelessness and Inclusive and Diverse Community.', '· Safe, Affordable Housing (Rehabilitation, Emergency Repairs)', '· Public Facilities and Infrastructure', '· Supportive Housing for Persons with Special Needs', '· Economic Development', '· Fair Housing', '· Homeless Activities (Prevention, Emergency Shelters, Supportive Housing)', '· Public Services (Seniors, Youth, Homelessness, Persons with Disabilities)', 'The Proposed FY 2018-19 Action Plan is part of the City’s broader efforts to advance its strategic goals and support its most vulnerable populations through local and regional programs. All proposed projects directly advance strategic goals for Homelessness and Inclusive and Diverse Community. Specific goal outcomes and strategies addressed include expanding affordable housing opportunities, raising incomes for low-moderate income families, helping Santa Monica residents stay in their homes, preventing homelessness, and enhancing the City’s efforts with regional partnerships to transition those experiencing homelessness into housing.', 'Santa Monica also partners with outreach staff at LA County and local service providers to engage, stabilize, and connect homeless individuals to housing through the Homeless Multidisciplinary Street Team (HMST) and Los Angeles County C3 teams. City efforts are leveraged with County-funded outreach teams such as the Integrated Mobile Health Team (IMHT) and Street Medicine teams. The City coordinates housing and services for the most vulnerable homeless individuals through the Chronic Homeless Project (CHP), a partnership between the Santa Monica Housing Authority, Santa Monica Police Department, SM Fire, Community and Cultural Services Department, City-funded homeless providers, and the County. Additional City efforts include the Preserving our Diversity (POD) program to help rent-burdened residents retain housing, the Senior Housing Task Force, a collaborative of City and County departments and non-profit agencies serving older adults at risk of losing their housing, and the wide variety of services funded through the Human Services Grants Program.', 'Regionally, the City coordinates its efforts with the Los Angeles Continuum of Care (CoC) by participating in the Los Angeles County Homeless Initiative, led by the Los Angeles Homeless Services Authority (LAHSA). The City also participates in the Continuum of Care Coordinated Entry System (CES) along with county departments, housing authorities, the Veterans Administration (VA), and service providers to match people who are homeless to appropriate housing options.', 'Discussion', 'The Proposed FY 2018-19 One-Year Action Plan represents the fourth year of the City’s 2015-19 Consolidated Plan and details program allocations for CDBG and HOME funds to address the high-priority needs identified in the City’s 2015-19 Consolidated Plan.', 'Both programs benefit residents with special needs and incomes at or below 80% of area median income (low and moderate income). The City’s estimated CDBG and HOME allocations reflect level funding from FY2017-18. The $1.8M FY 2018-19 estimated funding allocations include:', '· CDBG: $1,031,923 in new federal funds, $109,000 in prior year unallocated funds and $100,000 in projected program income funds for capital projects, public service, and administration.', '· HOME: $431,177 in new federal funds and $100,000 in program income for tenant-based rental assistance and administration.', 'CDBG and HOME programs provide funding to support affordable housing, capital improvements, and administrative reimbursement. In accordance with federal regulations, a maximum of 15 percent of current year CDBG funding may be allocated for public service to nonprofit organizations. Public service allocations support Human Services Grants Program agencies working to address and prevent homelessness by providing support services to low-income households, including people who are experiencing homelessness or at high risk of homelessness, people with disabilities, and the frail elderly.', 'Proposed projects for the FY 2018-19 funding period include:', '· Residential Rehabilitation (CDBG, $570,000): Repair or rehabilitation of housing units occupied by low-income households.', '· Public Infrastructure (CDBG, $246,703): Complete infrastructure improvements in low/moderate income areas.', '· Disability Community Resource Center/Home Access Program (CDBG, $36,644): Provide minor home modifications for low-income persons with disabilities.', '· St. Joseph Center/Chronic Homeless Program (CDBG, $44,624): Provide assertive outreach and intensive case management to chronically homeless persons.', '· Chrysalis/Employment Program (CDBG, $40,000): Assist low-income and homeless persons in developing job skills and securing and retaining employment.', '· Legal Aid Foundation of Los Angeles/Legal Services (CDBG, $80,000): Provide legal services to low-income residents, including tenant harassment and eviction prevention.', '· Tenant-Based Rental Assistance (HOME, $413,382): Rental subsidies for qualifying low-income households who may be at risk of losing housing.', '· Planning, Administration, CHDO Reserve (CDBG, $222,952; HOME $117,795)', 'The Proposed FY 2018-19 One-Year Action Plan assumes level funding for CDBG and HOME. Although HUD has yet to formally announce FY 2018-19 CDBG and HOME allocations, Congressional agreement on the FY 2018 omnibus spending bill on March 21, 2018 included a 7.8% overall increase to CDBG funding and a 43.4% overall increase to HOME funding. City staff anticipates the formal release of HUD’s FY 2018-19 CDBG and HOME allocations and will incorporate those figures into the final draft of the FY 2018-19 Action Plan. Any cuts to future allocations will erode the City’s social safety net and limit capital improvements to low-income areas and public facilities.', 'To that end, staff will continue to monitor federal budget developments in order to identify any potential impacts to HUD’s future allocations.', 'Public Outreach', 'The Proposed FY 2018-19 One-Year Action Plan was made available for a 30-day public review period from March 22, 2018 to April 20, 2018. The Plan was also presented to the Housing Commission on April 19, 2018 and to the Social Services Commission on April 23, 2018. Staff will incorporate any input received through the public review process into the final version. The Council approved Action Plan must be submitted to HUD within sixty days of notification of FY 2018-19 funding allocations, and no later than August 15, 2018.', 'Public Hearing', 'Pursuant to Municipal Code Section 2.68.050, the City has adopted a public comment process which requires two public hearings prior to the adoption of a Consolidated Plan and Action Plan. The public hearings held on February 13, 2018 at the Council Meeting and March 15, 2018 at the Housing Commission satisfy the two meeting requirement to receive public input and recommendations for the Proposed FY2018-19 Action Plan.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Staff projections for these awards will be included in various account numbers as part of the City’s Proposed FY 2018-19 Exception Based Budget and the Proposed FY 2018-20 CIP Biennial Budget. HUD’s submission requirements for the CDBG and HOME Action Plan precede the City Council’s approval of the City’s Budget.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2941'}, {'Title': 'Memorandum of Understanding for 2018 Soulstice Event', 'Department': 'Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Memorandum of Understanding with the Main Street Business Improvement Association to co-produce the 2018 Summer Soulstice event.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Summer Soulstice festival is an annual community event that the Main Street Business Improvement Association (MSBIA) has held since 2001 to showcase the Main Street commercial district. The event attracts approximately 7,000 to 10,000 local and regional attendees to hear live music and to experience the businesses along the one-mile business corridor. Beginning in 2011, the City has provided funding and staffing assistance to MSBIA for the event’s production. Staff recommends a memorandum of understanding to define the roles, responsibilities, and contributions of each party.', 'For the first time in its history, the 2018 Soulstice festival proposes to close a portion of Main Street to vehicle traffic. Starting at Pico Boulevard and extending south to Ocean Park Boulevard, the street would be closed from 10:00 AM to 9:00 PM. The street closure would not only expand the capacity for public participation in the event, it would also allow for additional activation of the area. The proposed street closure also increases the costs for staging the event, especially in the areas of public safety and traffic control. While MSBIA is working to raise additional funding for the event through increased sponsorships and vendors, a funding gap is anticipated. At its April 10, 2018 meeting, Council allocated an additional $14,000 of its discretionary funds to MSBIA to help offset the additional public safety expense.', 'Background', 'The Main Street Business Improvement Association (MSBIA) has produced the Summer Soulstice festival (Soulstice), an annual, free, one-day, live-music event, since2001. The event features bands on stages located on several closed side streets along Main Street, as well as an accompanying sidewalk sale by Main Street merchants, and, in some years, an entertainment area for children. The summer event was organized to celebrate Main Street’s businesses, attract residents and visitors to the area, and expand the entertainment offerings provided at the Sunday Main Street Farmers Market. The event brings vitality to the street, offers the community an opportunity to enjoy free, live musical entertainment in an outdoor setting, and provides an economic boost to the retailers and restaurants on Main Street. The Main Street commercial district begins at Pico Boulevard to the north and extends to the southern City boundary, just south of Marine Street.', 'For many years, MSBIA’s Executive Director and the organization’s board members solely produced and financed the one-day Summer Soulstice event. As production costs and administrative responsibilities have risen over time, MSBIA has sought participants to help with the administrative duties, as well as sponsors and vendors to help offset the expense.', 'Beginning in FY 2011-12 and annually thereafter, Council has allocated discretionary funds to support events organized by the business improvement districts (BIDs) that include MSBIA, as well as the Pico Boulevard and Montana Avenue districts. Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. does not participate in the discretionary funding allocation since it is primarily organized as a property-based assessment district. MSBIA has used the discretionary funds to cover the City’s fees related to the production of the Soulstice event. The amount of Council discretionary funds allocated to MSBIA has varied each year. The City provided $2,500 in FY 2011-12; $3,750 in FY 2012-13, and $7,000 in FY 2013-14. In FY 2014-15, the amount of discretionary funding was reduced to $4,000 because the City was able to reduce Police and Fire staffing costs associated with the event. In FY 2015-16 and FY 2016-17, Council provided $7,000 in discretionary funds to MSBIA and to each of the other BIDs. For FY 2017-18, the City has increased the amount each of the three BIDs receives to $8,000.', 'In 2011, the City’s Buy Local program began providing partnership grant funds to the three BIDs of up to $1,500 annually. MSBIA has primarily used the Buy Local grant to help fund some of the Summer Soulstice marketing and promotion costs, as the event helps promote the Buy Local program.', 'In 2015, the City established an Event Partnership Administrative Instruction (AI) that specified conditions and requirements for City sponsorship and co-production of community events. The AI authorizes the City to partner with organizations to provide funds, fee waivers, and use of City staff time for planning and implementation of qualified events. The value of the sponsorship or co-production varies. The City co-produced the 2015 Summer Soulstice event and MSBIA received approximately $13,604 in City support, comprised of Council discretionary funds, Buy Local funds, fee waivers, fee reductions, and in-kind staff time to contribute to the event’s total expense of approximately $32,000. The City also co-produced the 2016 Soulstice festival, and MSBIA received $16,823 in City support, which included allowing for an over-the-street banner, promotion of the event via the City’s social media outlets, fee waivers, fee reductions, and additional City fees associated with public safety staffing requirements, to help offset the total event expense of approximately $40,000. The value of the City resources provided to MSBIA is based on the actual cost of City fees, as well as staff time. While the City was considered a co-producer for both the 2015 and 2016 Soulstice events, both events were processed by the Community and Cultural Service events program and no MOU was executed.', 'At its February 28, 2017 meeting, Council authorized staff to enter into a MOU with MSBIA to co-produce the 2017 Soulstice festival (Attachment A). MSBIA received $19,313 of City support in the form of expense reimbursement, in-kind staff assistance, and some fee waivers to contribute towards the total event expense of approximately $66,000. The City’s increased support in 2017 was primarily due to a change in the City’s parking-rate structure for reserving spaces in the City parking lots.', 'The Soulstice festival is a signature event for MSBIA and the Main Street commercial district. The City has historically welcomed the opportunity to co-produce the event because it aligns with several City’s goals. For example, the event draws a broad audience that includes both locals and regional visitors of all ages. The festival also brings the community together and creates a sense of connection where attendees can gather and socialize. In addition, the event allows attendees to explore Main Street stores and restaurants, and encourages spending locally, thereby supporting Economic Opportunity.', 'Discussion', 'For several years, MSBIA has been interested in the closure of Main Street in conjunction with Soulstice in order to expand the event program area and increase pedestrian circulation. Due to the success of COAST, the open-streets event the City produced in 2016 and 2017, MSBIA requested the closure of Main Street for the 2017 Soulstice. Staff determined that a variety of internal policies and requirements would need to be addressed in order to permit the closure of Main Street and that there was insufficient time to do so prior to the 2017 event. While evaluating the closure of Main Street from Pico Boulevard to the southern City boundary for the 2018 Soulstice, aclosure of Main Street from Pico to Ocean Park Boulevard was agreed upon between staff and MSBIA. The 2018 Soulstice festival will be held on June 24, 2018. Main Street will be closed to vehicle traffic beginning at Pico Boulevard, and extending south to Ocean Park Boulevard from 10:00AM to 9:00PM. The street closure allows for additional activations, and it will provide attendees a new way to interact and experience the businesses along Main Street. The Ocean Park Association expressed their support for the closure of Main Street as part of the 2018 Soulstice.', 'The street closure also increases the costs for staging the event because of the increased requirements for public safety and traffic control. For 2018’s Soulstice, water barricades will be required at a cost of approximately $15,000; the costs for fire and medical personnel is estimated at $7,800, an increase of $6,500 from the 2017 Soulstice; and additional traffic control and police cost is estimated at $5,100, an increase of $2,200 from 2017. The public safety expenses add up to a total of $27,900 in production costs, an increase of $23,700 over 2017’s costs.', 'While MSBIA has been working to offset the increased costs by increasing the number of sponsors and vendors, at its April 10, 2018 meeting, Council allocated an additional $14,000 in discretionary funds to help with the additional public safety and traffic control expenses. For FY 2017-18, MSBIA will receive a total of $22,000 in Council discretionary funds, reflecting $14,000 allocated on April 10, 2018 and $8,000 allocated for FY 2017-18.', 'Staff recommends that the City enter into a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with MSBIA to co-produce the 2018 Soulstice festival being held on June 24, 2018. This is the second year the City will formalize its co-production of the event by entering into an MOU with MSBIA that would outline the scope of the event, responsibilities of each party, and City support. Staff anticipates that the amount of City support for the 2018 Soulstice will be higher than what was provided in 2017 due to the increased expenses associated with the street closure. The MOU would assign MSBIA with the responsibility for obtaining all appropriate permits, as well as organizing and managing the event. The City would be responsible for providing oversight and coordination of the City’s permitting process, access to the street banner on Main Street, coordination of the City’s social media promotion of the event, fee waivers, fee reductions, and $23,500 in direct financial assistance to support the event. MSBIA would be responsible for contracting with an event promoter, musical acts, securing the event space on private property, contracting with vendors and sponsors, and managing the event expenses, which are estimated at $71,500.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Funds in the amount of $23,500 to support the event are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the City Council and Housing and Economic Development Departments at accounts 01201.579002 ($22,000) and 012681.522340 ($1,500), respectively. The indirect costs associated with the event, including fee waivers, fee reductions, and in-kind staff time, are funded from the various City department budgets, including Housing and Economic Development, Community and Cultural Services, Police, and Fire.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2942'}, {'Title': 'Contract Approval for Design Services for 4th Street Pedestrian and Bicycle Improvements Phase II', 'Department': 'Mobility (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP #142 to Cannon Corporation, a California based company, to provide design services for the 4th Street Pedestrian and Bicycle Improvements Phase II Project.Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Cannon Corporation in an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 10% contingency) for an initial two-year term and a one-year renewal option.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City’s Downtown Community Plan emphasizes the need to adequately serve riders who will benefit from direct, clear, and improved routes to and from the Expo terminus station at 4th Street and Colorado Avenue. The 4th Street Pedestrian and Bicycle Improvements Project is a phased, grant-funded implementation effort for walking and biking enhancements on 4th Street between Broadway and Olympic Drive. Phase I improved the east side of 4th Street between Broadway and Colorado Avenue, and was completed in June 2017. Phase II extends Phase I improvements from Colorado Avenue to Olympic Drive including the Caltrans bridge structure over the I-10 Freeway. Staff recommends Cannon Corporation (Cannon), a planning and engineering consultant, to provide the design services for the 4th Street Phase II Project in an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 10% contingency). Staff anticipates up to 12 months for the design phase of the project with public outreach beginning fall 2018 and construction beginning fall 2019.', 'Background', 'The 4th Street Pedestrian and Bicycle Improvements Project is being developed as part of an overall phased implementation effort for enhanced north-south connections to the Expo terminus station that complements the Colorado Esplanade east-west connections, completed in June 2016. The 4th Street Phase I Project was completed in June 2017, providing an improved connection north of the station between Colorado Avenue and Broadway. Phase I improvements included new pedestrian scale lighting, new trees and grates, and pavement etching along the east side of the roadway. Sharrow lane markings were also added between Broadway and Olympic Drive.', 'Phases I and II are funded through a combination of Active Transportation Program (ATP) state grant funds and local matching funds. The purpose of ATP is to encourage increased use of active modes of transportation, such as walking and biking. On January 26, 2016 (Attachment A), Council authorized the City Manager to accept $1,613,000 in ATP funding for the design and construction of Phase II improvements.', 'On June 19, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposal (RFP) for professional design services for the Project and one (1) proposal was received. Due to the bid amount exceeding the available budget and the consultant team’s limited experience with public streetscape within Caltrans ROW, Council approved the staff recommendation to reject the single proposal and re-advertise on September 12, 2017 (Attachment B). To engage prospective consulting firms and achieve a better result, staff implemented the following modifications to the RFP to be re-advertised:', '· Listing available budget for design services;', '· Refining scope of work to emphasize public streetscape, Caltrans ROW, and Caltrans bridge structure experience; and', '· Increasing the duration of the bid posting from 3 weeks to 1 month.', 'Discussion', 'The opening of the Downtown Santa Monica Expo terminus station at 4th Street and Colorado Avenue is increasing the number of people walking in the Downtown and Civic Center. In recognition of this catalyst transit investment and the opportunities for improved mobility, the City’s Downtown Community Plan calls for direct, clear, and improved walking and biking routes to and from the station.', 'Improved station connections on 4th Street are being implemented in grant-funded phases, with Phase 1 completed in June 2017. This Phase II Project (Project) extends improvements south of the station between Colorado Avenue and Olympic Drive including the Caltrans bridge structure over the freeway. The Project will develop a final design that integrates with the existing improvements on the 4th Street Phase I and Colorado Esplanade projects. By doing so, a pedestrian-oriented connection is created in every direction, helping people to interpret their surroundings and orient themselves to final destinations. Improvements include:', '· Pedestrian-oriented lighting to enhance visibility, increase safety, and accommodate increased pedestrian volumes.', '· Shade trees (Gingko biloba) to improve pedestrian comfort and Date Palm trees (Phoenix dactylifera) to reinforce wayfinding.', '· Enhanced freeway bridge guardrail and/or fencing to buffer pedestrians from freeway noise and improve pedestrian comfort/sense of safety while preserving view corridors. Elements could include uplighting, planters, and lighting.', '· Tightened curb radii to reduce vehicle turning speeds and improve pedestrian safety.', '· Reconstructed accessible ramps (dual directional ramps preferred).', '· New north-leg crosswalk with accessible curb ramps, advance stop-bars, and bike boxes at the 4th Street/Olympic Drive intersection.', '· Widen sidewalk at the northeast corner of the 4th Street/Olympic Drive intersection to improve the pedestrian travel path and provide an enlarged pedestrian waiting area.', '· Enhanced crosswalk markings.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On October 18, 2017, the City issued Request for Proposals (RFP) #142 to obtain design services for the 4th Street Phase II Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 113 vendors downloaded the RFP request and one (1) proposal from Cannon Corporation (Cannon) was received on November 20, 2017. Based on the combined distribution of the original RFP advertised in July and the modified RFP re-advertised in October, staff is satisfied that advertising the RFP a third time would not necessarily attract additional responses. Following a review of submittal requirements, Cannon’s proposal was accepted and evaluated based on the criteria outlined in the RFP, which included project understanding, relevant experience, quality of staff, familiarity with state and federal procedures, and demonstrated technical project success. On December 14, 2017, the Cannon consultant team was interviewed by project staff from Planning and Community Development and Public Works.', 'On December 15, 2017, following a comprehensive review of Cannon’s proposal and interview with the consultant team, the evaluation team selected Cannon to provide the design services for the Project based on its team composition and proven experience in designing and advancing public streetscape enhancements, particularly where Caltrans bridge structures are involved; project approach and understanding; and commitment to deliver the project to the City on schedule and within budget. Based on Section 2.24.073 of the Municipal Code and these criteria, Cannon is recommended as the sole and best qualified firm.', 'For state and/or federal funded consultant contracts greater than $150,000, Caltrans requires submittal and approval of their Local Assistance Procedures Manual Exhibit 10-C form prior to contract award. Exhibit 10-C identifies critical elements of the consultant procurement process to ensure local agency compliance with state and/or federal consultant procurement requirements. Staff received Caltrans Exhibit 10-C approval on April 26, 2018.', 'Next Steps', 'Cannon would develop and deliver a City approved, community supported, and technically vetted final design and construction documents. Due to the grant funding component of this Project and required Caltrans involvement, staff anticipates 9-12 months for the design phase of the project depending on Caltrans coordination, with public outreach beginning fall 2018 and construction beginning fall 2019.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The professional services agreement to be awarded to Cannon for the 4th Street Phase II Project is for an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 10% contingency) for an initial two-year term and a one-year renewal option. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:', 'Account   _FY 17/18', 'C209097.589300 $252,000', 'C019097.589000  $63,000', 'Total   $315,000'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2944'}, {'Title': 'Professional Service Agreement and Modification to Maintenance Agreement for Selectron Technologies IVR/IWR system', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Selectron Technologies, an Oregon-based company, for professional services to upgrade the City’s Building Inspection Scheduling System and Integrated Voice and Web Response systems. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (d), as competition does not exist because Selectron Technologies is the only vendor qualified to provide support for its proprietary software.  The total contract amount would not exceed $25,000. Future year funding would be contingent on Council budget approval.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to agreement No. 9745 (CCS) in the amount of $162,845 with Selectron Technologies, an Oregon-based company, for software maintenance and support of services over a period of five years. This would result in a ten-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $251,905, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City strives to offer outstanding customer service and uses the Selectron Technologies Integrated Voice Response (IVR) and Integrated Web Response (IWR) systems to enable the public to schedule building and safety inspections via phone or online. The system is integrated with the City’s permitting system, Accela Automation, and shares important inspection data between the two systems without requiring redundant manual data entry. Some of the system components are outdated and fail to function properly.  A system upgrade is required.  Along with upgrade services, staff also seeks approval to extend the software maintenance and support services to continue to receive software updates and technical support.  At this time, staff recommends executing a professional service agreement with Selectron Technologies (Selectron) for a one-time system upgrade in an amount not to exceed $25,000 and to extend the software maintenance and support agreement for an additional five years in an amount not to exceed $162,845, for a combined total not to exceed $187,845. This would result in total cost not to exceed $276,905 over a ten-year period.', 'Background', 'On October 14, 1997 (Attachment A), following a solicitation process, Council approved the purchase of the IVR system with Selectron. In 2006, the City upgraded the Selectron software, including IWR. On June 11, 2013 (Attachment B), Council approved a sole source agreement with Selectron in the amount of $89,060 to cover software maintenance and support for an additional five years, extending the term to June 30, 2018.', 'Discussion', 'Recently, integration between Accela Automation and Selectron has failed to function properly due to the installed software version, which is outdated. This issue has resulted in an increasing number of complaints from the public, as well as from City staff who utilize the software and assist the public in resolving issues. Currently, customers receive an outbound call from the IVR system to notify them of the inspector’s estimated arrival time, as well as updates on inspections. Sometimes, these outbound calls are cut-off due to the outdated software. As a result, customers could miss their inspection window and feel negative about their service experience. Many industries now utilize text messaging technology for notification purposes. Having the ability to use text messaging instead of outbound calls is vital to improving customer service. Upgrading the system would resolve all functionality issues, as well as enable new features and system functionality, which would improve overall user experience.', 'Additionally, the current software maintenance and support agreement expires in June 2018. It is critical that the City extend the maintenance and support services to ensure business continuity and to ensure that the City continues to receive system updates and product support.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'Originally purchased in 1998 and upgraded in 2006, the software licenses purchased by the City for the Selectron IVR and IWR systems are perpetual and require no renewal.', 'In 2018, staff began to review other IVR and IWR systems. Staff researched the market and found the only other competitive IVR and IWR system that would integrate with the City’s Land Based Management System, Accela Automation, and determined that the system would cost twice as much as the Selectron system. The City has made significant investments in capital and dedicated considerable time in training staff and the public to use the Selectron system.  In addition, the additional cost to implement a new system at this time would not be cost efficient.', 'The advanced technology and features that Selectron has developed for its IVR and IWR systems are only supported and can only be maintained by Selectron. Therefore, staff recommends that the award for the upgrade services be approved as an exception to the competitive bidding process, as specified in SMMC 2.24.080 (d), as Selectron is the only vendor qualified to provide support and enhancements of its proprietary software.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The professional services agreement and modification to be awarded to Selectron is for an amount not to exceed $187,845.  Funds in the amount of $54,445 for the upgrade services and year 1 software maintenance and support are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department at account 01321.533580.  Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2958'}, {'Title': 'Second Modification to WaterSmart Professional Services Agreement for continued development, licensing and maintenance of WaterSmart Software', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to Professional Service Agreement #9878 in the amount of $104,500 with WaterSmart Software, Inc. (WSI), a California-based company, for the continued development, licensing and maintenance of WaterSmart, a web-based customer engagement and data analytics software platform to track, compare and provide water use analysis and efficiency reports. This will result in a six-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed of $294,500, with future funding contingent upon Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In the face of the recent severe drought and future limitations on imported water availability, Santa Monica has set an ambitious goal of water self-sufficiency by 2020. To help meet the goal of reducing water demand, WaterSmart is a web-based customer engagement and data analytics software platform for customers and staff to track, compare, analyze, and communicate on water use. Staff extensively utilizes WaterSmart to communicate with customers and promote the City’s water conservation programs. WaterSmart is also used in the City’s Automated Metering Infrastructure (AMI) Pilot Program to analyze real-time water consumption data, quickly detect leaks, and send alerts. Staff requests a second modification to the agreement with WaterSmart Software, Inc. in the amount of $104,500, for a new total amount not to exceed $294,500 over a six-year period, and to extend the contract by two years with a new expiration date of June 30, 2020.', 'Background', 'Council approved the Sustainable Water Master Plan (SWMP), which includes a list of water conservation programs and projects to help the City meet its water self-sufficiency goal by 2020. This list includes the purchase of WaterSmart. Following a competitive request for proposals (RFP) process, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional service agreement with WaterSmart Software, Inc. for the licensing, development and maintenance of WaterSmart for a total amount not to exceed $190,000 over a four-year period on February 25, 2014 (Attachment A). Staff subsequently executed a first modification to this agreement to extend the contract expiration to June 30, 2018.', 'Discussion', 'WaterSmart provides a user-friendly dashboard for water customers and staff to track and compare water usage.', 'Over 6,000 single-family water customers use the system to supplement their bimonthly utility bill with:', '· Easy-to-understand graphs and charts to show water customers their usage compared to their Water Use Allowance', '· Customized suggestions to conserve water', '· Comparisons of their water use to similar size homes in the City', '· High-usage alerts and tools to communicate with staff', 'A May 2017 survey of the City’s single-family water customers conducted by WaterSmart Software, Inc. showed 70% of respondents were more water efficient as a result of the WaterSmart reports and that satisfaction with City water services increased from 65% to 73%.', 'The system allows water staff to:', '· View and analyze consumption for all water accounts citywide. Data can be viewed and analyzed by customer class, consumption, geography, and individual account.', '· Identify potential leaks and generate leak reports used by staff to notify customers', '· Notify customers via text and voice alerts to potential leaks', '· Engage customers on ongoing water-saving measures such as conservation programs and rebates through email and group messaging', 'In addition, WaterSmart is a critical tool used to track water usage and evaluate savings for the Advanced Metering Infrastructure (AMI) Pilot Program. The initial pilot phase of the program replaced approximately 700, or 4%, of the City’s meters with new, AMI-enabled units. The first phase of the pilot program concluded in March 2018 and successfully demonstrated the technical feasibility and reliability of AMI within the City. Now staff are using WaterSmart to assess water usage savings, view and analyze AMI data, immediately identify leaks and high usage patterns, and send customer alerts and notifications. Continued access to WaterSmart would allow data collection to include all seasonal fluctuations in water use and would provide time for staff to complete an analysis of the AMI water savings by the end of FY 2018-19.', 'A second modification to the agreement with WaterSmart Software, Inc. through June 30, 2020, would allow staff to continue using the software for water conservation promotion, finalize a study to accurately determine water conservation from WaterSmart and conduct a full water savings analysis of the AMI Pilot Project.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to WaterSmart Software, Inc. is $104,500 for an amended contract total not to exceed $294,500. Funds in the amount of $36,377 are included in the Proposed FY 2018-19 Capital Improvement Program budget. Funds in the amount of $15,873 are included and in the Proposed FY 2018-19 operating budget in the Public Works Department. The contract will be charged to the following accounts:', 'C250388.589000 $36,377', '25671.533580  $15,873', 'TOTAL   $52,250 (covering the first year of the two year extension totaling $104,500)', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2969'}, {'Title': 'Fifth Modification to  Agreement 9210 (CCS) with Conduent State & Local Solutions, Inc. to add the Installment Payment Plans Software Module to Process Payment Plans for Parking Citations', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fifth modification to agreement #9210 (CCS) in an estimated amount of $61,250 with Conduent State & Local Solutions, Inc., a New Jersey-based company, to add the Installment Payment Plans software module to process payment plans for parking citations in compliance with Assembly Bill 503. The nine-year term of the contract will remain unchanged. This will result in a nine-year amended agreement with a new estimated total amount of $14,561,250, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City currently contracts with Conduent State & Local Solutions, Inc. (Conduent) for parking citation processing, parking permit fulfillment, and payment processing services. On October 13, 2017, the State of California approved Assembly Bill No. 503 (AB 503), which mandates that cities provide payment plans for any unpaid parking citations for qualified indigent individuals who request it. Staff recommends a fifth modification to agreement #9210 with Conduent to add the Installment Payment Plans (IPP) software module to process payment plans in compliance with AB 503. The amended contract would be for an estimated additional amount of $61,250 for the remainder of the contract, for an estimated amended total of $14,561,250. The nine-year term of the contract would remain unchanged.', 'Background', 'On November 23, 2009, the three Westside cities of Santa Monica, West Hollywood, and Beverly Hills jointly issued a RFP for citation processing, handheld devices, license plate readers, and permit processing systems. A selection committee of representatives from all three cities reviewed the proposals and unanimously selected Xerox (then ACS State & Local Solutions, Inc.) as the best bidder based on price, range of products and services offered, ability to address the Westside cities’ issues, and commitment to implement an integrated parking solution.', 'On May 11, 2010 (Attachment A), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute agreement #9210 (CCS) with ACS State & Local Solutions, Inc. in an estimated amount of $1,400,000 per year for a period of five years, with two additional two-year renewal options, to provide parking citation processing, parking permit fulfillment, and payment processing services. In April 2012 agreement #9210 (CCS) was assigned to Xerox following the name change as a result of ACS State & Local Solutions, Inc. being acquired by Xerox. Xerox later separated its parking operations under Conduent. The City’s agreement to maintain the software is now with Conduent.', 'The most recent contract modification was approved by Council on May 9, 2017 (Attachment B) to increase the contract amount by an estimated $1.9 million (including a 10% contingency) and extend the contract term to June 30, 2018, with one remaining one-year renewal option. This modification resulted in a nine-year amended agreement with an estimated agreement amount of $14.5 million, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. As stipulated in the fourth modification, the City is currently in the process of extending the contract for an additional one-year term through June 30, 2019.', 'Discussion', 'On October 13, 2017, the State of California approved AB 503 which mandates that cities offer payment plans for unpaid parking citation(s) to all qualified indigent individuals who request it. The City has not offered payment plans for parking citations in the past, and the current contract with the company providing parking citation processing services (Conduent) does not include an IPP software module or pricing information. The implementation deadline for AB 503 is July 1, 2018. To aid in this implementation, staff recommends acquiring Conduent’s IPP software module.', 'In concert with AB 503 implementation, staff also recommends offering payment plans for parking citations to all people issued citations. This option has been requested many times in the past and would enhance customer service levels by offering a new payment option and reducing the number of Department of Motor Vehicles registration holds on cited vehicles. In addition, this service could potentially reduce the City’s parking citation collections costs as it could lead to fewer delinquent citations.', 'Staff estimates the cost to provide these services will be approximately $61,250.', 'Staff examined whether to only offer payment plans to indigent people as required by AB 503 or to offer the option to all citation recipients. Staff recommends offering the option to everyone because it provides operational efficiency and reduces the average cost per payment plan. Since the cost of the service would be an estimated amount of $61,250 regardless of the number of participants, offering this option to the general public would lower the average cost per payment plan and enhance the level of customer service.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Since the City has not offered payment plans to the public in the past, no historical data is available. The contract modification to be awarded to Conduent State & Local Solutions, Inc. is for an estimated agreement amount of $61,250. Funds for the one-time payment are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Finance Department account number S010130.589000 (expenditure control savings) for the initial setup costs and account number 012241.555010 (Contractual Services) for ongoing costs (mailing expenses). Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2984'}, {'Title': 'Award RFP #132 to RSI Security to provide Payment Card Industry Audit and Compliance Services', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #132 to RSI Security, a San Diego based company, to provide Payment Card Industry (PCI) audit and compliance services.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with RSI Security for five years in an estimated total amount of $346,000 (including a 10% contingency), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'All merchants that accept credit cards for payments must comply with the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) compliance requirements. The City has been categorized as a Level 1 merchant under the PCI industry standards and must conduct annual security assessments. In order to continue to accept credit/debit card payments and ensure no fines are assessed for noncompliance, the City must receive a Report of Certification from a PCI Council approved vendor. Staff recommends RSI Security (RSI) to conduct these audits and provide necessary certifications under a five-year contract in an estimated amount of $346,000 (including 10% contingency).', 'Discussion', 'The City maintains multiple websites and currently allows credit card payments for various services throughout the City. Credit card payments are accepted over the internet, via Point of Sale (POS) devices, over the phone, and with card swipe devices through a multitude of systems and vendors.  The City processed 9.34 million transactions during fiscal year 2016-17.  With the increased use of credit cards and growing number of services available to pay by debit or credit card, the City recently was reclassified to a Level 1 merchant (defined as merchants that process over 6 million transactions per year), requiring additional security and compliance monitoring.', 'PCI Compliance Requirements', 'PCI DSS are a set of security standards designed to ensure all companies that accept, process, store, or transmit credit card information maintain a secure environment. These are universally accepted standards that help protect the safety of customer data. PCI DSS set the operational and technical requirements for both organizations accepting or processing payment transactions and the software developers and manufacturers of the applications and devices used in those transactions. Based on the standards, all merchants will fall into one of the four merchant levels that have been established and are based on the annual volume of transactions. The validation requirements for Level 1 merchants are as follows:', '1) Annual Report on Compliance (“ROC”) by Qualified Security Assessor (“QSA”) – also commonly known as a Level 1 onsite assessment – or internal auditor if signed by officer of the company.', '2) Quarterly network scan by Approved Scan Vendor (“ASV”).', '3) Attestation of Compliance Form (annual).', '4) Security training and consulting services.', '5) Development and review of security policies and procedures.', '6) Additional Consulting, as needed.', 'Santa Monica and PCI Compliance', 'To ensure that the City has taken the safety measures to minimize any security risk, PCI audit and compliance services are required.', 'The City currently does not have a consultant that provides PCI audit and compliance services. However, with the expansion of online payment options, the credit/debit card transactions are an integral part of today’s payment channels. Due to the volume of credit card transactions, PCI audit and compliance services are needed to manage payment account security throughout the transaction process. Newly reclassified to a Level 1 merchant, this will be the first time the City undergoes PCI DSS compliance certification.', 'The City currently contracts with TransFirst Health and Government Solutions, LLC, (Transfirst), American Express Travel Related Services, ActiveNet, and PayPal for merchant processing services. The City is in the process of transferring parking related meter transactions from Transfirst to IPS Group, Inc. to reduce processing costs and potentially change the merchant level categorization from Level 1 to Level 2, which would reduce the PCI compliance requirements. PCI DSS sets the security standards and requirements for credit card merchants.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On May 19, 2017, the City published a Request for Proposals (RFP #132) for PCI audit and compliance services. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding website and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fifty-four vendors downloaded the RFP. Proposals were received from the following five firms:', '· Trustwave', '· Coalfire Sytems, Inc.', '· RSI Security', '· CampusGuard', '· Online Business Systems', 'An evaluation panel composed of representatives from the Finance, Planning and Community Development, and Information Systems departments reviewed and ranked the proposals using the criteria set out in the RFP. The panel short-listed three firms to participate in an interview process: Trustwave; Coalfire Systems, Inc.; and RSI Security. Based on the selection criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends RSI as the best qualified firm to provide PCI audit and compliance services for a five-year period in an estimated amount of $346,000. RSI was selected based on the firm’s ability to assist with quality control measures to minimize risk, experienced and qualified staff, technology solutions, ability to provide required services and availability of optional services and/or additional services, creative solutions that can reduce the cost of services while improving operational efficiencies and effectiveness, pricing, and compliance with the City scope of work. RSI would provide audit, security, and compliance solutions to establish, assess and validate Information Technology (IT) compliance.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Fees for PCI audit and compliance services are based on the scope of the work determined by the amount of credit card transactions performed annually. Based on the current number of transactions, staff estimates cost of services over the five-year life of the contract to be $346,000 including a 10% contingency ($69,200 per year). Funds for the initial assessment and the first year of funding for on-going costs are available in the FY 2017-19 Biennial budget in account number S010130.589000 (expenditure control savings). Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2985'}, {'Title': 'Award Agreements for Construction Management Services and Deputy and Material Testing Inspection Services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #2235 to Cumming Corporation, a California-based company, to provide construction management services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project; 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Cumming Corporation, in an amount not to exceed $636,350 (including a 10% contingency) over a three-year period; 3. Award RFP #2235 to Koury Engineering, a California-based company, to provide deputy and material testing inspection services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project; and 4. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Koury Engineering, in an amount not to exceed $262,364 (including a 20% contingency) over a three-year period.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project will build a new fire station located at 1337-45 7th Street to replace the existing Fire Station No. 1 at 1444 7th Street. Bernards Bros, Inc. will construct Fire Station No. 1. In preparation for the construction project, staff recommends that Council approve two agreements to provide 1) construction management services to Cumming Corporation and 2) deputy and material testing inspection services to Koury Engineering. Both vendors would provide services to assist the City in monitoring the work of the contractor and to ensure that the special inspection requirements for the project are met. Staff anticipates the project will be completed in early 2020.  The agreements recommended by staff to be awarded are within budget limits and do not add costs to the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project.', 'Discussion', 'As part of approving the second-year budget for the City’s FY 2016-18 Biennial Capital Budget, Council appropriated $41.6 million to the Fire Station No. 1 Project. This budget included funding for project costs including construction, construction management, deputy and material testing inspection services, technology infrastructure, furniture and equipment, and unforeseen conditions (site hazardous material).', 'Construction Management and deputy and materials testing inspection services are industry best practices in large scale construction projects, especially those with unique safety and technology requirements such as Fire Station 1. Deputy inspection services are those performed by a third-party done on behalf of the client to ensure compliance with specifications. Subsequent to awarding the construction contract to Bernards Bros, staff solicited two consultant services required and budgeted for this major project: 1) construction management services and 2) deputy and material testing inspection services.', 'Construction management services are required to assist staff with project planning, cost management, quality management, contract administration, and safety management. The consultant providing construction management services would be located at the project construction site for the duration of the project. Staff recommends Cumming Corporation to provide construction management services at a cost not to exceed $636,350.', 'As noted, deputy and material testing inspection services are performed by a third-party vendor (not the contractor) to ensure long-lasting and high quality construction materials are used during the construction phase. This vendor monitors construction activities to ensure proper installation practices are followed throughout the duration of the construction project. The vendor uses the design specifications for structural steel, masonry, concrete, welding, and bolted components, along with City standards, specifications, and applicable building codes, to compare and test against the real-time constructed elements. Staff recommends Koury Engineering to provide deputy and material testing inspection services at a cost not to exceed $262,364.', 'The Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project is expected to be complete in early 2020.', 'Consultant Selection – Construction Management Services', 'On October 10, 2017, the City issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQ) #2507 to provide on-call construction management services for two categories of projects: various building and park construction projects. The RFQ was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fifty-one vendors downloaded the RFQ. Thirteen firms responded. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Staff selected 10 firms as pre-qualified in each category and eligible to compete in future bids over a three-year period; the pre-qualified list will expire on November 28, 2020.', 'On February 6, 2018, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) #2235 to provide construction management services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project. The RFP was sent to the 10 pre-qualified vendors to provide on-call construction management services. The following nine firms responded.', '· Cumming Corporation', '· GKK Works', '· Griffin Structures, Incorporated', '· KDG Construction Consulting', '· Kitchell', '· PMCS', '· PSOMAS', '· Simplus', '· Simpson & Simpson', 'Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: technical competence, staffing capability, project approach and planning, past performance, dispute resolution, quality control, cost control, customer service, and cost of services. Staff then shortlisted three firms and on February 23, 2018 conducted interviews. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Cumming Corporation, the lowest bidder, as the best qualified firm to provide construction management services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project.', 'Cumming Corporation’s team has extensive knowledge and experience working on numerous municipal projects to construct new fire stations. Cumming Corporation has successfully managed projects that included essential services buildings, LEED projects, large excavations, and complex projects in dense urban settings. Their proposed team would provide on-site project management planning, which involves planning the entire project and documentation, cost management to ensure the expenses of the project are efficiently managed and to account for any unexpected issues or difficulties, quality management to ensure the contractor completes the project at a high-quality standard, contract administration to ensure the needs of the City are being satisfied, and safety management to ensure that work meets all legal requirements and building regulations. Cumming Corporation would also provide in-house project schedule analysis and cost estimating resources to augment the on-site construction manager on an as-needed basis.', 'Vendor Selection – Deputy and Material Testing Inspection Services', 'On October 10, 2017, the City issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQ) #2327 to provide on-call deputy and material testing inspection services for various construction projects. The RFQ was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirty-eight vendors downloaded the RFQ. Twelve firms responded. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Staff selected 11 firms as pre-qualified and eligible to compete in future bids over a three-year period; the pre-qualified list will expire on November 14, 2020.', 'On February 12, 2018, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) #2235 to provide deputy and material testing inspection services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project. The RFP was sent to the 11 pre-qualified vendors to provide on-call geotechnical, deputy and material testing inspection services. The following seven firms responded:', '· AECOM', '· California Testing & Inspections', '· Koury Engineering', '· MTG', '· Ninyo & Moore', '· United-Heider', '· Willdan Geotechnical', 'Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: quality of proposal, competitive pricing, experience, references, and qualifications of the proposed project inspection team. Koury Engineering’s proposal included wide-ranging experience and demonstrated the competency, of their team of registered Civil and Geotechnical Engineers and numerous inspectors holding multiple certifications. Koury Engineering’s proposal also included their reputable corporate structure and excellent references on prior completion of similar projects. The proposed inspection team would include one project manager to provide general work plan oversight; one deputy inspector to monitor and inspect all structural concrete, masonry, steel, welding, and bolted elements; one field technician to assist the deputy inspector in proving field testing services; and one laboratory technician for elements requiring laboratory testing. The deputy inspector would join the project full-time from mid-2018 to early-2020, while the other project team members would be on the project as-needed. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Koury Engineering as the best qualified firm to provide deputy and material testing inspection services for the Fire Station No. 1 Construction Project.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to Cumming Corporation is for an amount not to exceed $636,350. Funds are available in the FY 2017-2018 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C014063.589000.', 'The agreement to be awarded to Koury Engineering is for an amount not to exceed $262,364. Funds are available in the FY 2017-2018 Capital Improvement Program Budget in account C014063.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2989'}, {'Title': 'Resolution to Rectify a Posting Error Related to Judicial Council Parking Rate Extension Included in the Recently Adopted Parking Rates Resolution', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution (Attachment A) to correct an error in the parking rates resolution establishing transient parking rates and permit parking fees for various City parking facilities adopted by Council on April 24, 2018.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'This report corrects an error in the parking rates resolution that was approved by Council on April 24, 2018. The April 24, 2018 staff report recommended, as part of the overall parking rates resolution, an extension to the California Judicial Council’s bulk parking fee for one more year to June 30, 2019. The correction will not impact the implementation of the updated parking policies on July 1, 2018.', 'Discussion', 'On April 24, 2018 Council adopted a resolution (Attachment B) establishing new parking rates for off-street parking. The staff report included the following section:', 'Judicial Council Parking', 'The fee resolution also extends the bulk parking fee for the California Judicial Council fortwelve months from July 2018 to June 2019 in anticipation of the multipurpose sports field, with a possible request for a six month extension if construction demands allow.The Council has made progress in promoting alternative options for its employees, customers, and jurors; however, the Council requires additional time to address budget impacts and to develop programs to address its minimum parking needs, particularly for members of the public who utilize the court’s services.', 'City staff discovered that the resolution posted with the staff report did not include the updated and correct end date of June 30, 2019 for the California Judicial Council due to an error with the version of the resolution posted, and instead contained the original deadline of June 30, 2018. The proposed resolution provides the corrected resolution extending the bulk parking fee to June 30, 2019. The resolution contains no changes, only this one correction.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '3056'}], [{'Title': 'Second Reading and Adoption of Ordinance Amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Sections 3.04.035 and 3.16.170 Regulating Parking Meter Zones, Meter Rates, Parking Fees, Permit Fees and Hours of Operation', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance amending sections 3.04.035 and 3.16.170 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'At its meeting of April 24, 2018, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Sections 3.04.035 and 3.16.170 regulating parking meter zones, meter rates, parking fees, permit fees and hours of operation.', 'The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '3057'}, {'Title': 'Introduction and First Reading of an Ordinance Making Clerical Clarifications To Tenant Protection Provisions In The Santa Monica Municipal Code and Adding Section 4.27.050 Limiting No-Fault Evictions Against Students and Educators During the School Year', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached proposed ordinance providing a substantive defense to any no-fault eviction of an educator or a family with a school-age child during the school year and making certain clerical clarifications to the Santa Monica Municipal Code.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City of Santa Monica is committed to maintaining an inclusive and diverse community, as well as a community where all children can learn and thrive. Studies have shown that evictions are on the rise, and that evictions of students in the middle of the school year disrupt relationships that are important to children, interfere with the learning process, and place an administrative burden on schools. The proposed ordinance would reduce harmful effects of evictions and promote continuity in education by preventing no-fault evictions of families with children and educators during the school year.  The proposed ordinance also makes clerical changes to Article 4 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code by moving certain existing tenant protection provisions in Article 4 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code to a new chapter titled Tenant Protection. These clerical changes are intended to promote transparency and ease access to the law.', 'Background', 'On February 27, 2018, the City Council directed staff to prepare an ordinance to limit no-fault evictions against students and educators during the school year. The request was made in the context of a continuing affordable housing crisis in the City, concern for housing-related disruptions to children’s education, and guidance from a recent U.S. Court of Appeal decision affirming a similar law in San Francisco. As detailed below, no-fault evictions occur when tenants are evicted based on no fault of their own but due to a landlord’s decision to, for example, occupy the property or exit the rental market.', 'Discussion', 'No-fault evictions occur year-round, but those occurring for families during the school year are of particular concern due to the adverse effect on children. Studies demonstrate that moving or changing schools in the middle of the school year can be harmful for children. See, for example, “Moving Matters: The Causal Effect of Moving Schools on Student Performance” (2017) The MIT Press, Vol. 12, Issue 4, p. 419-446 (citing twenty-seven previous studies and articles); Veronique Dupere’s “School Mobility and school-age children’s social adjustment”,Developmental Psychology 51(2): 197-210 (2015).', "Mid-year moves are more likely to disrupt children's peer networks and interfere with the learning process; and school year mobility is also linked to decreased proficiency rates on standardized test performances.", 'The impact of no-fault evictions during the school year on school staff, especially teachers, also raises serious concern. School staff tend to be especially vulnerable to displacement due to salary limitations that can make it difficult to quickly or easily locate replacement housing. Moreover, the eviction of school staff during the school year can cause significant harm to a child’s education. Children need strong mentoring relationships to succeed and often turn to school staff, particularly when they cannot find stability in their homes or in their communities. Academic performance suffers when teachers and other significant staff leave or are repeatedly absent during the school year. Thus, mid-year evictions of teachers and staff disrupt relationships that are important to children, interfere with the learning process, and burden our schools.', "The proposed ordinance draws on and is based upon significant work done by the City and County of San Francisco to study the effects of and take steps to mitigate the harm of school-year evictions of children and educators. In April 2016, following extensive study and findings, San Francisco adopted Ordinance No. 55-16 to create a substantive defense to no-fault evictions of students and educators. On February 14, 2018, the California Court of Appeal upheld that Ordinance in a published opinion; on April 25, 2018, the California Supreme Court declined to review this decision. See San Francisco Apartment Association et al. v City and County of San Francisco (2018) 20 Cal. App. 5th 510. See also, Birkenfeld v. City of Berkeley (1976) 17 Cal.3d 129, 149 (city's exercise of the police power creating a substantive eviction defense does not conflict with the state's unlawful detainer statutory scheme).", 'The proposed ordinance is modeled after Ordinance No. 55-16 and based on similar and many of the same findings. It would create a new substantive defense to the following categories of no-fault evictions:', '(1) Owner-occupancy evictions pursuant to Charter Sections 1806(a)(8) and 2304(a)(8);', '(2) Evictions pursuant to properly obtained demolition and removal permits under Charter Section 1806(a)(9) and 2304(a)(9); and', '(3) Ellis Act removals of units from the rental market pursuant to Charter Section 1806(a)(10).', 'The defense would be available in the event of a no-fault eviction when:', '(a) a child under the age of 18 or any educator resides in the unit,', '(b) the child or educator is a tenant in the unit or has a custodial or family relationship with a tenant in the unit,', '(c) the tenant has resided in the unit for 12 months or more, and', '(d) the effective date of the notice of termination of tenancy falls during the school year.', 'The proposed ordinance defines “educators” to include any person who works in Santa Monica at a state-licensed child care center, state-licensed family day care, and/or any public, private, or parochial institution that provides educational instruction for students in any or all of the grades from kindergarten through twelfth grade. The school year is defined based on the Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District school year.', 'The City of Santa Monica has a long history of dedicating public resources to benefit students and to stabilize housing for families. The City Attorney’s Office, Consumer Protection Division, enforces tenant harassment and antidiscrimination laws and also provides community education related to tenants’ and consumers’ rights. These efforts, and the proposed ordinance, support the City’s goals, articulated in its Strategic Goals and Framework, of maintaining an inclusive and diverse community, helping Santa Monica residents stay in their homes and build community, and strengthening youth connectedness and emotional health.', 'Should Council adopt the proposed ordinance, the Consumer Protection Division would initiate education efforts to inform families, educators, tenants, landlords, and legal aid providers about the availability of this defense. The affirmative defense would be cited by tenants to avoid initiation of eviction during the school year and raised by tenants on a case-by-case basis in unlawful detainer cases.', 'Finally, the proposed ordinance makes clerical changes to the Santa Monica Municipal Code by moving certain existing tenant protection provisions in Article 4 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code to a new chapter titled Tenant Protection. The proposed ordinance renumbers these provisions within the SMMC but makes no substantive changes or amendments to the provisions. The clerical changes are intended to promote transparency of the law and ensure that interested community members are able to find relevant provisions with ease.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2992'}, {'Title': 'Introduction and First Reading of an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 10.08.560 (Municipal Pier—Vehicle Weight Restrictions) authorizing the City Engineer to set updated vehicle weight limitations for Municipal Pier and Newcomb Pier', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Introduce for first reading the attached ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 10.08.560 (Municipal Pier—Vehicle Weight Restrictions) authorizing the City Engineer to set updated vehicle weight limitations for the Municipal Pier and Newcomb Pier.2. Conduct a public hearing, on behalf of Los Angeles County and at the County’s request, to determine the appropriate load limitation for the Pier Bridge.3. Direct staff to seek authorization from the County of Los Angeles to set the Pier Bridge load limit.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Following a recent inspection, the Los Angeles County Department of Public Works (LACDPW) recommended posting a weight limit sign for the Pier Bridge. Currently, weight limit signs are posted only for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and Newcomb Pier, both of which are entirely under the City’s jurisdiction. Upon receiving this recommendation, staff conducted a review and developed revised weight limits for the piers and the bridge. Staff recommends amending local law to authorize the City Engineer to set updated vehicle weight limits based on study and assessment. Based on the City Engineer’s most recent study and assessment, staff recommends increasing the posted weight limit for the Santa Monica Pier to 15 tons and setting a weight limit of 3 tons for the Newcomb Pier. Staff further recommends that Council conduct a public hearing, on behalf of Los Angeles County and at the County’s request, to determine the weight limit for the Pier Bridge. At the conclusion of the hearing, staff would forward the City’s weight recommendation to the County and seek authorization from the County to set the bridge weight limit, as required by state law.', 'Background', 'On September 19, 2017, the LACDPW contacted the City requesting a copy of the load limit ordinance for the Pier Bridge. Staff clarified that load limits are not currently posted for the Pier Bridge structure. Load limits are posted only for the Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier to protect the pier structures from the wear and tear brought about by heavy vehicles. The signs are posted at both the top and bottom approaches to the Pier Bridge and, by inference, limited the loads for the Pier Bridge. The photo to the left shows the sign located at the top of the Pier Bridge. Notwithstanding the load limits posted for the Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier, the LACDPW noted that their structural analysis required a load limit to be posted for the Pier Bridge itself. In order to legally post a load limit for a bridge, the California Vehicle Code requires that a public hearing be held and an ordinance be adopted under the County’s direction.', 'Discussion', 'The LACDPW performed load rating calculations for the Pier Bridge, which indicated the safe load capacity of the structure to be:', '· 22 tons per truck', '· 22 tons per truck and semi-trailer combination', '· 30 tons per truck and full trailer combination', 'The LACDPW recommends that the bridge be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 22 tons. However, this exceeds the load capacities of the Municipal Pier (outlined in blue below in Figure 1) and the Newcomb Pier (outlined in orange below in Figure 1). The sole purpose of the Pier Bridge is to provide vehicle and pedestrian access to the Municipal and Newcomb Piers. There are no other adjoining structures or access points to the Pier Bridge. Despite the bridge’s 22-ton structural capacity as determined by LACDPW, it is the 15-ton structural capacity of the Municipal Pier that would dictate the operational weight limit for the Pier Bridge.', 'Vehicle Weight Restrictions', 'Traffic flows through the different sections of the piers, and the lowest rated section of each pier is the controlling limit for allowable vehicle weights. The Municipal and Newcomb Piers have had signs posted for maximum weights of 10 and 3 tons, respectively, for nearly a decade or longer. Staff researched as-built plans and records for past upgrade and maintenance projects for the Municipal Pier and concluded that the lowest rated section, a 200-foot-long concrete waffle structure at the west end, could support a 15-ton vehicle. The rest of the structure is rated for a 20-ton vehicle. Based on the controlling capacity of the waffle structure, staff recommends that the Municipal Pier and the adjoining Pier Bridge be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 15 tons.', 'The 2008 Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study by Moffatt & Nichol (Study) examined the Newcomb Pier and subdivided it into sections based on the varying substructure types and corresponding load limits. The Study further identified that the lowest rated section can support a 3-ton vehicle. Therefore, staff recommends the Newcomb Pier, where the pier deck parking lot is located, be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 3 tons.', 'The City has exclusive jurisdiction to regulate Pier weight limitations. Accordingly, the proposed amendment updates the previously codified weight limit for the Municipal Pier and codifies the weight limit for the Newcomb Pier.', 'Community Events', 'For many years, the Newcomb Pier has served as a venue for community events and will likely continue to accommodate events moving forward, as reflected in the Pier Corporation’s calendar (santamonicapier.org/events). A community event permit is required for these events. Many of these events require the use of vehicles that exceed the 3-ton weight limit during setup and takedown. To this point, heavy vehicle activity historically has been coordinated with harbor guards, who ensured heavy vehicles did not enter the weaker sections of the Newcomb Pier. Codifying the 3-ton weight limit would make it illegal for a vehicle exceeding 3-tons to enter the Newcomb Pier for any reason other than an emergency, subsequently precluding many community events. To continue accommodating community events, the proposed amendment includes an exemption for vehicles that are issued a permit, and a permit would be required for events that utilize vehicles heavier than 3 tons. Heavy vehicle activity would continue to be monitored by harbor guards.', 'Pier Bridge', 'Unlike the Piers, which are under the City’s exclusive jurisdiction, California Vehicle Code Section 35751(a) grants only Los Angeles County the authority to set weight limitations on the Pier Bridge. Consistent with Section 35751 and longstanding practice, the County has cooperated with Santa Monica and other cities within the County to set bridge load limits. Additionally, Section 35751 requires a public hearing be held before the Pier Bridge’s weight limit could be reduced beyond what the Vehicle Code otherwise requires. The County has requested that the City conduct this hearing on the County’s behalf. Upon conclusion of the hearing, staff would transmit the City’s weight recommendations to the County and work with the County to set the correct weight limit. Once that limit is set by the County, staff would return to the Council to codify the new limit.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. The removal of existing signs and installation of the new signs will be performed by Public Works staff within the existing operating budget.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2990'}], [{'Title': 'Receive Compensation and Staffing Review and Approve Implementation Plan Responding to Recommendations', 'Department': 'Finance Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Receive and consider the Compensation and Staffing Review completed by Moss Adams, LLP; 2. Provide feedback on the proposed Implementation Plan responding to Review recommendations; and3. Direct staff to proceed with the Implementation Plan, and provide Council with reports on the progress of implementation after six months and annually thereafter until implementation plan actions are deemed complete.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In response to community and broader concerns raised by media reports, the City of Santa Monica commissioned an independent compensation study to collect and analyze pay, benefits and workload data from comparable cities and, where appropriate, the private sector to identify opportunities for improvement of policies and practices related to City employee compensation, as well as analyze use of overtime by public safety staff. The report represents one of the most comprehensive local government analyses of compensation practices done in recent years in Southern California, comparing not only pay, benefits and public safety overtime usage, but benchmarking workload data and other factors among cities comparable to Santa Monica. The report documents that overall, Santa Monica’s pay and benefits are comparable to peer cities, albeit on the higher end of the scale. Also noted is the large scope and high level of City services. The report also identifies areas for improvement, many of which are already in progress. Implementation of these improvements will play a significant role in the City’s efforts to maintain fiscal sustainability as it faces future statewide threats from rising pension costs.', 'The Compensation and Staffing Review report (Attachment A) was conducted by the City’s internal auditor, Moss Adams, LLP, under the oversight of the Audit Subcommittee of the City Council, with advisory support from a limited-term, seven‑member ad hoc committee of residents, the Compensation Study Advisory Committee (CSAC). The report provides 13 observations and recommendations organized in the following categories: wage and benefits packages, drivers of compensation, and public safety overtime.', 'The report was informed by interviews of eleven peer cities, published data and surveys and interviews of staff and labor unions.', 'Background', 'On January 17, 2017, in response to concerns raised by a number of community groups related to news stories about City of Santa Monica staff compensation, and calls by these groups that an “independent” audit be conducted, the Audit Subcommittee discussed a proposed scope of work for a compensation audit to be completed by the independent firm that acts as the City’s Internal Auditor, Moss Adams, LLP.', "After initial discussions both in the Audit Subcommittee and among community members and the City Manager, staff returned to the Audit Subcommittee on April 20, 2017 with an amended and expanded scope of work, along with the recommendation to create an ad hoc advisory committee, composed of up to 7 community members. According to the resolution establishing this ad-hoc community committee would act “in an advisory capacity to the Audit Subcommittee in matters pertaining to critically reviewing and objectively considering the City's methodologies related to compensation.” The ad-hoc community committee was to join Subcommittee discussions specifically related to the scope, findings, and final report of the compensation review. At its May 9, 2017 meeting (Attachment B), Council directed the City Manager to seek applications from members of the public who would be interested in serving on the ad hoc committee, named the Compensation Study Advisory Committee (CSAC), and then make appointments.On August 23, the Audit Subcommittee, informed by its discussion with members of CSAC, approved the scope of work for the Compensation and Staffing Review. The Audit Subcommittee and CSAC reviewed data and an initial draft of the report, asked questions and discussed additional information that would be useful to incorporate into the report on November 21, 2017 and February 28, 2018. The final report was received and reviewed by the Audit Subcommittee at its meeting on April 17, 2018. Also received and filed at the April 17, 2018 meeting was an implementation plan proposing steps that staff could take to address report recommendations.", 'Discussion', 'The report provides observations and recommendations organized in the following categories: wage and benefits packages, drivers of compensation, and public safety overtime.', 'The report was informed by interviews of eleven peer cities: Anaheim, Beverly Hills, Burbank, Culver City, El Segundo, Glendale, Inglewood, Pasadena, Redondo Beach, Santa Barbara and Torrance. Berkeley and Palo Alto also participated in interviews to provide perspectives on leading practices in other innovative, progressive cities published data and surveys and interviews. This was in addition to interviews with staff and labor unions.  After discussions between the Audit Subcommittee and the CSAC the scope and peer cities were approved by the Audit Subcommittee.', 'While the report indicates that every effort was made to obtain comparable data, not all information can be compared equally. Factors that contribute to this include differences in operating budgets, performance measurements, community priorities, level of outsourcing, geography, and departmental organization. Additionally, a large part of the peer information used in this report is self-reported and un-audited. Cities do not, as a general practice, gather and make public easily comparable data on compensation, workload and service levels on a consistent basis.', 'The study documents that overall, Santa Monica’s pay and benefits are comparable to peer cities, albeit on the higher end of the scale. Also noted is the large scope and level of City services. The study also identifies areas for improvement, many of which are already in progress. Implementation of these improvements will play a significant role in the City’s efforts to maintain fiscal sustainability as it faces future statewide threats from rising pension costs. There are 13 observations and corresponding recommendations in the report that will help the City to improve its fiscal sustainability.', 'O BSER VAT I O N S AN D R EC O MME N D A T IO N S', 'WAGE AND BENEFIT PACKAGES', '1', 'Observation', 'In relation to peer cities, Santa Monica exhibits the same distribution of personnel costs as peers across wages, health benefits, and retirement.', 'Recommendation', 'Enhance awareness and understanding of personnel costs by making this information readily accessible to the general public and provide explanations of each component of total compensation.', '2', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica’s average cash compensation for employees is comparable to the average of peer cities, although the City’s median senior leadership compensation is the highest among peers. When Santa Monica’s median cash compensation was compared to peers, it was the third lowest, likely due to the City’s strong preference to insource services that require a large number of relatively low paid workers. For individual positions, Santa Monica met or fell below the peer median for 40% of the positions included in the benchmarking study, while the remaining 60% of positions were compensated at levels exceeding the peer median. Santa Monica lacks a formal philosophy to guide how compensation is determined.', 'Recommendation', 'Develop and implement a formal compensation philosophy, including, but not limited to, compensation and benefits components, levels, and market competitiveness, to guide labor negotiations and set employee expectations with respect to compensation.', 'O BSER VAT I O N S AN D R EC O MME N D A T IO N S', '3', 'Observation', 'The City uses peer city compensation averages for individual positions during its market analysis prior to negotiations. Best practice is to expand the dataset used to include the median (midpoint) and calculate percentiles when benchmarking position wages.', 'Recommendations', 'Evolve the in-house position-level compensation market study methodology to include medians and percentiles in accordance with best practices, accounting for labor relation requirements.', '4', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica has taken steps to reduce unfunded liability, including introducing an additional retirement tier prior to the Public Employee Pension Reform Act and making', '$76 M in lump sum payments. Similar to peer cities, the City’s overall unfunded pension liability remains high.', 'Recommendation', 'Continue to take steps whenever possible to mitigate the financial threat that pension liability places on the City.', '5', 'Observation', 'Similar to peers, Santa Monica’s employee medical insurance costs have risen steeply in recent years. The City’s cash contribution to monthly individual employee medical insurance, which varies by plan, is consistent with that of peers.', 'Recommendation', 'Evaluate options to stabilize per-employee health care costs.', 'DRIVERS OF COMPENSATION', '6', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica is a highly unionized municipality that typically negotiates multiple labor contracts lasting one to three years. Frequently, all 11 contracts expire simultaneously, requiring a significant amount of work to negotiate.', 'Recommendations', 'Consider negotiating labor contracts in the next cycle to expire at different times and cover longer durations to reduce the burden of negotiations on the City.', '7', 'Observation', 'Like most municipalities, Santa Monica operates a civil service system that is governed by state law and the City’s charter, municipal code, and civil service rules. As a result, it is difficult to change personnel practices as business needs evolve.', 'Recommendation', 'Regularly assess the City’s charter, municipal code, and civil service rules to ensure they are aligned with contemporary personnel practices and meet the evolving business needs of the City.', '8', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica largely operated as usual during the 2008 recession and did not need to reduce staffing levels, while most peer cities had to significantly cut costs by increasing efficiency, outsourcing services, and reducing staffing levels.', 'Recommendation', 'Develop financial and operational strategies to prepare for possible future recessions, since the City may not be able to absorb a future recession as easily.', '9', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica has the highest number of employees among peers. Similar to peers, tenure at the City tends to be long with 77.3% of employees being paid within 10% of the top salary step for the position.', 'Recommendation', 'Explore strategies for mitigating personnel costs, such as hiring personnel at lower steps, and leveraging training programs to equip personnel to take on greater responsibility earlier in their career.', '10', 'Observation', 'Santa Monica employs more personnel than peers, in part, because it operates a variety of unique service offerings and responds to the service needs of a significant tourist population.', 'Recommendation', 'Implement an evaluation framework to assess the lifecycle costs of proposed new programs and services, and evaluate outsourcing options, where applicable.', 'O BSER VAT I O N S AN D R EC O MME N D A T IO N S', '11', 'Observation', 'In general, Santa Monica has a higher workload and higher costs than peer cities. Citywide, productivity is comparable to peers, although productivity varies by program and service, and a comprehensive service level study was not conducted. The City could more strategically utilize key performance indicators to measure and communicate operational and individual efficiency and effectiveness.', 'Recommendation', 'Continue initiatives already underway to develop a strategic plan, comprehensive performance indicators, and leverage the City’s data for decision-making.', 'PUBLIC SAFETY OVERTIME', '12', 'Observation', 'Although SMPD’s overtime expenditures increased by $1.2 million between FY 2014 and FY 2016, the overtime rate for an existing employee costs an estimated 7.1 to 14.6% less than the hourly rate of a new employee, suggesting that the use of overtime provides cost savings to the department.', 'Recommendation', 'In accordance with best practice, continue to evaluate police staffing levels and use of overtime.', '13', 'Observation', 'Although SMFD’s overtime expenditures increased by approximately $800,000 between FY 2014 and FY 2016, the overtime rate for an existing employee costs an estimated 9.3% less to 6.5% more than the hourly rate of a new employee, suggesting that the use of overtime may provide cost savings to the department.', 'Recommendation', 'In accordance with best practice, conduct a staffing study to evaluate on-duty staffing demand, staffing levels, and use of overtime.', 'Some key points emerged from the study that highlight the unique landscape in which Santa Monica functions. According to the study, “Santa Monica’s community has a number of unique characteristics compared to the average municipality.” Specifically, the population fluctuates substantially from day to night, seasonally, and during the holidays. These fluctuations impact the City’s public safety, public landscape and transit services. It has more complex processes for planning and development due to its “unique environmental considerations and community development priorities. Overall, the City delivers programs and services beyond a typical full-service city, including infrastructure (airport, pier, cemetery, public Wi-Fi, community broadband, beach, regional bus service) and community programs (arts and community non-profit grant programs, housing assistance, public interest law, mobility).” (p. 8)', 'Additionally, among peers, Santa Monica shares a reputation, with Palo Alto and Berkeley, as “‘innovation labs’ of local government in California, because they have the employees, culture and resources to explore innovative programming and services.” As noted in the study, “Both cities reported that, similar to Santa Monica, the culture of high levels of service was driven by the community, elected officials and employees… City leadership reported that new hires typically have more experience and education than a typical new hire.” These cities “noted their highly engaged and educated communities, with long public meetings and significant effort made to quickly respond to citizen requests. Several peer cities reported a perception that their public meetings are not as long as Santa Monica’s, nor do they require as much staff time to support.” (p.46)', 'Comparison to Peers', 'Santa Monica’s cash compensation is comparable to the average of peer cities. (pp. 17, 21) By virtue of the fact that Santa Monica shares a regional economy and statewide structures (such as being a member of the California Public Employee Retirement System - CalPERS) with its peers, its compensation is driven by many of the same factors and is for the most part comparable. As noted in the study, the region has a high cost of living (the study refers to Santa Monica’s over $1 million median home price as the second highest among the peer group and far above the $465,000 of the Los Angeles metro area (p.8), high commute times, and high job competition, including with the private sector).', 'Overall, the City’s median cash compensation for individual positions met or fell below the peer median for 40% of positions analyzed, while 60% of the positions were above the peer median. Like all but one peer city, Santa Monica’s employees are hired, promoted and compensated according to the statutes of the City’s civil service system as defined in the City Charter and Municipal Code and overseen by a Personnel Board whose members are appointed by the City Council. Nine of the eleven peers, including Santa Monica, showed high employee tenure. According to the study, the Bureau of Labor Statistics shows that local government employee tenure is 8.3 years, while the private sector median is 3.7 years. Longer tenure is noted as a factor in higher total compensation costs. (p. 44)', 'The proportional mix of salaries, medical and retirement benefit costs is similar across the peer cities, with Santa Monica having slightly higher (1-3%) medical costs. (pp. 12-13) All cities have seen steep increases in medical insurance costs in recent years. Most peer cities face the challenge of large unfunded pension liabilities. While some cities seem to have lower liability burdens as a percent of their operating budget, four of these cities operate electrical utilities and their budgets include large contracts for electrical purchases, which affects the proportional distribution of these costs.', 'Facing the same fiscal challenges related to medical and retirement costs, Santa Monica and its peers are requiring employees to increase their cost sharing of retirement and medical contributions. Santa Monica, like four peers, has added additional, lower levels of retirement benefits for non-sworn new hires that go beyond the legislatively-mandated reduced levels (commonly referred to as tiers). The following chart shows the different level of pension benefits and the percentage of the City’s workforce in these tiers of retirement:', 'Pension benefit (Tier)', 'Percentage of staff in tier as of April 30, 2018', 'Miscellaneous 2.7% at 55', '53.0%', 'Miscellaneous 2.0% at 55 (Hired on/after July 1, 2012)', '5.1%', 'Miscellaneous 2.0% at 62 (New to PERS hired on/after Jan 1, 2013)', '27.1%', 'Sworn Police 3.0% at 50', '8.2%', 'Sworn Police 2.7% at 57 (New to PERS hired on/after Jan 1, 2013)', '1.3%', 'Sworn Fire 3.0% at 55', '4.2%', 'Sworn Fire 2.7% at 57 (New to PERS hired on/after Jan 1, 2013)', '1.1%', 'Regular pension contributions are established by CalPERS and are set based on the assumption that unfunded liabilities will be paid off within a 30-year amortization period. Santa Monica has gone a step further than its peers, in accordance with its Council-adopted policy, to pay down at least $1.2 million of its unfunded liability each year in addition to making its regular pension contribution payments. Additionally, the City has taken the bold step to aggressively pay down the unfunded liability by making significant lump sum payments. To date, the City has made $76 million in additional payments to lower its unfunded pension liability.', 'The study found a number of areas where Santa Monica differs from peers. The report indicates these differences are often the result of the unique circumstances of Santa Monica and can represent areas for improvement.', '· Santa Monica has the highest median cash compensation for management positions.', 'The data and anecdotal research suggests that the higher median is due, in part, to Santa Monica’s desire to take on complex issues and to be a leader in local government innovation, similar to the cities of Palo Alto and Berkeley, requiring staff with more experience and education. (p.46)', '· Santa Monica has the largest staff of peer cities, and often has a higher workload.', 'The report indicates that Santa Monica has unique services including a cemetery, pier, airport, public Wi-Fi, community broadband, beach, regional bus line, Office of Sustainability, Office of Civic Wellbeing, as well as social services and arts grant programs. Santa Monica has a population that fluctuates from 92,289 to 250,000 on a daily and seasonal basis and this larger population directly impacts public safety, public landscape/beach, and transit services. Also factoring into the larger staff is Council’s policy of insourcing and keeping a low level of as-needed positions, rather than contracting out. Examples of areas that other cities contract out are solid waste, custodial, and workers’ compensation.', '· Some trade and frontline positions are paid less than peers.', 'The difference in cash compensation is likely due to the City’s in-sourcing of many services, which may lower the minimum value of the range. (p. 17)', '· Staff increased 5% in 9 years, while peer cities, whose revenues were more impacted during the Great Recession, laid off or furloughed staff or froze salaries.', 'The majority of recent position increases in Santa Monica were related to the introduction of EXPO light rail service (specifically additional Police and Fire personnel, and additional positions in BBB as part of the Evolution of Blue enhancements), changing service structures at the Santa Monica Airport (these positions have not been filled), as well as the conversion of as-needed positions to permanent positions.', 'Implementation Plan', 'Staff has developed an implementation plan to ensure that the recommendations of the Internal Auditor are addressed in a timely manner. The Implementation Plan (Attachment C) categorizes each recommendation based on level of difficulty to address, develops a timeline, and describes the steps that staff will take to make improvements to the compensation and staffing process as another one of the ways that the City is working to achieve long term fiscal sustainability. Many of the proposed actions are already in progress, including the development of a framework, based on performance measures, to inform staff and council on the most efficient and effective way to allocate scarce resources. The table below provides a summary of each recommendation’s priority, effort level and assigned responsibility. Staff will report back to Council on initial progress made after every six months and annually thereafter until the implementation actions are deemed complete.', '#', 'Recommendation', 'Priority', 'Effort Level', 'Responsibility', '1', 'Enhance awareness and understanding of personnel costs by making this information readily accessible to the general public and provide explanations of each component of total compensation.', 'High', 'Moderate', 'HR, Finance, CMO', '2', 'Develop and implement a formal compensation philosophy, including, but not limited to, compensation and benefits components, levels, and market competitiveness, to guide labor negotiations and set employee expectations with respect to compensation.', 'High', 'High', 'HR, CMO, and City Council', '3', 'Evolve the in-house position-level compensation market study methodology to include medians and percentiles in accordance with best practices, accounting for labor relation requirements.', 'High', 'Moderate', 'HR', '4', 'Continue to take steps whenever possible to mitigate the financial threat that pension liability places on the City.', 'High', 'Moderate', 'Finance', '5', 'Evaluate options to stabilize per-employee health care costs.', 'High', 'High', 'HR, Finance', '6', 'Consider negotiating labor contracts in the next cycle to expire at different times and cover longer durations to reduce the burden of negotiations on the City.', 'Medium', 'Moderate', 'HR', '7', 'Regularly assess the City’s charter, municipal code, and civil service rules to ensure they are aligned with contemporary personnel practices and meet the evolving business needs of the City.', 'Medium', 'Moderate', 'HR and CMO', '8', 'Develop financial and operational strategies to prepare for possible future recessions, since the City may not be able to absorb a future recession as easily.', 'High', 'High', 'Finance and CMO', '9', 'Explore strategies for mitigating personnel costs, such as hiring personnel at lower steps and leveraging training programs to equip personnel to take on greater responsibility earlier in their careers.', 'High', 'High', 'HR', '10', 'Implement an evaluation framework to assess the lifecycle costs of proposed new programs and services, and evaluate outsourcing options where applicable.', 'High', 'High', 'Finance and CMO', '11', 'Continue initiatives already underway to develop a strategic plan, comprehensive performance indicators, and leverage the City’s data for decision-making.', 'Medium', 'High', 'CMO and Finance', '12', 'In accordance with best practices, continue to evaluate police staffing levels and use of overtime.', 'Medium', 'Moderate', 'Police and HR', '13', 'In accordance with best practices, conduct a staffing study to evaluate on-duty staffing demand, staffing levels, and use of overtime.', 'Medium', 'Moderate', 'Fire and HR'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2940'}, {'Title': 'Possible Ballot Measure to Protect Against Development Exceeding the Adopted General Plan or Zoning Code Limits on Height or Floor Area Ratio, By Requiring Super-Majority Council Approval or Other Means', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council review the proposed options and adopt the recommendation not to proceed with a ballot measure for the November 2018 Election to require a super-majority Council approval for projects that exceed the Land Use Element, Specific Plans or the Zoning Ordinance that would result in an increase in allowed height or floor area ratio (FAR) as unnecessary due to the protections already built into those adopted plans to preclude such approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'At the City Council meeting on December 12, 2017, the Council directed staff to “explore a possible 2018 ballot measure that would protect against development exceeding the adopted General Plan or Zoning Code limits on height or Floor Area Ratio, by requiring super-majority Council approval, or by other means, and return to Council with options.”', 'In response to Council direction to explore a possible ballot measure to protect against development exceeding the General Plan or Zoning Ordinance, staff has developed three options. The recommended first option is to not place a measure on the ballot and continue to rely on the existing General Plan, the Downtown Community Plan and Zoning Ordinance which sets out clear rules for maximum height and floor-area ratios (FAR) for the vast majority of the City based on plans adopted after robust public input. Option 2 would allow projects to exceed the zoning ordinance standards through a Development Agreement without a super-majority, but only if the project is consistent with the LUCE and any applicable Specific Plan. Option 3 would require a super-majority for any project that exceeds the height and FAR allowance contained in the zoning ordinance.', 'Having completed the implementation of the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) in 2010 with the adoption of the citywide Zoning Ordinance and the Downtown Community Plan, the flexibility utilized for development agreements is no longer either necessary or desirable. Predictability for both property owners and residents outweighs the perceived benefits that came from negotiating heights and density on a project by project basis. Having put enormous resources of time, debate and financial resources into establishing specific height and density limitations for the entire city, Council has clearly indicated a commitment to enforce those limits by applying them consistently to all future projects and that has been the established practice without deviation since the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and the Downtown Community Plan.', 'Discussion', 'Development in Santa Monica is governed by a Tier system, which is contained in the LUCE and establishes up to three tiers of development in most land use districts. Tier 1 development is limited to a relatively low height and FAR with a very predictable entitlement process. Tier 2 development allows greater height and FAR in exchange for increased, but prescribed community benefits. Tier 3 development allows the most height and FAR in exchange for community benefits beyond what is required for Tier 2 projects.', 'Under current requirements, development can only exceed height or FAR requirements established in the Zoning Ordinance, LUCE and/or any Specific Plan if the relevant governing document is amended, or, in limited circumstances, if a Development Agreement is obtained. Any such amendment or Development Agreement must be adopted by ordinance and is subject to referendum and reversal by the voters.', 'Prior to adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and associated amendments to the LUCE in 2015 and the Downtown Community Plan last year, most projects proceeded by Development Agreement, which allowed increased height and FAR in exchange for community benefits. The Zoning Ordinance and the Downtown Community Plan, however, implemented prescribed development standards and community benefits for Tier 2 projects; and the Downtown Community Plan includes prescribed development standards and community benefits for most Tier 3 housing projects.', 'Today, there are only limited areas in the City where Tier 3 projects with negotiated height and FAR are still allowed. These include Broadway and Colorado Avenue between Lincoln and 20th Street, the area bounded by Broadway to the north, Colorado to the south, Cloverfield to the east and 20th Street to the west, and any project in the Mixed Use Boulevard Low District that includes 100% affordable housing or a designated Landmark. Tier 3 projects are also allowed by Development Agreement in portions of the Bergamot Transit Village. However, while these projects could exceed the height and FAR limits in the zoning ordinance, they must be consistent with the height and FAR maximums contained in the LUCE.', 'Option 1', 'Option 1 would retain and reinforce existing legally adopted development rules and requirements. With the adoption of the Downtown Community Plan in 2016 and the citywide Zoning Ordinance in 2015, Council clearly established height and FAR ratios to guide future development throughout the City with the intent of providing certainty about the rules for property owners, residents and potential developers. Under existing rules, development may not exceed established height or FAR requirements. Deviating from those standards would require amending the governing document ordinance (or the governing document permits a Development Agreement, also adopted by ordinance). In either case, any such ordinance adopted by Council would be subject to referendum by the voters. Council may therefore conclude that an additional super-majority requirement is not necessary given that the Council has intentionally adopted the prescribed development requirements set forth in recent years and shown a clear commitment to regulating development within those standards. The availability of referendum for any change to height or FAR requirements in the Zoning Ordinance or area specific plan or any Development Agreement allowing development in excess of prescribed height and FAR limits provides strong protection that these rules will be enforced and not set on a project by project basis. It should be noted that the City is not required to even process a proposal for a development agreement that exceeds zoning standards. Staff believes that adhering to the established zoning standards makes enacting a charter amendment unnecessary to ensure consistent compliance with established height and FAR standards.', 'Options 2 and 3', 'In response to Council direction to explore options to require a super-majority, or other process, for development exceeding the adopted General Plan or Zoning Ordinance height or FAR allowances, staff has developed two additional options for Council consideration.', 'Option 2', 'Option 2 would require a super-majority for an amendment to the LUCE or any specific plan where that amendment would increase the maximum height limit or floor area ratio applicable to any zoning district. This option would add the underlined language to Section 615 of the City Charter to read as follows:', 'Option 2 - limits height and FAR increases in the LUCE and Specific Plans', '615. Adoption of ordinances and resolutions. With the sole exception of ordinances which take effect upon adoption, hereinafter referred to, no ordinance shall be adopted by the City Council on the day of its introduction, nor within five days thereafter, nor at any time other than at a regular or adjourned regular meeting. At the time of adoption of an ordinance or resolution it shall be read in full, unless, after the reading of the title thereof, the further reading thereof is waived by unanimous consent of the City Councilmembers present. In the event that any ordinance is altered after its introduction, the same shall not be finally adopted except at a regular or adjourned regular meeting, held not less than five days after the date upon which such ordinance was so altered. The correction of typographical or clerical errors shall not constitute the making of an alteration within the meaning of the foregoing sentence.', 'No order for the payment of money shall be adopted or made at any other than a regular or adjourned regular meeting.', 'The affirmative votes of at least four members of the City Council shall be required for the enactment of any ordinance or resolution, or for the making or approving of any order for the payment of money.', 'The affirmative votes of at least five members of the City Council shall be required for the adoption of any amendment to the (a) the Land Use and Circulation Element or (b) any specific plan adopted pursuant to Chapter 9.45 of the Municipal Code, where that amendment would increase the maximum height limit or floor area ratio applicable to any zoning district.', 'Emergency Ordinances. Any ordinance declared by the City Council to be necessary as an emergency measure for preserving the public peace, health or safety and containing a statement of the reasons for its urgency, may be introduced and adopted at one and the same meeting if passed by at least five affirmative votes.', 'The language contained in this option would allow projects to exceed the zoning ordinance standards through a Development Agreement without a super-majority, but only if the project is consistent with the LUCE and any applicable Specific Plan. In other words, changes to the governing rules and regulations would require super-majority approval, but, in situations where the LUCE allows Tier 3 projects through the approval of a Development Agreement, a super-majority would not be required.', 'Option 3', 'Option 3 would require a super-majority for any project that requires an amendment to the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE), any specific plan adopted pursuant to Chapter 9.45 of the Municipal Code, or the City of Santa Monica Comprehensive Zoning Ordinance as set forth in Article 9 of the Municipal Code, where that amendment would increase the maximum height limit or floor area ratio applicable to any zoning district. However, this super-majority provision would not apply to any Established Large Sites Overlay project that complies with Section 9.10.080 of the Downtown Community Plan. This option would add the underlined language to Section 615 of the City Charter to read as follows:', 'Option 3 - limits height and FAR increases in the LUCE, Specific Plan or the Zoning Code', '615. Adoption of ordinances and resolutions.', 'With the sole exception of ordinances which take effect upon adoption, hereinafter referred to, no ordinance shall be adopted by the City Council on the day of its introduction, nor within five days thereafter, nor at any time other than at a regular or adjourned regular meeting. At the time of adoption of an ordinance or resolution it shall be read in full, unless, after the reading of the title thereof, the further reading thereof is waived by unanimous consent of the City Councilmembers present. In the event that any ordinance is altered after its introduction, the same shall not be finally adopted except at a regular or adjourned regular meeting, held not less than five days after the date upon which such ordinance was so altered. The correction of typographical or clerical errors shall not constitute the making of an alteration within the meaning of the foregoing sentence.', 'No order for the payment of money shall be adopted or made at any other than a regular or adjourned regular meeting.', 'The affirmative votes of at least four members of the City Council shall be required for the enactment of any ordinance or resolution, or for the making or approving of any order for the payment of money.', 'The affirmative votes of at least five members of the City Council shall be required for the adoption of any amendment to (a) the Land Use and Circulation Element, (b) any specific plan adopted pursuant to Chapter 9.45 of the Municipal Code, or (c) the City of Santa Monica Comprehensive Zoning Ordinance as set forth in Article 9 of the Municipal Code, where that amendment would increase the maximum height limit or floor area ratio applicable to any zoning district; provided, however, that this super-majority provision would not apply to any Established Large Sites Overlay project that complies with Section 9.10.080 of the Downtown Community Plan.', 'Emergency Ordinances. Any ordinance declared by the City Council to be necessary as an emergency measure for preserving the public peace, health or safety and containing a statement of the reasons for its urgency, may be introduced and adopted at one and the same meeting if passed by at least five affirmative votes.', 'The language contained in this option would require a super-majority for any project that exceeds the height and FAR allowance contained in the Zoning Ordinance. Therefore, Tier 3 projects located in the few areas that still allow Tier 3 development would be required to obtain a Development Agreement and achieve a super-majority vote from City Council.', 'The proposed language in this option specifically exempts the Established Large Sites contained in the Downtown Community Plan area because the determination to allow projects on these sites to reach a height up to 130’ through the approval of a Development Agreement was thoroughly vetted during the Downtown Community Plan outreach process and the requirement for a Development Agreement allows the approvals to be brought before the voters through the referendum process.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'If the Council were to choose to place a measure on the ballot, the cost of the ballot measure would be incurred as part of the elections budget of $513,981 in the Records & Election Services (City Clerk) Department.'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '2924'}], [{'Title': 'Public Hearing and Issuance of Lease Revenue Bonds, Series 2018 to Finance Fire Station No. 1', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '09. Public Hearings', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council: Hold a public hearing, receive public comment, and adopt the attached Resolution Authorizing Issuance of Series 2018 Bonds (Attachment A), and approve the related documents required for the Issuance of Lease Revenue Bonds, Series 2018 (Attachments C, D, E, F, G and H).Staff recommends that the Public Financing Authority:1. Hold a public hearing, receive public comment, and adopt the attached Resolution Authorizing Issuance of Series 2018 Bonds (Attachment B), and approve the related documents required for the Issuance of Lease Revenue Bonds, Series 2018 (Attachments C, D, E, F, G and H).', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'After extensive planning and public approval milestones, construction is set to commence on a replacement for the City’s downtown fire station which does not meet current seismic and other contemporary operating standards. Staff recommends that the City Council and Public Financing Authority (PFA) approve documents required for the issuance of Lease Revenue Bonds, Series 2018 to finance Fire Station No. 1 and a Fire Training Facility at the City Yards. The determination to issue lease revenue bonds is made based on the City’s intent to distribute the cost of building an essential facility over its useful life, the City’s access to low-cost financing, and the City’s low level of existing debt.', 'The Bonds will be secured by a lease agreement between the City and the PFA that will include the right to use the City’s Public Safety Facility during Fire Station No. 1 construction, following which lease payments will be for Fire Station No. 1 use and occupancy only. Bond proceeds will also cover bond issuance costs. The proposed Series 2018 bonds will be for a maximum principal amount of $38,000,000, with a final maturity date of July 1, 2048 and a maximum true interest cost of 5.00%.', 'Background', 'The FY 2016-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget includes $41.6 million for Fire Station No. 1 and the Proposed FY 2018-20 Capital Improvement Program Budget will include $2.2 million for the Fire Training Facility.', 'On March 27, 2018 (Attachment I), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Bernards Bros., Inc. in the amount of $29.2 million for construction of Fire Station No. 1. Additionally, the Fire Station No. 1 project will include approximately $12.4 million in direct owner costs for technology equipment, testing and inspections, construction management services, permits, fees, furniture, fixtures and equipment, LEED certification costs, and project contingency. The cost of the Fire Training Facility is estimated to be approximately $2.2 million.', 'Discussion', 'Staff is recommending that the City issue lease revenue bonds in an amount not to exceed $38.0 million to fund the Fire Station No. 1 and Fire Training Facility projects. The remaining costs will be paid for by $6.5 million in reserves previously set aside for the projects. When determining whether to issue bonds to cover this capital cost, the City has considered a number of factors. First, the City’s adopted financial policies assert the prudence of using debt financing to distribute the cost of a facility over its useful life. Also, owing to its sound financial health and resulting high credit ratings, the City is able to benefit from low-cost financing. This allows for greater flexibility in allocating existing resources. Finally, the City is able to take advantage of favorable conditions in the municipal bond market due to its very low level of debt. With regard to the last factor, the City’s indebtedness is limited by Article VI of the City Charter, which states that the bonded indebtedness of the City may not exceed the sum of 10% of the total assessed valuation of property within the City. With this bond issuance, staff estimates that this indicator would reach 0.50%.', 'A breakdown of the total costs of the projects to be funded by the Bonds is shown in the table below.', 'Description', 'Fire Station No. 1', '(in millions)', 'Fire Training Facility TI', '(in millions)', 'Total', '(in millions)', 'Design Contract', 'N/A*', '$ 0.2', '$  0.2', 'Construction', '$ 29.2', '$  1.4', '$  30.6', 'Direct Owner Costs', '$ 12.4', '$ 0.6', '$  13.0', '$   41.6', '$  2.2', '$  43.8', '*Not included in bond issuance; approximately $2.0 million in General Funds was included in prior CIP Budgets for Fire Station 1 Design.', 'The bonds would be secured by a lease agreement between the City as lessee and the Santa Monica Public Financing Authority (PFA) as lessor. The lease agreement is based on use of the Public Safety Facility during Fire Station No. 1 construction. Once Fire Station No. 1 is completed and occupied by the City, expected early in 2020, the Public Safety Facility will be removed from security for the lease and payments will be solely for Fire Station No. 1 use and occupancy. This arrangement means that the City will not need to include interest due on the bonds during construction in the bond amount (capitalized interest).', 'Staff is proposing to sell the Series 2018 Bonds through a negotiated sale whereby the bond underwriter is predetermined and the Bond interest rates are set through a process of negotiation. A negotiated sale, as compared to an open competitive bid, is the best way to ensure the bond underwriter is in compliance with the City’s banking services Resolution (Resolution No. 11025). Upon Council approval of the Series 2018 Bond issuance, the City’s financial advisor will assist staff in determining the fair market value for the Bond interest rates.', 'To select a bond underwriter, the City’s financial advisor distributed a Request for Qualifications (“RFQ”) to 12 commercial and investment banking institutions active in the California tax-exempt bond market. The RFQ required respondents to certify the firm was in compliance with the City’s banking services Resolution. Nine firms responded to the RFQ.  The financial advisor rated the firms based on a combination of factors including their recommended approach to the bond sale, relevant experience with similar financings, methodology to execute the bond sale, compensation, and compliance with City social responsibility guidelines per Resolution 11025.  The recommendations were then presented to Finance Department staff who made the final selection of Stifel, Nicolaus & Co. as lead manager and UBS as co-manager. The lead manager serves as the representative of the underwriting group and manages the process of soliciting orders for the bonds from individual and institutional investors. The co-manager assumes underwriting liability and consults with the lead manager prior to and during the financing process.', 'In preparation for issuance of the bonds, credit ratings were requested from three credit rating agencies that currently maintain credit ratings on the City and Authority bonds.  The credit rating agencies – Fitch Ratings, Moody’s Investors Service, and Standard & Poors.  Staff anticipates the credit rating agencies will assign the highest possible lease revenue bond ratings to the bonds (AA+, Aa1, and AA+, respectively) and affirm the City’s AAA/Aaa/AAA general obligation bond credit ratings.', 'The attached resolutions and documents permit the City and PFA to proceed with all steps necessary for the issuance of the Series 2018 Bonds.  The resolutions approve the attached documents and authorize their execution and delivery by the specified agency’s officials and employees.  The resolutions also approve the preparation, execution, and delivery of a Final Official Statement; the execution and delivery of any additional documents and certificates; and the performance of such acts or related actions as may be necessary or desirable to effect the offering, sale, and issuance of the Series 2018 Bonds.  The resolutions authorize the issuance of the Series 2018 Bonds with a maximum principal amount of $38,000,000 with a final maturity date of July 1, 2048 and a maximum true interest cost of 5.00%.', 'This May 8, 2018 meeting serves as a public hearing relating to the public benefits of financing the Fire Station No. 1 and Fire Training Facility improvements through the PFA.  Staff published this public hearing notice in the Santa Monica Daily Press on April 26, 2018; at least five days prior to the hearing date as the Joint Exercise of Powers Agreement (JPA) law requires.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'Approving the recommended actions will result in the PFA issuing up to $38,000,000 in tax-exempt Lease Revenue Bonds. The estimated annual debt service, to be paid from the City’s annual base rental payments pursuant to the Lease Agreement, would be approximately $1.7 million (interest only) through fiscal year 2020 and rise to approximately $2.3 million between fiscal years 2021 and 2048.', 'The FY 2016-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget includes $41.6 million for design and construction of Fire Station No. 1 in account C014063.589000 and the Proposed FY 2018-20 Capital Improvement Program Budget will include $2.2 million for the Fire Training Facility.', 'Other accounts required to record transactions related to the bond issuance and debt service payments are listed in the table below. Any necessary budget changes will be made as part of the Year-End Budget Review in October 2018 after the bonds are issued and exact amounts are known.', 'Account', 'Amount', 'Other Financing Sources (proceeds from the sale of the Series 2018 Bonds, net of any original issue discount or premium)', '01990.601001', '$35,000,000', 'Other Financing Uses – Original issue Discount/Premium', '01990.602001', '$2,600,000', 'Series 2018 Bond Issue Costs (costs of issuance, underwriter’s discount and bond insurance)', '01274.567250', '$400,000', 'Fire Station #1 lease payment (debt service on Series 2018 Series Bonds (first year is interest only)', '01274.567251', '$1,720,000'], 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '3017'}], [{'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer, Mayor Pro Tem Davis and Councilmember McKeown that the Council allocate $20,000 as a matching grant to Elemental Music, a 501 ( c ) 3 non-profit that was created to inspire, train and nurture young musicians in Santa Monica. The organization serves over 200 elementary and middle school students each year and funds will be used to provide instruments and lessons to children from low-income households. Additionally, this action is in furtherance of the Council’s Learn &Thrive; Strategic goal which reflects Santa Monica’s long-standing commitment to provide equitable access to quality, affordable opportunities for lifelong learning and growth for community members of all ages.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1140', 'ID': '3059'}]]
[[{'Title': 'Proclamation declaring April 25, 2018 as Denim Day in the City of Santa Monica', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2973'}, {'Title': 'Proclamation recognizing April 2018 as Community College Month', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '3013'}], [{'Title': 'Bid Award for Local Electrical Supplies via In-Store Purchases', 'Department': 'Public Works, Facilities Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4306 to Electric Supply Connection, a California-based company, to furnish electrical supplies via in-store purchases as required by the Public Works Department; and2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue the Public Works Department a purchase order with Electric Supply Connection for the purchase of electrical supplies in an amount not to exceed $100,000 for one year, with two additional two-year renewal options, with an annual increase of 2%, for a total amount not to exceed $520,405 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Public Works Department purchases a variety of electrical supplies to maintain City facilities and street lighting. While the City receives a large majority of its planned electrical supplies via delivery, in-store purchases are still necessary for any work orders that require immediate attention and are urgent in nature. Staff recommends Electric Supply Connection to provide electrical supplies to the Public Works Department for a total amount not to exceed $520,405 over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'On July 25, 2017, Council rejected Bid #4284 to furnish electrical supplies via in-store purchases and required that bidders have a physical location within a 10-mile radius of Santa Monica (Attachment A). The only bidder, One Source Distributors, is located in Garden Grove, CA, over 40 miles away from the City.', 'Discussion', 'Staff from the Facilities Maintenance Division and Street & Fleet Services Division of the Public Works Department complete approximately 2,500 electrical-related work orders per year, including electrical repairs in City offices, public parks, various City facilities and the maintenance and repair of street lighting. Electrical supplies are obtained through a combination of delivery and in-store purchases. Planned projects, large purchases, and standard shop stock items are purchased through a separate contract. Even with this process, staff still currently average over 12 in-store electrical supply purchases per week for urgent and unplanned incidents.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On January 18, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide electrical supplies via in-store purchases in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal code provisions. A total of 21 vendors downloaded the bid. Three bids were received and publicly opened on February 1, 2018, per Attachment B. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, quality of products quoted and compliance with City specifications. There were 16 sample items quoted for bid and each vendor had multiple items for which they were the lowest bidder. Electric Supply Connection is the lowest bidder on 5 of the items and second lowest on an additional 5 items. Its store location is less than two miles from the City Yards (2500 Michigan Avenue), where the Facilities Maintenance and Street and Fleet Services workshops are located. The other two bidders’ closest store locations are 32 miles (Summers Group) and 17 miles (Wesco Distribution) from the City Yards, which would effectively prohibit the necessary in-store purchases. Moreover, Electric Supply Connection is the only bidder to offer four renewal options. If taken as an average across all bid line items, there was a 13% increase in the prices quoted above those of Summers Group, but staff determined that this offset was justified given the staff time required to travel to Santa Fe Springs for supplies. Based on these criteria, staff recommends Electric Supply Connection as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The purchase order to be awarded to Electric Supply Connection, for the Facilities Maintenance Division, is for an amount not to exceed $416,324. Funds of $80,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in various departments. The purchase order will be charged to account 014523.544010, and expenditures will be transferred to departments incurring maintenance services. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.', 'The purchase order to be awarded to Electric Supply Connection, for the Street & Fleet Services Division, is for an amount not to exceed $104,081. Funds of $20,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Public Works Department. The purchase order will be charged to accounts 014212.544010. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2620'}, {'Title': 'Award Construction Management Services Agreement for Citywide Facilities Renewal Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Facilities Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staffrecommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #SP2507_FRPto PMCS Group, a California-based company, for construction management services; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreementwithPMCS Groupin an amount not to exceed $317,680(including a 10% contingency) for one year with no additional renewal options.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Citywide Facilities Renewal Project funds a broad variety of large-scale renovations, deferred maintenance, emergency repairs, and upgrade projects at City facilities including construction and remodeling, carpentry, plumbing and electrical, painting, as well as heating ventilation and air conditioning (HVAC) repairs. This ongoing project plays a key role in maximizing the lifespan of City facilities and ensuring that the public and City staff receive the most benefit from their usage. Due to a backlog of deferred, large-scale projects, staff is requesting one year of construction management services to help complete the work. Facilities Maintenance staff does not have the capacity to manage these large-scale projects in addition to the ongoing preventative maintenance and minor projects they regularly oversee. Staff recommendsPMCS Groupto provide construction management servicesfor this project inan amount not to exceed $317,680(including a 10% contingency).', 'Background', 'The City operates and maintains over 140 facilities ranging in complexity from simple park concession buildings to the complicated Public Safety Facility. The ongoing Citywide Facilities Renewal Project allows the City to invest in this facility infrastructure by ensuring that larger maintenance needs are completed in a manner which:', '· maximizes the lifespan of City facilities;', '· lowers operational costs where possible;', '· provides maximum functionality, safety, efficiency and accessibility for the public and City staff;', '· promotes a clean and attractive appearance;', '· promotes green building practices/sustainability; and', '· provides flexibility for staff to respond to unforeseen circumstances and requests.', 'Using information gathered from planned facility condition assessments performed by outside vendors, regular staff inspections, and feedback from facility users, the Facilities Maintenance Division allocates the capital funding for the repair and replacement projects that are most needed.', 'Discussion', 'The main priority of Facilities Maintenance Division staff is to focus on smaller preventative maintenance and as-needed repairs. Because of this, it is necessary to contract out construction management services to complete larger capital replacement projects. To complete these larger projects in a prompt and effective manner, staff requests approval to enter an agreement with construction management firm PMCS Group.', 'PMCS Group would manage construction work that would be completed by various contractors throughout the year. Staff would return to Council for approval as necessary for the various contractors it would hire to complete the construction activities that would be managed by PMCS Group. As part of its construction management services, PMCS would complete quality assurance inspections of the contractors’ work, verify and manage field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitor and mitigate impacts as a result of the construction activities, attend the construction contractors’ safety meetings, attend periodic progress meetings, keep record of all necessary documentation relevant to the work performed during construction, and conduct public outreach as necessary.', 'A sample of the larger projects scheduled to be completed over the course of the next year are:', '· The upgrade and expansion of the City’s building management system, which allows the City to remotely control HVAC and energy usage', '· The replacement of major mechanical components at the Public Safety Facility', '· The replacement of failing exterior windows at the Public Safety Facility', '· The replacement of major mechanical components at Fire Station 2', '· The repair and overhaul of the heating, ventilation and air conditioning (HVAC) units at City Hall', '· Interior improvements to the Joslyn and Reed Park community buildings', '· Interior improvements to the Main Library', 'Consultant Selection - Construction Management', 'On October 10, 2017, the City issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQ) for construction management on-call services for various building and park construction projects. The RFQ was posted on the City’s online bidding website, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Forty-four vendors downloaded the RFQ, and thirteen firms responded. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Evaluation was based on the selection criteria set forth in SMMC Section 2.24.073, with the specific review of the following: technical competence, staffing capability, project approach, past performance, dispute resolution, quality control, and cost control. The top 10 firms were placed on a pre-qualified list of construction management firms in the Building category:', 'Arcadis', 'Kitchell', 'Cumming Corporation', 'PMCS Group', 'GKK', 'Psomas', 'Griffin Structures', 'Simplus', 'KDG Construction Consulting', 'Simpson & Simpson Management Consulting', 'From that list, KDG Construction Consulting, Kitchell, PMCS Group, Psomas, and Simpson & Simpson Management Consulting were found to have the most direct and relevant previous experience to this specific project and were invited to participate in a Request for Proposal (RFP) phase on January 16, 2018.', 'On February 5, 2018, KDG Construction Consulting, PMCS Group, and Simpson & Simpson Management Consulting submitted proposals. The City’s three-person review committee from the Facilities Maintenance Division reviewed and graded the firms and proposals based on the selection criteria set forth in SMMC 2.24.073. Staff recommends PMCS Group as the best qualified firm to provide construction management services, for an amount not to exceed $317,680 (including 10% contingency). PMCS Groupdemonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with similar projects in the cities of Santa Monica and Los Angeles, and the Los Angeles and Montebello unified school districts. Through past projects, PMCS Groupalso demonstrated its ability to offer experiencedconstruction management teams that couldconducthigh qualityconstructionmanagement at competitive hourly rates.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Thecontract to be awarded toPMCS Groupis for an amount not to exceed$317,680(including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 CapitalImprovement Program budgetin accountM010085.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2838'}, {'Title': 'Award Construction Contract for Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2395 to PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company, a California-based company, for the Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company, in an amount not to exceed $610,468 (including a 10% contingency);3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority; and4. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project would enhance pedestrian and cyclist safety and access. The project would also upgrade a stretch of the Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway (MANGo) Final Concept Plan, which was adopted by City Council in February 2014. The project would improve the visibility of pedestrians and cyclists at four pedestrian crossings near the Edison Language Academy located at 2402 Virginia Avenue, via new landscaped curb extensions that would shorten crossing distances. These changes will provide safer conditions for students traveling to school and will encourage more walking and biking, both objectives of the August 2015, Council identified goal to “Create a new model of mobility." Signing, striping, and pavement markings would also be upgraded at the project locations. Staff recommends PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company, to construct these improvements in an amount not to exceed $610,468 (including a 10% contingency). The total project cost of $610,468 will consist of $549,421 of grant funds and $61,047 of project readiness grant match funds.', 'Background', 'The Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project is funded by a Safe Routes to School (SRTS) grant that was competitively awarded to the City by the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans). The original The City received a notice to proceed from Caltrans in August 2013, and subsequently advertised for, and selected a designer. On February 11, 2014, Council approved the adoption of the MANGo conceptual plan which describes the community’s vision for a neighborhood greenway that traverses the Pico Neighborhood from the Bergamot area to the beach (Attachment A). The MANGo plan identifies four primary segments to be improved, and this project would make improvements along the segment referred to in the plan as the “The Neighborhood Wiggle.” This segment was selected because of its proximity to the Edison Language Academy, which makes the project locations eligible for Safe Routes to School grant funds. On April 12, 2016, Council approved a design contract with Alta Planning and Design to move forward with improvements near the Edison Language Academy (Attachment B). On February 28, 2017, Council approved the refined concept designs (Attachment C).', 'Discussion', 'The Edison Language Academy is in the Pico neighborhood between Interstate 10 and Pico Boulevard. Much of the MANGo corridor traverses a densely populated area that is home to approximately 22,500 residents and significant vehicular traffic. The major challenges facing pedestrians and cyclists within the project area include navigating the high traffic volume on streets that surround the Edison Language Academy campus, and obstructed visibility from motorists at intersections due to on-street parking. The proposed curb extensions would help to slow traffic and place pedestrians waiting to cross the street in locations that are more visible to motorists. The improvements are planned for:', '· Delaware Avenue and 22nd Street,', '· Kansas Avenue (mid-block) near the Edison Language Academy,', '· 27th Street and Kansas Avenue, and', '· Stewart Street and Kansas Avenue', 'These intersections are all part of MANGo’s “Neighborhood Wiggle” segment and would enhance pedestrian and cyclist safety for those commuting to the Edison Language Academy and the surrounding area.', 'Contractor Selection – Construction', 'On February 14, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirty-nine vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on March 8, 2018:', 'Bidder', 'Bid Amount', 'All American Asphalt', '$698,765', 'PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company', '$554,971', 'Engineer’s Estimate: $530,000', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City specifications. PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company has completed similar projects for the City, including the Annual Paving and Sidewalk Repair Project in Fiscal Year 2011-12 and improvements to Ocean Park Boulevard in 2013. PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company has also completed similar projects for the cities of Glendale, Whittier, Lomita, and Laguna Niguel. Staff contacted references listed in the bid package, and all respondents reported that work performed by PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company was completed according to project requirements. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company’s license is current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company, the lower bidder, is recommended as the best bidder for the Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project.', 'SRTS grant funds were programmed by Caltrans in the amount of $502,055 prior to the City beginning the bid procurement process. Caltrans Office of Local Assistance advised the City that additional funding would be available if necessary. Upon opening and evaluating the bids, staff determined an additional $47,366 of SRTS funds would be required and subsequently revised the grant finance letter accordingly. The project funding is explained in detail below in the Financial Impacts and Budget Section.', 'Construction Schedule and Management', 'Due to vehicular circulation congestion around the Edison Language Academy during the regular school year, construction of the project would take place during summer break when school is not in session. Construction work would begin on or around June 12, 2018, (the first day after the school year ends) and would conclude on or around August 17, 2018 (the last day before the new school year begins). Staff would continue to coordinate with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD) before and throughout the duration of the construction period to minimize impacts to the surrounding community. City staff would provide construction management for this project, which includes inspecting the contractor’s work during construction, verifying and documenting field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts due to construction activities, attending the contractor’s safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings, and maintaining all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work conducted during construction.', 'Public Outreach', 'Due to the nature of this project, staff anticipates interruptions to vehicular circulation around the Edison Language Academy. To mitigate these temporary public impacts, staff would conduct comprehensive outreach with SMMUSD, and include weekly updates on the City’s “Know Before You Go” (KBUG) web page and in the Santa Monica Daily Press. For work requiring temporary or partial closures to streets or access ways and detour plans, traffic control and highly visible signs would be placed at key locations to notify the public. Staff would also mail notices to nearby businesses and residents, post information on social media, and update the City’s website to inform the community. The construction has been scheduled during summer break to minimize impacts to students, parents, staff and the school facility. Additionally, recognizing that there may be some activity at the school during the summer break, the construction management team will work with the school and its principal to ensure that students and their parents are notified about the project. Following project construction, the City will utilize an additional $30,400 in Caltrans grant funds to aid in raising awareness about the infrastructure changes implemented near and around Edison Language Academy and promote a travel plan for school access.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The project is categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15301(c) and Section 15302 of the CEQA Guidelines. Class 1 exempt projects include the "operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination." Class 2 exempt projects include the “replacement or reconstruction of existing structures and facilities where the new structure would be located on the same site as the structure replaced and would have substantially the same purpose and capacity as the structure replaced.” The project qualifies as a Class 1 and Class 2 project exempt from CEQA. In addition, none of the exceptions specified in Section 15300.2 of CEQA Guidelines would apply that would preclude the use of this CEQA exemption: the project site is not located in a sensitive environment, the project would not have a significant effect on the environment, the project would not damage scenic resources, the project would not be located on a hazardous waste site, nor would the project cause a change to a historical resource. Therefore, this project is categorically exempt from CEQA.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to PALP Inc., dba Excel Paving Company is for an amount not to exceed $610,468 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget in the following accounts:', 'Account No.', 'Description', 'FY 2017-18', 'C209102.589000', 'Edison Language Academy Safe Routes', '$ 502,055', 'C014073.589000', 'Bicycle Project Readiness & Grant Match', '$  36,748', 'C459094.589000', 'Pedestrian Action Plan Implementation Readiness & Grant Match', '$ 24,299', 'Total Funds Available', '$ 563,102', 'Award of this construction contract will require the following budget changes:', '1. Increase revenue budget at account 20267.404041 to receive additional grant funds in the amount of $47,366.', '2. Increase expenditure budget at account C209102.589000 in the amount of $47,366 to reflect receipt of the additional Caltrans Edison Safe Routes to', 'School grant funds. This will increase the grant amount to $549,421.', 'The total project cost of $610,468 will consist of $549,421 of grant funds and $61,047 of project readiness grant match funds.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2859'}, {'Title': 'Bus Body Repairs and Painting Services', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4318 to Carlos Guzman Inc., a California-based company, to provide body repair and painting of transit coaches;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Carlos Guzman Inc., in an amount not to exceed $703,098 for one year, with four (4) additional contract years, in the amount of $2,812,392 on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $3,515,490 over a five-year period which includes a $319,590 10% contingency with future year funding contingent on City Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends the award of Bid #4318 to Carlos Guzman Inc. to provide bus body repairs and painting services as required by Big Blue Bus (BBB). The award is for a specified hourly labor rate and materials price plus applicable sales taxes for a five-year period with successive contract years at the same price, terms, and conditions as the first contract year. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $3,515,490 which includes a 10% contingency, over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'The body repair and painting of transit buses are necessary to address normal wear and tear and accident damage during the 12-year useful life of a bus. This service ensures that buses with damaged exteriors can be repaired and returned to service in a timely manner. On June 23, 2015, Council awarded bid #4183 to Carlos Guzman for an amount not to exceed $1,950,000 over a three-year period. The resulting agreement expires on June 30, 2018, requiring BBB to solicit bids for body repairs and painting services for its fleet of transit buses.', 'Discussion', 'The City’s fleet of transit buses require body repair and painting services for buses that become damaged through normal wear and tear or accidents. It is essential that repairs be made promptly to preserve acceptable customer service levels. BBB staff performs minor body repairs in-house; however, repairs and painting resulting from major accidents exceeds BBB’s capabilities, workspace, and staffing levels. The amount of work needed to keep the fleet in an as-new condition is equivalent to nine Full Time Employee’s (FTE’s) time.', 'BBB currently has one full time employee performing minor body repairs. Transit buses requiring extensive repairs and painting are sent to an outside body shop that can repair multiple buses simultaneously. In addition, the outside body shop has a drive-in paint booth that can accommodate 30’, 40’, and 60’ buses. Per Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) regulations, extensive painting must be performed in a paint booth. BBB’s facility does not have a paint booth because of its close proximity to a school.', 'Due to the number of buses requiring body repair and paint services to keep BBB’s fleet in an as-new condition, the space required, and the EPA requirement of a paint booth staff recommends that overflow body repair and painting services be awarded under Bid #4318.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014 staff was directed by Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” Transit Bus Body Painting and Repair services were identified as meeting the criteria for contractual services due to specialized technology and expertise, space requirements, capital equipment requirements, and excessive risk associated with painting buses.', 'Based on the number of buses requiring body repair and paint services to keep the fleet in an as-new condition, bringing this service in-house would require a minimum of nine (9) additional FTEs, two additional work bays and a paint booth to accommodate 30’, 40’, and 60’ coaches. Bid #4318 requires vendors to have a fully enclosed paint booth in their facility in accordance with Federal, State, and Local rules and regulations, and requires vendors to have certified painters and technicians on staff. The bid also requires vendors to have their own repair facility, which may be subject to approval by BBB staff.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On February 1, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide bus body repairs and painting services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Seven (7) vendors downloaded the bid. Proposals from Carlos Guzman Inc. and McCray Enterprises were received and publicly opened on February 21 2018.', 'Cost Estimate', 'Carlos Guzman', 'McCray Enterprises', 'Estimate - 5- year period', '$ 3,195,900.00', '$ 3,467,750.00', '10% Contingency', '$ 319,590.00', '$ 346,775.00', 'Contract 5yr Total', '$ 3,515,490.00', '$ 3,814,525.00', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, which include price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product and compliance with City specifications. In evaluating the bids, BBB staff requested two paint samples from each vendor, and performed three tests to gauge quality of paint work: a gloss test, an orange peel test, and a pull test. Both vendors met BBB’s expectations on all tests, though Carlos Guzman Inc.’s sample scored higher on the gloss test. BBB staff reviewed the cost proposal submitted by Carlos Guzman and compared it to the previous agreement and found the cost increase to be reasonable. Carlos Guzman Inc. has had a positive history of providing bus body repairs and painting services for Big Blue Bus and is able to meet all of the City’s requirements in addition to being the lowest bidder. Based on these criteria, Carlos Guzman Inc. is recommended as the best bidder and staff recommends that Council award Bid #4318 to Carlos Guzman Inc. for bus body repair and painting services. The total expenditure for the five-year period is not to exceed $3,515,490.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Carlos Guzman Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $3,515,490 which includes a 10% contingency. Funds of $703,098 are available in the FY 2018-19 Approved Budget in the Big Blue Bus Department. The contract will be charged to 60600008.550012. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2893'}, {'Title': 'Pilot-Program License Agreement with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. for the Third Street Promenade to provide public-serving programs and amenities', 'Department': 'Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a pilot-program license agreement with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. for the Third Street Promenade to provide public-serving programs and amenities for an initial term of one year with four, one-year renewal options with no license fee.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Changing consumer preferences and increased competition in the retail environment are impacting the iconic Third Street Promenade (Promenade) in Downtown Santa Monica, as reflected by increased store vacancies and the closing of many retail operations, including the Barnes & Noble store, which was an anchor on the north end of the Promenade. To promote community, encourage public visitation and use, and help ensure that the Promenade (including in particular its northernmost block) remains vibrant, inviting, and safe, staff recommends that the City enter into a pilot-program license agreement with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) to provide public-serving programs and amenities on the Promenade, with a focus on its 1200 block between Arizona Avenue and Wilshire Boulevard. The duration of the pilot-program license agreement would be for an initial term of one year with up to four one-year renewal options on the same terms and conditions, for a total license term of up to five years, without a license fee.', 'Background', 'The Third Street Promenade’s public spaces have become important community gathering places and a significant contributor to the success of the Promenade and Santa Monica’s Downtown. In 1989, the City and downtown property owners had the foresight to invest in creating enhanced public spaces, which included the renovation of the public right-of-way and the addition of a variety of streetscape elements. Residents and visitors have been drawn to the Promenade’s unique urban setting, which features street performers, restaurants and outdoor dining, specialty merchandise, entertainment venues, flexible plazas, welcoming ambassadors, and enhanced maintenance services. The bustling, colorful scene along the Promenade provides a safe place for community gathering that encourages repeat visitation and supports a healthy mix of retail, restaurant, and entertainment uses. Research and experience in Santa Monica and nationally demonstrate the value of “placemaking” to promote community gathering spaces that are shared and welcoming, and that as a result are also safer.', 'The most northern of the three blocks, the 1200 block of the Promenade located between Arizona Avenue and Wilshire Boulevard, has traditionally not generated the same level of visitation and pedestrian activity as the Promenade’s other two blocks for a variety of reasons, including its distance from the Santa Monica Pier, Santa Monica Place, and key transportation access points such as the I-10 Freeway and more recently, the Expo light-rail terminus. Additionally, the Barnes & Noble bookstore at the southeast corner of Third Street and Wilshire Boulevard, which served as an anchor for the 1200 block of the Promenade for over 20 years, closed in January 2018, citing the need to downsize their store space and seek a more affordable location. Given the recent trends in retail and increasing competition from online retailers, the closing was unfortunate for downtown, though not unexpected. Other retail closings have occurred throughout the Promenade, and these, coupled with a growing movement towards e-commerce, have contributed to decreased visitation and pedestrian activity in the Promenade as a whole.', 'DTSM has prioritized business retention and recruitment to address changing consumer preferences and the continued competition of online sales. DTSM’s Board of Directors created the Promenade Tenancy Committee in 2017 for the purpose of vetting proposed programs, strategies, and tactics designed to support downtown’s retail, restaurant, entertainment, and other active uses. DTSM has also identified the need to expand the level of public-serving amenities to increase visitation and pedestrian activity and attract patrons to support the area’s businesses. As Promenade businesses compete with internet commerce, as well as other retail destinations like The Grove and the newly renovated Westfield Century City, DTSM has sought to differentiate Downtown Santa Monica and the Promenade. One element of differentiation is creating interactive, people-focused experiences that are not available elsewhere, and which buttress the Promenade’s identification by the public as a safe and entertaining community gathering space. DTSM has enhanced the Promenade’s public spaces by creating engaging activities and installations, such as the Picnic on the Promenade summer activities and December’s holiday pop-up art installation.', 'The City has a history of sensitivity to concerns about privatizing public space. While traditional malls and newer “lifestyle centers” like the Grove exert private property rights over their circulation and gathering spaces, historic commercial areas in revitalized urban areas are genuinely public spaces. Working in partnership with a non-profit, stakeholder-based organization like DTSM offers an opportunity to animate and manage public spaces while ensuring public access and, indeed, increasing their attractiveness as community gathering spaces. DTSM has been granted other licenses to activate the City’s public spaces such as the very successful ice rink at 5th Street and Arizona Avenue. DTSM has also entered into pilot-program license agreements to provide public-serving amenities along Ocean Avenue near Tongva Park and public art installations at Triangle Square adjacent to the Colorado Esplanade.', 'The Ocean Avenue activation is being permitted and is expected to begin by early summer. The downtown public art installation programming, in partnership with Community and Cultural Services, is planned to continue through Labor Day 2018. The City also entered into a pilot program to establish DTSM ambassador services in Tongva and Palisades Parks to provide hospitality services, assist with monitoring and maintenance of the spaces, and address quality of life issues. The initial success of these programs have created a positive impact on visitors’ perception of safety and cleanliness, and demonstrated the value of “placemaking” to promote shared, welcoming environments, which in turn enhances safety and helps to create more vibrant public spaces.', 'Discussion', 'With the continued growth of online shopping, customers who have traditionally been lured by brand names and new products are seeking more of an "experience" in a commercial district, rather than simply a place to shop. In an effort to keep the Promenade competitive and fresh in the public’s perception, to continue to offer a unique and attractive public community experience to both residents and visitors in one of the City’s key public spaces, and to help sustain one of the City’s economic engines, DTSM proposes to activate the Promenade (particularly its 1200 block) by offering public-serving amenities and other interactive experiences that enhance the sense of place and engage the community. The City has initiated the process of developing a strategy to sustain Santa Monica’s vibrant economy as technology and globalism rapidly change the way we live and work. One possible focus of the strategy is to address how e-commerce is impacting the retail environment. Even though the full extent of the impact to the retail environment is unknown at this time, studies and experiential efforts have shown that consumers are increasingly adopting the convenience of online shopping while seeking personal experiences such as dining or interactive retail experiences. To curate a great downtown environment and to continue to support a vibrant public space for community engagement, there is a growing need to provide an engaging environment that heightens the public’s experience.', 'Based on DTSM’s experience and success with programming activities and events, staff recommends entering into a pilot-program license agreement with DTSM to assist with increasing pedestrian experiences on the Promenade, with a focus on its north block. The proposed pilot-program license agreement would allow DTSM to provide pedestrian-oriented services and amenities within the Promenade, with a focus on the approximately 4,800-square-foot public plaza of the 1200 block of the Promenade, exclusive of any existing outdoor-dining license areas. Activation of the area with pedestrian-oriented amenities, experiential activities, and event programming is intended to help create connections between the north and south ends of the Promenade, increase overall public visitation (including in particular increased pedestrian activity at the north end of the Promenade), develop a greater sense of place, and build community. The goals and objectives align with the guiding principles of the Downtown Community Plan.', 'The terms of the license agreement are recommended to allow DTSM to program the Promenade daily from approximately 7 AM until 10 PM. DTSM staff and ambassadors would be allowed to set up the following, all of which would be available to the public for use:', '· Tables, chairs, umbrellas, and other moveable furniture', '· Games and interactive displays such as pianos and ping-pong tables', '· Dog treats and water bowls', '· Audio system and staging (for use by musicians, DJs, and performers who have obtained required permits, with scheduling as necessary by DTSM)', '· Additional trashcans and recycle bins', 'The terms of the recommended license agreement would also permit DTSM, during the same hours and in the same space, to have ambassadors or staff available to assist public use of the provided amenities. DTSM would also be allowed to post signage, bearing both DTSM’s and the City’s logos, promoting the Promenade as a public gathering space.', 'As part of the pilot program, staff recommends that DTSM be provided with the flexibility and creativity to adjust the types of programs and uses within the license area that are most impactful to enhancing the public’s experience and attracting increased public visitation. In turn, DTSM would provide regular reports to the City detailing the success of various programs and uses in increasing foot traffic and community engagement. DTSM would also study the use of temporary seating by observing the way people interact with moveable furniture. Staff seeks administrative discretion to modify the scope of DTSM services within the license agreement to respond to the success of programs and uses in enhancing community engagement and promoting a unique downtown public environment.', 'DTSM will also continue to obtain event permits pursuant to the generally applicable events permitting process to provide additional public community engagement activities, at times co-sponsored by local businesses. As DTSM learns the relative success of various programs, DTSM may seek to enter into a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with the City to present additional events outside of that process to further the City’s goals. Staff anticipates presenting any such MOU to the Council for approval.', 'General License Agreement Terms', 'The proposed terms of the license agreement are as follows:', '· A one-year term with up to four one-year renewal options for a total license term of up to five years, without a license fee.', '· Either party may terminate the license agreement with 30 days’ notice.', '· Tentative hours for the license area would be daily from approximately 7 AM to 10 PM, with an ability to adjust the hours based on seasonality and program activity.', '· Rules and regulations may be developed, posted, and enforced by the City.', '· DTSM would be responsible for providing adequate staffing to ensure consistent monitoring within the license area while maintaining public access.', '· DTSM would ensure that any sub-licensee or subcontracted vendors maintain and provide adequate insurance coverage and comply with all rules, regulations, and laws, while maintaining public access.', '· DTSM would be responsible for providing, maintaining, and securing any tables, chairs, or other furniture or improvements installed within the license area.', '· At the termination of the license agreement, DTSM would be responsible for the removal of any improvements installed and any repairs required to the license areas as a result of the installation of improvements.', '· All improvements or installations within the license area would be coordinated in advance with Public Works, Planning, and Building and Safety to ensure adherence with administrative policies and municipal code requirements.', '· Commencement of the services is estimated to occur in early summer 2018, following execution of the license agreement.', '· The City would continue to provide the same level of routine maintenance services and repairs for the licensed right-of-way area.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2899'}, {'Title': 'Upholstery Services for Transit Buses and Fire Vehicles', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #4321 to Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe, a California-based company, to provide upholstery service for Big Blue Bus and Fire Department Vehicles;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe, in an amount not to exceed $106,028 for one year, with four (4)additional contract years, in the amount of $513,179 which includes a 3% annual cost escalator and a 10% contingency, for an amount not to exceed $619,206 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on City Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends the award of Bid #4321 to Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe to provide re-upholstery and installation of transit bus passenger seats, bus operator seats, and Fire vehicles, at specified unit prices plus applicable sales taxes for a five-year period with successive years at 3% price increase. Due to the high volume of passengers who ride Big Blue Bus (BBB), seat replacement is an ongoing maintenance program. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $619,206 which includes a 10% contingency, over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'Upholstery services for BBB’s transit buses, passenger seats and operator seats are necessary to repair any seating damage that may occur during the normal operation of transit buses and fire vehicles. BBB has historically contracted out this service which ensures that seating standards are maintained, offering a clean and pleasant environment for Big Blue Bus passengers. On July 14, 2015, City Council awarded Bid #4180 to Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe for an amount not to exceed $306,900 over a three-year period. The existing contract ends on June 30, 2018 requiring BBB to solicit bids for upholstery services for its fleet of transit buses and Fire Department vehicles.', 'Discussion', 'The City’s fleet of transit buses requires routine seat re-upholstery to maintain seating standards and offer a clean surface, free of gum, excessive grease, dirt and unsightly graffiti. Due to the high volume of passengers who ride BBB buses, an average of one hundred six-teen (116) seat cushions, and sixty-six (66) seat back rests are replaced every week. The upholstery service provider would conduct a weekly inspection of all bus passenger and operator seats, re-upholster seat inserts, and remove and replace worn seats as needed. The upholstery service would also re-upholster the original equipment manufacturer’s bus operator and fire vehicles seats to ensure that operators of these vehicles have safe, comfortable seats after the original seats have worn out. The award of this bid would enable BBB to maintain the seating in its fleet of transit buses and fire vehicles to BBB standards, providing a safe and clean environment for its passengers and operators.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014 staff was directed by Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” seven criteria were established to determine proper use of contracted staff. Of these, “Specialized/Technical expertise,” “Space Requirements,” and “Capital/Equipment Requirements” are relevant to BBB’s decision to contract the transit bus and Fire vehicle re-upholstery service.', 'Bid #4321 requires the vendor to provide all necessary tooling and equipment to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment. Staff has evaluated the feasibility of conducting the re-upholstery service in–house. It was found that current staff does not have the technical expertise to perform this service. Two full-time employees with upholstery expertise would have to be hired to perform the services provided by the contractor. The current facility does not have sufficient space to house required staff and equipment necessary to provide the upholstery service. It is estimated that approximately 1,000 square ft. of space would be needed to house the two FTE’s and equipment.', 'Based on the criteria outlined in the January 13, 2015 staff report, and the added costs associated with bring this service in-house, staff recommends that City Council award Bid #4321 to Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe for bus and fire vehicle re-upholstery services. The total expense for the five-year term is not to exceed $619,206.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On February 15, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide transit bus and fire vehicle upholstery services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twelve (12) vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on March 6, 2018 per the table below:', 'Cost Estimate', 'Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe', 'Estimate 5-year Period', '$562,914', '10% Contingency', '$ 56,291', 'Contract 5-year Total', '$619,206', 'The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. There were no “No Bid” responses and procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid. Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe has had a positive history of providing re-upholstery services for transit buses and Fire vehicles to the Big Blue Bus and is able to meet all of the City’s requirements. In addition, staff compared the bid pricing to the previous price submitted by Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe and determined the new bid pricing to be reasonable. Based on these criteria, Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Ye Olde Upholstery Shoppe is for an amount not to exceed $619,206 which includes a 3% annual cost escalator and a 10% contingency. Funds of $106,028 are available in the FY 2018-19 Approved Budget in the Big Blue Bus and Fire departments. The contract will be charged to accounts 60600008.550012 ($99,278) and 01190001.529470 ($6,750). Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2903'}, {'Title': 'Award Bid for Unleaded Fuel', 'Department': 'Public Works, Street & Fleet Services', 'Sponsors': 'Fire Chief Bill Walker, Director Edward F. King', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4296 to Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc., a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of Top-Tier unleaded gasoline;Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue purchase orders with Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc. for the purchase and delivery of Top-Tier unleaded gasoline in the amount not to exceed $864,946 (includes a 20% contingency) for one full year, with five-additional one-year renewal options to extend on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $5,189,676 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City utilizes unleaded gasoline for emergency response vehicles in the Fire and Police departments, as well as hybrid vehicles in the Big Blue Bus (BBB) Department. The use of Top-Tier unleaded gasoline supports the City’s Sustainable City Plan goals for reduced emissions and sustainability by increasing engine performance, which enhances the ability of vehicles to maintain the Environmental Protection Agency’s Tier 2 emission standards. Staff recommends issuing purchase orders with Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc. for the purchase and delivery of Top-Tier unleaded gasoline for a total amount not exceed $5,189,676 (includes a 20% contingency) over a six-year period.', 'Background', 'On April 24, 2012, the City Council awarded bid #3087 to IPC, Inc. to supply and deliver unleaded fuel for a period of five years and two months, through June 30, 2017 (Attachment A).  The City has continued to purchase unleaded fuel through IPC, Inc. on interim purchase orders until a formal bid for unleaded fuel could be completed. The vendor agreed to extend the price, terms, and conditions for an additional nine months. The City currently has emergency response and hybrid vehicles that operate on unleaded gasoline. These vehicles include Police motorcycles, patrol and detective cars, Big Blue Bus gas/electric hybrid vehicles, and various Fire emergency response vehicles. The City’s reduced emissions fuel policy currently allows an exception for the use of unleaded gasoline for the operation of emergency response vehicles, and for hybrid vehicles still in service. The Big Blue Bus, Fire, and Public Works departments maintain fuel storage tanks at their locations, including the Big Blue Bus corporate yard, Fire Stations 1, 3, and 5, and the City Yards facilities, where these vehicles obtain fuel.', 'Discussion', 'City vehicles use approximately 263,500 gallons of fuel annually and the bid was based on this amount. In this bid, staff provided the Oil Price Information Service (OPIS) rate from January 29, 2018 as the baseline for vendors to bid a percentage above or below (+/-) the OPIS rate provided, and the City required Top-Tier detergent unleaded gasoline in an effort to improve engine performance in those vehicles that use unleaded fuel. The Top-Tier detergent fuel additive helps to control and minimize deposits on engine components, which helps to increase engine performance. As a result, the ability of a vehicle to maintain the Environmental Protection Agency’s Tier 2 emission standards is enhanced.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On January 29, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver 263,500 gallons of Top-Tier unleaded fuel in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-one vendors downloaded the bid. Six bids were received and publicly opened on February 15, 2018.', 'Total Price', 'Per Gallon Price', 'Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc.', '$720,788.44', '$2.73554', 'Falcon Fuels, Inc.', '$725,067.68', '$2.75168', 'Merrimac Petroleum, Inc.', '$745,705.00', '$2.83000', 'IPC (USA) -', '$747,681.25', '$2.83750', 'Southern Counties Oil Co.', '$751,735.20', '$2.85289', 'Petroleum Traders Corporation', '$760,250.20', '$2.88520', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc. offered a product consistent with City specifications, as well as a lower fixed price adjustment and fixed freight charges over the life of the agreement, providing a level of price security in the outer years of the agreement. Based on these criteria, staff recommends that the City Council award bid #4296 to Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc., as required by the Street and Fleet Services Division, Fire Department, and Big Blue Bus, in an amount of $864,946, including $223,229 for the remainder of FY 2017-18, for a total amount not to exceed $5,189,676.', 'The annual costs are based on the estimated usage of 263,500 gallons of fuel annually.  The total price noted in the table above is the price per gallon based on the January 29, 2018 OPIS price. The price per gallon will vary throughout the agreement term, based on the percent discount on the OPIS price, which fluctuates. As this award would run from April 24, 2018 through April 23, 2024, funding of $223,229 is being requested for the remainder of FY 2017-18, from April 24, 2018 to June 30, 2018 for the initial purchase order, as noted in the Financial impacts section. The not to exceed amount includes a 20% contingency for anticipated fluctuations in unleaded gasoline prices. Per market research, it is anticipated that an annualized average of 3.1% increase in gasoline prices will occur over the next three years, as well as possible changes in consumption over the next six years.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The purchase orders to be awarded to Pinnacle Petroleum, Inc. are for an amount not to exceed $5,189,676. Funds of $223,229 are included in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Big Blue Bus, Fire, and Public Works departments. The purchase orders will be charged to the following accounts:', '54459.522910', '“Vehicles-Fuels/Lubrication”', '$ 83,710', '01312.522910', '“Vehicles-Fuels/Lubrication”', '$ 13,951', '41654.522961', '“Fuel - Service Vehicles”', '$125,568', 'Total', '$223,229', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2918'}, {'Title': 'Contract Modification for Design Services for Safe Routes to School Pedestrian Improvements at Four Schools', 'Department': 'Mobility (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement #10551 (CCS) in the amount of $59,263 with Anderson Penna, a California-based company, for engineering design services for pedestrian safety improvements. This will result in a 3 year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $208,389.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'As part of the Council’s Strategic Goal of “creating a new model for mobility,” Santa Monica is pursuing a comprehensive approach to making walking, biking and transit safer and more attractive options. A key element of this effort is the commitment to Vision Zero, the goal of eliminating deaths and severe injuries from traffic collisions. This contract modification facilitates expedited implementation of Vision Zero “jump start” projects. Anderson Penna is presently providing engineering design services for the Safe Routes to School Pedestrian Improvements at Four Schools project, which includes curb extensions, and improved signing, striping and pavement markings at multiple locations to facilitate pedestrian safety and comfort. Staff recommends modifying the professional services agreement with Anderson Penna for engineering design services for the same types of improvements at a limited number of additional locations in order to efficiently and expeditiously deliver critical safety enhancements. Doing so will further expedite project delivery, as it will enable the construction bid package for both projects to be combined.', 'Background', '“Creating a new model for Mobility” is one of Council’s top five Strategic Goals. A central tenet of this goal, along with the Pedestrian Action Plan, is to achieve Vision Zero, which calls for the elimination of all fatal and severe injury collisions through data-driven design, engineering, enforcement, and educational interventions. On May 9, 2017 (Attachment A), Council gave direction regarding creation of a Vision Zero action strategy and on June 27, 2017 (Attachment B), Council allocated $500,000 toward Vision Zero jump start projects to occur within two years. The Vision Zero jump start projects, which would be designed under this contract modification, include the installation of targeted physical improvements to be complemented with other education, encouragement and enforcement efforts.', 'On September 26, 2017 (Attachment C) Council authorized a professional services agreement with Anderson Penna, a California-based company, in an amount not to exceed $149,126 to provide engineering design services for the Safe Routes to School Pedestrian Improvements for John Adams and Lincoln Middle Schools, Roosevelt Elementary School and the Will Rogers Learning Community.', 'Discussion', 'On November 17, 2017, the City entered into a professional services agreement with Anderson Penna to design pedestrian safety improvements, which include installing curb extensions and flashing beacons, and improving pavement markings and crossings around four schools in Santa Monica:John Adams and Lincoln Middle Schools, Roosevelt Elementary School, and Will Rogers Learning Community. The purpose of the project is to increase visibility of pedestrians, shorten crossing distances, and improve overall pedestrian safety, especially for students, parents, and faculty.', 'On June 27, 2017, Council allocated funds to the Vision Zero program to complete six “jump start” projects, three of which, like the Pedestrian Improvements at Four Schools projects, also aim to reduce pedestrian exposure to automobiles, shorten crossing distances, and enhance overall pedestrian safety through the following targeted physical improvements:', '1. Improve the Pico Boulevard and Stewart Street/28th Street crossing with a curb extension and leading pedestrian interval to increase pedestrian visibility and reduce pedestrian exposure,', '2. Improve either the Santa Monica Boulevard and 6th Street or Broadway and 5th Street intersection with two curb extensions and leading pedestrian intervals to increase pedestrian visibility and reduce pedestrian exposure,', '3. Pilot pedestrian and cyclist protections on Arizona Avenue at McKinley Elementary School or similar location.', 'Staff has completed field observations and refined the scope of the projects based on initial feasibility assessment. Due to the presence of storm drains and existing curb heights, building permanent curb extensions at Santa Monica Boulevard and 6th Street or Broadway and 5th Street would require extensive hydrological and civil engineering work that would exceed the available budget. Other Vision Zero communities, including Los Angeles, Austin, and New York City, have had success with piloting treatments to reduce pedestrian exposure that do not modify the existing curb design or height, thereby achieving safety improvements at a fraction of the cost. The kit of parts for these types of treatments includes reflective delineators, paint, thermoplastic, and portable planters or other attractive vehicle safety barriers.', 'By making use of this type of treatment, sufficient budget will be available in the Vision Zero jump start allocation for curb extensions at both downtown intersections (Santa Monica Boulevard and 6th Street and Broadway and 5th Street), as well as an additional location prioritized by parents at Franklin Elementary School‒a new crosswalk and curb extensions at Washington Avenue and 25th Street near Franklin Elementary. Finally, through conversations with school parents and administration, staff has identified the intersection of Arizona Avenue and Chelsea Avenue for curb extensions and cyclist protections at McKinley Elementary School. These improvements will advance Safe Routes to School Efforts in the Northeast Neighborhood for both McKinley and Franklin Elementary Schools.', 'Like the Pedestrian Improvements at Four Schools project, the Vision Zero jump start projects aim to increase pedestrian safety by installing curb extensions and crosswalks, and enhance signing and striping, which will limit pedestrian exposure to automobiles, shorten crossings, increase pedestrian visibility and overall safety.', 'To complete the design and construction of the Vision Zero jump start projects in an expeditious manner, staff recommends modifying the existing contract with  Anderson Penna to design pedestrian improvements near four schools, to include design work for the additional pedestrian improvements near Franklin Elementary and McKinley Elementary, and the intersections of Pico Boulevard and 28th Street, Santa Monica Boulevard and 6th Street, and Broadway and 5th Street). The firm is well positioned to fit this work into the existing contract schedule without delaying the ongoing work. Furthermore, doing so would allow for the construction phase of both projects to be bid collectively, thereby expediting project delivery and the safety enhancement of these critical locations.', 'Next Steps', 'Upon execution of a contract modification, Anderson Penna would begin design work and staff would conduct community outreach as necessary. Construction is anticipated to begin in early 2019.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On July 24th, 2017 the City published Notices Inviting Bids to obtain design services for the Safe Routes to School – Pedestrian Improvements at Four Schools project. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 68 vendors downloaded the bid request and three proposals were received on August 14th, 2017. Based on the RFP criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommended Anderson Penna as the best qualified firm to provide design services for this project. Anderson Penna demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with regard to pedestrian safety projects, and similar capital improvement projects in the Cities of Anaheim, Downey, and Laguna Beach. Through these projects, Anderson Penna also demonstrated its ability to offer project design on schedule and at a competitive price.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Anderson Penna is $59,263, for an amended contract total not to exceed $208,389. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019214.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2954'}, {'Title': 'Execute Agreement for Food Waste Prevention and Rescue Grant Program', 'Department': 'Public Works, Resource Recovery & Recycling', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $100,000 from the California Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery (CalRecycle) Food Waste Prevention and Rescue Grant Program for a Santa Monica food recovery and donation program, and to accept all grant renewals;2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant and all grant renewals; andAuthorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In pursuing a sustainable city of wellbeing, the Council in 2014 adopted a policy of “Zero Waste” with the goal of achieving 95% diversion by 2030.Every year, Santa Monica residents and businesses throw away close to 6,000 tons of food that could potentially be redistributed and consumed. The City has been awarded a $100,000 grant from the California Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery (CalRecycle) Food Waste Prevention and Rescue Grant Program to address this issue. With the grant funding, the City would develop a food recovery and donation pilot program to organize food forums, raise awareness on food waste prevention and reduction, identify interested partners and stakeholders, provide program participants with access to equipment, supplies, and technology to facilitate donation storage and delivery, and collect data to measure results. If successful, this program could be a resource for vulnerable local populations and help the City achieve its sustainability goals. Staff recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to accept the $100,000 CalRecycle Grant and execute all necessary documents to accept the grant and all grant renewals.', 'Background', 'On August 8, 2017, the City Council adopted resolution number 11073 (CCS) authorizing staff to apply for all CalRecycle grants and the City Manager to execute all related grant documents over five years through August 2022 (Attachment A). Subsequently, staff applied for the CalRecycle Food Waste Prevention and Rescue Grant Program. The first of its kind in CalRecycle history, the program aims to lower statewide greenhouse gas emissions by supporting food waste prevention projects to reduce the amount of food discarded in landfills.', 'On March 8, 2018, the State notified the City that it has been awarded $100,000 in grant funding to develop a food recovery and donation program. The grant requires that the funded program results in reductions in greenhouse gas emissions related to food materials and increases in food materials diverted from landfill. There is no City match, but costs must be incurred prior to April 2020 to be eligible for reimbursement.', 'Discussion', 'The latest data from CalRecycle estimated that approximately 32,513 tons of food waste is generated in Santa Monica annually. Up to 18%, or 5,852 tons, is potentially edible and could be recovered and redistributed. Restaurants are the largest producers of food waste. One estimate indicated food service operations throw away up to 10% of the food ingredients purchased before they reach consumers.', 'Accordingly, Santa Monica’s food recovery and donation pilot program funded by this grant would focus on reducing food waste from the commercial sector. First, staff from the Resource Recovery and Recycling Division and the Human Services Division would connect to identify food donation and collection organizations that may be interested in participating in the program. Concurrently, the City would also hire a non-profit organization via a competitive bidding process to help coordinate and facilitate the program. The non-profit would assist the City with hosting food forums by bringing together stakeholders from local restaurants, grocery stores, businesses, and human services organizations to begin a dialog on food waste prevention and donation. The goal of these conversations is to raise awareness, educate local constituents, gauge interest and share ideas, identify potential partners, and develop a network of businesses that generate food waste and organizations that could beneficially reuse that food.', 'Once participating businesses who are interested in donating food as well as human services organizations who are interested in receiving food have been identified, the City may elect to enter into agreements with these stakeholders to ensure that they meet the City’s and CalRecycle’s terms and conditions associated with program. Staff from the Resource Recovery and Recycling Division and the non-profit would conduct pre-waste audits at the participating business locations to benchmark the percentage of edible versus non-edible food waste generated by these establishments. After the preliminary audit, the City would provide program partners with necessary supplies and equipment, such as containers and potentially refrigerators, for the safe storage and delivery of the surplus food.', 'The partnered food donation and collection organizations would assist with identifying local disadvantaged demographics that may benefit from receiving food donations. Utilizing an existing mobile application, food donation and collection would be made as convenient and on-demand as possible for participants. The edible food collected would be donated to the populations in need throughout the City; the remaining non-edible food waste, including food-soiled paper, would be diverted from the landfill through composting programs.', 'The pilot program would include periodic waste audits at each participating food establishment to measure effectiveness, evaluate benchmarks, and set new goals. The City would continue to track food donation and food waste reduction data to analyze program success. The pilot program is anticipated to last up to two years, during which time the City will be required to report periodic program updates to CalRecycle.', 'This pilot program intends to achieve multiple goals:', '· raise awareness about food waste prevention and reduction;', '· provides an outlet, managed by the City, to redirect surplus food to the local vulnerable populations;', '· aligns with the State’s Senate Bill 1383 requirements of recovering 20% of food waste for human consumption by 2025; and', '· helps the City achieve its Council-adopted Zero Waste Goal by 2030.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Award of a $100,000 grant from the CalRecycle Food Waste Prevention and Rescue Grant Program requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', 'If renewals are awarded, budget changes will be included in subsequent year budgets, contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2962'}, {'Title': 'Contractual Services Agreement for Facility Security Equipment and Services', 'Department': 'Information Services Department', 'Sponsors': 'Director Susan Cline', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Siemens Industry, Inc. (Siemens), a California-based company, facility security equipment, systems and services, including related equipment and supplies in an amount not to exceed $1,500,000 over five years, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; andAuthorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Siemens for building automation system upgrades and expansion in an amount not to exceed $1,215,847 (including a 10% contingency).These recommended awards are made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (b), in a total amount not to exceed $2,715,847.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City utilizes access control and building automation system (BAS) equipment installed at various City facilities to control facility access, mechanical systems, and energy use. These systems require regular maintenance, upgrades, and enhancements to both hardware and software components. To accommodate the necessary repairs and expansion of the facility access control and BAS systems throughout City facilities, staff recommends entering into contracts with Siemens in an amount not to exceed $1,500,000 over five years for access control and in an amount not to exceed $1,215,847 (including a 10% contingency) for building automation systems, which would result in a total amount not to exceed of $2,715,847. For the first year, staff anticipates spending a total of $300,000 on access control and the entire $1,215,847 on BAS equipment and services, for a total first year amount of $1,515,847.', 'Background', 'The need for facility access control (both internally and externally as needed) and BAS improvements and modifications at City buildings such as the Library, City Hall, Public Safety Facility, and other locations, has grown over the years. The access control requests are the result of retrofits to various areas of City Hall stemming from the construction of the City Services Building and the need to enhance security at City locations. The BAS requests are largely the result of needing additional monitoring and control of additional systems or sites throughout the City. Installation and maintenance of both of these types of systems require the services of certified service experts, such as Siemens, that specialize in such control systems.', 'Discussion', 'Facility Access Control', 'Awarding a multi-year purchase order to Siemens will give staff the flexibility to schedule service calls and projects as needed to complete a significant backlog of pending projects and address new installation requests.', 'Staff is currently working to implement a comprehensive security and access strategy and has identified six priority locations as well as 20 to 30 additional locations where access control should be installed and standardized before the City Services Building (CSB) opens in 2020.', 'Facility Building Automation System', 'The City currently uses a proprietary Siemens Industry BAS to monitor and control the mechanical systems and energy usage at six existing facilities (Public Safety Facility, City Hall, Ken Edwards Center, Parking Structure 6, Annenberg Beach House, Pico Library) and is scheduled to add two additional sites as part of their new construction (City Services Building and Fire Station 1). A portion of the hardware and software from the existing system has reached the end of its useful life, is no longer supported by Siemens, and must be replaced. In addition to these necessary repairs, staff recommends expansion of the system by installing and equipping four additional sites with Siemens BAS controls (Main Library, Virgina Avenue Park Teen and Park Centers, Fire Station 2, Airport Administration Building).', 'Siemens BAS provides computerized controls and real time graphics to let staff see what is happening with the heating, ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC) equipment in a building without multiple trips to the site, thereby saving on costly problem determination visits and simplifying maintenance operations. Computerized controls monitor HVAC equipment status and helps in heading off unexpected problems. They also help to maintain even temperatures and humidity levels within the facilities in order to provide measured comfort, which then leads to reduction of overrunning the equipment and hence saving energy. Moreover, running the equipment less and controlling it more efficiently reduces wear and tear, keeps maintenance costs down, and extends equipment life expectancy. The automated fault detection and diagnostics of these newer systems have been found to help reduce downtime and operations and maintenance costs by as much as 30%.', 'Vendor Selection', 'In 2017,National Joint Powers Alliance (NJPA)solicited and issued request for proposals (RFP) #031517 for the procurement of facility security equipment, systems, and services with related equipment and supplies. Upon completion of the RFP process, a contract was established with Siemens, which includes manufacturer volume discounts and rebates forNJPAmembers, a multi-year contract term, and price verification mechanisms to assure pricing compliance and accuracy. NJPA contracts are supported and widely used by government agencies throughout theUnited States. As a member, the City of Santa Monica can participate inNJPAcontracts. By entering into a contract with Siemens, all pricing would be based on NJPA contract # 031517-SIE.', 'Section 2.24.080 (b) of the Municipal Code allows exception to competitive bid procedures when such competitive bid procedures have already been utilized, such as in purchasing from Federal, State, County, City or special district government agencies, or from cooperative purchasing agencies consisting of such agencies.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be issued toSiemens for access control is for an amount not to exceed $1,500,000over five years.Funds for access control related equipment and services are included in the proposed FY 2017-18 budget within departments’ budgets.Budget authority for subsequent years will be requested in each budget for Council approval.Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.', 'The agreement to be issued to Siemens for BAS improvements is for an amount not to exceed $1,215,847 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the Public Works Department. The agreement will be charged to the following account: M010085.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2991'}], [{'Title': 'Fleet Composition Study', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Finance & Administrative Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '04. Study Sessions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Review, and provide guidance to staff on the future implementation of a BBB vehicle propulsion technology for the BBB fleet to achieve a goal of Zero Emissions;2) Provide feedback regarding a proof of concept program for evaluating the operational effectiveness and efficiency of a sub-fleet of electric buses which shall consist of up to 10 battery electric buses and requisite infrastructure at the BBB yard; and3) Authorize staff to work with the Federal Transit Administration (FTA) Office of Innovation, FTA Region 9 Office, and Gillig, LLC for the procurement of one 40-foot electric propelled bus from Gillig, LLC under the FTA’s Prototype Waiver Program that would be produced in December 2018, and placed into revenue service in January 2019.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Big Blue Bus provides regional transit service for 13.6 million passengers a year, serving an area covering 58 square miles. Since the 1990’s, Big Blue Bus (BBB) has been a leader in using cost efficient environmentally-friendly vehicle propulsion technology for its fixed route bus fleet. With the advent of new propulsion technology being tested and evaluated at many California transit agencies and the potential that the California Air Resources Board (ARB) proposed Innovative Clean Transit (ICT) regulation being finalized later this year, staff initiated an analysis to compare the economic and environmental benefits for future vehicle procurements under two propulsion scenarios: 1)transitioning BBB’s existing fleet to near-zero NOx emission (NZE) natural gas engines that would continue to be fueled by renewable natural gas (RNG); and, 2)transitioning BBB’s existing fleet to battery electric buses (BEB).', 'Staff is committed to providing an objective and unbiased approach to help guide Council, and while the GNA report summary and cost implications for each fuel path are provided in the staff report, there are inherent tradeoffs with each fuel path scenario, upsides to each, and unknowns with Scenario Number 2, (transition the fleet to BEBs) due to how new this technology is in the transit industry. At the end of the day, BBB is committed to consistently provide financially sustainable, efficient, effective and safe mobility services to our customers and the community on a daily basis.', 'Understanding that this technology is new in the transit industry, staff recommends a responsible approach to first prototyping the application of electric bus operation on the BBB system, and moving forward with the implementation of a proof of concept program with measurable outcomes for success with a small fleet of electric buses over the next 2 years to lay the groundwork for a transition to a 100% zero-emissions fleet.', 'Background', 'BBB operates twenty fixed routes that include traditional local transit service, commuter transit, express service, and community-based circulators. The urban area serviced by BBB’s transit fleet includes the entire Westside region of Los Angeles. The BBB fleet provides service to approximately 13.6 million passengers annually in an urban service area of 58 square miles. The fleet’s service area is vastly larger than the City’s municipal service boundary of 8.4 square miles.', 'To provide these services, BBB operates a fleet of 200 natural gas urban transit buses which include nineteen (19) 30-35 foot buses, (153) 40-foot buses, and twenty-eight (28) 60-foot articulated buses. Approximately 60% of the fleet is model year 2011 or newer buses. The entire fleet is powered by natural gas engines fueled with renewable natural gas. Today, 62½ percent of the fleet operates on compressed natural gas (CNG) and 37.5% operates on liquefied natural gas (LNG). However, all LNG buses within the fleet would be retired by 2019.', "Figure 1 - BBB's Current Revenue Vehicles (Note: ISLG refers to a Cummins Engine model)", 'The transit facility consists of a maintenance facility, administrative buildings, fueling infrastructure, wash bays, bus yard, and a maintenance parking lot for staff vehicles. The maintenance facility was remodeled in 2009 and there are currently no plans to expand the facility.', 'Two fueling stations are physically located on BBB’s property. A private on-site station is located within the fenced boundary of the transit facility, while a public access station is located outside of the fenced boundary but still on BBB’s property. BBB’s transit fleet is supplied with CNG (via the LCNG station) and LNG from renewable liquefied natural gas (RLNG) that is procured from Clean Energy. On average, Clean Energy delivers one load of RLNG each day which is transported via tanker truck from Clean Energy’s Boron LNG plant. An onsite storage tank supplies the RLNG to the LCNG and LNG dispensers that are co-located within the drive-through wash bays.', 'Southern California Edison (SCE) provides electricity to the transit facility. On average, BBB’s electricity cost is higher than that of surrounding utility customers because the City procures a higher fraction of renewable electricity in its electricity mix than SCE’s average delivered electricity mix. The low carbon electricity is purchased via a third party energy service provider (ESP) but is delivered through SCE’s distribution system.', 'During peak service days, which occur Monday through Friday, BBB’s fleet operates 240 daily weekday assignments which require 162 transit buses during peak weekday service. The average distance of an assignment is 71 miles; however, individual assignments range from 13 miles up to 181 miles. Some transit buses receive more than one assignment during a peak day. The majority of route operations occur on primarily flat surfaces, however, there are a small number of route assignments, such as those travelling to and from the Pacific Palisades area, that entail a significant amount of elevation change.', 'Discussion', 'Fuel Path Analysis', 'To help staff better understand the issues surrounding vehicle propulsion systems, the consulting firm of Gladstein, Neandross & Associates/Ramboll prepared a detailed analysis looking at the different fuel paths. For each of the vehicle deployment scenarios, cost and emissions profiles were developed on a per-mile, annual, and lifecycle basis using fleet composition, operational, and procedural data provided by BBB, as well as assumptions where necessary in order to characterize the recently commercialized alternative technologies. The operational cost for each transit bus technology is an aggregate of individual cost factors that include bus capital, fuel, operations and maintenance (O&M), midlife overhaul, fuelling infrastructure, and facility modification costs. Data provided by BBB and assumptions were evaluated to quantify the individual cost factors as a component of the overall cost. The emissions evaluated as part of the analysis include greenhouse gases (GHGs), oxides of nitrogen (NOx), and particulate matter (PM10).', 'The analysis found the total per-mile operational cost for BBB’s existing transit buses to be $2.789/mi compared to $2.829/mi for near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit buses and $4.054/mi for battery electric transit buses if purchased in 2017. While significant operating cost reductions are not expected for BBB’s existing buses or for NZE natural gas buses over the next 20 years, it is widely projected that operating costs for battery electric buses will fall over time.', 'The analysis projects that battery electric buses purchased in 2030 would have an average operating cost of $3.382/mi. Over a 12-year lifecycle, the operational cost of BBB’s existing transit bus is approximately $1,079,343/bus compared to $1,094,823/bus for near-zero NOx emission transit buses, $1,568,898/bus for battery electric transit buses purchased in 2017, and $1,308,834/bus for battery electric buses purchased in 2030. This represents an incremental cost of $15,480/bus for near-zero NOx emission transit buses, $489,555/bus for battery electric transit buses purchased in 2017, and $229,491/bus for battery electric transit buses purchased in 2030. Estimated costs for battery electric transit buses take into account significant reductions in battery costs over time and are net of projected credits that BBB could generate under California’s Low Carbon Fuel Standard (LCFS).', 'The emissions analysis found well-to-wheel (WTW) GHG emissions of BBB’s existing transit bus to be 1,475 grams per mile (g/mi) compared to 1,213 g/mi emitted from near-zero NOx transit buses, and 8.88 g/mi for battery electric transit buses purchased in 2017 and in 2030. Well-to-tank (WTT) NOx emissions were found to be 4.53 g/mi for BBB’s existing transit buses, 4.55 g/mi for near-zero NOx transit buses, and 0.0653 g/mi for battery electric transit buses purchased in 2017 and in 2030. Tank-to-wheel (TTW) NOx emissions were found to be 0.581 g/mi emitted by BBB’s existing transit buses compared to 0.045 g/mi emitted from near-zero NOx transit buses and 0.00 g/mi emitted from battery electric transit buses purchased in 2017 and in 2030.', 'Transit Bus Emissions Profiles', 'BBB Existing Transit Bus', 'NZE NOx CNG Transit Bus', '2017 Battery Electric Transit Bus', '2030 Battery Electric Transit Bus', 'WTW GHG Emissions', '1,475 g/mi', '1,213 g/mi', '8.88 g/mi', '8.88 g/mi', 'WTT NOx Emissions', '4.53 g/mi', '4.55 g/mi', '0.0653 g/mi', '0.0653 g/mi', 'TTW NOx Emissions', '0.581 g/mi', '0.045 g/mi', '0.000 g/mi', '0.000 g/mi', 'WTW NOx Emissions', '5.111 g/mi', '4.600 g/mi', '0.065 g/mi', '0.065 g/mi', 'In addition to evaluating the cost and emissions performance of the individual transit bus technologies, BBB’s fleet-wide costs and emissions were evaluated over the proposed ICT regulatory timeframe that is currently under development by the ARB. The figure below displays BBB’s existing fleet transitioning to near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit buses according BBB’s planned replacement schedule.', 'During the 23-year implementation timeframe of the ICT regulation, BBB would incur a cost of approximately $414 million as a result of continuing to procure and operate their existing transit bus technology. The analysis found that BBB would incur a cost of approximately $418 million as a result of transitioning the existing fleet to a near-zero NOx emission natural gas fleet, representing an incremental cost of approximately $4 million. The analysis also found that BBB would incur a cost of approximately $492 million (an incremental cost of $78 million) as a result of transitioning to a battery electric fleet assuming expected reductions in battery costs and net of projected LCFS credits generated across the timeframe.', 'BBB Fleet Costs – 2018-2040', 'BBB Existing Transit Fleet', 'NZE NOx CNG Transit Fleet', 'Battery Electric Transit Fleet', 'Fleet Operational Costs', '$ 413,748,150', '$ 417,803,910', '$ 492,001,711', 'Incremental Cost Relative to Baseline Scenario', '$ -', '↑ $ 4,055,760', '↑ $ 78,253,561', 'Transitioning BBB’s fleet to near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit buses would reduce the fleet’s WTW GHG emissions by 26,724 MT (metric tons) during the timeframe. Transitioning BBB’s existing fleet to a battery electric fleet would significantly reduce fleet-wide GHG emissions by approximately 150,000 MT during the timeframe. However, the reductions provided by the transition to battery electric transit buses come at a cost of approximately $78 million or approximately $526/MT. The majority (approximately 99%) of WTW GHGs emitted during the transition to a battery electric fleet are the emissions from BBB’s existing transit buses as they operate for the remainder of their useful lives.', 'The analysis found that transitioning to either of the alternative scenarios technologies would yield significant TTW NOx reductions. During the timeframe, transitioning to a near zero NOx emission natural gas transit fleet yields a 63% reduction from the baseline scenario while the transition to a battery electric transit fleet buses yields a 68% reduction from the baseline scenario.', 'Though the reductions achieved by each scenario are comparable, there is a significant difference in the costs that would be incurred. At an incremental cost of approximately $4 million, the 60.1 tons of NOx reduced as a result of transitioning to a near-zero NOx natural gas fleet would cost approximately $67,484/ton. In contrast, the 65.1 tons of NOx reduced as a result of transitioning to a battery electric transit fleet would cost approximately $1,202,052/ton (approximately 1800% more than the cost of the reductions that would result from transitioning to an NZE NOx fleet) because the incremental cost of transitioning to a battery electric transit fleet is approximately $78 million.', 'BBB Fleet Emissions – 2018-2040', 'BBB Existing Transit Fleet', 'NZE NOx CNG Transit Fleet', 'Battery Electric Transit Fleet', 'TTW NOx Emissions', '95.2 tons', '35.1 tons', '30.1 tons', 'Reductions Relative to Baseline Scenario', '0.0', '↓ 60.1 tons', '↓ 65.1 tons', 'Cost of TTW NOx Emissions Reductions', '0.0', '$67,484/ton', '$1,202,052/ton', 'The analysis also found that transitioning to a near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit fleet would not yield any significant PM10 (particulate matter) reductions. The reason is the Cummins ISL G Near-Zero (NZ) and the Cummins ISL G (equipped in BBB’s existing transit buses) have the same certified PM10 emissions values. In contrast, transitioning to a battery electric transit fleet yields a 68% reduction from the baseline scenario. While this is a significant percent reduction, the PM emissions from each of the scenarios is very small because natural gas engines have extremely low PM10 emissions.', 'In summary, the analysis found that, at an incremental cost of approximately $4 million, the transition of BBB’s existing fleet to a fleet of near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit buses would result in a small decrease in GHG emissions and a significant reduction in TTW NOx emissions. At an incremental cost of approximately $78 million, the transition of BBB’s existing fleet to battery electric transit buses would result in GHG and TTW NOx emissions reductions that are more costly compared to those achieved from the deployment of near-zero NOx emission natural gas transit buses.', 'The results of the analysis are based on projections of significant operating cost reductions for battery electric buses over time. These reductions are based on large reductions in battery storage costs and projections of revenue from the LCFS program. Changes in these assumptions would have a dramatic impact on the total estimated project costs. Were battery storage costs to remain constant (and not fall over time as they almost certainly will based on history), the incremental cost of converting the entire fleet to battery electric buses would increase to approximately $130 million as opposed to approximately $78 million.', 'The LCFS program works with other programs in California, such as the Cap-and-Trade Program, to reduce transportation-related GHG emissions. Credits are generated from the use of low carbon fuels in the transportation sector. Regulated entities, such as petroleum refiners, are required to purchase credits to offset the GHG emissions associated with the higher carbon fuels that they produce. It is the demand for these credits by regulated entities that sets the credit price. Though the credit price has remained stable in recent years, future credit prices would be established in an open market environment and any fluctuations in the price of the credit would directly impact BBB’s cost of operating battery electric buses.', 'Funding Opportunities', 'With the proposed 23-year length of a transition to a zero emission fleet, it is impossible to accurately predict what the funding landscape would look like. However, this section describes existing federal, state, and county programs and incentives outside of BBB’s ongoing funding streams that could help pay for alternatively-fuelled buses.', 'The Federal Transit Administration (FTA) offers two relatively small funding pots for the purchase of zero-emission transit buses. The Low or No Emission Competitive Program (LoNo) provides funding to state and local governmental authorities for the purchase or lease of zero-emission and low-emission transit buses as well as acquisition, construction, and leasing of required supporting facilities. The LoNo Program distributes $55 million nationwide. Big Blue Bus applied for funding for battery electric buses in the FTA’s last funding cycle but was not selected.', 'The FTA also offers the Bus & Bus Facilities Infrastructure Investment Program which allows agencies to replace, rehabilitate and purchase buses and related equipment and to construct bus-related facilities including technological changes or innovations to modify low or no emission vehicles or facilities. The Bus and Bus Facilities Program distributes $226 million nationally. BBB currently submitted an application for the purchase of seven battery electric vehicles through this program but was not selected.', 'The state’s funding opportunities for zero and near zero engines have been increasing in recent years. For example, the Hybrid and Zero-Emission Truck and Bus Voucher Incentive Project (HVIP) provides vouchers to help California fleets purchase advanced technology trucks and buses. HVIP provides vouchers for California purchasers and lessees of hybrid and zero-emission trucks and buses on a first-come, first-served basis. Purchasers of fixed route zero emission buses receive $110,000 per vehicle while using near zero engines receive $10,000 to offset costs. BBB would utilize these vouchers regardless of the fuel path chosen.', 'To help with the implementation costs of the ICT regulation, the ARB has recently proposed to invest one-third of the VW Mitigation Trust in zero-emission buses. The program would create a maximum incentive of up to $180,000 for a new battery electric transit bus, up to $400,000 for a new fuel cell electric transit bus, and up to $100,000 for a new battery electric shuttle bus. These maximum funding amounts exceed the maximum funding amounts allowed under HVIP. Unfortunately, no funding is proposed for charging infrastructure.', 'In January, the California Public Utility Commission (CPUC) approved the first transportation electrification applications under SB 350 from the three large investor-owned utilities. The decision approves 15 projects with combined budgets of $42 million statewide. One approved project in Southern California Edison’s (SCE) area is $3.9million for “Electric Transit Bus Make-Ready.” SCE would deploy make-ready infrastructure at bus depots and along bus routes to serve electric commuter buses operating in SCE’s service territory. SCE would also provide a rebate to participating customers to cover the cost of the charging equipment and installation. SCE would maximize the electric transit bus routes it supports in disadvantaged communities.', 'The California State Transportation Agency has recently finished accepting applications for the next round of Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program (TIRCP). The TIRCP aims to increase ridership on the state-wide transit and rail network and reduce greenhouse gas emissions. The five-year program is anticipated to distribute $2.4 billion. Big Blue Bus recently submitted a grant application to CALSTA asking for $3.05 million to pay for the incremental cost of ten 40-foot battery electric buses. The total cost of the ten vehicle program would be $9.7 million. Associated infrastructure costs were not included in the request in order to make the application more competitive.', 'At the County level, BBB’s participation in Metro’s Bus Operations Subcommittee (BOS) allows it to apply for bus replacements and facility improvements. The BOS distributes 15% of Los Angeles County’s Federal 5307 Capital funds on an annual basis. Typically, the fund source spreads approximately $17 million among the sixteen Municipal Operators. The funds are allocated based on a competitive process.', 'Context for All-Electric Fleet Conversion', 'With over 200 public transit systems operating about 14,000 buses, the State of California is leading the way nationally in making the commitment to an all zero-emission fleet. Within the state, seven transit agencies have committed to making full transition to an all-electric fleet by the year 2030. LA Metro currently has 100 zero-emission vehicles on order, and has committed to the conversion if their new vehicles comply with performance benchmarks. Foothill Transit and the City of Los Angeles Department of Transportation (LADOT) have also made the same commitment to have an all zero-emission fleet by 2030. Foothill Transit has 30 zero-emission buses on the road; Long Beach Transit has 10. LADOT has four vehicles on the road and recently ordered 25 more zero emission vehicles. Antelope Valley Transit Authority (AVTA) has eight buses on the street and an order placed for all 85 of their buses to be battery electric by the end of 2019. Elsewhere in the United States, King County Metro in Seattle has committed to purchasing 120 all electric battery buses by 2020 with the goal of having a 100% zero emission fleet between 2034 and 2040.', 'The number of manufacturers currently providing battery electric buses is limited but the number is growing as more transit systems commit to the new technology. Two battery electric only bus manufacturers - Proterra and BYD - currently sell most of the battery electric buses across the United States. Other legacy bus manufacturers such as New Flyer and Gillig are also entering the battery electric marketplace.', "The most exhaustive study of battery electric bus performance was completed in June 2017 by the US Department of Energy's National Renewable Energy Laboratory on twelve Foothill Transit buses. The study compared the performance of Proterra battery electric buses versus Foothill's NABI CNG vehicles as a baseline. Highlights of the study include: the twelve battery electric buses accumulating more than 900,000 miles during the study period; the buses surpassed their target of 4,000 miles between road calls with more than 6,000 miles during the evaluation period; the on-route chargers operated reliably with minimal issues; and the high voltage batteries showed little to no sign of capacity degradation during the study period.", 'Conversely, the short-range on-route charged buses are inflexible and cannot be deployed to other routes; the higher use of air conditioning lowers the effective range in hotter months; charger availability is needed for successful vehicle deployment; and the CNG buses did significantly outperform the battery electric bus in many of the evaluation areas. For comparison, BBB’s miles between road failures on the CNG and LNG fleets are more than 18,000 miles. Additionally, systems in Albuquerque, NM, and Long Beach have experienced significant delays in BEB deliveries from vendors, delaying new projects that both systems had intended to launch in early 2017.', 'Based upon proactive discussions with Southern California Edison, and through staff evaluation of the proposed SCE medium- and heavy-duty vehicle charging infrastructure that includes transit agencies, staff has identified up to 23 potential charging unit locations within the maintenance/parking yard where BEBs could be charged overnight.', 'BBB all-Electric Fleet Challenges', 'One of the many challenges with converting the fleet to electric is operational and maintenance continuity of operations. As buses become eligible for replacement under the FTA funding regulations that BBB follows, transitioning and operating a dual fueled fleet becomes complex. During the conversion, more space would be needed for infrastructure required to support charging the BBB electric fleet, while still maintaining RNG fueling facilities for the CNG fleet including giving consideration to back-up power and energy storage. As BBB is already constrained by the size of the yard and facilities from which it operates, a feasibility and transition analysis would need to be conducted to inform staff and stakeholders on best practices and how to ensure that service delivery to BBB’s 54,000 daily customers remains consistent.', 'Other challenges and critical areas that need to be reviewed prior to transition to an all-electric fleet include: training of mechanic staff on new fleet propulsion technology; route specific energy analysis; impacts of a replacement analysis greater that one-to-one for electric buses; and the evaluation of electric bus technology advancements and reduced battery costs that are hard to accurately predict. While these challenges exist, there are many opportunities for growth of BBB’s understanding of electric bus technology.', 'BBB Transition Plan', 'Understanding the unknowns, benefits, costs, tradeoffs, and the City’s desire to move toward an all-electric fleet, staff continues to responsibly and conscientiously prepare and plan for that transition.', 'To address the electric bus fleet and new infrastructure costs, staff continues to seek additional funding for both, applying for new federal and state programs for this technology, as well as meeting with SCE to learn about their new programs. As mentioned earlier, a TIRCP grant has been submitted to partially fund up to ten new electric vehicles. BBB anticipates announcement of successful grant applications by May 2018. Previous grant submittals for FTA LoNo funding and Bus and Bus Infrastructure Program funding were not successful. Staff has scheduled a conference call with FTA staff on 4/20/18 to discuss our recent grant submittals and how to improve future grant applications.', 'Staff continues to work with American Public Transportation Association, California Transit Association and sister agencies to maintain the pulse and knowledge of the market. Locally, staff has joined the LA Regional Electric Bus Working Group to collaboratively work with our peers to find solutions for implementation and to the increased costs of this technology. Staff is also working on the Zero Emission Bus Procurement Committee to provide input to the State Department of General Services (DGS) for the creation of a statewide electric bus procurement, giving us options to buy our buses as funding comes in. Additionally, we are in dialogue with Southern California Edison (SCE) to layout plans and estimate costs for converting our property to support a 100% electric fleet. In those conversations, we have learned of SCE’s work with the CPUC for potential funding for infrastructure. We would continue to monitor all funding possibilities.', 'Finally, BBB has initiated a collaborative effort with FTA, Gillig and the Honolulu Transit System to test one of Gillig’s five total prototype battery electric buses that they are building at the end of this calendar year. In June or early July 2018, staff will recommend to council procurement of one prototype electric bus. This pilot project would help BBB immediately begin to evaluate the technology and the application of operating an electric bus within our service area and how it would impact our operations as we transition to an electric fleet.', 'Following best practices, we would perform route, charge and rate modeling to better prepare for a future implementation plan. This process would ultimately help staff understand the differences of this technology and how best to procure, deploy and operate electric buses into the BBB fleet mix. Staff would continue efforts with our funding partners to apply for grants to fund electric bus purchases.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action associated with conducting the study session. Depending on the direction given, costs associated with purchasing new vehicles and accompanying infrastructure may be affected.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2768'}], [{'Title': "Appeal of the Planning Commission's decision to approve Development Review Permit (16ENT-0034) to allow a new four-story (36 feet) 59,319 square-foot mixed-use project consisting of 47 residential units, 16,755 square feet of ground floor commercial space, and 151 automobile parking spaces within a two-level subterranean parking garage.", 'Department': 'Development Review 1', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '06. Administrative Proceedings', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council deny the appeal and uphold the Planning Commission’s approval by taking the following actions:1. Approve Development Review Permit 16ENT-0034; and 2. Adopt the Statement of Official Action, pursuant to the draft findings and conditions.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On January 10, 2018, the Planning Commission approved Development Review Permit (DRP) 16ENT-0034 to allow a new four-story (36 feet) 59,319 square-foot mixed-use housing project consisting of 47 residential units, 16,755 square feet of ground floor commercial space, and 151 automobile parking spaces within a two-level subterranean parking garage.  The Planning Commission staff report, Statement of Official Action (STOA), and additional attachments to this report are hereby incorporated herein. On January 24, 2018, the appellant, Rachel Kelley, filed an appeal (18ENT-0012) of the Planning Commission’s decision to approve the DRP. The appeal statement raises concerns regarding (1) the public comment and hearing process, (2) consistency with the LUCE, (3) compliance with the Zoning Ordinance, (4) application of the Housing Accountability Act (HAA), (5) compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act, (6) traffic impacts, (7) construction impacts, and (8) concerns about CIM Group.', 'Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.37.130, Council’s review of the DRP approval is de novo. Council may review and take action on all determinations, interpretations, decisions, judgments, or similar actions that were in the purview of the Planning Commission. This report describes the proposed project scope, provides relevant background information, and analyzes the issues of appeal raised by the appellant. The staff report concludes by recommending that Council approve the DRP based upon the findings set forth in the Draft Statement of Official Action (Draft STOA).', 'Background', 'Existing Conditions and Setting', 'The following table provides a brief summary of the project location, existing conditions and setting.', 'Site Location Map', 'Zoning District:', 'General Commercial (GC)', 'Land Use Element Designation:', 'General Commercial', 'Parcel Area:', '32,277 square feet', 'Parcel Dimensions:', 'Irregular shaped lot', 'Existing On-Site Improvements (Year Built):', 'Auto Repair and Sales one-story buildings (1932-1971)', 'Rent Control Status:', 'Commercial (Exempt)', 'Adjacent Zoning Districts and Land Uses:', 'North:GC&R2 (Multi-Family Residential) East: R2 & R1 (Multi-Family and Single Family) South: GC (Restaurant) West: GC (Retail and Restaurant)', 'Historic Resource Inventory', 'Not listed on HRI.', 'Affordable Housing', 'Per SMMC Section 9.23.030(A)(1)(a) of the Zoning Ordinance: 5% of total units as affordable 50% more affordable housing units than would be required pursuant to Section 9.64.050 Providing 8.5% residential units (4) as affordable at 30% income level (extremely low)', 'The subject site is approximately 32,277 square feet in size and is located on the east side of Lincoln Boulevard between Ashland Avenue and Wilson Place. The site has an upward slope from the Lincoln Boulevard street frontage to the rear of the site of approximately 12.5% average. The existing building improvements consist of multiple one-story vacant auto repair commercial buildings. A majority of the existing neighborhood context is modest in height. Adjacent uses along Lincoln Boulevard include retail, service, and restaurant uses with structures that are primarily one-story in height. Ashland Avenue contains R2 Multi-Unit properties while Wilson Place consists of R1 Single-Unit properties.', 'Project Description', 'The project is a four-story building with a maximum height of 36 feet that includes 16,755 square feet of ground floor commercial space, 47 residential units totaling 42,564 square-feet of residential area, and a floor area ratio of 1.81. Additionally, the project includes 11,548 square feet of open space consisting of 7,219 square feet of common open space and 4,329 square feet of private open space. The project includes 151 vehicle parking spaces and 28 motorcycle parking spaces in a two-level subterranean parking garage for the commercial users, residential tenant, and guests of the building. Bicycle parking spaces are proposed at grade and within the subterranean garage totaling 98 spaces (13 short-term spaces, 85 long-term spaces).', 'Figure 1: Project Rendering (Lincoln Boulevard elevation)', 'As shown in Figure 2 below, the ground floor is comprised of a commercial tenant space at the building frontage totaling approximately 16,755 square feet in size with a 1,494 square-foot plaza area adjacent to Lincoln Boulevard. A residential lobby is also directly accessed from the building frontage along Lincoln Boulevard next to the driveway and site access that leads to an elevator and stairwell to the units above. The upper floors consist entirely of residential units. The placement and orientation of the commercial and residential land uses in the project is consistent with the surrounding commercial area along Lincoln Boulevard and other recently approved mixed-use projects.', 'Figure 2: Site Plan', 'Architectural Review Board Concept Review', 'Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.40.040 (Development Review Permit - Procedures), a DRP requires Architectural Review Board (ARB) review and recommendation on the design of the proposal. The project was presented to the ARB at its November 21, 2016 meeting. The project design was generally well-received with the ARB expressing support of the project massing and acknowledging that the location of the new mixed-use project is challenging due to the site configuration and topography. While the ARB was positive regarding the overall direction of the project, there were some concerns expressed regarding certain aspects of the design. Staff expressed similar concerns with the overall project design and met with the applicant to convey these concerns. While the applicant responded to some of the ARB and staff comments, there were several other substantive design comments provided by the Architectural Review Board that were not addressed. In particular, the design strategy along the Lincoln Boulevard frontage is one of a repetition of forms and the pedestrian orientation of the Wilson and Ashland elevations should be improved. The project site combines six parcels and the design strategy results in a dramatic difference with the context and existing development pattern. Some variation along the length of Lincoln Boulevard is essential for the project’s compatibility with the surrounding neighborhood.', 'In approving the project, the Planning Commission included the ARB’s recommendations with respect to modulation, pedestrian orientation, and materiality as conditions of approval. These are areas that will be of particular focus in the ARB’s formal design review should Council approve the DRP.', 'Planning Commission Action', 'On January 10, 2018, a public hearing was held by the Planning Commission to consider the DRP. Public testimony was generally in opposition to the project, citing traffic related impacts, size and scale of the project and overall compatibility with surrounding neighborhood. In approving the project, the Commission noted the following:', '· The project is consistent with the vision set forth in the LUCE and Zoning Ordinance for housing projects that are located on Commercial Boulevard corridors but that also protect neighborhood character.', '· The project adds critical uses to the site and the proposed housing is of appropriate size and scale.', '· The project fails to address the context and compatibility of massing along Lincoln and that the façade needs to provide more visual breaks and separating the facades into different volumes; and', '· The irregular shape and size of the project site pose challenges for site design.', 'The Commission took formal action on the DRP on January 10, 2018. A majority of the Planning Commission initially considered recommending that the project be continued to allow further work by the developer on design-related issues prior to approval. However, due to Permit Streamlining Act timelines and the applicant’s unwillingness to grant an extension of time for the Planning Commission to act, the Planning Commission voted 5-2 to approve the project, with amendments to Condition #1 in the Planning Commission’s Statement of Official Action (Attachment B).', 'Condition #1(a-f) required the ARB to pay particular attention to the following design elements:', '· Building façade along Lincoln appears monotonous. The design should be revised to provide additional variation and visual breaks in the building volume, especially on the upper levels throughout the project, with particular attention to variation along the Lincoln Boulevard frontage without lowering the housing density and unit mix to extent possible;', '· Street elevations along Ashland and Wilson should be revised for improved pedestrian-orientation by bringing the unit floor lines closer to the street elevation, more modulation and openness to the street;', '· Introduction of more materials and color in reference ranges which could lead to better granularity;', '· Provide a pedestrian-oriented design along Lincoln by, for example, providing a canopy above the door that can provide a place for retail signage and help differentiate the ground floor commercial from the residential units above and the ground floor residential entrance;', '· Revise the planting areas to provide more usable space and space for gathering; and', '· Minimize upper level circulation to increase light and air into courtyard', 'The City Council Draft Statement of Official Action (STOA) (Attachment A) includes this recommendation as Condition #1(a-f).', 'Discussion', 'The proposed project is 4-story (36 feet) in height and has a 1.81 floor area ratio (FAR). The project exceeds the maximum Tier 1 limits (3 stories (36 feet) / 1.5 FAR) for the GC zoning district for projects consisting of 100% residential uses above the ground floor that include on-site affordable housing in compliance with the minimum requirements of the Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP). The project complies with all development standards applicable to the site and is within the established maximums to qualify as a Tier 2 project (36 feet / 2.0 FAR) with on-site affordable housing provided.', 'Development Review Permit', 'Pursuant to SMMC 9.40.050, in order to approve a DRP, Council on appeal must make the following findings in an affirmative manner:', 'A.The physical location, size, massing, setbacks, pedestrian orientation, and placement of proposed structures on the site and the location of proposed uses within the project are consistent with applicable standards and are both compatible and relate harmoniously to surrounding sites and neighborhoods;', 'B.The rights-of-way can accommodate autos, bicycles, pedestrians, and multi-modal transportation methods, including adequate parking and access;', 'C.The health and safety services (police, fire etc.) and public infrastructure (e.g., utilities) are sufficient to accommodate the new development;', 'D.The project is generally consistent with the Municipal Code, General Plan, and any applicable Specific Plan;', 'E.Based on environmental review, the proposed project has no potentially significant environmental impacts or any potentially significant environmental impacts have been reduced to less than significant levels because of mitigation measures incorporated in the project or a Statement of Overriding Considerations has been adopted;', 'F.The project promotes the general welfare of the community;', 'G.The project has no unacceptable adverse effects on public health or safety; and', 'H.The project provides Community Benefits consistent with Chapter 9.23.', 'Tier 2 Community Benefits', 'According to Chapter 9.23 of the Zoning Ordinance, projects that exceed the maximum height or FAR allowed for Tier 1 projects are required to provide the community benefits outlined in subsection 9.23.030 of the Chapter. The purpose of the community benefits is to ensure that projects are allowed to exceed the base height and FAR of a respective zoning district, and in return provide community benefits that enhance the City’s community character.', 'The project provides the required community benefits identified in Chapter 9.23 (Community Benefits) of the Zoning Ordinance for Tier 2 projects. This includes at least 50% more affordable housing units than would be required by Section 9.64.050 (Affordable Housing Production Program) of the Zoning Ordinance, and a unit mix of at least 15% 3-BR units, at least 20% 2-BR units, and no more than 15% Studio units. Also, the average number of bedrooms for all of the affordable housing units in a Tier 2 project shall be equal to or greater than the average number of bedrooms for all of the market rate units in the project. Further, the project provides the augmented fees and TDM requirements established in Chapter 9.23 of the Zoning Ordinance.', 'The project is located in the General Commercial land use designation in the LUCE. The development parameters in the LUCE are implemented in the Zoning Ordinance for Tier 2 projects. The proposed project complies with all of the development standards outlined in the Zoning Ordinance.', 'The proposed development is also consistent with the goals, objectives and policies in the LUCE. Specifically, Goal B25 (Lincoln Boulevard Goals and Policies) seeks redevelopment of Lincoln Boulevard as a district and visually-cohesive mixed-use commercial boulevard. Specifically, Policy B25.5 encourages a lively streetscape with places for people to socialize, where gathering spaces and plazas are encouraged and Policy B25.9 encourages that new mixed-use buildings adjacent to residential districts are contained within a prescribed building envelope that steps down toward the residential district to maintain access to light and air. Additionally, the project is consistent with Policy B25.10, which seeks to limit ground floor uses to mostly active retail with generally continuous, transparent (non-tinted) display windows facing the sidewalks and Policy B25.11 which encourages mixed-use projects to have active ground floor uses that face the boulevard with residential uses located on the upper floors.', 'The proposed project complies with these goals and policies in that it is a mixed-use building with ground floor commercial that is inviting for pedestrians and activated by the transparent storefront glazing system and plaza along Lincoln Boulevard, while also providing and maintaining access to light and air to the neighboring residential properties by having the building step down from the rear (east) to the street facing side (west). Additionally, the project consists of active retail on the ground floor and residential uses on the upper floors that feature significant common and private outdoor areas.', 'Housing Accountability Act (HAA)', "Under the Housing Accountability Act (Government Code section 65589.5(j)), when a proposed housing development project complies with applicable, objective general plan, zoning, and subdivision standards and criteria, including design review standards, in effect at the time that the housing development project's application is determined to be complete, but a local agency proposes to disapprove the project or to impose a condition that the project be developed at a lower density, the local agency must base its decision upon written findings supported by evidence on the record that both of the following conditions exist:", '“(A) The housing development project would have a specific, adverse impact upon the public health or safety unless the project is disapproved or approved upon the condition that the project be developed at a lower density. As used in this paragraph, a “specific, adverse impact” means a significant, quantifiable, direct, and unavoidable impact, based on objective, identified written public health or safety standards, policies, or conditions as they existed on the date the application was deemed complete.', '(B) There is no feasible method to satisfactorily mitigate or avoid the adverse impact identified, other than the disapproval of the housing development project or the approval of the project upon the condition that it be developed at a lower density.”', 'Therefore, if after consideration of all written and oral evidence presented to the City Council at the public hearing for the Project, the Council desires to either disapprove or impose a condition that the Project be developed at a lower density, Council must make the above referenced findings and direct staff to incorporate such findings and/or conditions into the STOA. The term “lower density” includes any conditions that have the same effect or impact on the ability of the project to provide housing.', 'The Housing Accountability Act does not prevent Council from imposing conditions of approval that do not result in lower density; however, if Council imposes conditions of approval that it believes does not result in lower density, it should clarify on the record (i) the factual basis for imposing the conditions and (ii) why Council believes these conditions will not result in lower density.', 'As explained in the body of the Planning Commission staff report for 16ENT-0034 (Attachment D), staff has recommended approval of the Project based upon its determination that the Project is consistent with objective zoning and General Plan standards, subject to the applicant\'s compliance with all conditions in the City Council Statement of Official Action ("STOA"), which is attached to the staff report (Attachment A). The Planning Commission approved the project because no oral or written evidence was presented at the public hearing, identifying “specific, adverse impacts” as defined in the Housing Accountability Act.', 'Appeal Summary', 'The appellant filed a timely appeal on January 24, 2018. The appellant’s appeal statement (Attachment G) raises many specific points as to why the appeal should be approved and DRP 16ENT-0034 denied by Council. In summary, the appeal statement raises concerns regarding: (1) the public comment and hearing process, (2) consistency with the LUCE, (3) compliance with the Zoning Ordinance, (4) application of the Housing Accountability Act (HAA), (5) compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act, (6) traffic impacts, (7) construction impacts, and (8) concerns about CIM Group.', 'Appeal Analysis', 'Staff has reviewed the issues raised by the appellant’s Statement of Appeal and provides the following analysis and responses:', '1. Public Hearing Process', 'A. The appellant states that the Brown Act was violated because the supplemental staff report was posted the day of the public hearing.', 'The agenda for the January 10, 2018 Planning Commission meeting was posted at least 72 hours in advance of the meeting. The Brown Act does not require posting of staff reports (or supplemental staff reports); however, the City provides staff reports for the public’s benefit along with the posting of the agenda and did so for this meeting. The supplemental Planning Commission staff report was provided in direct response to a request received from a Planning Commissioner prior to the hearing. The Commissioners requested that staff explain the applicability of the Housing Accountability Act (HAA) to the review of the project. As a result, the supplemental staff report was issued providing background on the HAA.', 'B. The appellant states that the staff report contained errors and that the project should have been denied based on oral and written testimony.', 'The Planning Commission approved the DRP based on the findings set forth in the Planning Commission STOA as well as the oral and written testimony presented prior to or during the public hearing. Council reviews the project de novo. Staff recommends approval of the DRP based on the findings set forth in the draft STOA.', 'C. The appellant states that the public was not sufficiently apprised of the project or offered sufficient opportunity for public comment. Specifically: the “Santa Monica system of neighbors meeting with developers is deeply flawed” and “Planning staff did not subsequently advise neighbors about the ramifications of possible design changes.”', 'Although not required as part of the application review process, staff strongly encourages project applicants to conduct neighborhood meetings with affected neighborhood groups and to keep them up to date on project revisions and status. The applicant stated that they presented the project to the Friends of Sunset Park Association on September 15, 2016 and July 10, 2017 and to the Ocean Park Association on November 11, 2016 and June 12, 2017. The applicant further stated that they conducted a full design presentation (including updates) at both meetings. The circulation change to move primary access to Lincoln Boulevard instead of Ashland Avenue was informed predominantly by staff’s review of existing conditions in addition to concerns expressed by residents early in the process. Staff worked extensively with the applicant to re-design the project’s circulation and access in order to minimize impacts on Ashland Avenue.', 'D. The Planning Commission staff report erroneously stated that "staff had not received any comments or concerns from the public at the time the staff report was being drafted."', 'At the time the Planning Commission staff report was drafted, staff had not received any comments from the public regarding the project. Staff did not receive any written correspondence from either Friends of Sunset Park Association or Ocean Park Association until after the required public notices were delivered. Once received, all written correspondence was presented to the Planning Commission prior to the public hearing. The Planning Commission also received public testimony during the hearing. Staff accepts public input at any time during the project review process and if requested will provide updates to nearby neighborhood groups and residents.', '2. Consistency with the LUCE', 'A. Appellant states that the project is inconsistent with LUCE guidelines related to General Commercial, Quality of Life, Design Compatibility, Building Articulation, and Building Facades and Step Backs, as well as LUCE goals and policies.', 'The project complies with all of the LUCE goals and policies listed by the appellant:', '· LUCE, pg. 2.1-42-(General Commercial): This appears to be a typo and should read 2.1-39. The building complies with the maximum allowable height of 36 feet adjacent to the property line along the boulevard or the intersecting side street as measured from the midpoint of Segmented Average Natural Grade (SANG).', '· LU 1.3 Quality of Life; Goal LU 1: This goal and land use policy states to preserve neighborhood quality of life and protect neighborhoods against potential impacts related to development, traffic, noise, air quality, and encroachment of commercial activities and establish standards that transition down the building envelope of commercial buildings adjacent to residential properties. The proposed building and project site complies with all Tier 2 development standards as outlines in SMMC Section 9.11.030. Additionally, it will also have to comply with all conditions of approval, which address traffic, noise and air quality. Lastly, the building envelope complies with the Daylight Plane Adjacent to Residential Districts (SMMC Section 9.11.030(D)).', '· LU 1.5 Design Compatibility; Goal LU1: This goal requires that all new infill development be compatible with existing scale, mass and character of the residential neighborhood. New buildings should transition in size, height, and scale toward adjacent residential structures. As stated previously, the project has imposed conditions of approval for the ARB to review (Condition #1) in that it requires the applicant to revise the size, massing and placement of the proposed structure as well as determining whether the proposed siting and design is compatible to the surrounding area.', '· LU 15.8 Building Articulation and LU 15.11 Building Façades and Step Backs:  The buildings articulation and façades provide additional setbacks and stepbacks on the upper floors and provides a 5 foot average on the street facing façade on Lincoln consistent with SMMC 9.11.030. Further, any other articulation required will be reviewed by the ARB as well as ensuring that highly reflective materials will be avoided and that the building massing and design as viewed form the public sidewalks and roadways will allow enough light, air and sense of openness along all facades.', 'Further, staff has identified additional LUCE goals and policies, specifically, Goal B25 (Lincoln Boulevard Goals and Policies) seeks redevelopment of Lincoln Boulevard as a district and visually-cohesive mixed-use commercial boulevard. In addition, Policy B25.5 encourages a lively streetscape with places for people to socialize, where gathering spaces and plazas are encouraged and Policy B25.9 encourages that new mixed-use buildings adjacent to residential districts are contained within a prescribed building envelope that steps down toward the residential district to maintain access to light and air. The project is consistent with Policy B25.10, which seeks to limit ground floor uses to mostly active retail with generally continuous, transparent (non-tinted) display windows facing the sidewalks and Policy B25.11 which encourages mixed-use projects to have active ground floor uses that face the boulevard with residential uses located on the upper floors.', '3. Compliance with the Zoning Ordinance', 'A. The appellant states, “Setbacks are inaccurately defined in the staff report: Page 24 states “No (required) interior side yard setback.” The appellant references Section 9.11.030 Development Standards, Height limit 32’ (36’ if on-site affordable housing provided); Minimum Interior Side and Rear-Adjacent to Residential District, 10’.”', 'The Planning Commission staff report erroneously stated that no interior setback is required. Notwithstanding this typographical error, the project was fully reviewed and found to be compliant with all applicable Zoning Ordinance development standards. The project provides a 10’ setback at both the interior side and rear yards. Further, the building height does not exceed 36’ as measured from SANG.', 'B. The appellant states, “The maximum height for Tier 2 projects in the GC zone is clear: 36 feet. There is not a special condition allowing building on sloped lots to exceed that height through creative grade calculations. The staff report refers to the project as a 36-foot four story building (pg.1) a five story building (pgs.28 and 30) and a 3 story building (pg.1 CEQA Exemption checklist). Front to rear yard is shown in the staff report using the segmented average natural grade calculation. The side yard grade is steep, yet there is no indication of the side yard slope formulation to prove its inapplicability. Additionally, the sites steep east/west grade is possibly compromised due to the adjacent 10 unit CIM Group project under construction which is virtually unmentioned in the staff report. Lastly, the actual height of the building at the corner of Ashland and Lincoln is 45’-8” (as stated by the applicant upon questioned by the Planning Commission) which is not mentioned in the text body of the staff report. However, pages 1, 8, 12, 16, 20, 23, 24 and 28 refer to (either/both) a 4-story building with a maximum height of 36 feet. There is one instance where the building is referred to as approximately 36 feet.” The appellant references Section 9.04.050(B)(2) Measuring Building Height on Sloped Parcels, Sloped Parcels, Side to Side.', 'The reference to a five-story building in the Planning Commission STOA was a typographical error. Staff has revised the STOA accordingly to reflect the project as a 36-feet, four story building. Further, staff determined the building height to be in compliance utilizing the SANG height methodology (SMMC 9.04.050 (A)(2)). SANG is measured from the elevation levels of three equal segments between the front setback line and rear setback line. As shown in Figure 3, the three equal segments shall be created by drawing imaginary lines connecting opposite side setback lines (or parcel lines if no setbacks are required) at 1/3 increments of the depth of the parcel from the front setback line to the rear setback line (or parcel lines if no setbacks are required). The elevation for the front 1/3 segment shall be equal to the elevation of the midpoint of the front setback line (or parcel line if no setback is required). The elevation for the rear 1/3 segment shall be equal to the elevation of the midpoint of the rear setback line (or parcel line if no setback is required). The elevation of the middle 1/3 segment shall equal the halfway elevation between the front and rear 1/3 segments.', 'Figure 3: Segmented Average Natural Grade Height Methodology', 'On sheet A1 of the project plans (Attachment C), the SANG diagrams are provided to show compliance with the determined building height methodology. All elevation points used are derived from the survey prepared on February 14, 2016, prior to the adjacent 10-unit project commencing construction in September of 2016. The height of the building (45’-8”) stated by the appellant is measured from finished ground floor elevation. However, pursuant to the SANG height measurement methodology in the Zoning Ordinance, building height is measured from the mid-point front yard elevation, which is fully compliant at a height of 36 feet.', 'C. The appellant references Section 9.11.010(D) Purpose. Establish design standards that improve the visual quality of development and create a unified, distinctive, and attractive character along commercial and mixed-use corridors. The appellant states, “This is subjective and therefore a legally vulnerable directive under HAA. The city will lose control of "look" without more specificity in the code if they continue to set HAA ahead of our General Plan and Zoning Ordinance in the review process. Based on the majority of responses of the public and the Planning Commissioners at the hearing on January 10th, 2018, and also members of the ARB at the "float-up", this project doesn\'t meet the bar due to mass, density, and design relevance to the surrounding neighborhoods (even bordering R1), as well as increasing traffic through the neighborhood.”', 'The appellant is referencing one of the purposes of the Mixed-Use and Commercial Districts in the zoning ordinance. The City is required by state law to comply with the provisions of the HAA. In accordance with recently adopted state legislation, which became effective on January 1, 2018, a local agency’s failure to comply with the HAA may result in civil penalties in the minimum amount of $10,000 per housing unit in the development project (multiplied by a factor with potentially higher penalties for “bad faith” determinations). The recent changes to state law also modified the judicial standard of review to be less deferential to local agency determinations as well as expedited judicial review. Notwithstanding these recent changes to the HAA, the HAA does not define or set the standards for development and therefore, does not impose any independent development standards that would supersede the General Plan and Zoning Ordinance and the LUCE. Any new housing development project must still comply with all City standards and criteria as established by the City’s Municipal Code and the LUCE. The project complies with all applicable development standards in the zoning ordinance and meets the required Development Review Permit findings. Particular design concerns have been included as conditions for the ARB to review as part of its formal design review of the project.', 'D. The appellant references Section 9.11.030(E) Purpose. Provide appropriate buffers and transition standards between commercial and residential uses to preserve both commercial and mixed-use feasibility and residential quality and provide a sensitive transition between the commercial uses and neighboring residences. The appellant states, “Despite the minimal setbacks imposed on the project, the applicant and planning staff feel comfortable placing a large transformer (a rear yard use) on Wilson Place in what should be the buffering setback to an R1 district where all other uses on that street are beautiful street frontage of single family residences. While this has been constructed by planning staff to be the "rear yard" of the site, its effect is as a side yard. This placement conflicts with the intention of…Item #24 in Conditions of Approval (pg. 38 of the Staff Report) under Final Design: No gas or electric meters shall be located within the required front or street side yard setback areas. This project fails lot size (lot depth) conformity standards if the front yard were Lincoln. However, the Staff report refers to the Lincoln "side yard" as frontage. Can this project have a front yard on Ashland, but a Lincoln address and driveway access? Making Wilson Place the "rear yard" isn\'t consistent with how the rest of that street is developed. Planning staff "cherry picks" the code to advantage the developer, and to the detriment of the surrounding R1 and R2 neighborhoods and streets.”', 'Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.04.110, the project site is defined as a corner lot. As a result, the narrowest dimension of the parcel with street front is considered the front, which is Ashland Avenue. The rear is opposite the front (Wilson Place) and the remainder of the parcel lines are considered sides (Lincoln Boulevard and interior side). Due to the site’s configuration and placement along Lincoln Boulevard, the defined front yard is Ashland, street side yard is Lincoln and rear yard is Wilson Place. This is consistent with the prevailing streetscape along Ashland and Wilson where either front yards or rear yards of neighboring properties are located. The address of the property is not relevant in determining the front of a parcel.', 'The placement of the proposed transformer is within the required rear yard setback which is permitted by Code. The transformer pad will be screened by a masonry wall and also be landscaped to provide additional buffering subject to the review and approval of the ARB. Further, per Condition #24, there are no utility meters proposed in either the front or street side yard setback areas.', 'E. The appellant references Section 9.40.010 (A and D) Purpose: A Development Review Permit is intended to allow the construction of certain projects for which the design and siting could result in an adverse impact on the surrounding area. The permit allows for: A) Review of the location, size, massing, and placement of the proposed structure on the site; D) A determination of whether the proposed siting and design should be permitted by weighing the public need for the benefit to be derived from the proposed site plan use against the impact which it may cause. The appellant states, “Again, the original Staff Report suggested topics and design strategies for discussion; the Supplemental Staff Report effectively annihilated that option.”', 'The Supplemental Staff Report was provided for clarification/informational purposes and to explain the applicability of the Housing Accountability Act. It did not change any of the analysis of the Development Review Permit in the original staff report, background on design comments, and the staff recommendation. Before voting to approve the project, the Commission held a public hearing including opportunity for public testimony and deliberations on the project. All of the information presented in the original and supplemental staff report was considered. In its approval of the project, the Planning Commission included project specific conditions (Condition #1) for the ARB to pay particular attention in its review of the project. These conditions addressed both SMMC Sections 9.40.010(A) and (D) in that it requires the applicant to revise the design of the proposed structure for additional variation, pedestrian orientation, and materiality. The ARB has purview to review the design of the project, including the areas highlighted by the Commission’s design conditions.', '3. Application of the Housing Accountability Act (HAA)', 'A. Appellant states that the HAA should not have been applied to this project and that application of the HAA dissuaded consideration of public comment.', 'The HAA is a state law, applicable to charter cities, that precludes the Planning Commission or Council from denying, reducing the density of, or making infeasible any housing development project that complies with objective general plan, zoning, and subdivision standards and criteria (collectively, “Objective Standards”) in effect at the time that the project application is deemed complete unless specific findings of adverse impact are made. Amendments to the HAA, effective January 1, 2018, significantly increased the burden of proof for local agencies to disapprove housing projects or approve projects at lower densities and added civil penalties and other punitive measures to ensure compliance with the HAA.', 'As explained in the body of the Planning Commission staff report for 16ENT-0034 (Attachment D), staff has recommended approval of the Project based upon its determination that the Project is consistent with objective zoning and General Plan standards, subject to the applicant\'s compliance with all conditions in the City Council Statement of Official Action ("STOA"), which is attached to the staff report (Attachment A). The Planning Commission approved the project because no oral or written evidence was presented at the public hearing identifying “specific, adverse impacts” as defined in the HAA.', 'Appellant states that the Planning Commission should have determined whether the project met the criteria for a Development Review Permit before applying the provisions of the HAA. In accordance with the most recent HAA amendments, however, “a housing development project . . . shall be deemed consistent, compliant, and in conformity with an applicable plan, policy, ordinance, standard, requirement, or other similar provision if there is substantial evidence that would allow a reasonable person to conclude that the housing development project is consistent, compliant, or in conformity.” [Government Code Section 65589.5(f)(4)] Staff’s determination is that this Tier 2 Project is consistent with “Objective Standards” as defined by the HAA.', 'As discussed above, Council may approve this project pursuant to the staff recommendation by making the affirmative findings set forth in the STOA without consideration of the HAA. Should Council choose to deny or reduce density of this project, findings of “specific, adverse impacts” as set forth in the HAA would be required.', '5.  Compliance with California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA)', 'A. Appellant states that streamlining CEQA conditions for housing amplifies the detrimental effects of traffic; that the CEQA exemption criteria set forth in Section 21155.1 were not met; that the Planning Commission did not conduct a public hearing regarding the CEQA exemption as required by Section 21155.1; and that the draft EIR for the LUCE should have been consulted before an exemption was claimed.', 'CEQA and its streamlining provisions established in Public Resources Code (PRC) 21155.1 were enacted by the State Legislature (specifically SB 375 effective January 1, 2009). As a lead agency, the City must review discretionary projects in compliance with the regulatory provisions of CEQA. The full text of PRC 21155.1 is attached (Attachment F).', 'On January 10, 2018, the Planning Commission held a public hearing to consider approval of the project and determined that the Project met the applicable requirements of PRC 21155.1 and is considered a project to be statutorily exempt from CEQA. Public input given at the public hearing was considered by the Planning Commission in their decision-making.', 'The Project meets the applicable requirements of a Transit Priority Project under PRC 21155.1 and is considered a project to be statutorily exempt from CEQA. No EIR, either project-level or program level, is required. CEQA Guidelines Section 15168 establishes the guidelines for when a Program EIR is being prepared for a project and for when a subsequent project may rely on the use of a Program EIR for CEQA compliance. CEQA Guidelines Section 15168 does not apply to the 2903 Lincoln Boulevard Project since a Program EIR is not required for the project - nor is a Program EIR being relied on for CEQA compliance.', '6. Traffic Impacts', 'A. Appellant states that traffic impacts of the project should have been further studied pursuant to CEQA and in conjunction with the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Plan (LiNC).', 'As detailed in the CEQA Exemption Checklist prepared for the project, the Project meets the applicable requirements of Public Resources Code Section 21155.1 and is considered a Transit Priority Project to be statutorily exempt from CEQA. Unlike categorical exemptions the statutory exemption for a transit priority project is absolute. A statutory exemption applies to any given project that falls under its definition. Therefore, since the 2903 Lincoln Blvd Project qualifies for a statutory exemption, a traffic study is not required. Further, the appellant raises concerns regarding existing traffic conditions, which have not been created by the proposed project. Based on staff’s review of existing conditions that were raised early in the project review process, the project’s circulation design was substantially revised to minimize potential impacts to Ashland Avenue.', 'Regarding existing conditions, the City is currently undertaking efforts to address existing traffic conditions through the Sunset Park Neighborhood Traffic Management Program. Several options are being studied as part of this program but generally, any Sunset Park street that is not signalized and intersects with Lincoln will be evaluated to possible changes to restrict either commute period flows or permanent directional (one-way) closures.', 'Staff was aware of the potential traffic impacts on Lincoln and ensured the project plans were fully reviewed for compliance with the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Plan (LiNC). At the Planning Commission public hearing, staff further discussed and clarified to the Planning Commission how the proposed LiNC plans will coordinate with the project and discussed potential ramifications for circulation and ingress/egress to the site. The applicant is fully aware of the existing conditions, including the peak hour bus lanes, and will have to accommodate for these conditions as well as planned future improvements adjacent to the project site. It was presented at the meeting that the planned medians in the LiNC plan will limit (or restrict) the ability for southbound drivers to turn east across Lincoln into the project site. Instead, southbound drivers will be able to U-turn at Marine in order to access the project. Northbound drivers exiting the project wanting to go southbound will be able to U-turn at Ashland or further north, if necessary. Staff is also aware of the existing conditions on both Ashland Avenue and Wilson Place. Ashland has parking on both sides of the street with the streetscape interrupted by multiple driveways. Wilson has restricted access from Lincoln with only northbound right turns permitted from Wilson Place. Due to the number of curb cuts already existing on Ashland Avenue and concerns regarding existing traffic conditions voiced by residents, it was determined that the proposed site access from Lincoln Boulevard would help off-load traffic and minimize the project’s impacts on Ashland Avenue.', '7.  Construction Impacts', 'A. Appellant states that construction impacts of the project should have been studied further.', 'The project will be required to submit a construction mitigation plan in accordance with Condition #88 of the City Council STOA (Attachment A). As part of this plan the applicant will be required to indicate the location of staging of equipment, anticipated truck routes, number of trucks, and a construction period parking plan, which shall not be permitted to use public streets. The approved mitigation plan shall be posted on the site for the duration of the project construction and shall be produced upon request. This plan has not yet been submitted since it is required prior the issuance of a building permit.', 'As stated prior, the 2903 Lincoln Boulevard Project meets the applicable requirements of PRC 21155.1 and is considered a project to be statutorily exempt from CEQA. Statutory exemptions are projects specifically excluded from CEQA consideration as defined by the State Legislature. Therefore, no traffic study was required.', '8. Concerns About CIM Group', 'A. The appellant states that the project should not have been approved because Planning Director David Martin was Vice President of the CIM Group from 1999 to 2009.', 'Planning Director David Martin has not worked for or received income from CIM Group since he left the company in 2009 and therefore does not have financial interest in CIM Group.', 'B. The appellant states that CIM Group is presently constructing its 10-unit 2919 Lincoln/802 Ashland project on the hill behind the 2903 Lincoln site. They do not follow the rules, and they disrespect neighbors.', 'The City takes seriously all complaints about rule violations. Concerns about construction at another site, however, are not properly the subject of this appeal but rather should be referred by concerned community members to the City’s Building and Safety Division, which handles all on-going construction projects for compliance with construction rules and regulations.', 'Environmental Status', 'The proposed four-story mixed use building is exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 21155.1 of the CEQA Guidelines, which exempts a special class of Transit Priority Project (TPP) determined to be a Sustainable Communities Project (SCP) by the local jurisdiction. As provided, the proposed project meets all of the following requirements set forth in Section 21155.1 as a Sustainable Communities Project:', '1. The project is consistent with the general land use designation, density, building, intensity, and policies in the Southern California Association of Governments’ adopted Sustainable Communities Strategy.', '2. The project is at least 50 percent residential use based on area and greater than 0.75 FAR.', '3. The project is at least 20 units/acre.', '4. The project is located within ½ mile of a major transit stop or high quality transit corridor included in SCAG’s Regional Transportation Plan.', '5. The project can be adequately served by existing utilities and the project applicant will pay in-lieu or development fees.', '6. The project will not impact wetlands or other biological species.', '7. The project site is not located on a list of hazardous waste sites compiled pursuant to Section 65962.25 of Government Code.', '8. The project site has been subject to a preliminary endangerment assessment to determine the existence of any release of hazardous substance on the site and to determine the potential for exposure to significant health hazards.', '9. The project will not have an impact on historical resources.', '10. The project site is not subject to wildland fire hazards, high fire risk or explosion, risk of a public health exposure, seismic risk, or landslide or flood hazard.', '11. The project site is not located on developed open space.', '12. The project is 15 percent more efficient than Title 24 standards and using 25 percent less water than the regional average household.', '13. The project site is less than 8 acres.', '14. The project is less than 200 units.', '15. The project will not result in any net loss in the number of affordable housing units.', '16. The project does not include any single level building exceeding 75,000 sf.', '17. The project will incorporate any applicable mitigation measure or performance standards adopted in the prior LUCE EIR.', '18. The project would not conflict with nearby operating industrial uses, as the operations of existing industrial uses nearby will not be impacted.', '19. The project site is located within ½ mile of a rail station included in the RTP or within ¼ mile of a High Quality Transit Corridor included in the RTP.', '20. The project meet the requirement that at least five percent of the housing will be available to very-low-income households for at least 55 years.', 'Therefore, based on the above, the proposed project is considered a Sustainable Communities Project that is exempt from CEQA pursuant to Section 21155.1.', 'Alternative Actions', 'As an alternative to the staff recommendation, Council may choose to approve the appeal based on revised findings and deny the DRP (16ENT-0034). However, in order to do so, Council would be required to make additional findings under the Housing Accountability Act, as stated in this report.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action required as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '3022'}], [{'Title': 'Introduction and First Reading of an Ordinance Modifying Sections of the Santa Monica Municipal Code Related to the Management of Parking and Adoption of a Resolution Revising Public Parking Rates', 'Department': 'Parking Operations (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Introduce for first reading an ordinance (Attachment A) modifying the Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) Section 3.16 related to on-street parking management and 3.04 related to off-street parking management; and2. Adopt the attached resolution (Attachment B) establishing new transient parking rates and permit parking fees for various City parking facilities.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'This report presents information and requests actions necessary to adopt the revised Downtown transient parking rates and permit fees following the public hearing held last month.', 'On March 6, 2018, staff proposed various demand-responsive parking pricing strategies options for Council consideration to further manage congestion, improve public parking services, address Santa Monica residents’ parking desires, and encourage shifts towards more sustainable modes of transportation. Council heard from the public and various stakeholders within the City, and directed staff to return to Council with modifications to the recommended pricing strategy that, in the short term, take into account input from Council and the community, and in the long-term, strategically address the reduction of subsidized parking by providing increased investments in diverse mobility options.', 'Background', 'On May 11, 2010, Council adopted a resolution (Attachment C) establishing new parking rates for off-street parking as a first phase in implementing the 2009 Walker Parking Study recommendations. The Walker Parking Study found that there was an imbalance in pricing between the different parking facilities within Downtown resulting in the unintended consequence of putting visitors, employees, and transient and monthly parkers in competition for the most convenient and often least expensive spaces while other spaces in the City remained largely unoccupied. Walker Parking consultants provided recommendations consistent with the LUCE to better manage parking demand and maximize efficiency of the public parking supply in Downtown Santa Monica.', 'On July 10, 2012, Council adopted a resolution (Attachment D) establishing new parking fees at citywide on-street parking meters, off-street parking facilities, and beach parking lots, including a reduction in the Downtown free parking “grace” period from two hours to 90 minutes. These changes were informed by a parking rate study conducted by Walker Parking Consultants in 2012, consistent with the LUCE and the 2009 Walker Parking Study.', 'On May 10, 2016, Council adopted a resolution (Attachment E) establishing revised parking rates for the Civic Center and Downtown parking facilities to address increased high weekday occupancies and discourage potential “park and ride” activity due to the arrival of the Expo Light Rail.', 'Discussion', 'On March 6, 2018, staff conducted a study session (Attachment F) with City Council that included various demand-responsive parking pricing strategy options for Council consideration. Staff sought Council direction on the concept of implementing a demand-responsive parking pricing strategy that sets different parking rate structures on weekdays and weekends based on their different demand patterns. The proposed parking strategies were based on a detailed analysis of parking transactions and occupancies in each Downtown parking facility, and were designed to:', '· Facilitate at least 15% parking availability in all facilities at all times', '· Redirect long-term parking sessions to less expensive parking facilities outside of the Downtown core', '· Maximize the use of existing public parking inventory', '· Address occupancy, traffic, access and circulation challenges', '· Encourage consideration of travel mode shift', '· Reduce subsidized parking for monthly permit holders', 'Prior to developing the parking pricing strategies for Council consideration, staff conducted study sessions with various stakeholders throughout the City to ensure that the needs of the communities represented by the respective stakeholders were considered and included in the overall proposal to Council. During this thorough six month outreach process, staff received verbal and written comments from residents and stakeholders in the City that supported staff’s overall proposal to address traffic congestion and excessively high parking facility peak occupancies. However, the feedback on how to address these challenges varied amongst stakeholders. For example, there was unequivocal support from Santa Monica Travel and Tourism, which promotes the City of Santa Monica as a travel destination as well as local employment opportunities in the City, on all of the staff proposed pricing strategies (Attachment G). There were other stakeholders in the City who also supported the overall goals, but recommended addressing the current challenges with varied pricing alternatives, primarily being the preservation of the free parking for the first 90 minutes in the Downtown core parking facilities. Attachment H includes formal written comments from these stakeholders, community members and residents.', 'In light of the comprehensive discussion and feedback, Council directed staff to return to Council promptly with the necessary ordinance and resolution to adopt the proposed parking rate increases with the following modifications:', 'Immediate Parking Pricing Strategies', '· Maintain first 90 minutes free parking period in PS 1-9 and KEC', '· Increase parking rates; however maintain a uniform parking rate structure across Downtown core facilities, PS 1-8 and KEC, to avoid customer confusion', '· Eliminate monthly parking in PS 1 and PS 3, providing alternative parking options, if necessary, in PS 9 and PS 10 based on availability', '· Draft an ordinance that streamlines the process and modernizes the municipal code to reflect the current practice of setting on-street and off-street parking rates based on goals outlined in the LUCE and DCP', '· Continue subsidizing parking for Ken Edwards Center and Santa Monica Emeritus College program users', '· Develop new subsidized parking options for Main Library program users', '· Continue to invest incremental parking revenues over the FY 2009-10 base year into parking traffic, access, and circulation programs, including transit subsidy options', 'Staff recommends that Council adopt the attached resolution that includes the immediate parking pricing strategies as submitted for implementation by July 1, 2018. This proposal addresses the immediate implementation of the necessary ordinance and resolution to establish rates in a timely manner.', 'Long-term Parking Management Strategies', 'Staff will work with city stakeholders and other City Departments to develop a long-term comprehensive strategy that is aligned with the City’s larger focus on supporting a more livable community, and return to Council on or before June 30, 2019 with specific long term strategy proposals for Council approval and adoption. Among the steps staff will take going forward are the following:', '· Partner with City Departments, stakeholders, and TNC businesses to create mobility options that support the use of more sustainable travel modes', '· Evaluate the effectiveness of a SM Resident Downtown Access Parking Program and a Downtown Merchant Validation Program', '· Work with stakeholders to analyze the feasibility of pursuing a universal valet parking program', '· Return to Council with a comprehensive strategy that addresses the reduction of free or subsidized parking with investments in tangible mobility options', '· Return to Council annually to report on the State of Citywide Parking', 'Judicial Council Parking', 'The fee resolution also extends the bulk parking fee for the California Judicial Council for twelve months from July 2018 to June 2019 in anticipation of the multipurpose sports field, with a possible request for a six month extension if construction demands allow. The Council has made progress in promoting alternative options for its employees, customers, and jurors; however, the Council requires additional time to address budget impacts and to develop programs to address its minimum parking needs, particularly for members of the public who utilize the court’s services.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Due to the ever-changing conditions surrounding current and emerging transportation options and parking alternatives, revenue projections in establishing budgets are as much an art as a science, and predictive models developed by staff to gauge parking revenues fall into this category. The model used to develop the proposed pricing strategy is based on the concept of demand elasticity and recognizes that both occupancy and elasticity changes throughout the day, including research that suggests that elasticities tend to be higher when there are more alternative transportation options.', 'The proposed parking rate and permit fee adjustments account for parkers shifting amongst the Citywide parking facilities, and takes a proactive approach to managing demand across the remaining parking facilities, slightly increasing the Downtown core parking rates to encourage parkers to shift to less expensive facilities without oversaturating any given facility due to significant rate differential between structures. Lessons learned from the FY 2016-17 parking rate change suggest that not making the secondary rate increase to other peripheral parking facilities within the Downtown portfolio would result in potential overcrowding in those facilities.', 'Staff believes that the following range between $3 million and $5 million of increased revenues is sound, prudent, and based on an elasticity model that has included several years of data from Santa Monica parking facilities as well as benchmarking against industry standards of practice and in comparison with other parking operations with similar characteristics. While no model will exactly predict total revenues, staff is confident that it has established a fairly strong case for these predicted increases, if the recommendation is approved as submitted for implementation by July 1, 2018. The anticipated revenues would primarily recover the revenues lost over the last 1-2 years due downward trend of parking transactions related to the changing mobility patterns. Staff will include the revenue projections as part of the FY 2018-19 Exception Based Budget, and will continue to actively monitor parking activity in the various facilities and adjust revenue estimates, if necessary, during the FY 2018-19 midyear budget.'], 'MeetingID': '1139', 'ID': '2952'}]]
[[{'Title': '2018 Council Retreat: 21st Century Government, Council’s Five Strategic Goals, and the Performance Management Framework', 'Department': "City Manager's Office, Administration", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '04. Study Sessions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council receive the updates, discuss and provide direction to staff on next steps to effectively pursue a 21st Century Government and implement the citywide performance Framework adopted in last year’s Budget.', 'Body': ['“Cities that think ahead, stay ahead.”', 'Background', "Among the powers vested in the City Council is the responsibility to provide overall policy direction to the City government. This responsibility extends beyond making decisionson individual agenda items and approving the City's budget. It involves setting an overall focus on what matters most --both in delivering consistent, high-quality results as well as shaping an organizational structure, culture and capacity to achieve those goals.", 'Over the decades, Santa Monica has goneover and abovethe essential protection of "health, safety and welfare" that is the core legal requirement of all California municipalities. In fact, in 2003, the City Council adopted an overall set of measures developed after broad community input to “enhance our resources, prevent harm to the natural environment and human health, and benefit the social and economic well-being of the community for the sake of current and future generations.” This became the basis for a regular Sustainability Report Card. Similarly, in 2013, the City undertook a pioneering effort to identify the key indicators of Community Wellbeing, to create a “guide for making more informed decisions, more efficient use of resources, and improve the quality of life of people throughout the community." In 2015, the City Council unanimously adopted five Strategic Goals as “game-changing” efforts to create a new model of mobility; exert regional leadership on homelessness; reclaim local control of the Santa Monica Airport; maintain a diverse and inclusive community; and promote wellbeing so that residents Learn & Thrive. Finally, last year, the City Council incorporated into the 2017-19 Biannual Budget a Framework that integrates our delivery of City services and Strategic Goals with the larger outcomes that support a sustainable city of wellbeing.', 'Introduction', 'Even as our city has been at the forefront of pursuing broad and visionary goals to improve the quality of life and standard of living of community members, like other California cities, Santa Monica has retained much of the structure and processes inherited from a City Charter adopted in 1947 and traditional government practices that are considerably older. This contributes to increasing tension between public expectations and the capacity of local government to address them in the 21stCentury.', 'From the way we consume our news to power our vehicles, technological innovation is disrupting every industry and sector—the public sector is no exception. The rapid acceleration of change has, at times, bred economic displacement and inequitable growth. Skeptical of governments’ ability to solvethese problems, some people in this country and elsewhere have become frustrated and angry -- and many are nostalgic to return to the stability and comfort of some version of the remembered past.', 'Here in California, as once reliable windows of social and economic opportunities have closed, our population has burgeoned in size and diversity. According to a 2012 Stanford Center for Longevitystudy, while California’s population increased by 10%, Hispanic and Asian populations each grew by about 30%. Though California’s boom economy has supported this growth, vibrancy has forced housing prices to rise; in just the past year, the median home value in Santa Monica hasrisen8.4%. While an affordability crisis rages, the State’s pension liabilities are mounting and now far outweigh our ability to fund them without considering painful trade-offs. At the regional and local levels, we are assuming a new metropolitan identity, moving beyond the old hallmarks of the California Dream (a single-family home, an expansive lawn, a car). Local media outlets have gone digital. In the face of these challenges and changes, community members are no longer accepting of slow-moving and methodical government processes and procedures. Residents increasingly base their expectations of government on private consumer experiences—they demand solutions, and they expect themnow.', 'The City Council retreat is an opportunity to step back from the operational decisions that made for the past fiscal year’s successes in order to have a strategic and broad-based conversation with the City’s executive leadership team in a more informal and unstructured environment. In the context of the new Framework and a broader push for Santa Monica to demonstrate the potential of 21stCentury government, the goal of this morning session is to focus on a shared vision of the City’s overall direction. The essential question is: How can the Council and executive team work together more effectively with the community to tackle these new 21stcentury challenges – and opportunities?', 'Government in the 21stCentury', 'Getting to the bottom of that question begs another: what is the model of governance in the 21stcentury? As the Council has acknowledged with the strength and sustainability of our local economy, we cannot risk resting on our laurels. As the sole provider of traditional local services, cities have operated like monopolies. Yet increasingly the private sector is competing to satisfy needs that were once automatically assumed to be the domain of the public sector. In a state where technology is promising that “there’s an app for that,” the public sector must demonstrate it is delivering cost-effective public value. To do so, the public sector must take stock of what we have been, and in turn, what we have to become. Like other traditional industries facing disruption in recent times (newspapers, record companies, automobiles, travel agents etc.) we must re-examine every aspect of our operating model or face brutal choices down the road. Because of its robust economy and public infrastructure and assets,Santa Monica faces less immediate threat than most cities. Instead, these assets give us a head start to be a model of successful 21stCentury government.', 'The following table outlines and juxtaposes some features of these two models of governance. It is not meant to imply stark contrasts so much as an evolution from one era to the next:', '20thCentury Governance', '21stCentury Governance', 'Provide services', 'Deliver outcomes', 'Fixed Structure', 'Evolving structure', 'Chain of Command organizational chart', 'Cross-disciplinary teamwork and collaboration', 'Individual transactions and service delivery', 'Ongoing relationship with community members', 'Managing operations; achieve compliance', 'Managing performance; achieve results', 'Hire for expertise, experience and credentials', 'Hire for talent, potential and fit with values', 'Government acts as a vending machine', 'Government engages community in “barn raising”', 'Line Item Budget', 'Programmatic performance budgets', 'Driven by long-standing rules, best practices and expectations', 'Data-driven – do more of what works and less of what doesn’t', 'Drawing inspiration from the entrepreneurial success stories of Silicon Beach and beyond, our City is approaching the challenge with a focus on embracing agility, testing and experimenting our way toward optimal solutions. We are beginning to think about and apply technology, not only to digitize services, but to transform service experiences. We are cultivating and deploying our human capital to focus on empowerment, accountability and growth, unlocking the untapped potential of our workforce. We are harnessing data to be pro-active and on top of trends instead of waiting to react to their impact.', 'This session offers an opportunity for Council to reflect with key staff and community members on our understanding of 21stcentury government, and how it applies here in Santa Monica', 'The City’s Evolution to Define “The Why”', 'Santa Monica has never shrunk from the challenge of solving big problems. This zest for exceptional service, however, has come at the price of straining our capacity to meet growing demands. It is unsustainable to continue to add staff to address new challenges. As the problems the City is called on to solve become ever more numerous, complex and dynamic, we must parse with care theimportantfrom theurgent.', 'Strategy—the decision to prioritize some things over others— has long been the lifeblood of private sector success. Recognizing the profound differences between government and private business, there is still much we can learn from the private sector’s calibrating organizational structure, culture, and operation to strategy.', 'Council embraced the need to set clear priorities when it formulated the five Strategic Goals in August 2015. In designing the five goals, Council took the community’s and staffs’ input, examined the breadth of the City’s initiatives, and selected those where focused efforts would move the needle most:', '●Maintaining an inclusive and diverse community', '●Establishing a new model for mobility', '●Securing local control of the City land occupied by the Santa Monica Airport', '●Taking a leadership role in regional efforts to address homelessness; and', '●Fostering a community partnership to Learn and Thrive.', 'Once identified, the City formed teams for each goal, which focused on developing plans of action. These living, malleable documents include background information on each goal area, along with a theory of change (the “why” behind the goal), and a dashboard, which identifies key outcomes as well as key activities and metrics designed to achieve agreed upon outcomes. Coordinating efforts across units in this manner was, and remains, a challenge for an organization structured on old notions of how governments function. Notwithstanding that impediment, the City progressed in all five areas.', 'The Council’s five Strategic Goals represent City’s effort to set clearly articulated priorities and harmonize efforts across departments on these specific issues. Yet this effort was not sufficient to capture the overarching vision for the community as well as create a cohesive structure to manage diverse functions and performance of City departments. The Framework, developed as part of the City’s biannual budget process along withSaMoStat(the City’s new performance management system), integrates and builds on the initial success of defining the five Strategic Goals. The Framework for a Sustainable City of Wellbeing Built on a Foundation of Good Governance is the City’s strategic vision, tying organizational purpose to the day-to-day functions of individual departments. The Framework is organized into six outcome areas, each of which is broken down into sub-outcomes, clarifying what the City hopes to achieve in specific areas:', '· Safe, Connected, and Engaged Community (“Community”);', '· Resilient Built and Natural Environment (“Place and Planet”);', '· Lifelong Opportunities for Personal Growth (“Learning”);', '· Physical, Mental, and Environmental Health (“Health”);', '· Inclusive Affordable, and Diverse Local Economy (“Economic Opportunity”); and', '· Reliable, Effective, and Efficient Government (“Governance”)', 'Each sub-outcome area includes outcome metrics, designed to measure success in achieving the overarching outcomes. To guide the Framework forward, questions to consider at this retreat include: how we might buildon data and experience; what does the shift to a single Framework mean for other city-wide, like the Sustainable City Plan, or localized efforts; how might we better measure and communicate progress; should “Safer Community” be its own outcome area given the growing challenges faced by Santa Monica in that arena?', 'Alongside efforts at building the capacity for strategic thinking within City Hall, the City is undertaking a variety of projects to embrace the 21stcentury model. Ahead of completing the City Services Building, we are working at modernizing the City’s internal operations and culture. To meet rising expectations for City services to be available at the click of a button, anytime, and anywhere, we are crafting a digital strategy. Though these changes represent new ways of thinking and achieving, the indicators of success will be what they always have for government: we will have elevated our community’s sense of trust and satisfaction; we will have identified outcomes and measures with clarity, and report them with transparency; we will have maintained our fiscal health; we will have raised our workforce’s effectiveness and satisfaction; and we will both engage and empower our community.', 'To ensure the dialogue that comes of this retreat is as engaging and constructive as possible in driving a shared vision of, and commitment to, 21stcentury government, here are a few questions to conclude:', '· What are the hallmarks of 21stcentury government in Santa Monica?', '· How are we progressingtoward this transitionto a 21stCentury government?', '· What is the role of citizens, Boards and Commission in informing the visionand its implementation?', '· What is theleadershiprole ofthe CityCouncil inthis transition?', 'Saturday’s session is designed to foster candid discussion among the Council and the City’s executive leadership (City Management team, City Attorney, City Clerk and department heads) to address these key questions.'], 'MeetingID': '1162', 'ID': '3037'}]]
[[{'Title': 'Proclamation declaring April as ArtsMonth 2018.', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2926'}, {'Title': 'City Manager Report: ArtsMonth – An ode to the arts and creativity in Santa Monica', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2935'}, {'Title': 'Recognition of Interim Police Chief Kenneth Semko', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2964'}], [{'Title': 'Airport Lease Agreement with Santa Monica Community College District', 'Department': 'Public Works, Airport Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a lease agreement with Santa Monica Community College District (SMC) for classroom space located at 2800 Airport Avenue, Santa Monica, CA 90405, reflecting the general terms and conditions outlined in this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'As owner of the Santa Monica Airport, the City has leases covering more than half a million square feet devoted to both aviation and other uses, including cultural, recreational and educational as authorized by Charter Amendment LC. In accordance with the Santa Monica Airport (SMO) Leasing and Licensing Policy of August 8, 2017, the City is moving forward with renewed and revised leases on city-owned properties. Staff seeks authorization to lease 25,086 square feet of classroom space and 180 parking spaces to Santa Monica Community College (SMC) at the City-owned property located at 2800 Airport Avenue. SMC has leased this property from the City since July 1, 1988. The proposed agreement is consistent with the provisions of the Airport’s Leasing and Licensing Policy, which requires that all tenants lease property at the Airport at fair market value. The proposed lease with SMC is for post-secondary education classes and programs for a period of five years, with an option for an additional five-year period. The base rent is at fair market value and begins at $43,291.90 monthly with an annual increase of 2.5%. The new rent rate would be effective on April 1, 2018.', 'Background', 'On May 17, 1988, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a lease with SMC for public college and educational activities at 2800 Airport Avenue (formerly known as the Organized Reserve Corps Armory site). The term of this agreement was for 10 years, with an additional 10-year option to renew (Attachment A).', 'On July 1, 1988, the City and SMC entered into a new lease agreement for the site at an annual rent of $100,000 (or $8,333 per month) adjusted upward by the consumer price index. On July 1, 1998, SMC exercised the option to renew the lease for an additional 10 years. The term of the agreement ended on June 30, 2008.', 'Since July 1, 2008, SMC has continued to occupy the property under an expired lease. Upon the lease expiration, SMC’s occupancy of the premises converted into a month-to-month tenancy under the same terms and conditions of the expired lease. On July 1, 2015, the City noticed SMC that on August 1, 2015 their previous rental amount of $21,410.83 would be increased by 50% to a new monthly rental amount of $32,116.25.', 'On January 12, 2016, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a five-year Motor Vehicle and Pedestrian Access Agreement with SMC. The purpose of the agreement was to allow for pedestrian ingress and egress and to continue vehicular egress from the north vehicle gate at SMC’s Satellite Campus to the intersection of Donald Douglas Loop South and Airport Avenue. As part of this agreement, SMC was responsible for all costs for any necessary improvements made to the property to facilitate motor vehicle and pedestrian access. However, these improvements were not completed by SMC (Attachment B).', 'On July 1, 2017, the City began negotiations for a new lease agreement with SMC for classroom and parking space at 2800 Airport Avenue that culminated in the general terms and conditions proposed in this report.', 'Discussion', 'SMC leases property at 2800 Airport Avenue for post-secondary education classes and programs. SMC seeks to maintain current use of the property and does not intend to expand current classes and/or programs. The proposed lease with SMC is for 25,086 square feet of classroom space and 180 parking spaces. The proposed lease would be for a term not to exceed five years with a monthly rate of $43,291.90 per month to be increased annually by 2.5%, and an option to renew for an additional five years at fair market value for similar quality space in the area. The new rent rate will be retroactive to April 1, 2018. SMC would have the option to terminate the proposed agreement in the event of an SMC fiscal emergency by providing one-year notice to the City.', 'Additionally, the City would authorize a tenant improvement credit in the amount of up to five months’ rent for a total rent credit of $227,556 to be equally allocated monthly across the initial five-year term. Any improvements undertaken by SMC would revert to the City at the conclusion of the lease term. Although SMC would modify the building with minor interior tenant improvements, SMC does not propose to expand the building.', 'Annual rent paid by SMC to the City would be between $519,503 for year one and $573,434 for year five, exclusive of tenant improvement credits. In addition, SMC agrees to pay the City an additional $250,000 upon lease execution to discharge any and all past obligations to the Airport related to improvements to Donald Douglas Loop South that were not performed by SMC as agreed upon under the Motor Vehicle and Pedestrian Access Agreement with the City. The City has agreed to undertake the construction of improvements to the egress within the Airport’s property.', 'SMC participates in the City’s Transportation Demand Management Program for all its locations in Santa Monica including 2800 Airport Avenue. SMC’s Average Vehicle Ridership (AVR) target is 1.75. SMC would be required to comply with all city building code regulations, planning standards, and any applicable Federal Aviation Administration regulations, as a condition of the lease. Finally, the lease is consistent with the terms of the voter-approved Measure LC passed in 2014, which allows Santa Monica Airport to be used for the development of parks, public open spaces, and public recreational facilities and the maintenance and replacement of existing cultural, arts and educational programs.', 'SUMMARY OF PROPOSED LEASE TERMS', 'Lease Commencement', 'Upon Execution of Lease Document', 'Rent Commencement', 'April 1, 2018', 'Term Ends', '60 months from date of lease execution', 'Options', 'One five-year option not to exceed December 21, 2028', 'Base Rental Rate', '$43,291.90 per month', 'Escalations', '2.5% increase annual at the lease anniversary', 'Tenant Improvement Allowance', 'Tenant shall receive a rent credit that is equivalent to five months’ rent, amortized monthly over five years, for a total of ($227,556.48)', 'Parking', '180 parking spaces', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The recommended lease with SMC would generate an estimated $119,053 in Airport revenues for FY 2017-18 at account 33431.402120. Additionally, a one-time payment of $250,000 would be allocated in FY 2017-18 to account 33431.402120. Revenue budget changes will be included in the FY 2018-19 Proposed Budget.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2300'}, {'Title': 'Award Construction Contract for the Big Blue Bus LCNG Fuel System Modification Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2371 to Wyoming NorthStar Incorporated, a Wyoming-based company with local offices in Newport Beach, California; for the Big Blue Bus Liquified-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG) Fuel System Modification Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Wyoming NorthStar Incorporated, in an amount not to exceed $1,098,643 (includes a 10% contingency); and3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Big Blue Bus (BBB) currently operates a fleet of approximately 200 buses fueled by Liquefied-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG). BBB seeks Council authorization for construction services to provide facilities upgrades to the existing fuel and wash system at the BBB Campus. These upgrades are needed to provide a more efficient and fail-safe fueling system and continue uninterrupted bus service to riders, while improving workplace safety at the BBB Campus. Staff recommends awarding a contract to Wyoming Northstar Incorporated in an amount not to exceed $1,098,643 (including a 10% contingency) for the Big Blue Bus Liquefied Compressed Gas Fuel System Modification Project.', 'Background', 'On January 27, 2015, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement #10019 (CCS) with RNL Interplan, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $117,282 to provide design services for the Big Blue Bus (BBB) Fuel and Wash Upgrades Project (Attachment A).', 'On April 12, 2016, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement #10019 (CCS) with RNL Interplan, Inc. in the amount of $112,419 for design services to expand the Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) fuel system at BBB. This resulted in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $229,701 (Attachment B).', 'On November 1, 2016, the City Manager executed a second modification to professional services agreement #10019 (CCS) with RNL Interplan, Inc. to provide required design and engineering services previously not included in the first contract modification. The second modification was within the authorized contingency and new budget authority was not requested.', 'On October 10, 2017, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a third modification toagreement #10019 (CCS) in the amount of $73,420(including a10% contingency) with RNL Interplan,Inc., a California-based company, foradditionaldesign services to replace themethane gas-detection systemsattwo locationsinthe BigBlueBusCampus (Attachment C). This will result in an amended agreement with anew total amount not to exceed $303,121.', 'On January 17, 2018, based on the design and detailing provided by RNL Interplan, Inc., the City published Notices Inviting Bids for construction services to provide facilities upgrades to the existing Liquefied-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG) fuel system at the Big Blue Bus Campus in accordance with City specifications.', 'Discussion', 'The existing Liquefied-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG) fuel and wash system at the Big Blue Bus (BBB) Campus was installed in 2002. The Big Blue Bus Fuel and Wash Building is operational seven days per week and services approximately 200 buses per night. The existing fueling system is operational; however, the system lacks redundancy, and there is no fail-safe system that safeguards against fueling interruptions in the event of a fueling system or pump failure. The operational system and software is outdated and needs to be replaced with an up-to-date and more robust system.The upgrades to the BBB LCNG fueling system would provide redundancy in the fuel pumps system to ensure that BBB can fuel its fleet of buses even during the failure of one of their fuel pumps.This project would improve the existing fueling system, including relocating two existing LCNG pumps, installing two new LCNG pumps and related hardware, installing new high-flow LCNG dispensers, and installing a complete replacement of the operations systems with a new master Programmable Logic Controller (PLC) control system and program.', 'The BBB strives to be a leader in sustainable, clean energy public transportation. Looking ahead, the BBB and City Council are working on a plan to replace the existing BBB LCNG fleet with Battery Electric Buses (BEB) fleet. Per Federal requirements, all public transportation buses should have a minimum useful life of 12 years; for example, a new LCNG bus delivered in 2018 would be eligible for replacement in 2030. The BBB Fuel System Modification project would ensure proper fueling capacity at the BBB Campus throughout the fleet’s transition from LCNG to electric.', 'Next Steps', 'If approved, construction would tentatively begin in late May 2018 and would be completed by November 2018.One fueling lane would remain operational at all times and the system switch over would occur on a weekend to minimize impacts to bus fueling schedules.', 'Vendor Selection', "On January 17, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for construction services to provide facilities upgrades to the existing Liquefied-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG) fuel and wash system at the Big Blue Bus Campus in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.071(a). Thirty-nine vendors downloaded the bid. Four bids were received and publicly opened on February 21, 2018.The bid results are as follows:", 'Vendor', 'Bid Amount', 'GP Strategies Corporation', '$919,942', 'Wyoming Northstar Incorporated', '$998,766', 'EFS West', '$1,239,242', 'Fastech', '$1,243,982', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff contacted references to review work experience and Wyoming NorthStar Incorporated obtained the most positive reviews and references noted the vendor’s quickness of response and problem-solving skills. All respondents reported that the work by Wyoming NorthStar Incorporated was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner while maintaining consistent quality. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that Wyoming Northstar Incorporated has a license that is current, active, and in good standing.Based on these criteria, Wyoming Northstar Incorporated is recommended as the best bidder.', 'On March 19, 2018, GP Strategies Corporation submitted a bid protest alleging, inter alia, that they are the lowest bidder and the best valued bidder with past LNG/LCNG fuel station design/build experience, and specific experience with the BBB fueling system. In accordance with appeals procedure set forth in the Notice Inviting Bids, the Public Works Director evaluated the bid protest and issued a final determination recommending Wyoming Northstar Incorporated as the best bidder. Copies of the bid protest and the Public Work Director’s final determination are attached (Attachments D and E).', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Wyoming Northstar Incorporated is for an amount not to exceed $1,098,643 (including 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C410826.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2652'}, {'Title': 'Award Agreement for Santa Monica Airport Buildings Property Condition Assessment', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# 2508 to Omgivning Architects, a California-based company, to provide a comprehensive building assessment at nine building locations at the Santa Monica Airport;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Omgivning Architects, in an amount not to exceed $756,140 (including a $68,740 contingency) for a total amount not to exceed $756,140 over a two-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City of Santa Monica (City) is the owner/operator of the Santa Monica Airport (Airport) and has leased Airport property and tenant spaces along both sides of Airport Avenue since the 1940s. The Airport is an important municipal asset, maintaining leases with approximately 397 tenants and generating approximately 70% of its revenues from leasing. Due to deferred maintenance, many of the tenant spaces and buildings are showing signs of aging with both structural and non-structural deficiencies. It is critical for the City to address tenant building issues and deficiencies in a timely manner. Staff recommends an agreement to be awarded to Omgivning Architects in an amount not to exceed $756,140 to provide a comprehensive building assessment at nine building locations at the Santa Monica Airport.', 'Discussion', 'Due to the ongoing wear and tear of weather and use over the decades, the frequency of repairs occurring on leased Airport building properties has increased substantially compared to previous years. To extend the life of these buildings, staff is recommending a Property Condition Assessment, which would entail investigating the life expectancy of mechanical, electrical, and plumbing systems, as well as the current structural integrity of the buildings. In-house staff does not have the design expertise for each of these trades required to perform a thorough building assessment. Any issues brought to light by the assessment would be addressed in a future construction project which would make repairs and bring the buildings as a whole to current building codes and standards in the most cost-effective manner. The consultant would also provide the City with an estimated operational budget for each of the properties to better account for their post construction maintenance costs. The Property Condition Assessment would evaluate the following nine Airport locations.', '· 2501 Airport Ave.', '· 2701 Airport Av', '· 2900 Airport Ave.', '· 3000 Airport Ave.', '· 3011 Airport Ave.', '· 3026 Airport Ave.', '· 3050 Airport Ave.', '· 3200 Airport Ave.', '· 3300 Airport Ave.', 'The scope of the proposed project includes the completion of a comprehensive assessment and initial design drawings on how to address the needed repairs for each of the nine buildings. For each building, an assessment report would be prepared which would include a summary of the overall condition of the buildings with itemized deficiencies to be addressed, schematic designs for the repairs, cost estimates for repairs and annual maintenance/operation costs, and usable square footage totals with a recommendation for the City to proceed with either refurbishment or replacement.  Staff would return to Council at a future date with a recommendation to award construction services to complete the building upgrades as funding becomes available.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On January 8, 2018, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) #SP2508 to provide a Property Condition Assessment report, schematic design services and cost estimation services for nine building locations at the Airport. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.075(a). A total of 106 vendors downloaded the RFP. Three firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department.', '· AE3 Partners Architects', '· Nonzero \\ Architecture', '· Omgivning Architects', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience with similar scopes of work, project approach, project team and references, and prime and sub-consultant past projects. Omgivning Architects was recognized in the evaluation process for their effective project management, completeness, and client responsiveness. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Omgivning Architects as the best qualified firm to provide a comprehensive building assessment at nine building locations at the Santa Monica Airport.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to Omgivning Architects is for an amount not to exceed $756,140. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account M339088.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2657'}, {'Title': 'Bus Stop Shelter Custodial and Maintenance Services', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4316 to Shelter Clean Services, Inc., a California-based company, to provide custodial and signage replacement services for Big Blue Bus (BBB) bus stops and zones located within and outside of the City of Santa Monica;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Shelter Clean Services, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $978,738, which includes a 10% contingency for a five-year term with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Big Blue Bus (BBB) provides transit service across 56 square miles, well beyond the City limits. Staff recommends the award of Bid #4316 to Shelter Clean Services, Inc. to provide custodial and signage replacement services for all Big Blue Bus stops, bus shelters and bus loading zones served by BBB routes located in Santa Monica, Los Angeles, and Los Angeles County, at specified hourly labor charges. This award would enable the City to continue providing clean and well maintained Big Blue Bus stops and zones, and ensure that all street furniture and shelters at stops are maintained to a high standard of cleanliness at approximately one thousand locations. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $978,738, which includes a 10% contingency over a five-year term.', 'Background', 'In 2014 and continuing into 2016, Big Blue Bus implemented the Evolution of Blue program designed to provide new bus routes and stops to integrate into the new Expo Line light rail service. This program included the newly designed and implemented Bus Stop Improvement Project within Santa Monica as well as the upgrade of traditional amenities outside the City of Santa Monica. Due to the enhanced amenities at BBB stops that resulted from the Bus Stop Improvement Project, signage replacement and custodial requirements have increased. The prior standard for BBB stops consisted of a pole, eye level signs displaying maps and schedules, and a target displaying the BBB brand logo. The new sites include a large sign with multiple route and information slots, custom seating, solar panels, lighting, and real-time signage with electronic components and canopies, all of which require additional cleaning and maintenance.', 'On January 16, 2015, the City executed a Contractual Services Agreement (CSA) with Shelter Clean in an amount of $150,000, for a one-year period, to provide custodial and signage replacement services for all BBB bus stops, shelters and bus loading zones. This contract was executed to meet the increased bus stops and zones custodial needs resulting from the Bus Stop Improvement Project. On February 23, 2016, Council awarded Bid #4144 to Shelter Clean Services to provide custodial and signage replacement services for BBB bus stops, shelters and loading zones in an amount not to exceed $315,000 over a two-year period.', 'Discussion', 'Bus stops and zones are high profile elements that require regular cleaning and signage replacement. Big Blue Bus currently contracts this service to ensure that bus stops and zones remain clean, providing a pleasant environment for BBB passengers. BBB has approximately 1,000 bus stops in Santa Monica and Los Angeles County. The stops feature varied shelter configurations to accommodate high, medium, and low volume stops. High volume shelters have a sign unit, two shade units and seating for two to six customers depending on location, medium volume shelters have a sign unit, one shade unit and seating for two to four customers, and low volume shelters have a sign unit, one shade unit and seating for one to two customers. Stops outside of Santa Monica have a pole, target, seating, eye level signs and specialty signage.', 'Each bus stop requires routine cleaning to provide a safe and pleasant environment for customers and staff and is an important part of BBB’s maintenance standards and customer experience model. The cleaning and signage replacement of each bus stop consists of: picking up trash, sweeping any debris from the transit cement pad, pressure washing the cement pad on an as-needed basis, wiping down transit furniture, hand wiping shade structure ceiling panels, cleaning of solar panel arrays and lighting systems, disinfecting seats, backs, and arm-rests, cleaning and polishing shade structures and signs, removing graffiti, stickers, and non-transit related signs and posters on all bus stop signs and furniture, post system information updates throughout the year, and performing minor maintenance such as removing/replacing/refastening bus signage and poles, shelter panels, solar lighting and transit furniture.', 'The award of this bid would ensure that bus stops are inspected and cleaned as scheduled by BBB. Technicians would log into a work order system and document all work specific to a bus stop. BBB maintenance staff would evaluate reports on a weekly and monthly basis for quality control and to ensure compliance with the bid scope of work.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014, staff was directed by the City Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 staff report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” custodial services were identified as meeting the criteria for contractual services under the categories of space required, equipment required, and workforce flexibility.', 'Custodial cleaning and signage replacement of our bus stops and loading zones requires the vendor to provide all equipment needed to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment. In addition to cost savings, the nature of the custodial work needed requires a large employee pool, as well as requisite supervision for custodial staff.', 'Based on the recommendations of the January 13, 2015 staff report, staff solicited bids for outside contracting of custodial and signage replacement services for bus stop shelter and loading zones.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On January 26, 2018, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide bus stop custodial and signage replacement services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-nine (29) vendors downloaded the bid. Three (3) bids were received and publicly opened on February 15, 2018. The cost estimates are summarized below:', 'Cost Estimate', 'Semilla Landscape Corporation', 'Shelter Clean Services, Inc.', 'Ultimate Maintenance Services', 'Estimate 5-year period', '$    839,525', '$  889,762', '$ 958,134', '10% Contingency', '$  83,953', '$  88,976', '$  95,814', 'Contract 5 yr. total', '$  923,478', '$  978,738', '$ 1,053,948', 'Bids were evaluated based on criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. In evaluating the bids for bus stops and zones custodial services, BBB staff performed outreach to the references listed in the bid responses and evaluated the previous experience of each bidder. Semilla Landscaping’s cost was $10,000 lower annually than the other bidders, but their experience statement did not indicate transit experience, including the need to change update signage during service changes, which occur two or three times per year. Shelter Clean Services, Inc. is not the lowest bidder; however, it was the only bidder that had experience providing custodial services for transit bus stops including preparing stops for service changes resulting from BBB’s service changes (also called shake-ups). Based on these criteria, Shelter Clean Services, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Shelter Clean Services Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $978,738 including a 2.5% annual price increase and a 10% contingency. Funds of $169,274 are available in the FY 2018-19 budget in the Big Blue Bus Department. This contract will be charged to account 416574.555018. Future year funding is contingent on City Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2775'}, {'Title': 'Award of Commissioning Services Agreement for the City Services Building Construction Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP #2250 to Syska Hennessy Group, Inc., a California-based company, to perform commissioning services for the City Services Building Construction Project; Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Syska Hennessy Group, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $95,189 (including 10% contingency) with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City Services Building (CSB) construction phase commenced in December 2017, with the goals to centralize and streamline city services for the community, eliminate leased office space saving the City up to $10 million annually, and model the City’s commitment to sustainability and the environment.  The CSB’s sustainable design includes strategies to achieve net-zero energy (NZE) and net-zero water (NZW) performance. If these targets are met, the City will benefit from never paying for energy or water utility costs, which are expected to escalate over time. Commercial office buildings like the CSB are required by code to hire a third-party commissioning agent to ensure building systems are designed, coordinated and installed correctly. Because the CSB includes unique high-performance building systems, staff is recommending enhanced commissioning services, which are encouraged by California Building Code and the LEED Rating system for energy savings. For building owners that intend to operate a building through its useful life, investing in enhanced commissioning increases life-cycle cost savings. Staff recommends awarding an agreement to Syska Hennessy Group, Inc. for enhanced commissioning services in an amount not to exceed $95,189. The budget for these services was included in the overall cost of construction for the CSB, approved by Council on August 8, 2017 (Attachment A).', 'Background', 'On August 8, 2017, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second contract modification to Agreement #10051 (CCS) with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for a Guaranteed Maximum Price for construction services with a total amount not to exceed $70,600,507 (Attachment A). At the same meeting, Council also adopted a Resolution Authorizing Issuance of Series 2017 Bonds, and approved the related documents required for the Issuance of Lease Revenue Bonds, Series 2017, to finance the City Services Building Project for a maximum principal amount of $76,760,000 (Attachment B).', 'The City Services Building (CSB) Project brings nearly all core municipal operations onto one City Hall campus as envisioned in the Civic Center Specific Plan. The investment in this new building meets three main objectives:', '1. Offers a one-stop hub to better serve the community. The CSB would bring departments and vital public counter functions under one roof to streamline services in one location.', '2. Eliminates all existing city office space leases and consolidates municipal operations onto city-owned land. City Hall was constructed in 1938 and in 79 years, the services that the City provides to the community has expanded and outgrown the historic building. For several decades, city divisions have been spread throughout the downtown, leasing space. With the construction of the City Services Building, the City will eliminate leases saving as much as $10 million annually and bring 240 staff under one roof.', '3. Achieves a strong return on investment for the City both economically and environmentally with a resource efficient structure. The building is a long-term investment that is designed to streamline operational functionality and to be resource efficient. It is a Living Building and will not have a water or electric bill because it will produce the energy and water it consumes on site.', 'Code Requirement', 'The California Building Code requires all buildings over 10,000 square feet perform fundamental commissioning activities. The recommendation of this staff report is to hire a commissioning agent that will perform enhanced commissioning activities above and beyond the baseline requirements of the California Building Code to ensure energy and water savings.', 'Discussion', 'The commissioning process is an integrated set of activities intended to ensure that a project’s energy and water-related systems are coordinated, installed, calibrated and perform as intended. When properly executed, commissioning’s major benefit is energy savings. A Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory study of 643 buildings found that commissioning provided average whole-building energy savings of between 13 and 16 percent. The same study also found that if every non-residential building in the U.S. were properly commissioned, the nation would realize $30 billion in energy savings by 2030. Commissioning services also assess project components related to water, indoor environmental quality and durability.', 'The City Services Building (CSB) construction phase commenced in December 2017, and the project targets Living Building Challenge (LBC) certification. LBC is considered the pinnacle of sustainable design, with net-zero energy (NZE) and net-zero water (NZW) performance required for certification. Unlike Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) certification, the industry standard for sustainable building design, LBC is a performance standard awarded after the building is operational and has demonstrated NZE and NZW through actual utility bills. Designing for performance and auditing the design with enhanced commissioning ensures operational savings promised during design are achieved through the life of the building.', 'The CSB represents best practices in sustainable design and construction for Santa Monica’s Mediterranean climate. The net-zero energy and net-zero water strategies require complex building systems to operate in concert for optimal performance. According to CALGreen, the California Green Building Standards Code (version 2016), new buildings 10,000 square feet and higher shall include commissioning in the design and construction processes of the project to verify that the building systems and components function properly. City Staff is confident in the CSB design but recognize that achieving its performance targets will depend on an effective commissioning process to validate the design, installation and proper functioning of all of the building’s systems.', 'The following building systems will be commissioned for the CSB Project: heating, ventilation and air-conditioning (HVAC); automated operable windows; photovoltaics (PV) systems; sub-metering and data collection; lighting controls; occupant pre-settings and timers; plumbing including heat pumps, potable water treatment system, greywater system and composting toilets. Because of the innovative building systems in the CSB, the City seeks commissioning services to provide fundamental commissioning (as required by CALGreen) as well as the following:', '1. Create an Operations & Maintenance Plan for the building;', '2. Provide ongoing commissioning of energy systems after the building is operational to ensure the Living Building Challenge Net-Zero Energy Certification is met;', '3. Provide enhanced commissioning services including:', 'a. monitoring-based commissioning services to develop procedures and identify points to be measured and evaluated to assess ongoing performance of energy and water systems; and', 'b. building envelope commissioning (the physical separation between the building’s exterior and interior components like the walls, windows, floors and doors) to ensure building enclosures meet requirements for acoustical, structural, thermal, blast resistance, durability and energy and air/waterproofing performance.', 'Commissioning services cannot be provided by the project’s contractor for quality control purposes. The commissioning agent is required to observe the construction process with frequent site visits and inspections. Site visits may be necessary on short notice to keep the project’s construction schedule on track. Ultimately, the commissioning agent will provide all documentation to demonstrate compliance with CALGreen requirements and provide a letter certifying that the commissioning plan was successfully executed. The commissioning report will verify the City’s assumptions about the performance of the building, which the Total Workplace plan of action will reference to ensure a smooth and effective transition for building occupants. Total Workplace is a multi-departmental initiative to ensure City staff are prepared to transition to the new building and offer efficient services to the community. The budget for commissioning services was included in the overall cost of construction for the CSB, approved by Council on August 8, 2017 (Attachment A).', 'Consultant Selection', 'On December 12, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide commissioning services for the City Services Building Construction Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.075(a). Forty-five vendors downloaded the RFP. The following 20 firms responded.', '· Argento / Graham', '· ARUP', '· Capital Engineering', '· CBRE | HEERY', '· Edison Energy', '· Engineering Economics, Inc.', '· Gaia', '· GLUMAC', '· Goss Engineering', '· Green Dinosaur', '· Harrison Thomas Group', '· Humann Building Solutions', '· Kitchell', '· kW Engineering', '· P2S Cx', '· Partner Energy', '· Syska Hennessy Group, Inc.', '· The Cadmus Group', '· TM Cx Solutions, LLC', '· VCA Green', 'Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. The selection panel completed an initial review based on the following criteria: price, previous experience on high performing projects, comparable projects, knowledge of the specific systems proposed on the project, key personnel’s previous experience with the specific systems proposed on the project, quality of work plan, and compliance with City specifications.  The five firms that scored highest in the initial review were then interviewed by the panel.', 'Syska Hennessy Group, Inc. presented a unique understanding of the specific systems proposed on the City Services Building Project and thorough knowledge of LBC Certification. Syska has previous experience with two LBC projects, which is unique since there are only 15 fully certified LBC projects worldwide. They articulated their expert knowledge of natural ventilation systems, composting toilets and rainwater capture and treatment systems. Additionally, with more than 500 professionals across 16 offices offering a full range of engineering services, Syska Hennessy could draw from robust resources and experience to support the CSB commissioning activities. Out of the 20 initial proposals received, Syska Hennessy was the seventh lowest cost. They were the lowest of the five finalists that were interviewed. These costs, which were included in the cost of construction approved by Council, include all four of the additional-alternatives (add-alt) the City requested proposals for. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Syska as the best qualified firm to provide commissioning services for the City Services Building Construction Project.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to Syska Hennessy Group, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $95,189. Funds are available in the FY 2017-2018 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C014083.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2870'}, {'Title': 'Software Subscription Agreement for Learning Content Management System', 'Department': 'Information Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #136 to Cornerstone OnDemand, a California-based company, for the purchase and implementation of a centralized training portal solution, Cornerstone Learning Suite Solution.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Cornerstone OnDemand for software subscription, implementation services, and the purchase of training content and professional services as needed, in an amount not to exceed $ $839,065 (including $15,024 contingency), over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. 3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'All City Departments provide regular staff training, including staff development, safety, regulatory (harassment prevention, drivers’ safety, OSHA, etc.), and peer-to-peer knowledge transfer. Whether formal or informal, each Department currently manages and tracks curriculum in different ways. The City has never implemented a centralized system or process to gauge the effectiveness of such offerings. The purchase and implementation of a Learning Management and Content System (LMS) would bridge this gap. It would foster a more comprehensive approach to staff development, fostering learning communities, promoting staff career paths, providing educational opportunities in various media to more effectively meet staff needs and help them stay current, informed and engaged and support succession planning. Staff recommends executing a five-year contract with a company based in Santa Monica, Cornerstone OnDemand (Cornerstone), for the purchase, training and implementation of their Learning Suite Solution.', "Cornerstone's system is a web-based, feature-rich, collaborative, user-friendly software environment that supports and enhances instructor-led, virtual, and self-paced training. This city-wide portal will enable training, while also capturing data on training performance to achieve insight into City training offerings. The system would be used to administer, document, track, report, schedule, house and deliver training to City staff.", 'In addition, staff is requesting funds to purchase as-needed training content through Cornerstone, as they resell third-party training content at discounted rates. The cost of this purchase, including licensing, training, implementation services, and 10% contingency is an amount not to exceed $439,065, with the additional amount not to exceed $400,000 ($80,000 annually) for optional as-needed training content and professional services for a 5-year grand total not to exceed $839,065. Funding for the original purchase of this system has been earmarked in the Total Workplace budget. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Discussion', 'As the motto for Santa Monica Institute states, we are “The City that Learns.” Santa Monica strives to be a tech-savvy, service-oriented organization with a Governance framework that promises our customers a government that is transparent and trustworthy. To support this customer-service focus, training and education must continue to be a central focus that helps to keep the workforce on top of the knowledge and skills they need to perform with excellence.', 'Staff with a broad set of relevant skills find greater satisfaction from their jobsas they feel more valuable and can utilize a wider skillset. Poorly trained employees have lower levels of engagement, motivation and productivity. While some City staff have always had regulatory, credentialing and legal training requirements, it was only recently that the City formalized staff development course offerings and automated student registration across the organization by means of the Santa Monica Institute (SMI).', 'Since 2014, ISD has been providing online computer training via both web-based content providers and through in-house developed training videos. In 2017, ISD implemented a formalized IT training program and expanded its offerings to include mandatory cyber security awareness training and other in-person and online business software trainings to support city staff in acquiring the skills and knowledge necessary to be a more technology- and business-literate organization.', 'The Big Blue Bus, Fire Department, Risk Management, Human Resources and Library each continue to manage their respective training mandates and offerings via disparate systems.', 'While these Departments all have training in common, there is no central training portal to manage, track, measure effectiveness or promote collaboration among learners, which hinders the cooperative approach that makes our individual and collective business units function efficiently. The purchase and implementation of the Learning Management and Content System (LMS) software from Cornerstone would bridge this gap by enhancing enterprise-wide employee development and compliance training, by creating standardized scheduling, learning communities and implementing one familiar City-wide portal.', 'Cornerstone’s web-based, collaborative, user-friendly software environment supports and enhances instructor-led, virtual, and self-paced training. The system includes authoring tools for online training, and comprehensive reporting, tracking, and analysis by employee, job class, and department. This system would be a single landing place for staff training whether it be Instructor-led or external training curriculum from other training content providers. Simple built-in reporting will provide real time visibility into the City’s compliance requirements by organizational unit and employee, available to management and individual employees. It will also assist in retaining and promoting talented workers, through motivational learning opportunities and comprehensive transcript maintenance.', 'As Departments currently have no formalized system to track and provide existing training, the migration to this LMS will be provide much-needed functionality in the data-driven paradigm the City has created.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In February 2017, ISD issued an Request for Information (RFI) to learn about the different options available in terms LMS product offerings. The results of the RFI informed the development of a Request for Proposals (RFP), which was issued on September 28, 2017. ISD also partnered with various City departments, including Big Blue Bus, Fire Department, Human Resources, Santa Monica Library, and Finance in developing the RFP to ensure that the product selected could meet the City’s collective training needs.', 'The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fifty vendors downloaded the bid and 12 bids were received. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including the proposed software solution, price, references, previous experience, value added-breadth of service, presentation/demonstration of proposed solution, and compliance with City specifications. Cornerstone OnDemand’s product features and user interface best align with the City’s IT needs in terms of an up-to-date, feature-rich, easy to use solution. Cornerstone has vast experience working with municipalities, including City of Los Angeles, Ventura County Fire Department, and Contra Costa County. The 19 year-old company, headquartered in Santa Monica, provides solutions in use by over 35 million people in 192 countries, and in 43 languages.', 'Cornerstone received praise from their references for their feature-rich product, implementation approach, comprehensive knowledge transfer and training approach, and customer service and support. In terms of functionality, the Cornerstone solution has integration with Tyler Munis, the City’s new ERP software currently in implementation, and their solution provides a built-in scheduling component that will enable automated training enrollment. Based on these criteria, Cornerstone is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Cornerstone OnDemand for the licensing, implementation, training services and the purchase of training content is for an amount not to exceed $839,065. Approval of the contract requires the following budget actions:', '1. Release of fund balance in the amount of $165,264 at account 1.380256', '2. Appropriation of $165,264 to account SO015814.589000', "Training content would be charged to various departments' budgets as applicable. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2910'}, {'Title': 'Request for Change Orders with Four Vendors for Fleet Maintenance Goods and Services', 'Department': 'Public Works, Street & Fleet Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a change order for interim funding for the next six months to purchase order #28093-OF in the amount of $31,090 with American Moving Parts, LLC, a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of brake parts, supplies, and service for passenger cars, and light-, medium-, and heavy-duty vehicles, until the goods can be bid. This would result in a revised purchase order total not to exceed $208,127, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a change order for interim funding for the next six months to purchase order #28016-OF in the amount of $26,779 with Battery Power, Inc., a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of vehicle batteries and pickup of battery cores, until the goods can be bid.  This would result in a revised purchase order total not to exceed $182,985, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a change order for interim funding for the next six months to purchase order #28020-OF in the amount of $42,388 with Los Angeles Freightliner, a California-based company, to furnish and deliver OEM Crane Carrier brand parts, until the goods can be bid. This would result in a revised purchase order total not to exceed $207,227, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a change order for interim funding for the next six months to purchase order #28024-OF in the amount of $63,858 with Natural Gas Systems, Inc., a California-based company, to furnish all labor, parts, materials, equipment, and supervision necessary to provide maintenance and repair services for the natural gas station at the City Yards facility, until the goods can be bid. This would result in a revised purchase order total amount not to exceed $233,878 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff is requesting change orders for interim funding for the next six months until the goods and services currently provided by American Moving Parts, LLC, Battery Power, Inc., Los Angeles Freightliner, and Natural Gas Systems can be formally bid. Due to staff turnover and vacancies, Fleet Management was not able to address these bids prior to their expiration dates. Modifying the purchase orders to provide interim funding for six months would allow Fleet Management to bid out the goods and services used in the maintenance and repair of City vehicles, and the CNG fueling stations at the City Yards facility, while maintaining adherence to City purchasing policies. Staff recommends that the City Council approve change orders for American Moving Parts, LLC, Battery Power, Inc., Los Angeles Freightliner, and Natural Gas Systems to provide interim funding for a six-month period. This would result in a cumulative, modified purchase order amount not to exceed $164,115, with a new total amount not to exceed $832,217, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Background', 'Fleet Management is responsible for ensuring that the City’s diverse fleet of vehicles and other automotive-related equipment, such as power washers and generators, and fueling infrastructure are available, dependable, meet the highest environmental standards for a sustainable fleet, and are safe to operate from acquisition through disposal. Fleet Management attempts to balance maintenance costs, while ensuring vehicle and fueling infrastructure reliability. The vendors American Moving Parts, LLC, Battery Power, Inc., Los Angeles Freightliner, and Natural Gas Systems, were awarded informal bids based on the City’s purchasing guidelines. Battery Power, Inc.’s bid expired in September 2017, and American Moving Parts and Natural Gas System’s bid expired in October 2017. Due to staff turnover and vacancies, Fleet Management was not able to get these goods and services out to bid prior to their purchase order expiration dates. The vendors are willing to continue providing the goods and services to the City until formal bids can be completed. Although Los Angeles Freightliner’s bid does not expire until November 2018, it is anticipated that expenditures exceeding the informal bid limit of $175,000 will occur with all four vendors prior to the completion of formal bid processes. The following table summarizes the new current not to exceed amount for each vendor to cover the next six months until the bid process can be completed:', 'Vendor Name', 'Original Bid Term Dates', 'Current Amount Spent', 'Amount Requested', 'Total Amount not to Exceed', 'American Moving Parts, LLC', '10/13/2014 – 10/12/2017', '$177,037', '$31,090', '$208,127', 'Battery Power, Inc.', '09/04/2014 – 09/03/2017', '$156,206', '$26,779', '$182,985', 'Los Angeles Freightliner', '11/10/2015 – 11/09/2018', '$164,839', '$42,388', '$207,227', 'Natural Gas Systems', '10/09/2014 – 10/08/2017', '$170,020', '$63,858', '$233,878', 'Total:', '$668,102', '$164,115', '$832,217', 'Discussion', 'The goods and/or services provided by American Moving Parts, LLC, Battery Power, Inc., Los Angeles Freightliner, and Natural Gas Systems are purchased to ensure that the current fleet of vehicles and fueling infrastructure at the City Yards facility can be maintained based on safety and manufacturer standards. Each of the following vendors has agreed to extend the supply of goods and services provided until formal bids can be completed.', 'American Moving Parts, LLC', 'American Moving Parts furnishes Fleet Management with all labor, materials, equipment, and supervision necessary to provide brake supplies and off-site services for passenger cars, as well as light- and heavy-duty trucks. Pricing is in accordance with quote #46708-OG, dated October 13, 2014. The vendor has agreed to extend the purchase order on the same terms and conditions, with a 5% price increase. The change order for interim funding would result in a new total purchase order amount with American Moving Parts, LLC, based in Los Angeles, California, not to exceed $208,127.', 'Battery Power, Inc.', 'Battery Power, Inc. furnishes and delivers vehicle batteries and picks up used battery cores as required by Fleet Management. Pricing is in accordance with quote #46699-OG, dated September 4, 2014. The vendor has agreed to extend the purchase order at the same price, terms, and conditions. The change order for interim funding would result in a new total purchase order amount with Battery Power, Inc., based in San Fernando, California, not exceed $182,985.', 'Los Angeles Freightliner', 'Los Angeles Freightliner furnishes and delivers OEM Crane Carrier parts as required by Fleet Management. Pricing is in accordance with quote #49943-OG dated November 10, 2015. The Resource Recovery and Recycling Division operates more than 30 refuse trucks that require OEM Crane Carrier brand parts. The vendor has agreed to extend the purchase order with the same price, terms and conditions. The change order for interim funding would result in a new total purchase order amount with Los Angeles Freightliner, based in Whittier, California, not to exceed $207,227.', 'Natural Gas Systems', 'Natural Gas Systems furnishes all labor, materials, equipment, and supervision necessary to provide maintenance and repair services for the CNG fueling station at the City Yard Fleet and Water Division locations. Pricing is in accordance with quote #46750-OG, dated October 9, 2014. The vendor has agreed to extend the purchase order at the same price, terms, and conditions as in the previous years. The change order for interim funding would result in a new total purchase order amount with Natural Gas Systems, based in Corona Del Mar, California, not exceed $233,878.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'The items and services noted above were already informally, competitively bid by the City of Santa Monica. Staff is requesting authorization for change orders for interim funding for six months, until formal bid processes can be completed.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The change orders for interim funding coverage are summarized below:', 'Vendor', 'Change Order Amount', 'Amended Not-to-Exceed Amount', 'Account numbers to Charge', 'American Moving Parts, LLC', '$31,090', '$208,127', '54459.522990', 'Battery Power, Inc.', '$26,779', '$182,985', '54459.522990', 'Los Angeles Freightliner', '$42,388', '$207,227', '54459.522990', '54459.522991', '54459.522920', 'Natural Gas Systems', '$63,858', '$233,878', '54459.533123', '54459.533126', 'Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Public Works Department.', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2919'}, {'Title': 'Agreement for Purchase of Ruckus Network Equipment and Site Assessment and Installation Services', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Infrastructure and Cloud Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid#4310 to SmartWAVE Technologies LLC (SmartWAVE), a Georgia -based company, for the purchase of Ruckus network equipment and site assessment and installation services; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with SmartWAVE for the purchase of Ruckus network equipment, site assessment and installation services in an amount not to exceed $868,000, including a $87,000 contingency, over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'City Wi-Fi connects over 13,000 members of the public to the internet daily at speeds of 8 megabits per second upload and download. The existing equipment is now over 10 years old, is beginning to fail, and does not meet current industry standards. It is necessary to replace the aging equipment and expand Wi-Fi coverage. Staff seeks to engage the services ofSmartWAVE, a wireless systems integrator, to conduct wireless site surveys and analysis to determine the areas and locations where equipment is installed, but coverage is deficient or absent altogether, as well as to design a strategic deployment plan to optimize City Wi-Fi coverage. At this time, staff seeks approval to enter into a five-year contractual services agreement withSmarWAVEfor siteassessment and installation services in amount not to exceed $299,000 and issue a Purchase Order for the purchase of Ruckus wireless equipment, as needed, for a period of five years in an amount not to exceed $569,000.', 'Background', 'The City first launched City Wi-Fi service in 2005 at Virginia Avenue Park, 3rd St Promenade and the Main Library. There are now over 350wireless access points that provide free Wi-Fi service tothe Cityparks, open spaces, facilities, entertainment venues and 19 commercial and transit arterials.', 'The number of users and devices connecting to City Wi-Fi has increased substantially in the last five years and continues to grow, primarily due to the proliferation of smart phones and other wireless devices, and the shift to mobile-centric computing.', 'As part of the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program Budget adoption, Council appropriated funding to establish an ongoing replacement program. That year, as part of the initial rollout of the project, staff replaced critical network infrastructure to improve system reliability and increase capacity. This year, staff will begin replacing wireless equipment installed at various City locations, as well as install new equipment to expand Wi-Ficapacity andcoverage.', 'Discussion', 'To move forward with this project, staff seeks to engage the services ofSmartWAVE, a wireless systems integrator, to conduct comprehensive wireless site surveys and analysis to determine the areas and locations where equipment is installed but coverage is deficient or absent altogether. Through this analysis,SmartWAVEwill also design a strategic deployment plan to optimize City Wi-Fi coverage by replacing equipment in existing locations throughout the City, as well newpubliclocations where coverage has never existed. This project will be paid for by approved CIP funding from the City Wi-Fi Replacement Program.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'After completing technical evaluation of wireless network equipment from various manufacturers, including Cisco, HP Aruba, Ruckus and others, staff selected Ruckus equipment as the Standard for City Wi-Fi due to the technology which performed better in high density environments such as 3rd Street Promenade and the Pier, esthetics and the small form-factor of the equipment that blends in nicely with the street lights and traffic poles, and the price point which was approximately 50% of the cost of competitors. On December 12, 2017, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids for the purchase of Ruckus network equipment and site assessment and installation services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press, in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 27 vendors downloaded the bid and one bid was received before the bid close date of January 3, 2018. The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Because only one bid was received, Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to find out why they did not submit a bid; 10 no bidders responded providing various reasons, including not being a reseller of Ruckus products, not being able to meet the reseller certification/partnership level specified in the bid, and not being able to offer competitive pricing due to the discounted pricing that was extended to them by the equipment manufacturer. The bid submitted bySmartWAVEaddressed all requirements of the bid.SmartWAVEhas the highest-level services certification from the equipment manufacturer, Ruckus.SmartWAVEhas experience with similar projects for other public agencies, including City of San Jose, City of Mountain View, City of West Hollywood, and various other municipalities. The references provided bySmartWAVEfor City of San Jose and City of Mountain View indicated it provided outstanding service.SmartWAVEhas also provided outstanding service on previous City of Santa Monica projects. SmartWAVE has committed to extending the City of Santa Monica fixed pricing on all Ruckus equipment purchased for the next five years. In sum,SmartWAVEmet all the requirements defined in the bid. Based on these criteria, staff recommendsSmartWAVE as the best bidderto provide network equipment and site assessment and installation services.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract and purchase order to be awarded toSmartWAVETechnologies LLC is for a total not to exceed is $868,000. Funds in the amount of $218,000 are included in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019158.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2927'}, {'Title': 'Tire Lease and Related Onsite Tire Services', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4294 to Michelin North America, Inc., a South Carolina-based company, for the lease of new transit tires and related services;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Michelin North America Inc., in an amount not to exceed $2,635,171, including a $239,561 contingency for a five-period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends the award of Bid #4294 to Michelin North America Inc. to provide new transit tires and related services on a tire lease program. Big Blue Bus operates a fleet of 200 transit buses, with six to ten tires on each bus. BBB transit buses run approximately 6 million miles per year, and billing for transit bus tires is on a per-mile basis. The agreement includes the lease of transit tires on a flat rate per-mile-driven basis plus the cost of services including inspection, repair and replacement, and inventory control. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $2,635,171, which includes a 10% contingency, over a five-year term.', 'Background', 'Tire leasing has been a standard practice in the transit industry since the 1940’s and a common practice at Big Blue Bus (BBB) for the last 45 years. Leasing tires is more economical than purchasing because it is based on cost per mile-driven rather than purchasing individual tires. The service ensures that new tires are available at all times, and that any necessary repairs or replacements can be made in a timely manner.', 'On November 13, 2012, Council awarded bid #4022 to Michelin North America Inc. for an amount not to exceed $3,432,462 over a five-year period, including a one-time payment to the previous tire lease provider of $390,000. This one-time payment was authorized to purchase the previous vendor’s existing inventory as part of the transition to the new vendor.', 'BBB’s latest agreement expired on November 12, 2017, requiring BBB to solicit bids for tire leasing services for its fleet of transit buses.  An interim purchase order was approved under the City Manager’s authority for services performed while the bidding process was ongoing.', 'Discussion', 'Big Blue Bus currently leases bus tires from Michelin North America, Inc. The existing lease provides tire inventory, including spare stock on a replacement basis, and two full-time on-site service attendants who perform inspections, tire repair, and replacement. Tires are individually branded prior to delivery for inventory control purposes. Tire rates are fixed and BBB only pays for the miles the tire actually travels. The award amount is based on estimated miles traveled per year (6 million miles) plus a 10% contingency for unforeseen charges such as tire damage due to accidents or curb damage, increased miles traveled and new bus purchases. The award of this bid would enable BBB to maintain its current fleet of transit buses in safe operating condition through the timely and efficient repair or replacement of damaged or worn-out tires.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014, staff was directed by Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” seven criteria were established to determine proper use of contracted staff. Of these, “Workforce Flexibility” and “Capital/Equipment Requirements” are relevant to BBB’s decision to contract the services related to tire lease and replacement.', 'Bid #4294 requires that the vendor provide all necessary tooling and equipment to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment. In addition to cost savings, the tire repair and replacement service requires a large employee pool that would be available to work day and night to ensure that buses are available for service. The added costs associated with bringing this service in-house would be $1,947,888 to the contracted amount over a five-year period.', 'Based on the criteria outlined in the January 13, 2015 staff report, and the added costs associated with bringing this service in-house, staff recommends that Council award bid #4294 to Michelin North America Inc. for tire lease and related services. The total expense for the five-year term is not to exceed $2,635,171.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On December 12, 2017 the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide tire lease and related services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirteen (13) vendors downloaded the bid. We received and publicly opened on February 7, 2018 one proposal from Michelin North America Inc.', 'Cost Estimate', 'Michelin North America Inc.', 'Estimate 5-year Period', '$ 2,395,610', '10% Contingency', '$ 239,561', 'Contract 5yr Total', '$ 2,635,171', 'The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a proposal. One prospective bidder responded that they could not bid as they were unable to comply with the domestic partner provision to the living wage ordinance. Michelin has had a positive history of providing tire lease and related services for Big Blue Bus and is able to meet all of the City’s requirements. In addition, the bid cost has decreased from the previous contract cost. Based on these criteria, Michelin North America, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Michelin North America Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $2,635,171 including a 5% annual price increase and a 10% contingency. Funds of $437,230 are available in the FY17-18 Capital Improvement Program. This contract will be charged to account C410106.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2930'}, {'Title': 'Adoption of Resolution Authorizing Application for Grant Funds from the State of California Natural Resources Agency', 'Department': 'Strategic Planning (PCD)', 'Sponsors': 'Director Susan Cline', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Adopt the resolution (Attachment A) authorizing the application for grant funds in the amount of $1,477,809 from the California Natural Resources Agencyto fund implementation of the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Plan Streetscape Improvements;and2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to apply for the grant, accept the grant, if awarded, and accept all grant renewals, if awarded.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'This report seeks authorization to submit an application to the California Natural Resources Agency Urban Greening program for an amount not to exceed $1,477,809 to fund implementation of the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Plan Streetscape (LiNC), which was approved by Council on April 25, 2017 (Attachment B). The grant funds may be used for a variety of landscaping, pedestrian safety and mobility-related capital enhancement projects that are included in the LiNC design. Adoption of the attached resolution is a requirement of the grant program for eligibility to receive Urban Greening funds allocation for Fiscal Year (FY) 2019-20.', 'Discussion', 'The Urban Greening Program funds projects that reduce greenhouse gases, decrease energy consumption and reduce vehicle miles traveled, while also transforming the built environment into places that are more sustainable, enjoyable, and effective in creating healthy and vibrant communities. The Urban Greening Program is funded by the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund (GGRF), which allocated $26 million to the Natural Resources Agency in 2016 to fund the planning and implementation of green infrastructure projects.', 'The recently approved LiNC Streetscape was awarded CIP funding of $2.9M for FY17/18 to implement a discrete phase of work targeting connections across the boulevard, which includes preparing the necessary construction documentation. Additional funding is required to realize the other elements of the concept design, including the provision for additional landscaped medians and landscaping, ADA compliant curb ramps, and green infrastructure low-impact development facilities. If awarded, the grant would fund a portion of additional funds needed with remaining funds requested through CIP, or other grant opportunities as presented. The LiNC is an eligible project under the guidelines of the Urban Greening Grant program.', 'It is expected that grant awards will be announced by June 2018 and, pursuant to the grant guidelines, funds must be expended within three years of the award.Based upon a preliminary analysis of the eligible project elements such as additional landscaped medians, ADA ramps, and bioswales and rain gardens, staff estimates that the Urban Greening funds would expedite the build-out of most of the LiNC streetscape by several years, excluding the most costly components such as new pedestrian street-lighting, which staff anticipates funding through future grant opportunities. Without the grant funds, completion of the project would otherwise be subject to future budget requests.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The total amount of grant funds requested from the California Natural Resources Agency is $1,477,809. If awarded, expenditure and revenue budgets will be established. The grant requires no local match; however, the City’s application will leverage committed resources, including the implementation of the peak-hour dedicated bus lane, and the FY17/18 CIP award of $2.9 million for Phase 1 implementation,as well as in-kind staff time.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2950'}, {'Title': 'Award Construction Contract for Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Repair', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2528 to John S. Meek Company, Inc., a California-based company, for the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Repair Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with John S. Meek Company, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including a 11% contingency);3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project would consist of the removal and replacement of the existing Harbor Patrol boat hoist and crane, and the design and construction of a new steel catwalk on the southwest end of the Santa Monica Municipal Pier. These improvements are necessary due to the facilities’ nearing the end of their useful life and to adequately maintain existing Santa Monica Police Department Harbor Patrol operations, facilities, infrastructure and equipment. The hoist and crane are primarily used to lift or lower the Harbor Services Unit’s dinghy boat from or onto the water. The catwalk is used for docking, boarding and disembarking the Santa Monica Police Department Harbor Patrol boat. Staff recommends John S. Meek Company, Inc. to construct these improvements in an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including an 11% contingency).', 'Background', 'The Pier’s boat hoist and crane and appurtenant catwalk is located on the southwest corner of the Pier and is used by the Pier and Harbor Services Unit of the Santa Monica Police Department (Harbor Patrol) to launch and load their boat. The Harbor Patrol watches over the seaward area around the Pier and performs sea rescues in the Santa Monica Bay when necessary. The hoist and crane are primarily used to lift or lower the Harbor Services Unit’s dinghy boat from or onto the water as operations require. The catwalk serves as a dock for the Harbor Patrol boat, and also supports Pier maintenance staff with access to areas beneath the Pier.', 'Discussion', 'The boat hoist and crane, and appurtenant catwalk are nearing the end of their useful life and must be removed and replaced with new infrastructure. The boat hoist and crane are experiencing electrical, mechanical and structural issues that limit their functional capabilities. Issues include rusted machinery, electrical malfunctions, and structural deterioration. The steel catwalk has deteriorated, with localized material failure and rusting, and is also in need of removal and replacement.', 'Contractor Selection – Construction', 'On November 6, 2017, the City issued a Notice Inviting Bids for the construction of the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-two vendors downloaded the bid, and on December 6, 2017, one bid was received and publicly opened.', 'Engineer’s Estimate: $226,950', 'The difference between the bid amount and engineer’s estimate is attributable to an underestimation in mobilization for marine work, catwalk design cost, and overall labor for marine construction. The engineer’s estimate was also based on an older crane quotation and excluded costs for demolition and electrical work.', 'The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. John S. Meek Company, Inc. has completed many repair projects for the City at the Santa Monica Pier, including wood deck replacements, various concrete repairs, timber and concrete pile repairs, and full section repairs. John S. Meek Company, Inc. has also completed similar Pier projects for the cities of Long Beach and Redondo Beach. Staff contacted references listed in the bid package, and all respondents reported that work performed by John S. Meek Company, Inc. was completed within project requirements. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that John S. Meek Company, Inc.’s license is current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, John S. Meek Company, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder for the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project.', 'Construction Management', "Construction management and public outreach for this project would be provided by City staff. Construction management would include inspecting the contractor's work during construction, verifying and documenting field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts as a result of the construction activities, attending the contractor's safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings and maintaining all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work conducted during construction.", 'Public Outreach', 'In March and April 2017, Engineering staff met with the Pier Management staff, Pier businesses, Pier Corporation staff and the Pier Board about upcoming Pier projects that included this project. Staff would reengage to communicate with Pier tenants regarding all pre-construction public outreach while fostering open lines of communication and responding to the day-to-day concerns of the residents, visitors and local businesses.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The project is categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15301(c) and Section 15302 of the CEQA Guidelines. Class 1 exempt projects include the "operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination." Class 2 exempt projects include the “replacement or reconstruction of existing structures and facilities where the new structure would be located on the same site as the structure replaced and would have substantially the same purpose and capacity as the structure replaced.” The project qualifies as a Class 1 and Class 2 project exempt from CEQA. Therefore, this project is categorically exempt from CEQA.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to John S. Meek Company, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including an 11% contingency). Additional funds in the amount of $10,000 is also needed for administrative and prevailing wage costs. Funds of $100,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C309202.589000. Award of the contract requires a budget transfer of $250,000 from account S010300.589000 to account C019202.589000 and appropriation of an additional $160,000 from the Pier fund to account C309202.589000'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '3003'}], [{'Title': 'Second Reading and Adoption of Interim Zoning Ordinance Extending Interim Zoning Ordinance Number 2569 (CCS) Which Amended Portions of Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.07.030 to Revise Development Standards for Maximum Parcel Coverage, Maximum Building Height, Additional Minimum Stepbacks for Upper Stories, Limitations on Aggregate Floor Area for Upper-Story Decks and Balconies, and Exclusion of Certain Accessory Dwelling Units from Parcel Coverage in the R1 Single-Unit Residential District', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council adopt an Interim Zoning Ordinance Extending Interim Zoning Ordinance Number 2569 (CCS)', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'At its meeting of March 27, 2018, the City Council introduced for first reading an interim zoning ordinance extending Interim Zoning Ordinance Number 2569 (CCS) which amended portions of Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.07.030 to revise development standards for maximum parcel coverage, maximum building height, additional minimum stepbacks for upper stories, limitations on aggregate floor area for upper-story decks and balconies, and exclusion of certain accessory dwelling units form parcel coverage in the R1 Single-Unit Residential District.', 'The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '3008'}], [{'Title': 'Master Facility Use Agreements with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District', 'Department': 'Community & Cultural Services', 'Sponsors': 'Director Gigi Decavalles-Hughes', 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Master Facilities Use Agreement combining the two tax measures (YY and GS) into a single agreement (Measure YY/GS Facilities Agreement) including related supplemental terms and conditions with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District with an initial term ending June 30, 2028.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Over the years, the City of Santa Monica has built a positive and collaborative partnership with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District. The City has supported exceptional educational, cultural and recreational achievements at our schools. At the same time, the School District has supported the City’s residents by maintaining high caliber classroom education as well as facilities used by students and residents alike.  This relationship is codified in a Master Facilities Use Agreement, which terminates on June 30, 2022, and related supplemental agreements, which terminate on June 30, 2018. The agreements allow community members to use District facilities at the elementary, middle, and high schools in Santa Monica during non-school hours for recreation and sports purposes. At this time, the City and the District desire to amend the supplemental agreements for the middle schools, CREST and playground partnership to reflect current practices, to allow for unsupervised general use of the middle school fields by the community and to extend the term of the supplemental agreements to coincide with the term of the Master Facilities Use Agreement.', 'In 2010 and 2016, the voters passed local tax increases with accompanying advisory measures recommending that portions of the revenues be dedicated to improving and maintaining school facilities and support school programs. In keeping with the intent expressed by the voters, staff is recommending that Council authorize the City Manager to enter into a new agreement to combine terms and conditions for the allocation of the revenues from the two recent tax measures (YY and GS) into a single agreement with supplemental agreements covering with the recreational use of Santa Monica High School and memorializing the City’s and the District’s mutual understanding pertaining to community use of Los Amigos Park (Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement). The new agreement would supersede the existing Samohi Master Facilities Use Agreement and the Samohi Supplemental Use Agreement in their entirety.', 'Pursuant to the agreements, the City anticipates that it will pay the School District a total of $25,127,020 in FY 2017-18.', 'Background', 'In 2005, the Council approved an initial Master Facilities Use Agreement and related supplemental agreements with the SMMUSD. The Agreement provides unrestricted revenue from the General Fund to the District in return for community use of District facilities, including elementary and middle school playfields, recreational facilities and buildings under-utilized during non-school hours. In April 2009, Council approved exercise of the first renewal option by amending and extending the Agreement by three years, through April 2012.  In May 2012, Council approved entering into a new Master Facilities Use Agreement and related supplemental agreements for an initial term of 10 years (through June 30, 2022) with an option to extend for an additional five years to June 30, 2027.', 'Measure Y and Measure YY were approved by Santa Monica voters in November 2010. Measure Y established a half percent transaction and use tax and advisory Measure YY recommended that half of the transaction and use tax revenue be used to support school, educational and after-school programs. Following voter approval of these measures, in May 2011, Council approved entering into a Samohi Master Facilities Use Agreement and supplemental program agreement with SMMUSD to allow the City and community to utilize facilities at Santa Monica High School (Samohi) when school is not in session and in return receive an annual amount from the City’s General Fund equivalent to one half of the revenue received by the City from the transaction and use tax, thereby effectuating the will of the voters. The 10-year initial term expires on June 30, 2021 and may be extended for additional 10-year terms by mutual agreement and consistent with the Master Facilities Use Agreement.', 'Measures GSH and GS were approved by the Santa Monica voters in November 2016. Measure GSH established another half percent transaction and use tax; advisory Measure GS recommended that half of the transaction and use tax revenue be used to improve and maintain Santa Monica’s public schools and support educational and afterschool programs at the District’s facilities in Santa Monica.', 'Discussion', 'District and City staff recently met to discuss the longstanding practice of community use of the District-owned Los Amigos Park site during non-school hours and determined that it would be prudent to document this mutually agreed upon practice within the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement intended to effectuate the will of the voters as expressed in advisory Measure GS to devote half of the additional sales tax collected to public school education. Additionally, with the incorporation of sports lights and synthetic turf at Lincoln Middle School under construction, District and City staff identified opportunities to modify the existing supplemental agreements to the Master Facilities Use Agreement relating to the Lincoln and John Adams Middle Schools in order to carve out time at these schools for general unsupervised recreational opportunities, similar to the model used for Samohi. Staff also determined that it would be prudent to make minor modifications to the supplemental agreements for CREST and Playground Partnership to reflect current practices. The resulting Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement would retain the majority of the provisions in the existing Samohi Master Facilities Agreement with the following modifications and additions:', 'Term of Agreement: As noted above, the current term for the Samohi Master Facilities Agreement expires on June 30, 2021 with an option to extend for additional 10 year terms. It is recommended that this term be amended in the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement to expire on June 30, 2028 with an option to extend for additional 10 year terms by mutual agreement between the City and District. It is also recommended that the term for the supplemental agreements for Lincoln and John Adams Middle Schools, CREST and Playground Partnership be amended to mirror the term of the Master Facilities Use Agreement (through June 30, 2022 with an option to extend for an additional five years to June 30, 2027).', 'SMMUSD Unification: The SMMUSD Board of Education is currently reviewing the request of the Malibu community to separate from the district and create a Malibu Unified School District (also officially referred to as “unification”). While it is unknown at this time whether unification will occur, it is recommended that a provision be included in the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement to clarify that if SMMUSD were to split into two districts, the funding provided through Measures YY and GS would reside with the entity with jurisdiction over Santa Monica High School and Los Amigos Park as the sole successor in interest to the rights and obligations of the District under the Agreement.', 'Force Majeure: Both District and City staff recommend that a “Force Majeure” provision be added to the Agreement to address obligations of each party should there ever be a major, unanticipated natural or human-caused disaster.', 'Supplemental Agreements:  The following elements would be addressed in the revised supplemental agreements for Lincoln and John Adams Middles Schools, CREST,  Playground Partnership and Samohi as well as in the Supplemental Agreement for Los Amigos Park:', '· facility use plans to address permit group and general community use of the sites during non-school hours;', '· staffing at the sites by District or City staff as determined by the particular site needs;', '· permit fee collection;', '· documentation of permits issued; and', '· details regarding custodial services and maintenance needs.', 'In keeping with established practice, Supplemental Agreements would be reviewed periodically by operational staff from each entity and may be revised without governing board approvals so long as they are only related to e practical and operational changes.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The City’s projection for half of the combined (Measure YY and GS) one percent transaction and use tax is $16,100,000 (Account 01274.566810), although the final amount is based on actual transaction and use tax revenue received over the year. While the City has not yet paid the District the amount equal to one half the revenue received for Measure GS to date, that amount, totaling $5,650,681 as of 2/28/18 has been set aside in the General Fund reserve in anticipation of the executed agreement between the City and the District. Disbursements will be made once the City Council and Board of Education have approved and executed the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '3005'}, {'Title': 'Annual Review of Development Agreement Compliance', 'Department': 'Development Review 3', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review the status of Development Agreement compliance; and2. Determine good faith compliance for those that are in compliance and listed as such in Table 1.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Many major Santa Monica projects in recent years have been entitled with Development Agreements that set forth terms and conditions of approval. This report provides an annual summary of the status of compliance for each of the 33 Development Agreements that are currently in effect and subject to annual compliance report submittals. Council last reviewed the status of Development Agreement compliance at its March 7, 2017 meeting.  Since the passage of an ordinance establishing the City’s Development Agreement framework in 1982, 33 Development Agreements have been enacted that are still in effect:', 'Project Status', 'Count', 'Completed', '23', 'Under Construction', '5', 'Not Commenced', '5', 'TOTAL', '33', 'This includes two projects approved since Council’s last annual review of Development Agreement compliance: 1325 6th Street and 1430 Lincoln Boulevard. Based on staff’s review of each of the 28 projects already built or under construction, staff recommends Council determine that all of these agreements are in good faith compliance with requirements specified for each property. A summary of the 33 projects is below in Table 1.', 'Newer Development Agreements typically carry requirements for reducing traffic generated by the projects. While defined as being in good faith compliance, this report also summarizes staff’s work with three other properties that are, consistent with development agreement requirements, implementing additional transportation demand management measures to achieve the numeric peak-hour Average Vehicle Ridership (AVR) targets identified in each Agreement. These three properties are Colorado Center, Providence Saint John’s Health Center, and Saint Monica’s Catholic Community. For each of these three Agreements, the AVR targets are structured as goals and not requirements. More specifically, the owner’s inability to achieve the AVR target for the peak periods doesl not constitute a default within the meaning of the Agreement, provided that the owner is taking all reasonable and feasible steps to achieve compliance, including implementing additional single-occupancy trip reduction measures as specified by the City.', 'Background', 'Chapter 9.60 of the Municipal Code establishes the processes and requirements for the City to enter into a Development Agreement. One of the provisions is annual review by the City Council of each approved Development Agreement to determine good faith compliance with the terms and conditions of the Agreements. In accordance with the Municipal Code statute governing Development Agreements, the applicant or successor must demonstrate good faith compliance with the terms of the Agreement.  The term “good faith compliance” generally means: (a) compliance by Developer with the requirements of existing regulations, except as otherwise modified by the Development Agreement; and (b) compliance by Developer with the terms and conditions of the Development Agreement, subject to the existence of any specified excusable delays (as defined in the Development Agreement) which prevented or delayed the timely performance by Developer of any of its obligations under the Development Agreement.  If, as a result of the periodic review, the City Council finds and determines, on the basis of substantial evidence, that the applicant or successor hasn’t complied in good faith with the terms or conditions of the agreement, the City Council may commence proceedings to enforce, modify, or terminate the Development Agreement.', 'Each Development Agreement contains unique time frames, obligations, and requirements. The obligations can be one-time or ongoing; some are fees, some are actual physical improvements, and some are ongoing services.', 'Planning staff works closely with other City departments and divisions to confirm compliance with agreement terms that fit within those departments’ areas of expertise. For example, Housing and Economic Development performs the annual compliance review of affordable housing obligations in Agreements, while Community and Cultural Services performs the review of child care program obligations.', 'Early Development Agreements Not Subject to Monitoring', 'As explained in compliance reports submitted to Council in 2010-2017, there are five very early Development Agreements that are not subject to ongoing monitoring:', '· Lincoln Property/Phase II of the Ocean Park Redevelopment Area', '· 1426 California Avenue', '· 2823-2825 Santa Monica Boulevard', '· 1040 4th Street (Dorchester)', '· 701 Santa Monica Boulevard', 'In general, these early Development Agreements required certain street improvements and, in some cases, the payment of fees. For example, the Agreement for 701 Santa Monica Boulevard required the payment of an Arts and Social Service Fee and an In-Lieu Housing Fee. Such fee obligations were satisfied when the projects were completed. Thus, compliance and monitoring have not, in general, been an issue.', 'The Dorchester at 1040 4th Street, which was one of the City’s earliest efforts to create affordable housing, is the only project in the City that includes affordable units that are condominiums, instead of apartments. The model proved to be problematic in several ways. There were problems with recordation and notification of the affordability requirement. Some of the unit owners purchased intending to live there themselves or house a family member. Many purchased with arguably insufficient notice of the restrictions. Most had no experience in property management, much less the management and financing of a lone affordable unit. For the Housing Division’s monitoring period in 2017, of the fifteen units, ten of the owners filed compliance reports pursuant to the Development Agreement. Four of the unaccounted units are part of settlement agreements with the City, and the matter of the remaining unit has been referred to the City Attorney’s Office.', 'Discussion', 'As a result of staff’s review of all 33 Development Agreements subject to compliance reporting, staff has determined that all 23 constructed projects and all five under-construction projects are in good faith compliance. The remaining five Development Agreements do not require monitoring. Attachment A summarizes all Agreements where annual compliance reports are required and have been submitted for the current review period, and provides a brief status update on the projects under construction and those properties where construction has not yet commenced. As summarized below and detailed more fully in Attachment A, the three properties that are working to increase the their AVR results have implemented TDM plans during the annual reporting cycle and will be required to implement additional measures to reduce SOV trips and also focus on improving survey methodology to increase the accuracy of the annual AVR data collected to better reflect the full range of employee commute trips associated with each property.', 'Colorado Center management collects survey data from its tenants from both large and small employers to determine its site-wide average vehicle ridership during the AM and PM peak periods. This expanded survey effort includes employers with more than 50 employees, as well as employers with fewer than 50 employees; the latter are not currently required to perform employee trip surveys per the City’s Trip Reduction Ordinance. Colorado Center’s AVR target is 1.5 during both the AM and PM peak periods. The property achieved a 1.40 AVR during the AM peak period (an increase over the 1.37 AVR reported in 2016) and a 1.42 AVR during the PM peak period (an increase over the 1.36 AVR reported in 2016). As detailed more fully on pages 1-4 of Attachment A, Colorado Center will be required to implement measures focused on restructuring its carpool incentive program, and continuing full implementation of its Evolve Your Commute marketing and incentive program for the property. Colorado Center management will also be required to work with tenants’ Employee Transportation Coordinators to quantify the SOV trip reduction necessary for each employer and to structure tenant-specific incentives to achieve the site-wide AVR peak period targets.', 'Providence Saint John’s Health Center has a 1.6 AVR target for the AM and PM peak periods. The Health Center reported a 1.5 AVR for the AM peak period and a 1.39 AVR for the PM peak period. Subsequent to submittal of the AVR data, the Health Center provided documentation that the employee assumption for the PM peak period was inaccurate and that, with the adjustment for the inaccurate employee count, the Health Center’s PM peak period AVR is 1.51. As detailed more fully on pages 9-16 of Attachment A, the Health Center’s 2017 AVR survey documented that approximately 55 more caregivers took the bus, biked, walked, or carpooled in the PM peak period compared to 2016. Providence Saint John’s Health Center will be required to continue implementation of all its previously approved Green Commute Program enhancements and work with City staff to make improvements to the facility’s survey methodology to increase the accuracy of its annual AVR data collection. This increase in accuracy will serve to better-reflect the full range of employee commute trips associated with the facility’s 24 hour a day/7 days a week operations and provide a clearer baseline to establish program incentives for employees.', 'The Development Agreement for Saint Monica’s Catholic Community specifies a 1.5 AVR for the AM and PM peak periods. Saint Monica’s reported a 1.44 AM AVR and a 1.38 PM AVR with an 88% survey response rate in the AM and 87% in the PM. City staff believes that, if a 90% response rate had been achieved (three more AM surveys and four more PM surveys), Saint Monica’s would have been much closer to their target of a 1.5 AVR. As detailed more fully on pages 19-20 of Attachment A, staff is scheduling a meeting with Saint Monica’s to discuss compliance, including ways to garner a higher survey response rate to ensure that additional trip reduction measures are responsive to the full range of employee commutes.', 'Attachments B and C also provide a summary of TDM program measures that have been incorporated in newly-approved or amended Development Agreements since 2010 in conjunction with the City’s Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) implementation.', 'Development Agreements (33)', 'Recommended Finding:', 'Good Faith Compliance', 'Completed Projects', '(23)', 'Recommended Finding:', 'Not in', 'Good Faith Compliance', 'Completed Projects', '(0)', 'Recommended Finding:', 'Good Faith Compliance', 'Under Construction', '(5)', 'Construction Has Not Commenced', '(5)', '2401-2525 Colorado Avenue - Colorado Place II & II (Colorado Center) (1981)', '•', '1541 Ocean Ave - Paseo Del Mar (1982)', '•', '2700 Colorado Ave - National Medical Enterprise (Viacom) (1982)', '•', '530 Pico Blvd - Bayview CA Unlimited Partnership', '(Le Meridien Delfina) (1983)', '•', '2000-2200 Colorado Ave - Arboretum (AO Santa Monica) (1987)', '•', '1620 26th Street & 2425 Olympic Blvd - Water Garden (1988)', '•', '1733 Ocean Ave - Maguire Thomas (1990)', '•', '2221 Santa Monica Blvd - Providence Saint John’s Health Center (1998)', '•', '1776 Main Street - Rand (2000)', '•', '3030 Olympic Blvd - Lantana East (2004)', '•', '3030 Olympic Blvd - Lantana South (2004)', '•', '1725 Ocean Ave - The Village (2008)', '•', '725 California Avenue - Saint Monica’s Catholic Community (2010)', '•', '1800 Stewart St - Agensys (2010)', '•', '2834 Colorado Avenue -', 'Colorado Creative Studios (2011)', '•', '702 Arizona Avenue (2011)', '•', '1317 7th Street (2011)', '•', '710 Wilshire Boulevard (2012)', '•', '1548 6th Street (2012)', '•', '2930 Colorado Avenue (2013)', '•', '1318 2nd Street (2013)', '•', '1731 20th Street -', 'Crossroads School (2013)', '•', '1554 5th Street -', 'Courtyard by Marriott (2013)', '•', '501 Colorado Avenue -', 'Hampton Inn & Suites (2013)', '•', '315 Colorado Avenue - Arclight Cinemas at Santa Monica Place (2014)', '•', '1402 Santa Monica Blvd -', 'Mini Automobile Dealership (2014)', '•', '1112-1122 Pico Blvd (2014)', '•', '1415 5th Street (2015)', '•', '1560 Lincoln Blvd (2015)', '•', '1601 Lincoln Blvd (2016)', '•', '500 Broadway (2016)', '•', '1325 6th Street (2017)', '•', '1430 Lincoln Blvd (2017)', '•', '1333-1337 Ocean Avenue -', 'Hill Street Partners III (2007)', 'Expired in 2012', '1900 Pico Blvd - Santa Monica College Parking & Pool (1989)', 'Expired in 2014', '401 Broadway (2011)', 'Zoning code-compliant project built', 'Public Outreach', 'The Municipal Code requires that that the City provide at least 10 days’ notice to the Developer or successor-in-interest of the City Council’s scheduled meeting to review Development Agreement compliance. This notice has been provided.', 'Next Steps', 'Staff will continue its ongoing Development Agreement compliance review; reports will be made to Council annually during the first quarter of the calendar year. The next report will be made in the first quarter of 2019.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '2866'}], [{'Title': 'Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Santa Monica Library Board for a term ending 06/30/2018.', 'Department': 'City Clerk 13-Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '3010'}, {'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer, Mayor Pro Tem Davis and Councilmember McKeown that the Council allocate $14,000 of its discretionary funds to the Main Street Business Improvement Association to aid in the production of its Summer SOULstice, a family-friendly community festival on Main Street. The funds will be used to offset the costs for City-required staffing of public safety and fire safety officers and road closures on Main Street, among other City costs.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '3023'}, {'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer, Mayor Pro Tem Davis and Councilmember McKeown that the Council allocate $7,500 of discretionary funds to serve as a matching grant to assist students from lower-income families to participate in this year’s student cultural exchange program with our Friendship City of Kizugawa, Japan. Funds will be provided to the Santa Monica Science Magnet, a 501(c)(3) non-profit.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1138', 'ID': '3024'}]]
[[{'Title': "City Manager's Report: Seismic Retrofit Update", 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2909'}, {'Title': 'Proclamation recognizing March 2018 as Red Cross Month in the City of Santa Monica', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2965'}], [{'Title': 'Award Contract for Fire Station No. 1 Construction Services', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #2235 to Bernards Bros., Inc., a California -based corporation, for the construction of Fire Station No. 1. 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Bernards Bros., Inc., in an amount not to exceed $26,525,000, and authorize an additional $2,652,500 for contingency (10%) for a total of $29,177,500.3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'For more than a decade, the City has been working to make Fire Station No. 1 in the downtown core seismically safe, code compliant and appropriately sized. The City is now ready to award the contract to construct the new Fire Station No. 1 at 1337-45 7th Street, which will replace the existing Fire Station No. 1 at 1444 7th Street. This project is important because the existing fire station:', 'The new Fire Station No. 1 will be fully compliant with current seismic safety and Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) regulations. The facility will include:', '· Five appropriately sized and equipped apparatus bays;', '· Living facilities including sleeping quarters and restrooms that are appropriate for all staff members;', '· Community room;', '· Sufficient parking for all on-duty personnel;', '· Rooftop solar panels;', '· Large openable windows and a heat chimney to utilize natural ventilation;', '· A large light shaft bringing natural light to the apparatus bay floor and', '· Drought tolerant landscaping.', 'The design of the new Fire Station No. 1 is complete, as is bidding for the project. Staff recommends Bernards Bros. Inc. to provide construction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project, in an amount not to exceed $26,525,000. This amount is $2 million above the engineers estimate due to inflation. Staff anticipates that construction will be completed in early 2020. The existing Fire Station No. 1 site will no longer be needed for its current purpose in 2020. Staff will begin to evaluate the potential reuse opportunities for the site. As the building is included in the Historic Resources Inventory, an assessment of its historic status is recommended as a first step in the process. Based on the historical assessment and site evaluation, staff would return to council for further consideration.', 'Background', 'On June 26, 2007, Council authorized staff to execute a contract to study whether the existing Fire Station No. 1 could be retrofitted or if it should be rebuilt (Attachment A). The study indicated that the existing facility is in need of a seismic retrofit, facility upgrades, and building improvements to be in compliance with all current codes, including ADA, and to meet current staffing requirements. The seismic upgrades needed to retrofit the existing facility would add wall thickness and additional corridors, which would further narrow the interior spaces and compromise the functional and equipment storage needs of the firefighters. Therefore, retrofitting the existing fire station structure was not a viable option, and construction of a new, larger Fire Station No. 1 was approved to address all issues.', 'In October 23, 2012 and May 26, 2016, Council authorized a professional services agreement and one modification (respectively) with Rob Wellington Quigley FAIA Corporation (RWQ), a California-based company, to provide design and preconstruction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project (Attachments B, C, D).', 'During the design process the entire design went through a “value engineering” review. Value engineering is a systematic and organized approach to providing the necessary functions in a project at the lowest cost. Value engineering promotes the substitution of materials and methods with less expensive alternatives, without sacrificing functionality or quality. It is focused solely on the functions of various components and materials, rather than their physical attributes.', 'On December 17, 2013, Council approved the proposal to finance the construction of Fire Station No. 1, and authorized staff to continue with project design (Attachment E).  On April 6, 2016, the project was approved by the Planning Commission. On June 6, 2016, the project was approved by the Architectural Review Board (ARB).', 'The FY 2016-18 Capital Improvement Budget of $41.6 million for the project included all project costs, including construction, construction management, testing and inspection services, technology infrastructure, furniture, equipment, unforeseen conditions (site hazardous material), and prevailing wage monitoring.', 'Discussion', 'Fire Station No. 1 services mostly the downtown and northwest areas of Santa Monica with two fire engines allocated to citywide response. The facility is also an Essential Services Building, as defined by the California Essential Services Buildings Seismic Safety Act of 1986. An Essential Services Building should be operational and capable of providing services to the public after a natural disaster. However, the existing Fire Station No. 1 does not meet current seismic code.', 'On February 27, 2018, the City finalized a land swap agreement, exchanging public property located at 1338-42 and 1321 5th Street, for property located at 1337-45 7th Street (“7th Street Property”). The 7th Street Property will serve as the new site to build the replacement facility for Fire Station No. 1. The existing Fire Station No. 1 will remain operational throughout construction until the new fire station is ready for occupancy. The estimated completion date for the project is early 2020.', 'Contractor Selection', "On August 2, 2017, the City published a Notice Inviting Submission of Contractor’s Qualifications (SOCQ) to provide construction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project. The SOCQ was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.071(a) provisions. Sixty-eight vendors downloaded the bid. Seven Statements of Qualifications were received and publicly opened on August 31, 2017. Qualifications were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work, specifically experience constructing a fire station, work in and for the City of Santa Monica, and work in congested urban areas. Based on these criteria, the City pre-qualified the following list of vendors as best bidders: Bayley Construction, Bernards Bros., Inc., and Morley Construction Company.", 'On November 27, 2017, the City issued the Request for Bids (RFB) to the pre-qualified vendors to provide bids for construction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project in accordance with City specifications. Three bids were received and publicly opened on January 22, 2018.', 'Vendor', 'Bid', 'Bayley Construction', '$25,478,806', 'Bernards Bros., Inc.', '$26,525,000', 'Morley Construction Company', '$27,739,501', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Bernards Bros., Inc. is not the lowest bidder, but offered comprehensive knowledge and experience having previously successfully completed two fire station projects and a number of high profile and complex projects in Santa Monica, most notably at Santa Monica College (SMC). Bernards Bros., Inc. demonstrated its understanding of the importance of site controls, cleanliness, and communication with the neighborhood, including at their SMC campus project. Bernards Bros., Inc. provides extensive in-house Building Information Management (BIM) services, which will proactively identify building system conflicts and create detailed as-built documentation to aid in future maintenance of the facility. Additionally, Bernards Bros., Inc. received positive references from other municipalities and institutions for project completion timeliness, project management, and project billing professionalism. Based on these criteria, Bernards Bros., Inc. is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Bernards Bros., Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $26,525,000 with authorization of an additional $2,652,500 for contingency (10%) for a total authorization of $29,177,500. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C014063.589000. The total project cost is $41.6 million. Approximately $6.5 million of this total has been set aside to be funded from cash on hand. Consistent with the previously approved financing plan, the remainder of the project will be financed with a lease revenue bond and staff will return to Council in May to seek approval for bond issuance.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2468'}, {'Title': 'Amendment to the Resolution Adopting Rules of Conduct for the Audit Subcommittee', 'Department': 'Finance Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution modifying the Audit Subcommittee Rules of Conduct.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On June 27, 2017, Council adopted Resolution No. 11046 adopting modified Rules of Conduct for the Audit Subcommittee of the Santa Monica City Council.  The modified rules required that in addition to a quorum, two Council Committee members must be present in order for a meeting to occur.  At the February 28, 2018 Audit Subcommittee meeting, staff presented a second amendment to the Rules of Conduct (Attachment A) for Subcommittee consideration. In order for Subcommittee business to move forward in a timely manner, the proposed Rules would require that only one Council Committee member be present for a meeting to occur.', 'Background', 'On July 28, 2015, Council adopted a resolution establishing an Audit Subcommittee to assist the City Council in fulfilling their oversight responsibilities for the financial reporting process, the framework for internal control, and the audit process.On May 9, 2017, Council approved the establishment of an ad hoc compensation study advisory committee to take part in Audit Subcommittee discussions on a citywide compensation study being conducted by Moss Adams, LLP, the City’s Internal Auditor. At its June 27, 2017 meeting, the City Council adopted Resolution No. 11046 adopting modified Rules of Conduct for the Audit Subcommittee of the City Council. Section 2 of the modified resolution states that “A majority of Committee Members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, except to adjourn. Two Council Committee members must be present for a meeting to occur.” Section 6 of the resolution states that “Any ad hoc committee shall only convene during public meetings of the Audit Committee.”', 'Discussion', 'Since the establishment of the ad hoc committee in May 2017, there has been an increased need for Audit Subcommittee meetings in order to allow sufficient opportunity for the ad hoc committee to meet. In response to this increased need, and in consideration of scheduling challenges that persist even for meetings that do not include the ad hoc committee, staff seeks to modify the language in the current resolution. The amended language would require that only one Council Committee member be present for an Audit Subcommittee meeting to occur, allowing for increased flexibility in scheduling and further ensuring that Subcommittee business moves forward in a timely manner.', 'Staff presented this modification to the Audit Subcommittee at its February 28, 2018 meeting and the Subcommittee unanimously approved of the change.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2862'}, {'Title': 'Reject All Bids for the City Yards Ecodistrict Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Reject all bids for Request for Proposals (RFP) #SP2396 for establishing an Ecodistrict and communication and outreach services for the City Yards Modernization Project. 2. Direct staff to reissue a bid in order to obtain the best bidder for communication and outreach services for the City Yards Modernization Project.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Communication and outreach services are required for the City Yards Modernization Project. The bid solicitation posted on September 11, 2017 included, in addition to communication and outreach services, the requirement to establish an ecodistrict. However, during evaluation of bids received, two conditions caused staff to reevaluate the need to pursue a certified ecodistrict project: 1) the five bids received far exceeded the available budget; and 2) the Council’s prioritization of the Pico Neighborhood Plan underscored the need to coordinate and unify outreach efforts between departments. Staff recommends rejecting all bids and re-advertising a revised bid without the requirement to establish an ecodistrict. Section 2.24.100(a) of the Municipal Code requires Council approval to reject all bids and re-advertise.', 'Background', 'On July 12, 2016, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate a Guaranteed Maximum Price (GMP) with design-build contractor Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (HDCC) for design services of Phasing Package A for the City Yards Modernization Project (Attachment A). Council also authorized the City Manager to register the City Yards as an ecodistrict with EcoDistricts Protocol.', 'In October 2016, the City registered the City Yards as an ecodistrict with EcoDistricts Protocol. Registration did not bind the City to complete an ecodistrict.', 'On January 9, 2018, Council set upcoming priorities for the City Planning Division including the direction to staff to create a broad outreach strategy for the Pico Neighborhood Plan that would address community concerns, including issues related to protecting quality of life and reducing impact from adverse uses such as the freeway, City Yards operations and former landfill, and the Expo Maintenance Facility. Council also directed staff to involve all groups in the Pico Neighborhood (Attachment B).', 'Discussion', 'On September 11, 2017, the City published RFP #2396 to provide 1) communication and outreach services for the City Yards Modernization Project, and 2) to establish an Ecodistrict in the Pico Neighborhood in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 87 vendors downloaded the bid, and five bids were received on October 18, 2017. All submissions received exceeded the $250,000 budgeted funding available for these services.', 'Vendor', 'Bid', 'Blue Point Planning', '$632,015', 'Ecomotion', '$598,045', 'Evolve', '$1,603,936', 'Global Green USA', '$702,482', 'Stok', '$789,120', 'Additionally, following issuance of the RFP, staff determined proceeding simultaneously with both the City Yards Ecodistrict and the Pico Neighborhood Plan would be duplicative in that the scope for both projects rely on similar outcomes, engagement strategies and neighborhood participation. To this end, Council identified the Pico Neighborhood Plan as a priority Planning project at its January 9, 2018 meeting.', 'Despite staff’s recommendation to eliminate EcoDistricts Certification from City Yards Modernization project goals, the Project would still seek Envision Certification. Similar to LEED Certification, which uses a green building rating system to assess a building project, Envision is a green infrastructure rating system best applicable to a project like the City Yards which spans an entire campus area.', 'Municipal Code Section 2.24.100(a) requires Council approval to reject all bids and re-advertise. Therefore, staff recommends that Council reject the five bids received for establishing an Ecodistrict in the Pico Neighborhood and direct staff to refine and re-advertise the bid for project communication and outreach services, without the requirement to establish an ecodistrict.', 'Outreach and communication services are still required for the City Yards Modernization Project. The City Yards Modernization Project would re-bid to focus exclusively on the project’s outreach and communication strategy and also include scope to coordinate with the Pico Neighborhood Planning team on outreach activities, messaging and communications.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2868'}, {'Title': 'Award Construction Contract for Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Repair', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2528 to John S. Meek Company, Inc., a California-based company, for the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Repair Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with John S. Meek Company, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including a 11% contingency);3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project would consist of the removal and replacement of the existing Harbor Patrol boat hoist and crane, and the design and construction of a new steel catwalk on the southwest end of the Santa Monica Municipal Pier. These improvements are necessary due to the facilities’ nearing the end of their useful life and to adequately maintain existing Santa Monica Police Department Harbor Patrol operations, facilities, infrastructure and equipment. The hoist and crane are primarily used to lift or lower the Harbor Services Unit’s dinghy boat from or onto the water. The catwalk is used for docking, boarding and disembarking the Santa Monica Police Department Harbor Patrol boat. Staff recommends John S. Meek Company, Inc. to construct these improvements in an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including an 11% contingency).', 'Background', 'The Pier’s boat hoist and crane and appurtenant catwalk is located on the southwest corner of the Pier and is used by the Pier and Harbor Services Unit of the Santa Monica Police Department (Harbor Patrol) to launch and load their boat. The Harbor Patrol watches over the seaward area around the Pier and performs sea rescues in the Santa Monica Bay when necessary. The hoist and crane are primarily used to lift or lower the Harbor Services Unit’s dinghy boat from or onto the water as operations require. The catwalk serves as a dock for the Harbor Patrol boat, and also supports Pier maintenance staff with access to areas beneath the Pier.', 'Discussion', 'The boat hoist and crane, and appurtenant catwalk are nearing the end of their useful life and must be removed and replaced with new infrastructure. The boat hoist and crane are experiencing electrical, mechanical and structural issues that limit their functional capabilities. Issues include rusted machinery, electrical malfunctions, and structural deterioration. The steel catwalk has deteriorated, with localized material failure and rusting, and is also in need of removal and replacement.', 'Contractor Selection – Construction', 'On November 6, 2017, the City issued a Notice Inviting Bids for the construction of the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-two vendors downloaded the bid, and on December 6, 2017, one bid was received and publicly opened.', 'Engineer’s Estimate: $226,950', 'The difference between the bid amount and engineer’s estimate is attributable to an underestimation in mobilization for marine work, catwalk design cost, and overall labor for marine construction. The engineer’s estimate was also based on an older crane quotation and excluded costs for demolition and electrical work.', 'The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. John S. Meek Company, Inc. has completed many repair projects for the City at the Santa Monica Pier, including wood deck replacements, various concrete repairs, timber and concrete pile repairs, and full section repairs. John S. Meek Company, Inc. has also completed similar Pier projects for the cities of Long Beach and Redondo Beach. Staff contacted references listed in the bid package, and all respondents reported that work performed by John S. Meek Company, Inc. was completed within project requirements. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that John S. Meek Company, Inc.’s license is current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, John S. Meek Company, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder for the Pier Hoist & Crane and Catwalk Project.', 'Construction Management', "Construction management and public outreach for this project would be provided by City staff. Construction management would include inspecting the contractor's work during construction, verifying and documenting field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts as a result of the construction activities, attending the contractor's safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings and maintaining all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work conducted during construction.", 'Public Outreach', 'In March and April 2017, Engineering staff met with the Pier Management staff, Pier businesses, Pier Corporation staff and the Pier Board about upcoming Pier projects that included this project. Staff would reengage to communicate with Pier tenants regarding all pre-construction public outreach while fostering open lines of communication and responding to the day-to-day concerns of the residents, visitors and local businesses.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The project is categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15301(c) and Section 15302 of the CEQA Guidelines. Class 1 exempt projects include the "operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination." Class 2 exempt projects include the “replacement or reconstruction of existing structures and facilities where the new structure would be located on the same site as the structure replaced and would have substantially the same purpose and capacity as the structure replaced.” The project qualifies as a Class 1 and Class 2 project exempt from CEQA. Therefore, this project is categorically exempt from CEQA.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to John S. Meek Company, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $500,000 (including an 11% contingency). Additional funds in the amount of $10,000 is also needed for administrative and prevailing wage costs. Funds of $100,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C309202.589000. Award of the contract requires a budget transfer of $250,000 from account S010300.589000 to account C019202.589000 and appropriation of an additional $160,000 from the Pier fund to account C309202.589000'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2881'}, {'Title': 'Award of Contract to Deborah Aschheim for Percent-For-Art  Project for Fire Station #1', 'Department': 'Community & Cultural Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Recommend ActionsStaff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Deborah Aschheim, a California-based artist, the fabrication of the artwork to be installed at Fire Station No. 1;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Deborah Aschheim, in an amount not to exceed $160,000.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'A new 25,000 square foot above-grade fire station at 1337-45 7th Street, to replace the existing Fire Station No.1 at 1444 7th Street, will soon be built. In accordance with the City’s Percent for Art ordinance, the project will include a public art element. Deborah Aschheim designed art glass panels to illustrate the stories and experiences of the Santa Monica Fire Department, from both a historical and modern-day perspective that will be installed in various bays. Staff recommends the Council authorize a contract with Deborah Aschheim in an amount not to exceed $160,000, funded by the Percent-For-Art (PFA) allocation generated by the Fire Station No. 1 Capital Improvement Project.', 'Background', 'In 1986, the City of Santa Monica adopted Resolution Number 7231(CCS) to establish a Percent for Art (PFA) Program to enrich the lives of all residents of and visitors to the City of Santa Monica by providing funding for various forms of public art. The PFA Program requires that eligible Capital Improvement Projects set aside a budget of an amount equal to at least one percent of the total project budget for public art. The Fire Station No. 1 project is a qualifying Percent for Art project.', 'Vendor Selection', 'A Request for Qualifications for Southern California-based artists to design public art was published in October 2015. Following a competitive panel selection process that considered five possible artists for the project, Deborah Aschheim was selected to receive the commission based on having the strongest presentation, submission, and portfolio of previous public artworks. In June 2016, she was awarded a contract (contract #3154) in the amount of $40,000 for the delivery of an artwork proposal. This contract has concluded and has been closed, which requires a new contract to be created for the fabrication and installation of the art piece.', 'Discussion', 'Ms. Aschheim’s proposal, “Back Story” is an illustrated narrative translated in art glass panels that tells stories of the Santa Monica Fire Department, past and present. The extended timeline of this project allowed Ms. Aschheim to pursue an in-depth engagement with SMFD that included observation of fire, rescue and paramedic activities, the fire training academy and SMFD administration. The artist spent hundreds of hours observing Fire Department Personnel, working closely with Deputy Chief Tom Clemo.', 'Over the course of this informal “artist residency,” the artist has generated a significant body of work related to the SMFD in addition to images that will be translated into 15 permanent glass architectural elements. Ms. Aschheim will be contracting Franz Mayer of Munich, an internationally renowned glass fabricator, to fabricate the artworks. These large-scale glass panels will be installed on the interior of the Fire Station in the Watch Room and the Community Room. The artist will also produce an accompanying book of sketches and text excerpts from interviews with SMFD personnel. This artwork will be a significant addition to the City’s Public Art Collection and an engaging feature of the city’s newest state-of-the-art fire station facility.', 'On June 19, 2017 the Public Art Committee recommended approval of Ms. Aschheim’s proposal. The Arts Commission then unanimously approved the proposal and approved a budget for fabrication at $160,000 at its meeting the same day. Ms. Aschheim will be responsible for all fabrication and installation as part of the contract.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Total award for the project is $200,000, $40,000 of which has already been paid to Ms. Aschheim for the completion and delivery of the artwork proposal. The contract to be awarded to Deborah Aschheim is for an amount not to exceed $160,000. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget. The contract will be charged to account C010081.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2895'}, {'Title': 'Authorization to execute a contract modification with the Hawkins Company', 'Department': 'Human Resources Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement #10473 (CCS) in the amount of $68,000 with The Hawkins Company, a California-based company, for executive recruitment services. This will result in a three year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $208,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On occasion, City staff enlists an executive recruitment firm to assist with hard-to-fill, specialized vacancies at management and director levels. One firm in particular, The Hawkins Company, has been used recently by staff to recruit for the positions of Director of Library Services, Assistant City Manager, Deputy City Manager and City Architect. To continue this successful relationship, the agreement currently in place with The Hawkins Company requires a one-year extension and additional funds for a total contract term of three years and an amount not to exceed $208,000. This change will allow for the City to utilize their services for the positions of Water Resources Manager, Human Resources Manager and one additional unanticipated vacancy that would require a more specialized focus the Hawkins Company provides.', 'Discussion', 'The Human Resources Department performs 200 recruitments annually with a staff consisting of four recruitment analysts and two technicians. An executive recruitment requires extensive targeted outreach to attract top candidates from a diverse pool of potential applicants: thorough background investigations; and industry specific contacts.  While Human Resources staff has the capability to perform duties of this complexity, the time and resources required for specialized and proactive candidate recruitment, detracts from filling other important vacancies occurring throughout the City. The Hawkins Company has continued to prove its value by providing comprehensive recruitments that include strong candidate profiles, targeted marketing outreach, screenings, selection and backgrounds. The City has been consistently impressed with the quality, quantity and diversity of the candidates recruited and the excellent customer service provided throughout the recruitment and selection process.', 'The Hawkins Company was selected following a Request for Proposals (RFP) for Executive Recruitment Services in August 2015.  Hawkins was chosen as one of the top 3 bidders out of 12 proposals. The additional top 2 firms were Teri Black & Co., and Ralph Anderson & Associates. Teri Black & Co was selected to recruit for the City’s Fire Chief in 2016 and Ralph Anderson & Associates provided executive recruitment services for Chief Information Officer, and Chief of Police. These firms were evaluated and chosen, based on qualifications, experience, fees, references, services, and ability to engage a diverse pool of potential candidates to meet the City’s needs.', 'A one-year agreement with The Hawkins Company was entered into on August 15, 2016 for an amount not exceed $34,500. On June 13, 2017 City Council approved a first modification to the original agreement extending the contract termination date to June 30, 2018 for a total amount not to exceed $140,000 (Attachment B). Since that time, The Hawkins Company has conducted recruitments for Assistant City Manager, Deputy City Manager and City Architect.', 'A second modification will extend the contract term to June 30, 2019 and allow for three additional recruitments at the cost of $34,000 each, bringing the total value of the contract to $208,000.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The modification to be awarded to The Hawkins Company is $68,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $208,000.  Funds are included in the FY 2017-19 Adopted Biennial Budget in various departments.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2898'}, {'Title': 'Resolution Approving Final Parcel Map No. 72808 for a Three-Unit Condominium Project at 2512 7th Street', 'Department': 'Development Review 2', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached Resolution (Attachment A) approving Final Parcel Map No. 72808 for a condominium project located at 2512 7th Street.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Parcel Map for the following condominium project at 2512 7th Street. The Vesting Tentative Parcel Map was approved by the Planning Commission on August 3, 2016. A timely filing of the Final Map was made to the County prior to the Map’s expiration date. According to Section 66452.6(d) of the Subdivision Map Act, once a timely filing is made to the County or City, subsequent actions of the local agency, including, but not limited to, processing, approving, and recording of a map, may lawfully occur after the map’s expiration date.', 'PARCEL MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER   UNITS', '72808 2512 7th Street OP Real Estate Development Corp. 3', 'The following table provides a brief summary of the project:', 'Zoning District', 'OP2 – Ocean Park Low Density Residential', 'Parcel Area', '7,937 square feet', 'Parcel Dimensions', '160.08’ x 50’', 'Existing On-Site Improvements (Year Built)', 'Vacant', 'Rent Control Status', 'N/A – vacant property', 'Historic Resources Inventory Status', 'N/A – vacant property', 'AHPP Compliance', 'Payment of Fee', 'Discussion', 'A Vesting Tentative Parcel Map application (15ENT-0350) was submitted to the City Planning Division on December 24, 2015, to create three residential condominium air space parcels on one land lot in the Ocean Park Low Density Residential (OP2) zoning district. After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved the Vesting Tentative Parcel Map for the above project on August 3, 2016. The action of the Planning Commission was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map. As a vesting tentative parcel map application, its associated approval confers a vested right to proceed with development in substantial compliance with the ordinances, policies, and standards in effect at the time the vesting map is deemed complete by the City. In this case, the application was deemed complete on May 26, 2016, and therefore the development is subject to the development standards of the 2015 Zoning Ordinance (as amended) in effect at that time.', "The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium tax of $3,000 prior to issuance of building permits. The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer’s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. The City Engineer’s office indicates that there are no required off-site public improvements. The City Attorney's Office has approved the Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2911'}, {'Title': 'Resolution Approving Final Parcel Map No. 73829 for a Three-Unit Condominium Project at 212 Bay Street', 'Department': 'Development Review 2', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached Resolution (Attachment A) approving Final Parcel Map No. 73829 for a condominium project located at 212 Bay Street.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Parcel Map for the following condominium project at 212 Bay Street. The Vesting Tentative Parcel Map was approved by the Planning Commission on June 15, 2016. A timely filing of the Final Map was made to the County prior to the Map’s expiration date. According to Section 66452.6(d) of the Subdivision Map Act, once a timely filing is made to the County or City, subsequent actions of the local agency, including, but not limited to, processing, approving, and recording of a map, may lawfully occur after the map’s expiration date.', 'PARCEL MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER   UNITS', '73829 212 Bay Street Lucas Ralson, MLR Ventures, LLC 3', 'The following table provides a brief summary of the project:', 'Zoning District', 'NC – Neighborhood Commercial', 'Parcel Area', '6,022 square feet', 'Parcel Dimensions', '120.44 x 50’', 'Existing On-Site Improvements (Year Built)', 'Vacant', 'Rent Control Status', 'N/A – vacant property', 'Historic Resources Inventory Status', 'N/A – vacant property', 'AHPP Compliance', 'Payment of Fee', 'Discussion', 'A Vesting Tentative Parcel Map application 15ENT-0331 was submitted to the City Planning Division on November 10, 2015 to create three residential condominium air space parcels on one land lot in the Neighborhood Commercial (NC) zoning district. After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved the Vesting Tentative Parcel Map for the above project on June 15, 2016. The action of the Planning Commission was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map. As a vesting tentative parcel map application, its associated approval confers a vested right to proceed with development in substantial compliance with the ordinances, policies, and standards in effect at the time the vesting map is deemed complete by the City. In this case, the application was deemed complete on November 11, 2015 and therefore the development is subject to the development standards of the 2015 Zoning Ordinance (as amended) in effect at that time.', "The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium tax of $3,000 prior to issuance of building permits. The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer’s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. The City Engineer’s office indicates that there are no required off-site public improvements. The City Attorney's Office has approved the Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2912'}, {'Title': 'Second Modification to Gafcon Contract for Citywide Prevailing Wage and Labor Compliance', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Procurement', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate andexecute a second modification to Contract No. 10435, in the amount of $600,000 for three years with two additional one-year renewal options with Gafcon, Inc., a California-based company, to provide citywide State and Federal labor compliance and certified payroll monitoring on an as-needed basis. This will result in a five-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $900,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Since 2016, Gafcon, Inc. (Gafcon) has provided certified payroll monitoring services for city projects subject to State and Federal prevailing wage requirements. Services consist of job classification selection, certified payroll compliance monitoring, on-site interviews of workers, and enforcement if needed. Although a formal solicitation was conducted, the original three-year contract was executed under City Manager authority as a pilot to ensure compliance with state-mandated requirements in a timely fashion. At the time, staff did not have a full understanding about the quantity of projects that would require monitoring. The first modification on February 28, 2017, addressed this issue as staff developed a better understanding of actual use. As of the first modification, Gafcon was monitoring 81 projects. Gafcon is currently monitoring 105 active projects citywide. Due to an increase in the number of projects currently monitored, in anticipation of future large-scale projects, and to support the addition of Davis-Bacon Act Federal Prevailing Wage compliance monitoring, staff recommends amending the agreement with Gafcon in the amount of $600,000 for three years, with two additional one-year renewal options, for a new total amount not to exceed $900,000 over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'Two 2014 California laws (SB 7 and SB 854) define prevailing wage requirements, and establish responsibilities for prevailing wage payment. Prevailing wage law applies to anyPublicWorks projectthat exceeds $15,000 for repair/maintenance and $25,000 for new construction.The law requires prevailing wage payment to certain labor categoriesidentified in the State of California Labor Code (commencing in Section 1770etseq.)when employed for any work on or in the execution of a Public Works project.The City must 1) award public works bids in compliance with the law and report these bid awards to the California Department of Industrial Relations (DIR); and 2) ensurecontractors/subcontractors register with the DIR and provide certified payroll records to the Labor Commissioner.', 'On May 31, 2016, following a formal Request for Proposals (RFP), under City Manager authority, staff executed agreement #3142 in the amount not to exceed $80,000 over a three-year period with Gafcon to provide certified payroll monitoring services for projects subject to State and Federal prevailing wage requirements.', 'On February 28, 2017 (Attachment A), a first modification to Contract No. 10435 (CCS), formerly known as agreement #3142, was approved by Council in the amount of $220,000 over a three-year period with a new total amount not to exceed $300,000.', 'Discussion', 'City prevailing wage projects include construction and maintenance of public buildings, housing, public work infrastructure and similar facilities, and could include projects funded in part or in whole by Federal or State grants. Gafcon is currently monitoring 105 active projects Citywide.', 'Gafcon ensures that the Prime Contractor and Subcontractors comply with all California Labor Codes as outlined by California State Department of Industrial Relations (DIR). During the span of a project, Gafcon assists with the following:', '· Audit of certified payroll records to assure compliance with laws/regulations;', '· Compliance with apprenticeship laws/regulations and training fund contributions;', '· Identifies labor compliance violations and resolves issues and calculates applicable penalties/fines;', '· Conducts on-site inspections and worker interviews;', '· Provides the City progress payment and withhold recommendations based on the contractor’s compliance with labor laws/regulations through project close-out.', 'Gafcon will now also monitor Federal Davis-Bacon Act prevailing wage compliance requirements. This work has been done on a case-by-case basis individually by various contractors. Adding this scope to the existing contract with Gafcon will afford continuity by providing one point of contact. The City has three to five federally-funded projects which require adherence to federal and state prevailing wage laws. The added scope for this work would be minimal as three to five projects represent only approximately three to five percent of the total number of projects monitored.', 'The larger projects currently being monitored by Gafcon include: City Services Building, Clean Beaches Initiative, Water Main Replacement, and Parking Structure Repairs. These are larger projects that require significant labor compliance and monitoring. Gafcon also oversees and manages the City’s Labor Compliance Program for Prop 84-funded projects, which includes annual reporting to DIR. The two additional one-year renewal options would ensure the projects mentioned above continue to be monitored efficiently and would ensure a smooth project close-out.', 'Anticipated future large-scale projects include the City Yards Modernization Project, with a requested project budget of $114,000,000, and Fire Station #1, with a requested project budget of $41,000,000. Of the $600,000 requested for this second modification, approximately half will fund compliance monitoring for the current and future large-scale projects mentioned above. For example, the City Services Building alone will budget approximately $125,000 for Prevailing Wage and Labor Compliance charges.', 'Gafcon has agreed to honor their pricing for the two additional one-year renewal option terms and the additional scope. The modification amount is based on a monthly spending average of $14,700 by Departments and Divisions for a steadily increasing number of City prevailing wage projects since May 2016. Staff recommends the approval of a second modification to Contract No. 10435 (CCS) in the amount of $600,000 with two additional one-year renewal options with Gafcon to provide citywide State and Federal labor compliance and certified payroll monitoring services for a total amount not to exceed $900,000 over five years.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Gafcon is $600,000 with two additional one-year renewal options, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $900,000 over a five-year period. Funds are available within existing budgets, and would be charged to the appropriate Division or project account based on request for oversight and labor compliance services. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval and budget adoption.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2939'}, {'Title': 'Modification of City Council Rules of Order', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution modifying the Rules of Order and Procedures for the Conduct of City Council meetings, to establish a procedure for public speakers to submit electronic media files as part of their public comment during City Council meetings. This new procedure will take affect beginning with the April 10, 2018 meeting.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends that the City Council establish a deadline for public speakers to submit electronic presentation materials to the City Clerk’s Office by 12 p.m. on the business day preceding a Council meeting. The new rule would allow time to screen files for viruses, allow staff and speakers sufficient time to set up presentation files, and reduce meeting delays and disruptions.', 'Background', 'At the December 15, 2015 meeting, the City Council amended the Rules of Order and Procedure for the Conduct of City Council meetings to: 1) elaborate on the description for items heard under Item 2: Special Agenda Items; and 2) clarify public comment rules on the City Manager’s Report and late requests to donate speaker time on Item 14: Public Input. The current rules have been in effect for over two years with minimal disruptions to meetings, but staff has identified that a procedure is needed to address concerns regarding public speakers submitting and presenting electronic presentation materials during meetings.', 'Discussion', 'Currently, there is no established procedure for speakers to submit media files such as PowerPoint presentations, videos, audio, images, and portable document formats (PDFs) to be setup before and during their time for public comment. City Clerk staff has administratively established a 6:30 p.m. cutoff time on the day of City Council meetings to submit files, but staff continues to receive requests for assistance after this time and throughout the meeting.', 'The concern with uploading speakers’ media files after the meeting has commenced is the inability to screen files for computer viruses, and/or compatibility with the City’s software. While the computer in the Chambers can screen files for viruses, its connection to the network poses a security threat to City staffs’ operations, information, software and hardware. Lastly, different versions of presentations, video, audio, and image viewing software may prevent public speakers from accessing their files, and does not allow sufficient time for the public speaker to convert their presentation material into other formats before addressing the Council.', 'The number of public speakers using media files during public comment varies from one meeting to another and can be disruptive to meetings and staffs’ other duties. For example, the computer used to project these files is located at the front of the chambers, next to the public podium, where City staff and speakers stand throughout the meeting to address the Council on various items. It is also not possible for the City Clerk to upload files for speakers while taking votes and performing other duties. She may inadvertently interfere with content being displayed on the screen in the Chambers, on CityTV and online at the time.', 'Therefore, staff proposes to establish a deadline for speakers to submit electronic media files to the City Clerk’s Office no later than 12 p.m. on the business day preceding a City Council meeting. Files must be emailed to the City Clerk’s Office at clerk@smgov.net and include the Council meeting date, agenda item number, and name of the public speaker. Electronic presentation materials would only be allowed on agendized items. The earlier deadline would prevent access of corrupt files into the City’s network; it would allow staff adequate time to prepare presentation materials for public speakers, and would reduce delays and disruptions during the meeting. Upon approval by Council, the new rule would take effect starting with the April 10, 2018 Council meeting and be included: in the Council’s Rules of Order; on all Council agendas; and, the Council website to give the public adequate notice and give staff the authority to enforce the new rule. Alternatives to staff’s recommendation are to keep the current rules as is or modify the proposed deadline or procedure.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2951'}], [{'Title': 'Second Reading and Adoption of Ordinance Amending Chapter 2.04 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code Relating to Civil Service Rules and Regulations', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached ordinance amending Chapter 2.04 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code relating to Civil Service Rules and Regulations.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'At its meeting of March 6, 2018, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending Chapter 2.04 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code relating to Civil Service Rules and Regulations.', 'The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2949'}, {'Title': 'Introduction for First Reading of an Interim Ordinance Extending Interim Zoning Ordinance 2569 (CCS) for Interim Changes to Development Standards in the R1 Zoning District Pending Adoption of Permanent Revisions to the R1 Development Standards', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading an interim ordinance (Attachment A) extending interim development standards in the R1 zoning district.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On February 13, 2018, Council adopted Interim Zoning Ordinance No. 2569 to temporarily reduce the scale of new construction in R1 zoning districts. The interim ordinance was adopted in response to community concerns regarding the size of new home construction and the number of pending applications for demolitions and new home construction in the R1 district.', 'The Council also established February 23, 2018 as the date that complete applications for new construction in the R1 zone must be submitted in order to be reviewed under then-current standards. Between January 23, 2018 and February 23, 2018, 23 applications for new home construction in the R1 zone were submitted.  An additional six applications for additions/remodels were also submitted. Nine demolition permits were submitted, raising the total number of pending demolition permits to 42. Comparatively, over the past three years during the same period, the City received less than eight applications for new construction. Annually, the City typically receives approximately five permit applications per month.', 'The interim ordinance is set to expire on May 15, 2018. This report proposes extending the interim ordinance until November 15, 2019 to provide an opportunity to conduct a comprehensive revision of the R1 standards, including exploring potential solutions to address the problem of the size of new home construction and the number of demolitions of existing homes to make way for new homes that are out of scale in the R1 district. The extension will also allow time for a robust public engagement process.', 'Background', 'On October 5, 2016, in response to public correspondence and testimony, the Planning Commission held a discussion about the rapid change occurring in the R1 zoning district citywide. At the time, the Commission had previously reviewed Variances for homes 9,000-11,000 square feet in size. On December 1, 2016, the Planning Commission submitted a letter to the City Council requesting that Council direct staff to prepare a comprehensive review of citywide R1 zoning standards. A comprehensive review of R1 development standards has not occurred since selected amendments were made approximately 20 years ago.', 'As part of Council’s discussion on City Planning Division priorities on January 9, 2018 and in response to significant concerns raised by neighborhood groups and residents about the size and scale of new single-unit dwelling construction, Council determined that a revision to the R1 standards was of high importance. Council further directed staff to return with interim zoning standards that would temporarily reduce the size and scale of new homes pending a public process to study revisions to the R1 zone development standards.', 'Staff prepared an Interim Zoning Ordinance after considering Council direction and public input, and conducting its own analysis. On January 23, 2018, Council conducted a public hearing to introduce the proposed interim ordinance for first reading that established the following interim changes applicable to new construction in the R1 district:', '· Reduced maximum building height to 28 feet;', '· Limited maximum parcel coverage to overall 50% on a sliding scale with a maximum 20% parcel coverage for the second floor;', '· Required that upper level stepbacks are measured from the second floor;', '· Limited aggregate second floor balconies and decks to an aggregate of 400 sf; and', '· Eliminated accessory dwelling units from parcel coverage calculations.', 'The interim ordinance was adopted on February 13, 2018 and became effective on March 16, 2018. Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.46.090(C), the ordinance is set to expire sixty days thereafter, on May 15, 2018. Council may extend the interim ordinance beyond May 15, 2018 for up to 60 months.', 'Discussion', 'Adoption of the proposed ordinance extending the applicability of the interim development standards for the R1 district would ensure that the opportunity to protect the City’s unique and diverse neighborhoods is not lost while a comprehensive review of the R1 standards is underway. The interim standards continue to allow for reasonable new construction in the R1 district more consistent with existing neighborhood character.', 'The interim ordinance represents a temporary measure to reduce the maximum allowable size of new single-unit dwellings in the R1 zoning districts. Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.46.090(C), the initial interim ordinance can only be adopted for 60 days and is set to expire on May 15, 2018. The proposed interim ordinance would extend the term for an additional 18 months. Prior to expiration of the extended interim ordinance on November 15, 2019, staff will undertake a comprehensive update to the R1 Development Standards, which was identified as a high City Planning priority by Council on January 9, 2018.', 'The extension of this ordinance would provide opportunity for study of existing standards and exploration of possible options to address the scale and mass of new construction with all affected stakeholders. In a recent study session on potential zoning amendments, the Planning Commission directed moving some potential amendments, such as thresholds for requiring new garages in R1 districts, to the R1 comprehensive update because of their association with potential incentives for additions/remodels instead of demolition and new construction. This work effort will require a significant public engagement process regarding the appropriate character and scale of new construction and additions in R1 neighborhoods which could begin in the second half of FY2018-19.', 'Community Outreach', 'Since the interim standards were enacted, staff has received numerous inquiries from homeowners requesting information about the standards and concerns about loss of property value. Further, staff was invited to the North of Montana’s Association annual meeting where some attendees expressed opposition to the interim standards and the lack of notification regarding the changes. In order to provide broad notice of the interim standards, in addition to the public notice required by SMMC Sections 9.46.090(C) and 9.37.050(B), staff has disseminated information in the following ways:', '· Summary of changes on PCD website (www.smgov.net/pcd)', '· Summary of changes in press release', '· Summary of changes in Seascape March edition', '· Summary e-mail to PCD e-mail distribution list', '· Postcard mailing to 7,700 homes', 'Staff anticipates a broad public engagement process to include all stakeholders affected by changes to the R1 standards. The form and scale of the outreach process is not yet determined.  However, given the technically nuanced nature of the amendments being considered, staff is considering forming a technical working group of local design and construction professionals as a starting point. This is an approach that was previously taken in developing the North of Montana Development Guide. A link has also been added to the PCD website for interested stakeholders to sign-up if they wish to participate in the R1 update. Staff anticipates holding public workshops and smaller meetings as necessary that present the work of the technical working group. This would allow residents to provide feedback on possible options for the amendments.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The proposed interim ordinance is categorically exempt from the provisions of California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to 15061(b)(3) of the State Implementation Guidelines (common sense exemption). Based on the evidence in the record, it can be seen with certainty that there is no possibility that the proposed interim ordinance may have a significant effect on the environment. The recommended interim ordinance represents a temporary change to regulatory standards and would not allow more mass or floor area within the Zoning Ordinance than existing regulations. Therefore, no further environmental review under CEQA is required.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2872'}], [{'Title': 'Master Facility Use Agreements with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District', 'Department': 'Community & Cultural Services', 'Sponsors': 'Director Gigi Decavalles-Hughes', 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Master Facilities Use Agreement combining the two tax measures (YY and GS) into a single agreement (Measure YY/GS Facilities Agreement) including related supplemental terms and conditions with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District with an initial term ending June 30, 2028.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Over the years, the City of Santa Monica has built a positive and collaborative partnership with the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District. The City has supported exceptional educational, cultural and recreational achievements at our schools. At the same time, the School District has supported the City’s residents by maintaining high caliber classroom education as well as facilities used by students and residents alike.  This relationship is codified in a Master Facilities Use Agreement, which terminates on June 30, 2022, and related supplemental agreements, which terminate on June 30, 2018. The agreements allow community members to use District facilities at the elementary, middle, and high schools in Santa Monica during non-school hours for recreation and sports purposes. At this time, the City and the District desire to amend the supplemental agreements for the middle schools, CREST and playground partnership to reflect current practices, to allow for unsupervised general use of the middle school fields by the community and to extend the term of the supplemental agreements to coincide with the term of the Master Facilities Use Agreement.', 'In 2010 and 2016, the voters passed local tax increases with accompanying advisory measures recommending that portions of the revenues be dedicated to improving and maintaining school facilities and support school programs. In keeping with the intent expressed by the voters, staff is recommending that Council authorize the City Manager to enter into a new agreement to combine terms and conditions for the allocation of the revenues from the two recent tax measures (YY and GS) into a single agreement with supplemental agreements covering with the recreational use of Santa Monica High School and memorializing the City’s and the District’s mutual understanding pertaining to community use of Los Amigos Park (Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement). The new agreement would supersede the existing Samohi Master Facilities Use Agreement and the Samohi Supplemental Use Agreement in their entirety.', 'Pursuant to the agreements, the City anticipates that it will pay the School District a total of $25,127,020 in FY 2017-18.', 'Background', 'In 2005, the Council approved an initial Master Facilities Use Agreement and related supplemental agreements with the SMMUSD. The Agreement provides unrestricted revenue from the General Fund to the District in return for community use of District facilities, including elementary and middle school playfields, recreational facilities and buildings under-utilized during non-school hours. In April 2009, Council approved exercise of the first renewal option by amending and extending the Agreement by three years, through April 2012.  In May 2012, Council approved entering into a new Master Facilities Use Agreement and related supplemental agreements for an initial term of 10 years (through June 30, 2022) with an option to extend for an additional five years to June 30, 2027.', 'Measure Y and Measure YY were approved by Santa Monica voters in November 2010. Measure Y established a half percent transaction and use tax and advisory Measure YY recommended that half of the transaction and use tax revenue be used to support school, educational and after-school programs. Following voter approval of these measures, in May 2011, Council approved entering into a Samohi Master Facilities Use Agreement and supplemental program agreement with SMMUSD to allow the City and community to utilize facilities at Santa Monica High School (Samohi) when school is not in session and in return receive an annual amount from the City’s General Fund equivalent to one half of the revenue received by the City from the transaction and use tax, thereby effectuating the will of the voters. The 10-year initial term expires on June 30, 2021 and may be extended for additional 10-year terms by mutual agreement and consistent with the Master Facilities Use Agreement.', 'Measures GSH and GS were approved by the Santa Monica voters in November 2016. Measure GSH established another half percent transaction and use tax; advisory Measure GS recommended that half of the transaction and use tax revenue be used to improve and maintain Santa Monica’s public schools and support educational and afterschool programs at the District’s facilities in Santa Monica.', 'Discussion', 'District and City staff recently met to discuss the longstanding practice of community use of the District-owned Los Amigos Park site during non-school hours and determined that it would be prudent to document this mutually agreed upon practice within the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement intended to effectuate the will of the voters as expressed in advisory Measure GS to devote half of the additional sales tax collected to public school education. Additionally, with the incorporation of sports lights and synthetic turf at Lincoln Middle School under construction, District and City staff identified opportunities to modify the existing supplemental agreements to the Master Facilities Use Agreement relating to the Lincoln and John Adams Middle Schools in order to carve out time at these schools for general unsupervised recreational opportunities, similar to the model used for Samohi. Staff also determined that it would be prudent to make minor modifications to the supplemental agreements for CREST and Playground Partnership to reflect current practices. The resulting Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement would retain the majority of the provisions in the existing Samohi Master Facilities Agreement with the following modifications and additions:', 'Term of Agreement: As noted above, the current term for the Samohi Master Facilities Agreement expires on June 30, 2021 with an option to extend for additional 10 year terms. It is recommended that this term be amended in the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement to expire on June 30, 2028 with an option to extend for additional 10 year terms by mutual agreement between the City and District. It is also recommended that the term for the supplemental agreements for Lincoln and John Adams Middle Schools, CREST and Playground Partnership be amended to mirror the term of the Master Facilities Use Agreement (through June 30, 2022 with an option to extend for an additional five years to June 30, 2027).', 'SMMUSD Unification: The SMMUSD Board of Education is currently reviewing the request of the Malibu community to separate from the district and create a Malibu Unified School District (also officially referred to as “unification”). While it is unknown at this time whether unification will occur, it is recommended that a provision be included in the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement to clarify that if SMMUSD were to split into two districts, the funding provided through Measures YY and GS would reside with the entity with jurisdiction over Santa Monica High School and Los Amigos Park as the sole successor in interest to the rights and obligations of the District under the Agreement.', 'Force Majeure: Both District and City staff recommend that a “Force Majeure” provision be added to the Agreement to address obligations of each party should there ever be a major, unanticipated natural or human-caused disaster.', 'Supplemental Agreements:  The following elements would be addressed in the revised supplemental agreements for Lincoln and John Adams Middles Schools, CREST,  Playground Partnership and Samohi as well as in the Supplemental Agreement for Los Amigos Park:', '· facility use plans to address permit group and general community use of the sites during non-school hours;', '· staffing at the sites by District or City staff as determined by the particular site needs;', '· permit fee collection;', '· documentation of permits issued; and', '· details regarding custodial services and maintenance needs.', 'In keeping with established practice, Supplemental Agreements would be reviewed periodically by operational staff from each entity and may be revised without governing board approvals so long as they are only related to e practical and operational changes.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The City’s projection for half of the combined (Measure YY and GS) one percent transaction and use tax is $16,100,000 (Account 01274.566810), although the final amount is based on actual transaction and use tax revenue received over the year. While the City has not yet paid the District the amount equal to one half the revenue received for Measure GS to date, that amount, totaling $5,650,681 as of 2/28/18 has been set aside in the General Fund reserve in anticipation of the executed agreement between the City and the District. Disbursements will be made once the City Council and Board of Education have approved and executed the Measure YY/GS Facilities Use Agreement.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2925'}, {'Title': 'Resolution Certifying the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) Environmental Impact Report (EIR) for the Airport Park Expansion Project and Project Approval', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': 'Director David Martin', 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council adopt a resolution (Attachment A) certifying the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) Environmental Impact Report (EIR) for the Airport Park Expansion project, and a resolution (Attachment B) adopting the Statement of Overriding Considerations and Mitigation Monitoring Program to approve the project.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Airport Park Expansion Project would convert approximately 12 acres of non-aviation land at the Santa Monica Airport (SMO) into new park and recreational space adjacent to the existing 8.3-acre Airport Park. The Airport Park Expansion Project would construct two International Federation of Association Football (FIFA)-regulation-sized synthetic turf sports fields, 95 community garden plots, a large natural turf multi-purpose area, pickleball courts, recreational paths, fitness equipment, picnic areas and structures containing restroom, concession and storage facilities.', 'In accordance with the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA), an Environmental Impact Report (EIR) was prepared for the project (Attachment C). The EIR determined that the Airport Park Expansion Project would have a significant impact on the environment with respect to construction noise and traffic. This report recommends the City Council adopt the resolutions to certify the EIR and adopt a Statement of Overriding Considerations and Mitigation Monitoring Program.', 'Background', 'The City has long envisioned park and recreational uses on non-aviation land located south of the runway. There are approximately 40 acres of Airport property designated exclusively for non-aeronautical purposes. This area contains several buildings that are leased to artists, commercial office tenants, a restaurant, and museum. Airport Park and the Airport Park Expansion Project site are also within this area of the Airport.', 'The City has developed the area south of the runway to include commercial/office, restaurant, event venues, and educational non-aviation uses, as well as the existing Santa Monica Airport Park. In July 2002, the Final EIR for the Santa Monica Airport Park Project was certified, allowing for the development of the existing 8.3-acre public Airport Park within SMO property. Located in the northwest corner at the intersection of Airport Avenue and Bundy Drive, the park site is designated “residual land” and the development of non-aviation uses was permitted under the Airport Master Plan and the Airport Layout Plan. In 2003, the Airport Park design was approved, construction began in December of 2005 and the community has been enjoying the fields, dog park, tot lot, picnic area and general purpose turf area since April of 2007. The existing Santa Monica Airport Park project cost $7,052,330 to design and construct.', 'On March 24, 2015, the City Council heard a presentation by City Staff regarding SMO and future options for SMO operations, as well as land occupied by SMO (Attachment D). The City Council unanimously voted to direct City staff to develop recreational uses on approximately 12 acres of non-aviation land adjacent to the existing Airport Park within three years to address community requests for sports fields.', 'On June 18, 2016, a community event was held at the existing Airport Park, attended by approximately 106 people, in which three park concept schemes were presented. The three park concepts proposed included a Runway Concept (Option 1), a Landing Strips Concept (Option 2), and a Flight Path Concept (Option 3). Option 1 involved three new fields, one at FIFA-regulation size, with 192 net parking spaces and a new drop-off/turnaround location at the south. Option 2 also involved three new fields, two at FIFA-regulation size, with 160 net parking spaces and a new drop-off/turnaround location at the south. Option 3 involved two new fields, both at FIFA-regulation size, with 102 net parking spaces and a new drop-off/turnaround location at the north.', "On July 21, 2016, the three park concepts were presented to the City Recreation and Parks Commission along with the data collected from community members on their preferences for park amenities. Concept Option 3 was unanimously chosen by the Commission with additional recommendations, including: the addition of a “loop” pathway to surround the combined park areas; provision of a pedestrian entry at Bundy Avenue; placement of the Community Gardens away from the runway and within close proximity to other new amenities; retention of the size of both the existing children's playground and dog park; and that consideration be given to add concessions and pickleball courts.", 'On July 25, 2016, the three park concept schemes were presented to the Santa Monica Airport Commission along with the data collected from the community. Action was not required and the Commissioners deferred to public input and the recommendations of the Recreation and Parks Commission.', 'Based on the Council directive to maximize sports fields, community input, and the recommendations of the Recreation and Parks Commission, the design team developed a new hybrid concept balancing active recreation amenities with landscaped areas for passive recreation and organized to facilitate further expansion of the park in the future.', 'On September 27, 2016 the City Council approved the conceptual direction of the new hybrid concept and directed staff to proceed with design and construction documents (Attachment E). The hybrid concept approved by Council is the project analyzed in the EIR.', 'Discussion', 'In accordance with CEQA, an EIR was prepared to analyze the potential environmental effects of the Airport Park Expansion Project, both individually and cumulatively.', 'In accordance with Section 15082 of the CEQA Guidelines, a Notice of Preparation (NOP) was published on March 8, 2017 for a 30-day comment period which indicated the City’s intent to prepare an EIR for the project. The NOP was distributed to Federal, State, Regional, and City agencies, neighborhood groups, and occupants and owners within a 1,000-foot radius of the Project site and was published on the City’s Planning and Community Development website. Additionally, a public scoping meeting was held on March 21, 2017 to present the project and receive comments on the scope of the EIR.', 'On October 27, 2017, a Notice of Completion and Public Availability of the Draft EIR was published, commencing a 45-day comment period for the Draft EIR. The environmental areas studied in detail in the Draft EIR include:', '· Air Quality', '· Construction Effects', '· Greenhouse Gas Emissions', '· Hazards and Hazardous Materials', '· Land Use and Planning', '· Neighborhood Effects', '· Noise', '· Transportation/Traffic', 'Other issue areas such as Agricultural/Forestry Resources, Biological Resources, Aesthetics, Cultural Resources, Hydrology/Water Quality, Geology/Soils, Mineral Resources, Neighborhood Effects, Population/Housing, Public Services, Tribal Cultural Recourses, and Utilities were determined to be less than significant.', 'The Final EIR, which was published in January of 2018, contains all comments and responses to comments received during the comment period as well as minor changes to the Draft EIR.', 'The EIR identified mitigation measures in the areas of Hazards and Hazardous Materials, Noise (Construction), and Transportation/Traffic (Construction) to reduce potential impacts to less than significant levels. To ensure these measures are properly enacted, a mitigation monitoring program is necessary and will be enforced during the construction and operation of the project, if approved. The mitigation measures are provided in the Final EIR.', 'Significant and Unavoidable Impacts', 'The EIR determined the project would result in short-term significant and unavoidable construction-related impacts from noise, and long term significant and unavoidable impacts to transportation and traffic due to operation of the park. During construction, even with the implementation of identified mitigation, the use of heavy-duty construction equipment would exceed ambient noise levels at the residences across South Bundy Drive by more than 5 dBA (decibels), thus exceeding the City of Los Angeles’ thresholds for construction noise. Project construction would not exceed the City of Santa Monica thresholds for construction noise.', 'Operation of the park would increase the number of vehicle trips on the roadway network, such that four nearby intersections would be significantly impacted under the City’s currently adopted thresholds. These thresholds are based on quality of traffic service categorized by traffic flow and utilizing level of service (LOS) quality ratings ranging from A (best) to F (worst). The following intersections in the City were projected to experience a significant impact during one or more analyzed peak hours:', 'Intersection LOS Quality Level', '23rd Street & Dewey Street  F during the P.M. peak hour', '23rd Street & Airport Avenue D during the A.M. peak hour', 'Bundy Drive & Ocean Park Boulevard F during A.M. and P.M. peak hours Centinela Avenue & Airport Avenue  E during the P.M. peak hour', 'In addition, based on the City’s adopted thresholds for neighborhood street segments, operation of the project would result in a significant impact on certain street segments. Specifically, the project would result in an increase in vehicle trips (i.e., more than one vehicle trip) to two neighborhood street segments, 23rd Street north of Dewey Street and Dewey Street west of 23rd Street. No significant impacts were identified at intersections based on the City of Los Angeles’ thresholds. Currently there are no feasible mitigation measures available to reduce these impacts, so the impacts would remain significant and unavoidable. It should be noted that the State Office of Planning and Research is in the process of revising the significance criteria for CEQA traffic analysis from LOS to vehicles miles traveled (VMT) in accordance with SB743. Although the project would result in a significant impact on intersection and street segment LOS under existing adopted thresholds, the project would result in beneficial impacts under the forthcoming VMT thresholds (i.e., no significant impacts).', 'Comments on the Draft EIR', 'The Draft EIR was available for a 45-day public review period, during which a total of four comment letters were received. Two of the comment letters were from public agencies and two were from members of the public. The commenting agencies included Caltrans Division of Aeronautics and Southern California Edison. These comments provided regulatory information regarding development of the project, and did not raise any significant concerns regarding the environmental analysis. The commenting members of the public requested additional information regarding the park’s features and traffic/parking. Responses to all comments received are included in the Final EIR.', 'Alternatives Studied', 'The EIR studied five alternatives to the project, which are intended to reduce the significant environmental impacts of the project.', '· Alternative 1 – No Project/No Build (Existing Conditions)', '· Alternative 2 – No Project/Reasonable Foreseeable Development (Non-Recreational Use)', '· Alternative 3 – Airport Park Expansion without Fields', '· Alternative 4 – Reduced Project (East Paved Surface Area only)', '· Alternative 5 – Community Recreation Center', 'Environmentally Superior Alternative', 'In general, the environmentally superior alternative as defined by CEQA should minimize adverse impacts to the project site and its surrounding environment. Of the alternatives considered, the "No Project/No Build Alternative” does not create any new impacts; therefore, it is environmentally superior to a project, which proposes to change existing conditions. However, the No Project/No Build Alternative does not meet any of the project objectives. CEQA Guidelines section 15126.6 states that if the environmentally superior alternative is the No Project/No Build Alternative, the EIR shall also identify an environmentally superior alternative from among the other alternatives. Of the alternatives considered, Alternative 3 (Airport Park Expansion without Fields) reduces the project’s impacts the most; although significant and unavoidable short-term construction noise impacts and long-term traffic impacts would remain, the long-term traffic impacts would be measurably reduced. Therefore, Alternative 3 is considered to be the environmentally superior alternative over other alternatives that may have fewer impacts in other areas. However, by providing no new sports fields, Alternative 3 would not meet the project’s objectives, particularly the objective to develop recreational uses that would meet the highest priority needs of the community. In spite of being an environmentally superior alternative, the City may reject this alternative on policy grounds and may pursue the alternative that can attain most of the City’s overall project objectives so long as findings are made that there are sufficient benefits to the community (“overriding considerations”) to warrant project approval.', 'Statement of Overriding Considerations', 'Due to the significant and unavoidable impacts of the Airport Park Expansion Project, approval of the project will require the City Council to adopt a Statement of Overriding Considerations. The benefits of the project include expanding opportunities for public wellbeing, recreation and community development for City residents consistent with long-standing City objectives. Additionally, the project is consistent with the City’s Land Use and Circulation Element, which encourages high-quality recreational facilities to be developed through an offering of diverse amenities and activities intended to serve all ages, physical abilities, and activity levels and suitable for individual, team or large group use. The amenities would include a community learning garden, individual garden plots, team-based sports fields, paths for walking and running, stair steps, resistance training, zones for pickleball and table tennis, multiple non-programmed park and fitness areas and expansive open green space within Santa Monica’s urban setting. The benefits of the project would be incorporated into the Council resolution adopting the Statement of Overriding Considerations and Mitigation Monitoring Program should the Council determine an override is appropriate.', 'Next Steps', 'Once the EIR is certified, design will conclude upon reaching completion of 100% construction documents. Construction of the project is dependent on securing a permit for construction and identification of construction funding.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The CIP budget has appropriated $1.6 million in General Funds to fund the design phase for the Santa Monica Airport Park Expansion Project. The unfunded construction budget is currently estimated to be $39.3 million and would require alternative financing given that the estimate is more than the General Fund CIP annual allocation would be able to support.', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2710'}, {'Title': 'Potential Enhancements and Improvements to Local Election Laws and Enforcement Mechanisms', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office", 'Sponsors': 'City Clerk Denise Anderson-Warren', 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council review and comment on potential enhancements and improvements to local election laws and enforcement mechanisms.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City of Santa Monica has long been committed to a democracy that is responsive to the people and to an electoral process that ensures fair and effective representation. As a result, Santa Monica has adopted local regulations to promote transparency and level the playing field for electioneering that go beyond State law. In August 2017, the California Fair Political Practices Commission (FPPC) announced penalties against the Huntley Hotel, Richardson Patel, and Pure Pilates, Inc., for violations of the Political Reform Act relating to campaign contributions made in Santa Monica elections. In response, on November 28, 2017, Council directed staff to provide information on how the violations were identified and how local law was circumvented; to provide recommendations for a process to enforce, receive complaints regarding violations of, educate the community about, and create transparency on current / past investigations of violations of local campaign finance laws; and to explore options for campaign financing, including public financing.', 'Discussion', 'The Political Reform Act and the Santa Monica Elections Code', 'Elections in Santa Monica are governed by the California Elections Code, the Political Reform Act (PRA), and the Santa Monica Elections Code. The PRA is the state law that governs campaign finance, financial conflicts of interest of public officials, lobbyist registration and reporting, post-governmental employment, mass mailings at public expense, and gifts to public officials and candidate. Every candidate, candidate’s campaign committee, general purpose committee, political party committee, slate mailer organization, major donor, and person or entity making independent expenditures on candidates or ballot measures in California is subject to the PRA. Information about PRA campaign finance and disclosure requirements is available at http://www.fppc.ca.gov/learn/campaign-rules.html.', 'The FPPC is the state agency with primary responsibility for enforcing the PRA. The FPPC Enforcement Division regularly brings enforcement actions based on violations of the PRA in state and local elections including but not limited to:', '· Laundered campaign contributions;', '· Gifts and contributions over the state contribution limits;', '· Improper use of campaign funds, including personal use;', '· Campaign mass mailings at public expense;', '· False, inadequate, or inaccurate reporting on campaign statements and reports;', '· Non-filing or late filing of campaign statements or reports; and', '· Anonymous or cash contributions of $100 or more.', 'Charter cities are not authorized to alter or reduce the requirements of the PRA. Charter cities may, however, impose additional regulations that are consistent with the purpose of the PRA and stricter in effect. The Santa Monica Elections Code imposes further regulations on election activity in order to, among other things, ensure the credibility and integrity of the local election process; ensure equal opportunity for all candidates, promote diversity among candidates, and strengthen the community’s trust that their government is representative; promote participation in government and trust that the democratic process is not subverted by affluent special interest groups; and preserve a sense of community, safeguard local democracy, and effectuate a commitment to fair public process. For these purposes, the Santa Monica Elections Code, among other things:', '· Prohibits any person from making contributions totaling more than $340 to a candidate or controlled committee of a candidate in each election, as well as any candidate or committee from receiving such contributions (SMMC 11.04.050);', '· Prohibits the Santa Monica City Council, Santa Monica Rent Control Board, and their administrative officers from circulating any newsletter or mass mailing within 88 days of an election to approve or disapprove any ballot measure or to select any Council or Board member (SMMC 11.04.130); and', '· Requires committees raising or spending funds to support or oppose an initiative, recall, or referendum to file financial disclosure documents electronically with the City Clerk in addition to complying with State law (SMMC 11.04.165).', 'Additional information about Santa Monica elections, including campaign disclosure statements, is available at http://www.smvote.org.', 'Reporting Violations of State and Local Elections Law', 'The City of Santa Monica takes seriously any complaint or allegation regarding a potential violation of state or local election laws. Any member of the public who believes that a violation has occurred is encouraged to file a complaint or report with the FPPC Enforcement Division, the Santa Monica City Clerk’s Office, or the Santa Monica Police Department.', 'Complaints or reports may be submitted electronically or via email to the FPPC Enforcement Division by following the directions at http://www.fppc.ca.gov/enforcement/file-a-complaint.html.', 'Complaints or reports may be submitted to the City Clerk’s Office in person in Room 102 of City Hall or by email at clerk@smgov.net.', 'Upon receiving a complaint, the FPPC Enforcement Division will investigate and pursue any alleged violation of the PRA.', 'The Santa Monica City Clerk also receives complaints and reports of election law violations. The City Clerk does not investigate such complaints or reports but is required to report any apparent violation of the law to the appropriate enforcement agency. Per the procedure specified by the PRA and the FPPC, an apparent violation exists if the City Clerk knows or has reason to believe that a statement contains material inaccuracies or omissions, or when a filer fails to file all or part of a statement after reasonable notice has been provided.', 'Upon receiving a complaint or report of an alleged violation of the PRA or the Santa Monica Elections Code, the City Clerk will notify a candidate or committee of the complaint and request a response. Following two such notifications, if the City Clerk knows or has reason to believe that a campaign statement has inaccuracies or omissions that constitute an apparent violation of state or local law, or that state or local law has otherwise been violated, the City Clerk will report the potential violations to appropriate authorities, including the FPPC and/or the Chief of the Criminal Division of the City Attorney’s Office. Upon receiving any such report, the Chief of the Criminal Division of the City Attorney’s Office will determine whether conflict-of-interest concerns (actual or apparent) require a referral to the Los Angeles County District Attorney’s Office or another City Attorney’s Office for investigation and potential prosecution. To avoid any conflict-of-interest concerns (actual or apparent), the Chief of the Criminal Division will operate independently from and not confer with the City Attorney in conducting any investigation or prosecution of an alleged or apparent violation of the Santa Monica Elections Code.', 'The FPPC Enforcement Division’s Investigation of The Huntley Hotel, Richardson Patel, and Pure Pilates, Inc. In August 2017, the FPPC published its meeting agenda containing two enforcement items relating to activity in Santa Monica.', 'In the Matter of The Huntley Hotel; FPPC No. 15/246.Staff: Commission Counsel Michael W. Hamilton, Special Investigator Ann Flaherty, and Special Investigator Marshall Miller. The Huntley Hotel, a luxury hotel in Santa Monica, made contributions in the names of others instead of its own legal name to support candidates for Santa Monica City Council. In 2012, The Huntley Hotel made the following contributions in the names of others instead of its own legal name: nine contributions to Terry O’Day for City Council 2012, nine contributions to Gleam Davis for City Council 2012, eleven contributions to Richard McKinnon for City Council 2012, eleven contributions to Ted Winterer for City Council 2012, and four contributions to Santa Monicans for Responsible Growth, totaling $86,650; in violation of Government Code Section 84301 (44 counts). From 2013 through 2015, The Huntley Hotel made the following contributions in the names of others instead of its own legal name: one contribution to Santa Monicans for Renters Rights, one contribution to Santa Monica Coalition for a Livable City and sixteen contributions to McKinnon for City Council 2014, totaling $10,700; in violation of Government Code Section 84301 (18 counts).Total Proposed Penalty: $310,000.', 'In the Matter of Richardson Patel and Pure Pilates, Inc.; FPPC No. 17/00182.Staff: Commission Counsel Michael W. Hamilton, Special Investigator Ann Flaherty, and Special Investigator Marshall Miller. Richardson Patel was a law firm located in Los Angeles, CA until it merged with another law firm in 2015. Pure Pilates, Inc. is a Pilates studio located in Encino, CA. In 2012, Richardson Patel acted as an agent for The Huntley Hotel by making a $10,000 contribution to Santa Monicans for Responsible Growth in the name of Pure Pilates without disclosing the identity of the true donor, in violation of Government Code Section 84302 (1 count). Pure Pilates acted as an intermediary of The Huntley Hotel and failed to disclose the original contributor information for the $10,000 contribution to Santa Monicans for Responsible Growth, in violation of Government Code Section 84302 (1 count).Total Proposed Penalty: $10,000.', 'At the FPPC’s public hearing on August 17, 2017, Enforcement Division staff shared the following additional information about the investigation that led to these findings and proposed penalties:', '· The Enforcement Division’s investigation did not result from a complaint or a tip. Rather, the investigation resulted from proactive review by the Enforcement Division of contribution data.', '· The Enforcement Division has developed its own internal tools for identifying violations of the Political Reform Act. These tools include gathering contribution data from jurisdictions across the State that have adopted local campaign contribution limits. After collecting such data, the Enforcement Division uses a spreadsheet to identify noteworthy patterns of contributions; these patterns include multiple contributions from the same employer, from the same address, and/or from large numbers of unemployed individuals.', '· The Enforcement Division’s investigation began with the identification of noteworthy contributions using this technique. The Enforcement Division then continued its investigation for approximately two years before issuing its findings and entering stipulated judgments with The Huntley Hotel, Richardson Patel and Pure Pilates, Inc.', '· The stipulated agreements included all of the violations that the FPPC had evidence to prove based on its two-year investigation.', '· It is the standard practice of the Enforcement Division to automatically refer any potentially criminal conduct uncovered during an investigation to relevant criminal authorities, including the District Attorney’s Office, the Attorney General’s Office, and the U.S. Attorney’s Office.', 'A recording of the August 17, 2017, hearing is available at: http://www.fppc.ca.gov/about-fppc/hearings-meetings-workshops/current-agenda/past-agendas/2017-agendas/aug-2017-agenda.html.', 'The FPPC Enforcement Division did not alert the City of Santa Monica regarding its investigation while the investigation was ongoing. Rather, the City learned about the investigation and violations through the FPPC August 2017 agenda and related news reports.', 'Following approval, the FPPC implemented the proposed penalties, which were among the largest in its history, through stipulation agreements with The Huntley Hotel, Richardson Patel and Pure Pilates, Inc. The stipulated judgments are attached. (Attachment A and Attachment B)', 'Local Response to the FPPC Investigation', 'Council, community groups, and concerned members of the public have asked whether local enforcement efforts should now be taken in regard to potential related violations of local election law revealed by the FPPC investigation. Some have suggested that an independent counsel should be appointed to investigate the matter.', 'In considering whether local action is necessary following the FPPC’s investigation, one must keep in mind that enforcement mechanisms are intentionally redundant. Just as federal and state prosecutors have authority to prosecute the same conduct, but rarely do, state and local enforcement mechanisms are intentionally redundant to ensure effective enforcement of the law. Specifically, in deciding the best course for pursuing an enforcement matter, three considerations arise. First, enforcement investigations are often undermined when multiple agencies investigate the same matter simultaneously. Decisions as to which witnesses to interview, when, and with what information, are strategic considerations that can be undermined when enforcement work is unnecessarily duplicative. Here, the FPPC may not have alerted local authorities based on a determination that a simultaneous local investigation would undermine its efforts. Second, enforcement agencies must consider whether the interests of various entities will be vindicated. Here, the FPPC may have determined that local interests would be vindicated by the substantial fines imposed and public attention paid to its ultimate findings and penalties. Third, where vigorous, thorough, and complete, state agency investigation may be preferable to local investigation in order to avoid conflict-of-interest concerns and/or the appearance of bias.', 'In light of the seriousness of the violations, members of the public have asked whether criminal investigation is appropriate. Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 11 provides that it is a misdemeanor offense for any person to contribute more than $340 to any candidate for office or to the controlled committee of any candidate in a local election. Misdemeanor offenses, however, are subject to a one-year statute-of-limitations; this statute-of-limitations had already passed with respect to the relevant conduct when the FPPC announced its investigation, findings, and stipulated judgments in August 2017. The Los Angeles County District Attorney’s Office would be responsible for investigating and pursuing any potential felony criminal activity. The City Attorney’s Office has confirmed that the Los Angeles District Attorney’s Office is aware of the FPPC’s investigation and findings. The FPPC has also stated publicly that it automatically refers any potential criminal conduct to appropriate authorities, including district attorneys’ offices. The relevant criminal enforcement authority is therefore aware of the conduct and capable of conducting further investigation, should such investigation be appropriate.', 'Questions have also arisen regarding whether the candidates who received the contributions described above were aware that the contributions had been made unlawfully in names other than those of the true contributor. The FPPC stipulations in this matter give no such indication. The FPPC had authority to investigate and find violations based on knowing receipt of unlawful contributions if any candidate was so aware. Specifically, California Government Code Section 84211 requires candidates and committees to accurately report contributions received. The FPPC has imposed penalties on candidates and committees for failure to accurately report contributions in other, similar enforcement matters.', 'Potential Enhancements to Enforcement Options', 'The FPPC investigation described above was a proactive, thorough investigation conducted by the FPPC independently, without notice to the City of Santa Monica. Nonetheless, in light of the investigation and violations, Council directed staff to present options for enhancing enforcement of the Santa Monica Elections Code. Staff offers the following options for Council’s consideration and direction.', '1. Enhance Collaboration with the FPPC for Enforcement of Local Election Laws', 'In recent years, the FPPC and various local government entities have taken steps to enhance collaboration in enforcement of election laws. The following options now exist for seeking further cooperation:', 'a. The City could seek state legislation expressly authorizing the FPPC to enforce provisions of the Santa Monica Elections Code. California Government Code Sections 83123.5, 83123.6, and 83123.7 now expressly authorize the FPPC to act as the civil prosecutor responsible for enforcing local campaign reform ordinances adopted by San Bernardino County, Stockton, and Sacramento. These provisions required enactment by the California Legislature and come into effect upon mutual agreement between the FPPC and the local government entity, pursuant to which agreement the local government entity typically reimburses all costs.', 'b. Council could authorize the City to support introduction of legislation amending the FPPC to allow any local entity to contract with the FPPC for enforcement of local law. Such legislation has been previously introduced in the Assembly and Senate but has not passed. No such bill is currently pending.', 'c. The Council could adopt a resolution authorizing the City Clerk and City Attorney formally to request that the FPPC communicate and coordinate with the Los Angeles County District Attorney’s Office and/or the Criminal Division of the City Attorney’s Office in sufficient time to allow for prosecution whenever an FPPC investigation involves potential criminal violations of the Santa Monica Elections Code as well as the PRA.', '2. Establish Reciprocity with a Local City Attorney’s Office to Ensure Effective Enforcement of Campaign Finance Laws', 'The Los Angeles County District Attorney’s Office has the resources, ability, and jurisdiction to prosecute criminal election violations, under state or local law. Concerns may be raised, however, about whether the District Attorney’s Office will be willing to prioritize misdemeanor violations of local elections law. To resolve this concern, Council could direct staff to explore reciprocity arrangements with one or more local prosecutors for misdemeanor prosecutions of local election law. Such an arrangement could be established, for example, with the City of Burbank, Long Beach, Los Angeles, Pasadena, or Torrance, providing a streamlined referral option should a situation arise where misdemeanor prosecution may be appropriate but investigation within the Santa Monica City Attorney’s Office may pose conflict-of-interest concerns or create the appearance of bias.', '3. Explore Creation of an Election Law Commission', 'Council could explore creation of an enforcement commission. Six charter cities (Berkeley, Los Angeles, Oakland, San Francisco, San Jose, and Simi Valley) have established local commissions with some authority to enforce local election laws. While intuitively appealing, such Commissions lack the training and experience of career prosecutors and require appointment by City officials, reducing the ability to remove any appearance of bias. In Berkeley, for example, each Councilmember appoints one member of the independent ethics commission. Staff would not recommend such an option based on the importance of upholding the reality as well as the perception of impartiality in administering election law.', 'Enhancements to Campaign Finance Law', 'Council directed the City Attorney’s Office to consider potential improvements to Santa Monica campaign finance law, including public financing of elections. Santa Monica has historically adopted strong campaign finance laws and practices, including local contribution limits, the posting of candidate and committee disclosure statements online, and public subsidization of election-material fees. Staff nonetheless presents the following options for consideration:', '1. Seek Public Comment on the Costs and Benefits of Public Campaign Financing', 'Public financing programs typically (a) replace private contributions with public grants, (b) use public funds to match private contributions made by small donors, or (c) offer discounted advertising rates or waived election-material fees for qualified candidates. The California Supreme Court has held that public financing programs in charter cities are lawful, but the impact of such programs has been limited by United States Supreme Court decisions holding that such programs can only be adopted on a voluntary basis, leaving open candidates’ option to fundraise using traditional methods from private sources. Based on this limitation and expense, contribution limits are the norm, while public financing programs are the exception.', 'Four of the ten largest cities in California – Long Beach, Los Angeles, Oakland, and San Francisco – have some form of a public financing grant or matching program in effect. In smaller cities, Richmond voters adopted a public matching program in 2012, and Berkeley voters did so in 2016. Governor Brown signed a law in 2016 that would have allowed public financing of state and general law city elections. The law has been invalidated, however, by a court as in conflict with Proposition 73, a 1988 ballot measure that barred public funding of state and general law city campaigns. Litigation is ongoing.', 'The key to effective public campaign financing programs utilizing grants or matching funds is to appropriately balance qualification thresholds, matching amounts, and expenditure limits such that multiple candidates opt-in and vigorous public debate over issues of public concern ensues. In Los Angeles, for example, City Council candidates must meet significant thresholds of voter signatures or contributions in order to participate; matching funds are available at a ratio of up to 4:1 in the general election; and matching funds are only available to candidates who agree to limit expenditures to $408,000. Candidates in Los Angeles often participate in the public financing program. By contrast, matching programs adopted by the voters in Long Beach and Oakland have been under-utilized and criticized as providing inadequate matching ratios (1:2 and 1:1, respectively, for general elections) to incentivize candidates to participate. In 2016, Berkeley adopted a public finance program with a 6:1 matching ratio. While options for funding include a special tax, most cities discussed use general fund resources to fund a special trust account in order to provide campaign matching funds.', 'Because public finance grant or matching programs must utilize a certain level of matching ratio to be potentially effective, the programs require substantial resources and community input is essential. Should Council wish to receive more information about public financing programs, staff recommends that Council direct staff to develop a plan for soliciting public input on anticipated costs and benefits of campaign finance programs.', 'Notably, Santa Monica already utilizes the third type of public campaign finance mentioned above, in that the City does not charge filing fees for voter-initiated petitions, including initiatives and charter amendments, nor does it charge a filing fee for candidates running for City office.In addition, the City pays for all candidate election costs related to the printing, translating, handling and mailing of the candidate statement which is included in the City’s voter information pamphlet that is mailed to each registered voter. Because the City of Santa Monicapaysfor all candidate statement costs, and has paid themsinceat least 1974, during every election all candidateshavechosento file a candidate statement,and to have it translatedinto Spanishand printed in the voter information pamphlet.', '2. Increasing or Eliminating Campaign Contribution Limits', "Staff has previously suggested increasing or eliminating campaign contribution limits. The majority of local jurisdictions in California do not have campaign contribution limits; and, as explained in previous reports, the courts invalidate limits that are so low as to interfere with a candidate's ability to communicate her or his views.In 2011, Council raised contribution limits to $325, with Consumer Price Indexing every five years on a simple basis. The contribution limit is currently $340. According to Common Cause, in 2016, the lowest city contribution limit was $100 (Davis, Del Mar, Galt, Poway, Scotts Valley), whereas the largest limit was $4,200 (Fresno). The average (median) contribution limit was $500.", '3. Community Education Regarding Election Laws', 'Finally, in connection with the news regarding the FPPC investigation, one member of the community has raised a concern about candidates in Santa Monica elections receiving unlawful in-kind contributions from supporters. Most nonmonetary contributions valued at $25 or more must be reported as campaign contributions. An FPPC information sheet regarding in-kind contributions is attached to this staff report. FPPC has made available the attached information sheet regarding contributions. (Attachment C)', 'The City Clerk currently invites neighborhood organizations and the general public to its FPPC Candidate/Treasurer Workshop, where state and local laws are addressed. This event will take place in August 2018. Council could direct the City Clerk to promote this event to the public more broadly and to display FPPC guidance materials more prominently on smvote.org.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2853'}], [{'Title': 'Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Santa Monica Library Board for a term ending 06/30/2018.', 'Department': 'City Clerk 13-Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2907'}, {'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer, Mayor Pro Tem Davis, and Councilmember McKeown that Council direct staff to pursue decarbonization and protect public health and safety by exploring transition from open-flame technologies for heating and cooking into electrification, requiring new construction to use 100% renewable-sourced electricity.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1137', 'ID': '2968'}]]
[[{'Title': "City Manager's Report: Homeless Count Update", 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2908'}], [{'Title': 'Award RFP for the Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study, Pier West End Retrofit and Pier Area 2 Upgrades at the Santa Monica Pier', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# SP2473 to Moffatt & Nichol, a California-based company, to provide structural engineering consulting and design services to develop a new Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study and prepare construction documents for the Pier West End Retrofit and Pier Area 2 Upgrades at the Santa Monica Pier; Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Moffatt & Nichol, in an amount not to exceed $328,000 (including a 10% contingency) over a two-year period.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The last Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study was completed in 2008 (Attachment A). The study evaluated the Santa Monica Pier structures and provided recommendations and cost estimates for upgrades over a 10-year period. A new assessment is required to reevaluate the present-day condition of the Pier’s structural components (above and below water) and to provide recommendations and cost estimates for future improvements. Staff recommends Moffatt & Nichol to provide engineering design services including the preparation of a new infrastructure assessment study, and the development of construction plans and documents. Staff also recommends that Moffatt & Nichol provide engineering support during the construction phases of the Municipal and Newcomb Pier upgrade projects recommended by the 2008 Study. The total contract award would be for an amount not to exceed $328,000 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Background', 'The Santa Monica Pier (Pier) is over 100 years old and is an iconic destination where community and educational events are programmed throughout the year. It is an internationally recognized destination that draws over 6 million visitors each year. Over the years, the Pier has been subjected to harsh environmental and user impacts due to its coastal location and heavy usage.', 'In an effort to plan for and address the maintenance requirements of the Pier, in 2008 the City completed a Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study (2008 Study) that: (1) focused on the evaluation of the existing condition of the Pier’s various structural components; (2) conducted upgrade studies for the various structural systems, which included accommodations for 15-ton (H-15) and 20-ton (H-20) truck loading that the Pier is currently incapable of handling and; (3) developed a maintenance program in conjunction with a proposed 10-year improvement plan (Attachment A). Many recommendations of the 2008 Study have been implemented, and numerous areas have been upgraded at the Pier.', 'Discussion', 'The Santa Monica Pier is composed of two separate structures, the Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier, as shown in Figure 1.', 'Municipal Pier', 'The Municipal Pier begins at the concrete approach of the Pier Bridge and extends approximately 1,480 feet west over the ocean. The Municipal Pier is the main thoroughfare for pedestrian and vehicular access to commercial and recreational destinations. While the Municipal Pier is decked entirely with timber boards fastened to timber stringers (similar to joists), three different structural substructures are currently in place. The term substructure refers to structural elements below the decking including piles, caps, beams, and stringers. The westernmost 440 feet is composed of concrete piles supporting a concrete waffle system. The easternmost 675 feet is entirely timber, and the middle 365 feet was upgraded in 2014 to concrete piles, concrete caps, and concrete tie-beams.', 'Newcomb Pier', 'The Newcomb Pier is approximately 1,050 feet long by 265 feet wide and supports the majority of the commercial tenants, including an amusement park, the historic carousel, and on-deck parking for passenger cars. The majority of this pier is also made of timber, except for a 350-foot by 135-foot section in the southwest corner that supports the amusement park rides. This section has a substructure consisting of concrete piles and beams with timber stringers and decking.', 'The sections with concrete substructures in both piers are relatively new compared with the timber sections and are generally in good condition. The condition of the timber sections varies from good in the recently upgraded portions to poor in some areas of the Newcomb Pier deck system.', 'Figure 1', 'New Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study (New Study)', 'The new Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study will provide inspection of elements both above and below the water’s surface, GIS database documentation, assessment of the existing condition of all structural elements including the decking, and recommendations for a new 10-year improvement plan based on the findings.', '2008 Study Upgrade Recommendations – Remaining Work', 'There are limited locations identified in the 2008 Study that still require upgrades to increase structural capacity, including: (1) the easterly portion of the Newcomb Pier referred to as Pier Area 2 (Fig. 2); and (2) the west end of the Municipal Pier referred to as West End (Fig. 2). These proposed upgrades would allow access for larger vehicles including, but not limited to, emergency and delivery vehicles. Part of the new study would reassess and/or revalidate the previous recommendations made in the 2008 Study, which may require new or additional recommendations for these areas. If deemed necessary, these recommendations would be vetted prior to proceeding with the upgrades.', 'Area 2 Upgrade (Newcomb Pier)', 'Recommended upgrades to the Newcomb Pier include improving the structure to an H-15 rating (15-ton vehicle). Current structural capacities in different portions of the Newcomb Pier range from 3 to 15 tons. A priority area for structural upgrade is Area 2, as shown in Figure 2. Area 2 is approximately 25,000 square feet. The limits of this area are bounded by approximately 70 feet of the Hippodrome to the east, edge of the parking lot to the west, the Hippodrome to the north and the edge of the parking lot to the south.', 'In this zone, 2-inch-thick wood decking is supported by 3-inch-thick by 12-inch-deep stringers that are spaced 22 inches apart. The current calculated capacity for this area is 3 tons. To upgrade this section to an H-15 rating (15-ton vehicle), the stringers must be removed and replaced with larger stringers spaced closer together.', 'Pier West End Upgrade (Municipal Pier)', 'The existing concrete waffle structure portion of the Municipal Pier at the west end is not capable of supporting a 20-ton vehicle, such as a fire engine. Strengthening the existing members is necessary to safely accommodate the additional loading requirements of a 20-ton vehicle. Moffat & Nichol would be tasked with developing alternatives for upgrading the waffle slab. The West End is approximately 10,400 square feet.', 'Figure 2', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The project is categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15301(c) and Section 15302 of the CEQA Guidelines. Section 15301(c) exempts Class 1 projects consisting of the "operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination." This exemption includes “existing highways and streets, sidewalks, gutters, bicycle and pedestrian trails, and similar facilities." Section 15302 exempts Class 2 projects consisting of the “replacement or reconstruction of existing structures and facilities.” The project\'s West End and Area 2 improvements at the Santa Monica Pier qualify as Class 1 and 2 projects exempt from CEQA. In addition, none of the exceptions specified in Section 15300.2 of CEQA Guidelines would apply that would preclude the use of this CEQA exemption: The project site is not located in a sensitive environment; the project would not have a significant effect on the environment; the project would not damage scenic resources; the project would not be located on a hazardous waste site; and the project would not cause a change to a historical resource including the Santa Monica Pier as all materials would be replaced with the same material type and would look exactly the same. Therefore, this project is categorically exempt from CEQA.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On September 28, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) forthe', 'design of the Pier West End Retrofit and Pier Area 2 Upgrades and structural engineering services for preparation of a new Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fifty-three vendors downloaded the RFP, and seven firms responded. The following firms submitted proposals:', '· AECOM', '· COWI North America, Inc.', '· Holmes Structures', '· Moffat & Nichol', '· Walker Consultants', '· Walter P. Moore', '· WJE Associates, Inc.', 'A selection committee consisting of staff from the Civil Engineering Division reviewed the proposals. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience, references, proposed project work plan and timelines, proposed project team, quality work products, creativity, demonstrated technical competence and understanding of the project scope, and value added services and cost. Based on these criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Moffat & Nichol as the best qualified firm to provide structural engineering design services in an amount not to exceed $328,000 (including a 10% contingency). Moffat & Nichol demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with similar projects in the cities of Seal Beach, Redondo Beach, Manhattan Beach, Newport Beach, Goleta, Los Angeles (San Pedro), Los Angeles (Wilmington), Malibu and Santa Monica. Moffat & Nichol also demonstrated through past projects their ability to offer experienced design teams that can complete high quality project designs and reports in an expeditious manner and at competitive hourly rates.', 'Next Steps', 'The anticipated timeline for the infrastructure assessment and design phase of the project is approximately 8-12 months. After completion of the design work, the project team would prepare the bidding documents, advertise the project on the City’s on-line bidding site, select a contractor, and return to the City Council for award of the construction contract.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to Moffat & Nichol is for an amount not to exceed $328,000. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:', 'Account No. Description FY 17-18', 'C309187.589000 Structural Engineering Inspection / Assessment $ 191,000', 'C309186.589000 Pier Substructure Retrofit – West End $ 74,000', 'C309185.589200 Pier Deck Upgrade – Area 2  $ 63,000', 'Total Funds Available $ 328,000'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2813'}, {'Title': 'Correct Contract Reference for Contract Modification with DNV-GL for Climate Action Plan', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council:1. Amend the authorization of November 28, 2017 Council action to authorize a First Modification of Agreement No. 10240 (CCS) with DNV-GL for additional services for the Climate Action & Adaptation Plan in the amount of $34,000 for a three-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $260,578 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Discussion', 'On January 26, 2016 (Attachment A), Council approved an agreement with DNV-GL, a Norway based company with offices in California, for an amount not to exceed $226,578 for professional services for the Climate Action & Adaptation Plan (“Original Agreement”). This Original Agreement was assigned contract number 10240 (CCS). In the staff report dated November 28, 2017 (Attachment B) requesting a first modification for additional services, staff inadvertently referred to the Original Agreement as contract number 3286. To correct this error, staff requests an amendment of the authorization of November 28, 2017 to authorize a First Modification of Agreement No. 10240 (CCS) instead of Agreement No. 3286.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to DNV-GL is $34,000, for an amended contract total not to exceed $260,578. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Public Works Department. The contract will be charged to account 014261.555060.99544. Future-year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2842'}, {'Title': "Presentation of the City's Comprehensive Annual Financial Report", 'Department': 'Finance Department, Financial Operations', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council receive and file the City’s Comprehensive Annual Financial Report, the independent auditors’ unmodified report for the City’s financial statements for the fiscal year ended June 30, 2017, and the attached Auditors’ Letters to Council.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR; attachment A) communicates the City’s financial position and activity for the fiscal year ended June 30, 2017. Overall, the City’s operations show stability and steady growth, reflecting its prudent and sound management practices.', 'The Statement of Net Position, similar to a balance sheet, reports total assets and liabilities of the City. The total net position of the City for all activities was $1.6 billion.', 'The General Fund balance decreased by $40.8 million (to $346.3 million) over the prior year, primarily due to an additional payment of $35.6 million paid to CalPERS in June 2017, which represents the General Fund’s portion of the $45 million overall pay down of the City’s unfunded pension liability.', 'While, overall, the City’s financial position is strong, the largest concern is the growing liability for future pension obligations. The City’s various pension plans are approximately 72% funded with a combined unfunded long-term actuarial liability of approximately $461 million.', 'The independent auditors’ unmodified report communicates that the CAFR, and audited information within, fairly present the City’s financial position for the fiscal year ended June 30, 2017. This audit is performed in compliance with City Charter requirements. An attached submittal letter (attachment B) states that the City’s independent auditors encountered no difficulties and had no disagreements with management during the audit. An additional report on the City’s internal control over financial reporting and compliance (attachment C) notes no instances of non-compliance. The letters include corrected and uncorrected misstatements found during the audit and management has provided detailed responses.', 'The City of Santa Monica has received an unmodified audit report for more than three decades and has been awarded the Certificate of Achievement for Excellence in Financial Reporting by the Government Finance Officers’ Association of the United States and Canada (GFOA) for its CAFR for 33 consecutive years, since it began participating in the program. To make the CAFR more transparent, staff has provided an explanation for key financial performance indicators shown in the report.', 'The City’s external auditors, Lance, Soll & Lunghard (LSL) CPAs, presented the CAFR to the Audit Subcommittee on January 16, 2018. The presentation included details of the audit process and the financial reports, and provided an opportunity for Subcommittee members to ask questions of the auditors. The Audit Subcommittee approved the CAFR and recommended that it be presented to the full Council with a 5-0 vote.', 'Background', 'The CAFR communicates the City’s financial condition and activity in a transparent and organized manner and in compliance with accounting and financial reporting standards established by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board (GASB). The report presents historical and comparative information that can be useful to City staff, elected officials, and external users such as debt rating agencies, businesses, other public agencies, and the City’s residents. The most recent CAFR and over 10 years of prior year reports are available at the City’s libraries, the City’s Finance Department, and on the City’s Finance website at: https://finance.smgov.net/budgets-reports.', 'As required by the City Charter, financial statements are prepared by the City and audited by independent auditors. The City selects its independent auditor through a competitive procurement process in which Audit Subcommittee members take part as evaluators. The City’s current independent auditor, Lance, Soll & Lunghard (LSL) CPAs, is in their second year auditing the City.', 'The quality of the City’s financial reporting and the CAFR are measured in two ways: (1) an unmodified audit report by the independent auditors; and (2) the Certificate of Achievement for Excellence in Financial Reporting, awarded by the Government Finance Officers’ Association of the United States and Canada (GFOA). The attainment of the latter is the highest form of recognition in governmental accounting and financial reporting.', 'Auditors follow audit industry standards established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants (AICPA). These standards require auditors to provide an opinion on specific areas of the City’s financial statements based on observations, inquiries, testing of transactions, and analysis.', 'The City’s CAFR includes the following major sections and information:', 'Introductory Section', '· Letter of Transmittal – prepared by management and used to communicate information on areas that may have an impact on the City’s finances now and in the future. This includes economic factors as well as budget and management factors.', 'Financial Section (the main body of the CAFR for current year information)', '· Independent Auditors’ Report – the City’s report card on the content of the CAFR', '· Management’s Discussion and Analysis (MD&A) – provides an analytical overview of the City’s financial status and results for the year', '· Basic Financial Statements – reports finances at a point in time (assets - liabilities) and throughout the year (revenues - expenditures), and cash flows', 'o City-Wide Statements – overview of financial information including all of the City’s operations by financial activity', 'o Fund Financial Statements – a detailed look at funds, reporting the Balance Sheet and Statement of Revenues, Expenditures and Changes in Fund Balance', 'o Notes to the Financial Statements (Notes) – a narrative explanation that accompanies the Basic Financial Statements', 'Required Supplementary and Supplementary Information Sections', '· Pension Information – schedule of changes in the pension liability and related ratios; schedule of contributions by plan', '· OPEB Information – schedule of Other Post-Employment Benefits funding information', '· Budget to Actual Comparisons – for all governmental funds with a legally adopted budget', '· A breakout of individual funds – for funds that were presented in a cumulative manner in the Financial Section', 'Statistical Section (current and historical information – up to 10 years)', '· Financial Trends', '· Revenue Capacity Information', '· Debt Capacity Information', '· Demographic and Economic Information', '· Operating Information', 'Discussion', 'The attached CAFR for FY 2016-17 has received an unmodified opinion by LSL. An unmodified opinion communicates that the financial statements are fairly presented and that the information used in the report is reliable. In their written communications to Council, the auditors note that they encountered no significant difficulties with management in performing or completing the audit.', 'Statement on Auditing Standards (SAS) 114 establishes standards for the auditors’ communication with those charged with governance. SAS 115 provides guidance on communicating matters related to the City’s internal controls over financial reporting that have been identified in an audit of the financial statements. These statements require the auditors to consider and report on internal controls, significant audit findings, and other matters as prescribed in the standards as they relate to the audit of the financial statements. The letters that satisfy the SAS requirements are attached to this report.', 'At the request of the Audit Subcommittee, the external auditor conducted a conference call with Subcommittee Chair Sue Himmelrich and Subcommittee member Elizabeth VanDenburgh on January 10, 2018 to discuss the results of the audit without staff present. The CAFR was presented to the Audit Subcommittee of the Council on January 16, 2018 by LSL. Subcommittee members were given the opportunity to review the report and ask questions to the external auditor and staff. The topics discussed included the required communication and responsibilities of the external audit firm, the background of significant accounting estimates such as pensions and pollution remediation, internal control improvements as noted in the SAS 115 letter, and a new Accounting pronouncement implemented by GASB Statement 75 Accounting and Financial Reporting for Postemployment Benefits Other Than Pensions. The Audit Subcommittee received and filed the CAFR with a 5-0 vote.', 'The City of Santa Monica has received an unqualified/unmodified audit report and the GFOA Award for 33 years, since the City first participated in the GFOA program in FY 1983-84.', 'Overall, the City’s CAFR shows that City finances are stable. The following is an explanation of some key indicators reported in the CAFR.', 'General Fund Balance', 'The most notable measure of a City’s financial health is the General Fund balance. As presented in the Basic Financial Statements, the City’s General Fund assets exceeded liabilities by $346.3 million as of June 30, 2017. This balance is comprised of a number of categories, as follows:', '· $22.1 million nonspendable, restricted or committed resources that are required for specific purposes according to legal/contractual agreements or by ordinance or resolution of the City Council;', '· $256.1 million assigned funds set aside for specific purposes based on budget priorities (i.e., continuing and future capital projects; project financing equity, prior year encumbrances, and expenditure control budget); and', '· $68.1 million in unassigned funds as follows:', 'o $57.0 million rainy day contingency (15% of annual operating and revenue-supported capital expenditure budget);', 'o $9.7 million economic uncertainty reserve to mitigate potential revenue losses;', 'o Offset by a $1.6 million unrealized loss;', 'o $3.0 million other unassigned fund balance.', 'The strong fund balance and rainy day and economic uncertainty reserves play a key role in Santa Monica’s AAA general obligation bond rating from all three national rating agencies. In addition to being an indicator of very strong financial health, the high bond rating allows the City to pursue lower cost financing structures.', 'The General Fund balance decreased by $40.8 million over the prior year, primarily due to an additional payment of $35.6 million paid to CalPERS in June 2017, which represents the General Fund’s portion of the $45 million overall pay down of the City’s unfunded pension liability.', 'Citywide Net Position', 'The Statement of Net Position, similar to a balance sheet, reports total assets and liabilities of the City as of June 30, 2017. The total net position of the City for all activities was $1.6 billion. Net position is broken out into three categories: capital, restricted, and unrestricted.', 'Net Capital Position ($1,177.2 million)', 'Capital assets include land, buildings, improvements, intangibles, infrastructure and utility systems, and construction in progress. Intangible assets represent rights of use for items such as software and payments for Santa Monica’s cost of improvements to the City of Los Angeles sewage treatment system. Some notable capital projects that were underway as of June 30, 2017 are:', '· City Services Building', '· Fire Station 1', '· Fire Station 3', '· Fire Apparatus Replacement', '· Enterprise Resource Planning System', '· City Yards Modernization', '· Pier Bridge Electrical Upgrades', 'Restricted Net Position ($217.6 million)', 'These assets are subject to agreements with creditors, developers, grantors, or laws or regulations of other governments. Approximately 63% of this amount is restricted for affordable housing and committed to various projects, 18% is restricted per federal, state and other grant regulations, and the remaining amount is restricted for the Cemetery’s trust fund, debt service reserve, development agreement terms, and other grant and legislative constraints.', 'Unrestricted Net Position ($172.5 million)', 'This represents the balance of net position that is neither part of capital assets nor restricted. Healthy capital and operating reserves in the business-type activities support rate stabilization and recovery strategies for the City’s many activities.', 'Long Term Debt', 'The primary source of long term debt is in the form of bonds issued by the City. At the end of the current fiscal year, the City’s total long-term debt outstanding (excluding issuance premiums) was $77.4 million. Principal payments of $6.2 million were made on one general obligation bond for the Main Library construction, five General Fund revenue bonds for various parking structures and the Public Safety Facility, and one revenue bond to fund a proportionate share of capital improvements of the City of Los Angeles Hyperion wastewater treatment facility. On July 1, 2016, final payment was made on the Parking Authority Refunding 2002 Lease Revenue bonds. More information on long term debt can be found in Note 9, page 57 of the CAFR.', 'Pension Liability', 'Like all cities in the State CalPERS pension fund, Santa Monica faces significant long-term unfunded pension liabilities. GASB 68, implemented in FY 2014-15, was a pronouncement intended to provide greater transparency for pension accounting by requiring entities to report unfunded liability in the financial statements rather than in the footnotes. These GASB pronouncements do not affect either the amount of contributions a government makes to pension plans or the total net pension liability, which is still actuarially determined. Total net pension liability, or unfunded liability, is based on projected future benefit payments attributed to the current and past employees’ service, less the assets accumulated to pay those liabilities.', 'As shown on the Statement of Net Position, page 1 of the CAFR, the City has a net unfunded actuarial liability of approximately $461 million: the difference between a total pension liability of approximately $1.62 billion and plan assets of approximately $1.16 billion, making the City’s various pension plans approximately 72% funded. The unfunded liability amount increased from $387 million as shown in the prior year’s CAFR, to $461 million, primarily due to the actual returns on the investment portfolio being less than CalPERS’ projected returns. Since plan assets are based on market value, changes in investment values can have a drastic impact on the overall funding ratio of the plans, positively or negatively. The City’s annual payments include a portion to fund current benefits as well as an amount to pay down the unfunded liability. Annual actuarial valuations provide the City with the amount of the contribution that must be paid annually into the plan to ensure that the current unfunded liability is paid off over the following 30 years. In FY 2016-17, the portion of the actuarially determined employer contribution (ADEC) dedicated to paying down the unfunded liability was $26.7 million, or 53% of the total $50.2 million ADEC.', 'A detailed explanation of the Employee Benefits Programs including detailed pension information by plan is included in Note 16 (pages 76 through 87) and the Required Supplementary Information (pages 99 through 104).', 'State-mandated pension reform and Council-approved cost saving measures mitigate pension cost increases. Over the past three years, Police and Fire sworn employees have increased their contributions towards pensions to reach over 28% of the total pension cost, while Miscellaneous employees are contributing over 25% of the pension cost.  The passage of the Public Employee Pension Reform Act, or PEPRA, in September 2012 is working to further control cost increases in the future, as new employees entering PERS after January 1, 2013 are receiving reduced retirement benefits and cities are encouraged to further increase employees’ share of contribution costs. To date, approximately 32% of the City’s permanent workforce is receiving reduced pension benefits. The City will continue its Council-adopted policy to pay down at least an additional $1 million of the unfunded liability every year.', 'At the December 21, 2016 meeting, the CalPERS Board of Administration approved lowering the CalPERS discount rate assumptions, the long term rate of return from 7.5% to 7.0%. Due to timing, it did not affect the liability reported in this year’s CAFR, but will likely increase the liability in the CAFR beginning next year.', 'In June 2017, responding to the prospect of additional significant pension contribution rate increases beginning in FY 2018-19, Council approved a $45 million pay down of the City’s pension unfunded liability. Due to the requirements of GASB 68 reporting, the impact of this payment will not be reflected in the net pension liability until the FY 2017-18 CAFR. Based on updated estimate from CalPERS that take all these factors into consideration, the combination of the additional pay down and a better than anticipated experience level resulting from City employees retiring later is contributing to a 1/3 decrease in the projected growth of pension costs over the next 5 years that will help minimize the impact of the discount rate change.', 'Cash and Investments', 'The CAFR also includes detailed information on the City’s cash and investments. As of June 30, 2017, the City had $764 million in total cash and investments, all of which are in the form of investments authorized by the California Government Code and the City’s investment policy or in compliance with bond indenture agreements. More information on cash and investments is found in Note 5, page 37 of the CAFR.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action to receive and file this annual report.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2850'}, {'Title': 'Award Bid for Bus Detailing Services for Big Blue Bus', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #4295 to Uniserve Facilities Inc., a California-based company, for bus detailing services for the Big Blue Bus;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Uniserve Facilities Inc., in an amount not to exceed $622,166 including a 10% contingency for five-year term with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Staff recommends the award of Bid #4295 to Uniserve Facilities Services to provide detailing services to transit buses as required by Big Blue Bus. The detail service includes labor and materials to thoroughly clean and detail transit buses and service vehicles at specified prices. All cleaning materials would be environmentally friendly products that conform to all Federal, State, and local laws, rules, and regulations governing cleaning products. The expenditure for this bid is not to exceed $622,166 with a 10% contingency over a five-year term.', 'Background', 'Big Blue Bus (BBB) has used Uniserve Facilities Services (Uniserve) since 2012 to maintain its fleet of transit buses and service vehicle in a “like new condition,” with the exception of normal wear and tear. This provides a safe and pleasant environment for passengers and staff and is an important part of BBB’s maintenance standards and new customer experience model. On April 24, 2012, Council awarded a bid to Uniserve for an amount not to exceed $441,000 over a three-year period. This service was re-bid and awarded to Uniserve by Council on August 26, 2014, again for a three-year period, in an amount not to exceed $300,000. BBB’s latest contract expired June 30, 2017, requiring BBB to solicit bids for detail cleaning services for its fleet of transit buses and service vehicles. An interim purchase order was approved under the City Manager’s authority for services performed while the bidding process was ongoing.', 'Discussion', 'The City’s fleet of transit buses requires daily cleaning, fueling, and fluids inspection. In order to maintain our high standard of cleanliness for the exterior and interior of our buses, BBB has developed a program wherein each bus receives a detailed cleaning at least twice a year. This comprehensive program requires the cleaning of all interior surfaces including the steam cleaning of passenger seats, graffiti removal, cleaning and waxing of flooring, cleaning of all lighting fixtures, windows and a detail cleaning of the operator area. Transit Bus exterior cleaning includes, but is not limited to, a complete and thorough cleaning of the exterior body panels, windows, tires, and wheels. Additionally, the exterior of the transit buses and service vehicles receive an application of a polishing wax to maintain the paint color and to reduce paint oxidation and fading. Regular detailing minimizes the deterioration of upholstery, sidewalls, floors, and other interior and exterior bus panels.', 'Method of Service', 'On August 26, 2014, staff was directed by Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled “As-Needed and Contract Staffing Review Report,” bus detailing and cleaning services were identified as meeting the criteria for contractual services under the categories of “Space Requirement”, and “Workforce Flexibility.”', 'Bid #4295 requires the vendor to provide all equipment and materials needed to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment. In addition to cost savings, the nature of bus detailing work needed requires a large employee pool that would work every morning.', 'Based on the recommendations of the January 13, 2015 Staff report, staff recommends that Council award bid $4295 to Uniserve for bus detailing services. The total expense for the five-year term is not to exceed $622,166.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On November 17, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide detailing services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. One thousand twenty-nine vendors (1,029) were notified and fourteen (14) vendors downloaded the bid. We received and publicly opened on December 12, 2017 proposals from Ultimate Maintenance Service and Uniserve Facilities Services.', 'Cost Estimate', 'Ultimate Maintenance Service', 'Uniserve Facilities Services', 'Estimate - 5-year Period', '$ 571,799', '$ 565,605', '10% Contingency', '$ 57,180', '$ 56,561', 'Contract 5yr Total', '$ 628,979', '$ 622,166', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product and compliance with City specifications. Uniserve has had a positive history of providing bus detailing services for Big Blue Bus, and is able to meet all of the City’s requirements in addition to being the lowest bidder. Based on these criteria, Uniserve Facilities Services is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Uniserve Facilities Services is for an amount not to exceed $622,166 including a 3% annual price increase and a 10% contingency. Funds of $106,534 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Big Blue Bus Department. The contract will be charged to account 41651.555011. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2855'}, {'Title': 'Award Contracts for Seismic Retrofit Program Engineering Reviews', 'Department': 'Building & Safety (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Award RFP# 147 to the following four firms:a) Degenkolb Engineers, a California-based company for seismic structural evaluation report peer review services; b) IDS Group, a California-based company for seismic structural evaluation report peer review services; c) JAS Pacific, a California-based company for plan review services; andd) Interwest Consulting Group, a California-based company for plan review services.2) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute professional service agreements with:a) Degenkolb Engineers, in an amount not to exceed $525,000 (for three years, with one additional one-year renewal option in the amount of $100,000 on the same terms and conditions) for a total amount not to exceed $625,000 over a four-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval;b) IDS Group, in an amount not to exceed $525,000 (for three years, with one additional one-year renewal option in the amount of $100,000 on the same terms and conditions) for a total amount not to exceed $625,000 over a four-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; c) JAS Pacific, in an amount not to exceed $125,000 (for three years), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; andd) Interwest Consulting Group, in an amount not to exceed $125,000 (for three years), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval;', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In order to meet the demands of the City’s Seismic Retrofit program, the Building and Safety Division will need to hire engineering consultants with expertise in analyzing large, complex buildings. As part of the Seismic Retrofit Program, engineers and architects will submit structural evaluation reports regarding buildings on the City’s list of Potentially Seismically Vulnerable Buildings (PSVB) for the City’s review. Current Building and Safety staff do not have the experience necessary to quickly and accurately review structural evaluation reports for the largest, most complex buildings on the PSVB list. Similarly, staff do not have the experience necessary to perform Plan Checks of construction plans submitted for these types of large buildings. Consultant services may also be necessary to augment existing plan check staff if plan check volumes increase significantly due to retrofit submissions. As such, the Building and Safety Division is seeking to contract with consultants to assist with the tasks of structural report review and plan check review to ensure that 1) structural analyses are comprehensively reviewed by qualified individuals, and 2) the current level of plan check service to customers is not compromised. The full cost of these services would be recouped through seismic fees adopted in the FY2017-18 budget.', 'Background', 'Santa Monica’s Seismic Retrofit Program officially commenced on August 14, 2017, when the Building Officer first issued orders to building owners of 30 Concrete Tilt-Up buildings to seismically evaluate and, if necessary, retrofit their building(s). Orders will continue to go out in waves to the owners of various building types through August of this year.', 'The Building Officer’s order directs owners to perform a structural analysis of their building(s) by a licensed engineer or architect for the City’s review, pursuant to SMMC Section 8.58.030, to determine if the building meets the minimum earthquake standards specified in the City’s Seismic Retrofit laws. If not in compliance with the minimum earthquake standards, a structural retrofit of the building is required.', 'Fees to support the Seismic Retrofit program were established during the 2017 fee study.  Four new fees resulted from the study and were adopted by Resolution No. 11051 (CCS) during the June 27, 2017, budget adoption Council meeting (Attachment E). The intent of these fees is to make the Seismic Retrofit Program a full cost recovery program.', 'The four fees and their purpose are as follows:', '1) Seismic Retrofit Report Review – Covers cost of City staff time to review a structural report of a building subject to the Seismic Retrofit law.', '2) Seismic Retrofit Plan Check – Covers cost of City staff time, or outside consultant, to review a plan check submittal for a proposed retrofit of a building subject to Seismic Retrofit law.', '3) Seismic Retrofit Permit – Covers cost of retrofit permit issuance and subsequent City inspections associated with retrofit construction for a building subject to Seismic Retrofit ordinance.', '4) Seismic Retrofit Peer Review – Covers cost of peer review of a structural report by an outside agency for a building subject to the Seismic Retrofit law.', 'Discussion', 'The entire PSVB list encompasses just under 2,000 buildings. Non-Ductile Concrete (NDC) and Steel Moment Frame (SMF) buildings comprise roughly 140 of the overall total; however, they are the largest and most complex building types on the list. The submitted structural evaluation reports for these buildings must be reviewed by the City to determine whether or not the building in question needs to be retrofitted. There is not a sufficient amount of Building & Safety plan check staff with the technical expertise necessary to quickly and efficiently evaluate the very dense and highly technical reports for NDC and SMF building types. Therefore, outside consultant services are needed to perform these evaluations and make a recommendation to Building and Safety staff based on their review.', 'A similar situation will arise when NDC and SMF owners submit plans for a retrofit plan check review. The complexity of these building types demands a high level of structural expertise to thoroughly evaluate a plan submission. Additional consultant services will also be necessary to assist the City with the review of these plan checks.', 'The final round of Building Officer orders for the Seismic Retrofit Program is scheduled to be distributed to property owners on August 6, 2018. Property owners will have anywhere from two to twenty years (depending on the building type) from the date their order was issued to complete the retrofit of their building(s). It is anticipated that the increase in plan check submittals as a result of the retrofit plan submissions will necessitate additional reviewers to supplement the capacity that City plan check staff is able to accommodate without compromising a satisfactory level of service to the public. As such, consultant services will be required to perform plan check reviews and accommodate this additional plan check volume.', 'The 60 NDC and 78 SMF buildings on the PSVB list are required, pursuant to SMMC Chapters 8.76 and 8.80, to submit a structural evaluation report to the City within three years from the date of issuance of the Building Officer order (October 23, 2017). This assumes that approximately 140 structural reports will require review by consultants. Each report would be charged a $121.84 fee for staff processing when it is submitted, with an additional hourly review rate of $256.68 for the peer review by an engineer. Assuming that reports will take, on average, 35 hours to review (based on past experience), Building and Safety is requesting authority to award $1,250,000 to fund these reviews. All expenditures to consultants for these reviews would be recouped in-full through the established Seismic Retrofit fees. Staff recommends executing contracts with both Degenkolb Engineers and IDS Group to perform these structural evaluation report reviews. Having two firms available for this task gives the City flexibility in assigning the reviews and makes it possible to send reports to multiple firms if a high volume is received in a short period of time to ensure that turn-around times remain reasonable for customers.', 'Plan Check fees for seismic retrofit plan reviews would be charged in exactly the same way. Every submission will receive a $121.84 fee for intake, along with $256.84 per hour for review. NDC buildings have 10 years from October 23, 2017, to complete a retrofit, and SMF buildings have 20 years from the same date to complete construction. It is difficult to predict when these buildings will actually submit for plan check and initiate the construction phase of their retrofits, but staff does not anticipate many submissions in the first few years of the program. At this time, Building and Safety would like to request authority to award $250,000 to fund consultant plan check services to cover the review of these projects. This will allow any early plan checks submitted for NDC or SMF buildings to be reviewed, as well as provide funding to address any overflow of retrofit plan check submissions due to the Seismic Retrofit program. If a consistent increase in volume occurs, additional funding will be necessary to accommodate the increase and staff, as authorized by Council. Again, all expenditures for seismic retrofit plan checks to outside consultants would be entirely recouped through Seismic Retrofit Plan Check fees. Staff recommends executing contracts with both JAS Pacific and Interwest Consulting Group to perform the seismic retrofit plan check reviews for the same reasons stated above regarding structural evaluation report reviews.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In November 2017, the City published a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide both structural evaluation report peer review services and seismic retrofit plan check services to the Building and Safety Division in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. The City received 15 proposals. Proposals were evaluated and the respondents were ranked based on the criteria in SMMC Section 2.24.073 for selecting the best qualified person or firm. Firms had the option to submit only for structural evaluation report peer review, only retrofit plan check, or both. After considering the proposals, evaluators selected the top two firms for structural report review and the top two firms for plan check services based on overall qualifications.', 'The firms selected for structural report review are 1) Degenkolb Engineers and 2) IDS Group. The firms selected for plan check services are 1) JAS Pacific and 2) Interwest Consulting Group. All four companies specialize in the areas they were selected for and excel in at least three of the four major evaluation criteria: engineering experience, staff qualifications, record of success with past clients, and fee proposal.', 'Staff recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Degenkolb Engineers and IDS Group for structural report peer review services. Each agreement would be for an amount not to exceed $625,000 over a four year period. This would allow for any buildings needing extensions on their structural report submissions that may carry over beyond the three year deadline for submissions. Both companies would be assigned to peer review structural evaluation reports submitted to the Building and Safety Division as part of the Seismic Retrofit program. Staff also recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with JAS Pacific and Interwest Consulting Services for retrofit plan check services. Each agreement would be for an amount not to exceed $125,000 over a three year period. Both companies would be assigned to review seismic retrofit plans submitted to the Building and Safety Division for plan check review as part of the Seismic Retrofit Program', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreements to be awarded to Degenkolb Engineers, IDS Group, JAS Pacific, and Interwest Consulting Group are for an amount not to exceed $1,500,000. Funds of $408,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department. The agreements will be charged to account 01321.555060. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2860'}, {'Title': 'Award RFP# 126 to Westnet, Inc. for a Fire Station Alerting System.', 'Department': 'Fire Department', 'Sponsors': 'Chief Information Officer Joseph Cevetello', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': '1. Award RFP# 126 to Westnet, Inc. a California-based company for a Fire Station Alerting System.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Contractual Services Agreement with Westnet, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $800,000 for the initial purchase and installation.3. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Maintenance Agreement with Westnet, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $350,000 for maintenance of the system over a 5-year period with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Fire Department utilizes a Fire Station Alerting System to alert firefighters to respond to emergencies and routine calls for service. The Fire Station Alerting System is the primary method by which firefighters are alerted to respond to emergencies and is a mission critical component of the overall dispatch process. Implemented in 2009, the existing system is no longer supported by the manufacturer and does not offer certain advanced features such as enhanced night-vision lighting, zone-based alerting and integration with fire station automation systems. Staff recommends Council approve purchase of a new Fire Station Alerting System from Westnet, Inc and a five-year maintenance agreement in an amount not to exceed $1,150,000.', 'Background', 'As part of the process to return dispatching services from the Los Angeles City Fire Department to Santa Monica in 2009, it was necessary to install a new Fire Station Alerting System to replace the system provided and utilized by the City of Los Angeles.', 'On October 13, 2009, Council authorized the purchase of the Zetron Fire Station Alerting System from Advanced Electronics, Inc.', 'The current system has been utilized since 2009. The system has experienced several substantial failures over the last six months necessitating the use of backup alerting procedures while efforts were made to repair the system by the Information Services Department. The current system is no longer supported by the manufacturer and replacement parts are difficult to obtain and in some cases, no longer available.', 'Discussion', 'The National Fire Protection Agency (NFPA) publishes standards for Fire Departments to utilize when implementing programs and systems, including technology. The proposed new Fire Station Alerting would be fully compliant with NFPA requirements for station alerting systems including support for at least two disparate methods for the system to communicate with each fire station, backup power requirements, and system monitoring and alarms in the event of a system outage.', 'In addition, modern Fire Station Alerting Systems address firefighter health and safety by utilizing enhanced night-vision lighting, zone-based alerting to ensure that only crews assigned to incidents are alerted to respond, and integration with various fire station automation systems such as apparatus bay doors and cooking equipment.', 'The proposed new Fire Station Alerting System would integrate with the Fire Department’s Computer Aided Dispatch (CAD) system to allow automated processing and transfer of information from CAD to the Fire Station Alerting System for immediate alerting to the fire stations.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On July 24, 2017, the City published a Request for Proposal to furnish and provide a Fire Station Alerting System in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 1,414 vendors were notified, 34 vendors downloaded the bid. Two proposals were received and publicly opened on August 25, 2017. One proposal received was non-responsive because the vendor did not fulfill the Prevailing Wage requirements as specified in the RFP. The remaining proposal was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Based on these criteria, Westnet, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Westnet, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $1,150,000. Funds of $800,000 for the installation are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019147.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2863'}, {'Title': 'Renewal of Downtown Property-Based Assessment District', 'Department': 'Housing and Economic Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Authorize the City Manager to cast its ballots on behalf of City-owned properties in support of continuing the Downtown Property-Based Assessment District for an additional 10-year term; and 2) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute the renewal of the Amended and Reinstated Services Agreement with Downtown Santa Monica Inc. for an additional 10-year term.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The establishment of the Downtown Property-Based Assessment District (PBAD) has played a significant role in the success of Santa Monica’s Downtown. DTSM, which derives part of its revenue from the PBAD, provides enhanced maintenance, security, marketing and management that significantly improves the attractiveness of Santa Monica’s historic Downtown as a place to live, work, shop, dine and visit. In 2008, a majority vote by Downtown property owners favored the formation of a PBAD for a 20-year term, subject to the property owners reaffirming the value and utility of the district with a 10-year affirmative vote. Council is asked to authorize the City Manager to vote the City’s ballots for City-owned properties in favor of continuing the Downtown PBAD for an additional 10-year period. Staff also recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Fourth Amendment to Amended and Restated Services Agreement No. 9063 (CCS) with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) to renew the agreement for an additional 10-year term and modify any other related terms and conditions. Total City assessments are budgeted to be approximately $406,070 annually with increases of up to five percent per year.', 'Background', 'On March 25, 2008, Council approved a Downtown Management Plan (Management Plan) which was the basis for an assessment engineer’s report (Engineer’s Report) setting forth the mechanism for assessing property owners to raise funds (AttachmentA). OnJuly24,2008, after a majority vote in favor of the proposed assessment, Council adopted Resolution 10336 (CCS), which established the Downtown Property-Based Assessment District (PBAD) and authorized the levy and placement of assessments on property tax rolls for properties within the district (Attachment B). Assessment funds are used to provide enhanced services and activities within the PBAD, such as maintenance and ambassadors, which are in addition to the baseline services provided by the City. The authorizing documents approved by Council outline the district boundaries, services, budget, cost, formation, and duration. A 20-year district term was established subject to a 10-year majority vote by the property owners affirming the continuation of existing services.', 'The City entered into a services agreement (Services Agreement) with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) to define roles and responsibilities between the City and DTSM, and to delineate the collection and disbursement of assessment fees generated from the Downtown PBAD. The Services Agreement provides that the 10-year initial term of the agreement may be renewed for an additional 10-year period upon a majority vote in favor of extending the Downtown PBAD and Council approval.', 'The Downtown PBAD generally encompasses the core of the downtown area bounded roughly by Ocean Avenue to the west, 7th Street to the east, the Santa Monica Freeway to the south, and Wilshire Boulevard to the north. Properties within the boundaries are assessed based on the lot or building square footage (whichever is greater), the property’s location within one of four benefit zones, and the type of use/ownership (commercial, residential, governmental, and non-profit). The Downtown PBAD as originally established in 2008 was comprised of three benefit zones. In 2015, a fourth benefit zone was established through the Colorado Avenue Overlay Zone, which runs until 2028, coinciding with the end of the Downtown PBAD term. The Downtown PBAD is separate from the Lincoln Boulevard Property-Based Assessment District (Lincoln PBAD), which was also formed in 2015 and also runs until 2028.', 'DTSM, a 501(c) (3) non-profit organization, is under contract with the City to administer the assessment funds and manage a variety of programs, services, and operations to support economic stability and community life in Santa Monica’s Downtown. DTSM provides hospitality and maintenance services, programs a year-round calendar of community events including a popular seasonal ice rink, and promotes Downtown as a vibrant shopping, dining, and entertainment destination. DTSM is governed by a 13-member Board of Directors with six members appointed by the City Council, six elected by property owners, and one appointed by the City Manager.', 'Since formation of the Downtown PBAD, DTSM has funded programs that have improved the area and attracted residents, businesses, and visitors alike. Notable services include a maintenance program, which provides staffing 24 hours per day, 7days per week, a hospitality ambassador program, and enhanced marketing efforts and special events that help to promote the district. Attachment C produced by DTSM provides an overview of data demonstrating the measurable impacts of their operations, which have benefited Downtown and Santa Monica generally.', 'Discussion', 'Downtown property owners are being asked to consider only the continuation of district services under the existing Management Plan and Engineer’s Report. An assessment ballot initiative managed by the City is not required since there are no modifications to the district’s boundaries, assessment rate structure, governance, or other terms. Thepurpose of the 10-year vote is for the district’s property owners to affirm the services and assessments to be provided for the second 10-year term.', 'DTSM is administratively conducting the affirmative vote and is responsible for distributing and collecting the ballots, with the DTSM Board of Directors responsible for certifying the results. DTSM has retained Kristen Lowell Inc. (KLI), who was the consulting engineer on the Downtown PBAD’s formation, to advise on conducting the vote and to provide independent verification in tabulating the ballots and presenting the official results. Under KLI’s guidance, DTSM will follow the same internal balloting process used to elect property owner representatives to their board.', 'On February 15, 2018, DTSM mailed ballots and informational materials to property owners within the Downtown PBAD boundaries. Ballots are due on March 20, 2018, and the results will be tabulated by KLI and presented to DTSM’s Board of Directors at its March 22, 2018 meeting. In conjunction with the vote, DTSM proactively outreached to property owners and is holding office hours when ballots can be returned or concerns can be addressed directly. Property owners receive one vote for each assessment dollar paid, with ballots weighted in accordance with FY 2017-18 assessments. For the district to continue, the majority of ballots returned, as weighted by assessments, must be in favor of continuing the Downtown PBAD for another 10 years.', 'City’s Ballots', 'Council is asked to authorize the City Manager to cast ballots on behalf of several City-owned properties located within the boundaries of the Downtown PBAD. There are 31 City-owned parcels within the district that represent approximately 9.35 percent of the assessment vote. City properties mainly include the public parking structures and surface lots, the 4th/5th Street and Arizona Avenue site, the Santa Monica Main Library, and property adjacent to the Expo terminus station, as well as other properties listed on Attachment D.', 'Next Steps', 'If the Downtown PBAD property owners affirm the district’s 10-year extension, staff recommends Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Fourth Modification to the Services Agreement with DTSM to renew the term for an additional 10 years and modify any other required terms and conditions. However, if the majority of votes do not support the Downtown PBAD continuation, then programs such as enhanced maintenance and ambassador services would not be able to continue after May 2019 with the termination of the assessment funding and the end of the Services Agreement term.', 'Any subsequent renewal of the district would require a new management plan, engineer’s report, and ballot process, as would any new or increased assessments that are not consistent with the provisions of the adopted Management Plan. The duration of the Downtown PBAD 20-year term limit coincides with the expiration of the Colorado Overlay and the Lincoln PBAD in 2028. At that time, the City and DTSM could initiate proceedings to form a new PBAD that combines the Downtown PBAD and the Lincoln PBAD into a single assessment district that would serve Santa Monica’s Downtown.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'Should the Downtown property owners vote in favor of continuing the Downtown PBAD, the City would continue to pay property assessments for City-owned properties for an additional 10 years. In FY 2017-18, DTSM received $4,343,973 in property assessments within the Downtown PBAD. Of that, assessments for City-owned properties totaled approximately $406,070, which represents 9.35 percent of Downtown PBAD assessment funds. City assessments are funded from Housing and Economic Development Account 01274.577840 - Assessments for City-owned Property. To keep pace with the consumer price index and program costs, annual assessments may be increased up to five percent, subject to annual review and approval by DTSM’s Board of Directors. Additionally, the City’s annual assessment expenditures may vary depending on property acquisition and disposition over the next 10 years.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2874'}, {'Title': 'Resolution Regarding Offshore Oil Drilling, Exploration and Fracking', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached resolution reaffirming the City’s position against offshore oil and gas drilling, seismic oil exploration, oil and gas leasing, hydraulic fracturing (fracking) and other well stimulation in federal and state waters off the Pacific coast.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In response to a U.S. Department of the Interior proposal to open U.S. offshore coastal waters, including the waters off California, to oil and gas exploration, Council directed staff to draft a resolution opposing this proposal at its February 27 meeting. Staff recommends Council adopt the attached resolution, which reaffirms the City’s past policy actions opposing fracking and oil drilling, and calls for a ban on new offshore oil and gas drilling, seismic oil exploration, fracking, and other well stimulation in federal and state waters off the Pacific coast and opposes new federal oil and gas leasing in all U.S. waters. The City’s lobbyist will advance the City’s position in Washington, D.C. as necessary and appropriate based on Council’s policy direction.', 'Background', 'Council has adopted similar resolutions in recent years. On November 12, 2012, Council adopted a resolution in support of a moratorium on fracking in California. On December 9, 2014, Council adopted a resolution opposing oil drilling in Hermosa Beach which could negatively impact Santa Monica Bay. In its 2016 State of California Legislative Platform, Council noted its support for State bonds, funding and legislation aimed at both reducing existing, and banning new oil and gas extraction.', 'Offshore oil drilling and production have been shown to put environmental and public health at risk from oil spills, increased air and water pollution, intense ocean noise and other potential damage. These environmental and public health impacts can also negatively affect local and regional economies in coastal areas. The 1969 Santa Barbara oil spill, which to date is the third largest oil spill in U.S. waters, impacted over 40 miles of coastline from Goleta to Ventura, and resulted in the death of over 3,600 sea birds and hundreds of marine mammals including dolphins, elephant seals and sea lions. The economic impacts from the oil spill to Santa Barbara County were severe, as all commercial fishing was suspended in the affected area, and tourism to the County suffered a precipitous drop. More recently, in 2015 a pipeline servicing offshore oil platforms off Santa Barbara County burst and impacted the same area of coast, killing more wildlife and negatively impacting recreational and commercial activities in the Santa Barbara area.', 'Hydraulic fracturing (commonly known as “fracking”) is a technique that is used to increase oil and gas production by injecting water and chemicals at high pressures into the ground to create fractures in subsurface rock to release petroleum or natural gas for extraction. Negative impacts related to fracking include impacts to air quality, generation of polluted wastewater and excessive water use required by the fracking process.', 'Discussion', 'In January, the U.S. Department of the Interior Bureau of Ocean Energy Management released a Draft Proposed Plan (DPP) for the 2019-2024 Offshore Oil and Gas Leasing Program, which would make 90 percent of the U.S. offshore continental shelf, including coastal waters off of the coast of Southern California, open to oil and gas exploration. The DPP includes 47 potential offshore lease sales including six new lease sales off the California coast. There have been no new lease sales in the Pacific region (which includes all of the coastal waters off of California, Oregon and Washington) since 1984. The comment period for the DPP is open through March 9, 2018.', 'The attached resolution reaffirms the City’s position against offshore oil drilling and fracking. Specifically, the resolution calls for a ban on new offshore oil and gas drilling, seismic oil exploration, fracking, and other well stimulation in federal and state waters off the Pacific coast and opposes new federal oil and gas leasing in all U.S. waters.', 'To date the Governors of California, Oregon and Washington as well as 33 California cities and counties, including the City and County of San Francisco, Santa Barbara County, Ventura County, and the cities of Santa Barbara, Goleta, Malibu, Manhattan Beach, and Los Angeles have formally opposed the DPP proposal for new federal offshore oil and gas leases in the Pacific Ocean, and many have also called for a ban in offshore hydraulic fracturing or “fracking.”', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2923'}], [{'Title': 'Downtown Parking Management Pricing Strategies Study Session', 'Department': 'Parking Operations (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '04. Study Sessions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Direct staff to draft an ordinance modifying the Santa Monica Municipal Code (“SMMC”) Section 3.16 related to on-street parking management and Section 3.04 related to the establishment of off-street public parking fees; 2. Review and provide direction to staff on the proposed parking management strategies consistent with the policies in the Land Use and Circulation Element (“LUCE”) to further manage congestion, improve public parking services, address downtown residents’ parking desires, and encourage shifts toward more sustainable modes of transportation; 3. Direct staff to report annually on the State of Citywide Parking, including a financial and operational analysis as well as recommendations for future year parking rate adjustments.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Parking policy and parking facilities have been integral to the evolution of Santa Monica, particularly our vibrant Downtown and three miles of beachfront. The City owns and/or operates 43 parking facilities with approximately 14,000 available public parking spaces. These parking facilities help support the diverse local economy by providing convenient access to housing, retail centers, hotels and restaurants, employment, a public beach and community parks, education and recreation centers, special events, and municipal services and social service agencies alike.', 'Both policy and the market for parking are changing, however. There is increasing recognition of the high economic and environmental cost of subsidized parking, and growing recognition that in a region where there are seven parking spaces for every car that greater attention must be paid to the efficient utilization of parking.', 'Council adopted policies outlined in the Land Use and Circulation Element (“LUCE”) and Downtown Community Plan (“DCP”) suggest that parking pricing is one of the most effective strategies to reduce traffic congestion, encourage the shift towards alternative modes of transportation, and facilitate a more efficient use of existing parking supply. Based on a comprehensive analysis of the aggregated parking transaction and occupancy data, staff seeks Council direction on employing a demand-responsive parking pricing strategy in the Downtown core and peripheral parking facilities to proactively manage the various weekday and weekend demands, including traffic, congestion and circulation challenges. These policy shifts are part of the City’s larger focus on the Strategic Goal of creating a new model of mobility, one that Council reaffirmed during its wide-ranging February 27, 2018 study session, emphasizing the importance of aligning our policies and investments to support a more livable community. In addition, these concepts reflect changing mobility patterns as alternate travel modes including ride share companies, bike share, electric scooters, and the advent of autonomous vehicles reshape how people travel, with the apparent net impact of reducing and/or redistributing locational parking demand.', 'Staff believes that creating a weekday versus weekend pricing structure throughout the Downtown and peripheral facilities would better align pricing with demand to ensure that there is at least 15% availability at all times in all facilities, and allow the City to maintain sufficient ongoing revenues to fund parking, traffic and circulation programs, and other essential public services. Staff recommends that Council review and provide comment on the proposed parking management strategy options, and direct staff to return to Council in the future with the necessary resolutions to adopt revised transient parking rates and permit fees.', 'Additionally, staff recommends that Council direct staff to draft an ordinance for first reading modifying the SMMC Section 3.16.170 and Section 3.04.035 to streamline the process and modernize the municipal code to reflect the current practice of setting on-street and off-street parking rates based on the policies and goals outlined in the LUCE and DCP.', 'Over the previous five months, Staff conducted study sessions with various stakeholders throughout the City to ensure that the needs of the communities represented by the respective stakeholders were considered in the overall proposed parking management strategies. Feedback from each body is incorporated in the strategies outlined in the Discussion Section of the staff report.', 'Background', 'On May 11, 2010, Council adopted a resolution establishing new parking rates for off-street parking as a first phase in implementing the 2009 Walker Parking Study recommendations. The Walker Parking Study found that there was an imbalance in pricing between the different parking facilities within Downtown resulting in the unintended consequence of putting visitors, employees, and transient and monthly parkers in competition for the most convenient and often least expensive spaces while other spaces in the City remained unoccupied. Walker Parking consultants provided recommendations consistent with the LUCE to better manage parking demand and maximize efficiency of the public parking supply in Downtown Santa Monica. The Walker Parking Study recommended that the City:', '· Increase on-street and off-street public parking rates in the Downtown to more efficiently and effectively utilize existing public and private parking resources to meet parking needs, thereby creating greater availability of parking for visitors in the Downtown', '· Use increased parking revenues to enhance parking operations, parking technology, wayfinding, parking occupancy assessments, and capital repairs and replacements', '· Review parking occupancies regularly and adjust parking rates to encourage optimal use of public parking resources', 'On July 10, 2012, Council adopted a resolution establishing new parking fees at citywide on-street parking meters, off-street parking facilities, and beach parking lots, including a reduction in the Downtown grace period from two hours to 90 minutes. These changes were informed by a parking rate study conducted by Walker Parking Consultants in 2012, consistent with the LUCE and the 2009 Walker Parking Study with the continued goal of:', '· Managing parking demand to ensure availability in all locations and better use of underutilized parking resources', '· Identifying the relationship between the pricing of public parking, private parking, adjacent land uses and parking demand', '· Reviewing parking occupancies and adjust parking rates to encourage optimal use of public parking resources', '· Developing an objective, technical and transparent process by which to set public parking rates', 'On May 10, 2016, Council adopted a resolution establishing revised parking rates for the Civic Center and Downtown parking facilities to address increased high weekday occupancies and discourage potential “park and ride” activity due to the arrival of the Expo Light Rail. Staff anticipated that the rate increase would result in an additional $4.2 million in ongoing revenues beginning in FY 2016-17 based on utilization rates at that time and some attrition in transient transactions because of the higher rates. Staff monitored parking occupancies over the course of the first year of Expo Light Rail service. Attachment A includes a detailed year over year analysis of transactions, utilization, parking duration and peak occupancies for each parking facility.', 'Discussion', 'Parking policy is ultimately driven by the City’s larger policy goals, including supporting the Mobility Strategic Goal and contributing to the City’s Framework of Economic Opportunity and fiscal sustainability. This report seeks direction for staff to undertake a transition in parking policy that involves a range of interrelated changes. Accordingly, this report breaks down the concepts via the following sections:', '1. Analysis of Parking Occupancies, Transactions, and Durations', '2. Proposed Downtown and Peripheral Parking Facility Pricing Strategies', '3. Other Items for Council Consideration', '4. Alternative Pricing Strategies for Future Consideration', '5. Annual State of the Citywide Parking Report', '6. Public Outreach and Communication with Boards and Commissions', 'Section 1 – Analysis of Parking Occupancies, Transactions, and Durations (Sessions)', 'In FY 2015-16, there were 7.6 million total (transient and permit) parking transactions in the Downtown core and peripheral facilities discussed in this staff report. In FY 2016-17, there were 7.1 million total parking transactions, resulting in a 0.5 million, or 7%, reduction when compared to the prior year. The data included in Attachment A shows that the parking rate increase in FY 2016-17, in conjunction with increased popularity of Transportation Network Companies (“TNC”) and the increased demand in Expo Light Rail ridership (Attachment B) had a direct impact on parking behavior in the City, particularly successful in achieving the following goals:', '· Reducing total parking sessions in these Downtown core facilities', '· Discouraging park and ride activity in the Downtown core facilities', '· Reducing high weekday peak occupancies in most of the Downtown parking facilities', '· Freeing up parking for short-term parking for residents and Downtown visitors', '· Encouraging parkers to utilize less expensive parking facilities on the periphery of the Downtown core, or consider shifting to alternative modes of transportation', 'The reduction in total parking transactions continued into the first half of FY 2017-18. In light of this, on February 13, 2018, staff included a $3.9 million, or 7%, reduction in projected General Fund parking revenues as part of the Midyear Financial Status Update to Council. The midyear budget adjustment corrects the previous ongoing revenue projection related to the FY 2016-17 parking rate increase and accounts for the current shift in how staff believes people travel into the Downtown, including the following:', '· Expo Light Rail ridership realized a significant increase when it began six-minute headway service in March 2017. The City’s Traffic Management Division also implemented a signal priority protocol for Expo trains around this time, giving the rail “the green light” versus surrounding traffic. Expo now has a significant time and frequency advantage it did not have prior to March 2017. Additional information related to Expo Light Rail Ridership Statistics are included in Attachment B.', '· The Police Department worked out “geo-fenced” customer pick up solutions with Lyft and with Uber. As such, these TNC operators have streamlined their operations making them even more attractive for use in our downtown, and along Main Street. The significance is that TNC customers are able to get greater access to downtown and Main Street venues than ever before. This provides a competitive time and money advantage over the pricing and location of our parking structures and lots.', '· The nature of downtown shopping is changing significantly. As mentioned in the Midyear Financial Status Update, many customers are switching from visiting brick and mortar stores and making bulk purchases to on-line shopping.', 'While there were also slight decreases in the average peak occupancy for weekdays and weekends in some of the Downtown and peripheral facilities during the first half of FY 2017-18, other parking facilities either maintained existing peak occupancies or realized increases primarily due to their proximity and accessibility to the Downtown.', 'Section 2 – Proposed Downtown and Peripheral Parking Facility Pricing Strategies', 'The LUCE and the DCP include specific language about how to better manage the parking resource and achieve greater mode shift to other more sustainable transportation options. The LUCE suggests managing parking in Santa Monica as a limited resource, ensuring that adequate parking is available for residents, employees, and visitors by establishing an availability target of at least 15% of spaces in every lot and garage at all times. It also suggests that the City should adjust parking prices and the hours of enforcement to meet this target, varying by time of day, season, and location. Moreover, the LUCE recognizes that parking provides a substantial positive revenue stream to the City that should continue well into the future. The DCP echoes many of the core parking management principles of the LUCE, including maximizing the use of the Citywide parking inventory of available spaces and actively reviewing parking data to address occupancy, traffic, access and circulation challenges. The DCP goes a step further and recommends an integration of public and private spaces into a shared network with real-time information to further inform policy decisions.', 'Setting sensible parking pricing is one of the most effective strategies to manage demand, ensure parking availability at all times, maximize the use of underutilized facilities, reduce traffic congestion, and encourage the use of more sustainable modes of transportation. Staff included three strategy options for Council consideration, review, and discussion. Based on the Council adopted policies mentioned above, staff seeks Council direction on the concept of implementing a demand-responsive parking pricing strategy that sets different rate structures on weekdays and weekends based on their different demand patterns.', 'The proposed pricing adjustments included in this staff report would continue the multipronged strategy of:', '· Balancing the needs of the community, including residents, businesses, employees, and visitors alike, with a focus on establishing a new rate structure that welcomes and favors residents as our priority users into the Downtown area,', '· Facilitating desired turnover and incentivizing longer term parking sessions outside of the Downtown core,', '· Encouraging the mode shift towards sustainable transportation options, and', '· Maintaining sufficient revenues to reinvest in traffic, parking, and other essential public services programs.', 'To achieve the aforementioned objectives, staff asks that Council consider and provide feedback on the following range of choices included in Options A, B, and C:', '1. Extend the pilot Downtown employee discount validation parking program for one additional year, through June 30, 2019', '2. Use shorter pricing periods, ensuring minimal impact on short-term parking sessions and progressively increasing the incremental parking rates for successive time periods. This is designed to encourage long-term parking sessions in the less expensive parking facilities outside of the Downtown core, or to encourage consideration of mode shift', '3. Set monthly parking permit fees to 11 times the transient weekday daily maximum rate, limiting monthly permit parking holders’ access to one or two facilities', '4. Reduce the free “grace period” in the Downtown core facilities, Parking Structures 1-8 and Ken Edwards Center, from 90 minutes to 60 minutes', '5. Reduce the free “grace period” in Parking Structure 9, a non-Downtown core facility located north of Wilshire Blvd., from 90 minutes to 30 minutes', 'Option A', 'Downtown Core Parking Structures 1 and 3 – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'Parking Structures 1 and 3 are both located on 4th Street between Wilshire Blvd. and Santa Monica Blvd. with a combined inventory of 674 total parking spaces. Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for Parking Structures 1 and 3 for weekdays and weekends:', 'Facility', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'PS 1', '91%', '85%', '82%', '99%', '96%', '88%', 'PS 3', '100%', '99%', '95%', '100%', '100%', '95%', 'Both facilities regularly reach weekday and weekend peak occupancies between 11 a.m. and noon, maintain peak occupancies through 8 p.m., and do not begin to significantly taper off until after 9 p.m. Staff believes that the excessively high weekday and weekend peak occupancies are due to the limited capacities and proximity of these two facilities to the Third Street Promenade and surrounding businesses. Additionally, these are the first two parking facilities introduced to travelers along the Wilshire corridor when headed south on 4th street.', 'Historical City pricing strategies suggest these facilities be priced similarly to the other facilities within the Downtown core to avoid customer confusion and reduce circulation and congestion problems related to simply shifting travel from one location to another. However, based on the data and price sensitivity, staff seeks Council direction on setting parking rates for these facilities slightly higher than the rest of the parking portfolio to respond to the specific demand in these facilities with a goal of ensuring at least 15% availability at all times. Staff anticipates that this pricing strategy will shift parkers to other less expensive facilities within the Downtown core or periphery, thereby facilitating a more efficient use of the overall Downtown parking availability.', 'Downtown Core Parking Structures 2, and 4 through 8 – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'Parking Structures 2, and 4 through 8 are located within the Downtown core between Wilshire to the north, Colorado to the south, 4th Street to the east, and 2nd Street to the west. Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for the aforementioned facilities:', 'Location', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'PS 2', '73%', '62%', '58%', '69%', '56%', '48%', 'PS 4', '83%', '76%', '71%', '81%', '73%', '71%', 'PS 5', '70%', '61%', '62%', '70%', '70%', '67%', 'PS 6', '79%', '70%', '76%', '84%', '77%', '77%', 'PS 7', '70%', '68%', '62%', '84%', '82%', '75%', 'PS 8', '50%', '55%', '56%', '76%', '77%', '80%', 'Most of these Downtown parking facilities regularly reached weekday peak occupancies around noon and maintained peak occupancy through 8 p.m. before sharply tapering off after 8 p.m. On the weekends, most of these facilities regularly reached peak occupancies by noon and maintain peak occupancy to as late as 9 p.m. before sharply tapering off in the late night.', 'Staff believes that setting the parking rates for these facilities slightly lower than the proposed rates for Parking Structures 1 and 3 will:', '· Account for anticipated increase in parkers shifting from parking in Parking Structures 1 and 3 due to the rate differential', '· Improve traffic circulation within the Downtown core', '· Take a proactive approach in better managing congestion while ensuring 15% availability within all of the Downtown core facilities at all times', 'Ken Edwards Center Parking Structure – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'The Ken Edwards Center Public Parking Structure is located on 4th Street between Broadway and Colorado Avenue with 98 available parking spaces. These parking spaces are available to all on a first come first served basis. Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for this facility:', 'Location', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'KEC', '79%', '78%', '76%', '15%', '15%', '17%', 'The Ken Edwards Center Parking Facility regularly reached weekday peak occupancy around 11 a.m., slowly tapering off through 3 p.m., and then experienced a sharp decline after 4 p.m. Staff believes that this is due to the various programs offered at the Ken Edwards Community Center during the week. Parking in this facility is subsidized by the General Fund through free parking validations provided to Ken Edwards Community Center program users. On the weekends, the facility is significantly underutilized, reaching peak occupancy around 17% at noon, and gradually emptying throughout the afternoon. Staff believes that the low weekend usage is due to limited weekend programs offered at the Ken Edwards Community Center as well as a lack of permanent signage indicating this is a public parking facility. Staff recently installed temporary signage on the weekends to direct traffic into the facility to temporarily address this issue. As a result, there has been a slight uptick in transactions and occupancy in this facility.', 'Based on the occupancy and transaction data, staff recommends increasing the weekday daily maximum rate from $17.50 to $20.00, and reducing the weekend daily maximum rate from $17.50 to $10.00. Staff believes that the proposed rate structure aligns with the demand for this facility, ensuring that there will not be any weekday parking spillover from other Downtown core parking facilities due to price differential. Staff anticipates that the proposed weekday rate would ensure 15% availability at all times for Ken Edwards Center program users. The proposed reduction in the weekend rate is to maximize the use of this underutilized facility on the weekend.', 'Downtown Peripheral Parking Structures 9 and 10 – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'Parking Structure 9 is located outside of the Downtown core on 4th Street just north of Wilshire Blvd. and shares an alley on Third Court with Parking Structure 10, for a combined inventory of 381 total spaces between the two facilities. Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for these two facilities:', 'Location', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'PS 9', '81%', '64%', '69%', '66%', '60%', '56%', 'PS 10', '55%', '48%', '44%', '80%', '70%', '62%', 'Staff believes that pricing these two facilities similarly will help balance the demand between them and reduce on-street traffic in the Downtown core as part of the overall peripheral parking pricing strategy. Staff anticipates that the proposed rate structure will ensure at least 15% availability as these are the two most northern parking facilities in the entire portfolio and are likely to attract new parkers shifting from Parking Structures 1 and 3, and parkers shifting from the Downtown core due to the rate differential and easier accessibility from Wilshire Blvd.', 'Downtown Peripheral Parking - Civic Center Lot and Structure – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for the two facilities:', 'Location', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'Civic Lot', '70%', '50%', '43%', '43%', '34%', '28%', 'Civic Structure', '84%', '60%', '54%', '60%', '43%', '37%', 'The proposed changes reflect adjustments to the weekday and weekend incremental rate at the Civic Center parking facilities without adjusting the grace period, and without adjusting the weekday or weekend daily maximum rate. The proposed incremental rate adjustments are simply correcting the imbalance in the Downtown core incremental parking rates versus non-Downtown core facilities. It currently costs more to park in the weekday at the Civic Center for three hours ($5.50) than it does in the Downtown core facilities ($3.10). The proposed changes keeps long-term parking sessions in these facilities less expensive than the Downtown core, thus continuing to support the holistic parking strategy that ensures maximum use of all parking facilities in the citywide parking portfolio. Staff will return to Council with the results of the recently begun Walker Parking Consultants Civic Center parking impact study and a broader Civic Center parking policy discussion in the future.', 'Downtown Periphery Parking - Main Library Structure – Current and Proposed', 'The proposed incremental parking rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment C.', 'The Main Library Parking Structure is located on Santa Monica Blvd. between 6th Street and 7th Street with 529 available parking spaces. Below is a table outlining the average peak occupancies for the Main Library Parking Structure:', 'Location', 'FY 15/16 Weekday', 'FY 16/17 Weekday', 'FY 17/18 Weekday', 'FY 15/16 Weekend', 'FY 16/17 Weekend', 'FY 17/18 Weekend', 'Main Library PS', '77%', '83%', '71%', '52%', '51%', '45%', 'The Main Library Parking Structure regularly reached peak occupancy around 11 a.m., maintained peak occupancy through 6 p.m. before sharply tapering off in the evening. The high weekday peak occupancy can be attributed to long-term weekday parkers taking advantage of the cheaper all day parking rate ($10.00), when compared to the Downtown all day parking rate ($17.50) and Civic Center all day parking rate ($14.00). Staff anticipates parkers will shift from the Downtown core to the Library due to the price differential; therefore, the proposed rate structure would allow the Main Library Parking Structure to service these parkers and ensure 15% availability at all times.', 'Monthly Parking Permits for Downtown and Peripheral Parking Facilities', 'Parking Facility', 'Current Monthly Rate', 'Proposed Monthly Rate', 'Difference ($)', 'Difference (%)', 'Parking Structures 1 and 3', '$176.00', '$275.00', '$99.00', '56%', 'Parking Structures 2, 4 through 8', '$176.00', '$220.00', '$44.00', '25%', 'Ken Edwards Center', '$176.00', '$220.00', '$44.00', '25%', 'Parking Structure 9', '$176.00', '$187.00', '$11.00', '6%', 'Parking Structure 10', '$132.00', '$187.00', '$55.00', '42%', 'Civic Center Parking Lot and Structure [1]', '$160.00', '$160.00', '$0.00', '0%', 'Main Library', '$82.50', '$154.00', '$71.50', '87%', 'Affordable Housing [2]', '$65.00', '$65.00', '$0.00', '0%', 'Currently, the “anytime access” Downtown monthly parking permits for Parking Structures 1-9 and Ken Edwards Center are $176 per month, which is equivalent to about 10 times the weekday daily maximum transient parking rate of $17.50. As most full-time employees work an average of 22 days per month, this effectively represents 12 days of discounted or subsidized parking for monthly permit holders.', 'Staff recommends increasing the monthly parking permit rate to 11 times the weekday daily maximum rate of the respective facilities, in an effort to balance the demand of regular long-term Downtown employees with the need to ensure parking availability for transient, Santa Monica residents, and visitors who frequent Downtown. The proposed monthly permit rates would also create a rate structure that is in alignment with LUCE, DCP goals, and Council policy. This action allows complete transparency of the hidden subsidy provided with monthly parking. Setting the monthly parking permit rates to 11 times the weekday daily maximum rate effectively represents a 50% discount or subsidy for monthly parking permit holders. As stated in the LUCE, “unrealized revenues related to subsidized parking is money that could otherwise be used for capital repairs and operating cost of providing parking and incentives for alternative modes of transportation.”', 'Staff recommends a gradual and well broadcasted phasing in of the monthly parking permit increases over the course of next fiscal year for Parking Structures 1 and 3, Parking Structure 10, and the Main Library Parking Structure. This would allow staff time to conduct outreach to the impacted customers and provide alternative parking options, if necessary, in other facilities based on a review of transactions and durations in the other facilities.', 'Option B', 'Option B reflects a more moderate increase to the parking rates in the parking facilities, as outlined below:', 'Parking Facility', 'Current Monthly Rate', 'Proposed Monthly Rate', 'Difference ($)', 'Difference (%)', 'Parking Structures 1 and 3', '$176.00', '$220.00', '$44.00', '25%', 'Parking Structures 2, 4 through 8', '$176.00', '$187.00', '$11.00', '6%', 'Ken Edwards Center', '$176.00', '$187.00', '$11.00', '6%', 'Parking Structure 9', '$176.00', '$187.00', '$11.00', '6%', 'Parking Structure 10', '$132.00', '$187.00', '$55.00', '42%', 'Civic Center Parking Lot and Structure', '$160.00', '$160.00', '$0.00', '0%', 'Main Library', '$82.50', '$132.00', '$49.50', '60%', 'Affordable Housing', '$65.00', '$65.00', '$0.00', '0%', 'The detailed rate tables and graphs are included in Attachment D.', 'Option C', 'Council could consider implementing some of the proposed rate changes in Option A or Option B in phases, including adopting some of the proposed rate changes without any adjustments to the grace periods at this time. Depending on the guidance provided by Council at this study session, staff will return to Council with any necessary ordinance and/or resolutions in the future.', 'Rate Survey of Privately-owned Parking Facilities in the City of Santa Monica', 'Staff conducted a survey of parking rates for privately owned parking facilities within the City of Santa Monica, as these facilities directly affect parking demand and traffic circulation in the City. Attachment E includes a rate graph of six privately owned parking facilities and their respective weekday parking rates. Most of these private parking facilities reach a weekday daily maximum parking rate between $20.00 and $22.50 at three hours of parking, and none of them provides free grace periods without validation to their customers. These same private parking facilities have a flat weekend rate ranging from $6 to 12 upon entry.', 'Staff believes that the proposed parking rate adjustments to the City facilities included in this staff report take into account the market conditions, are aligned with Council adopted policies and parking management strategies, and are appropriately priced to ensure that there is not an unintended consequence of parking spillover to City facilities due to pricing imbalances between public and private parking facilities.', 'Section 3 – Other Items for Council Consideration', '3A – Ordinance', 'Section 3.16.170 of the SMMC governs the process in which on-street parking meter rates can be adjusted, including specific target occupancy rates, the amount and frequency of rate changes, the amount in which and the minimum and maximum range in which on-street meter rates can be adjusted. This policy and process is outdated and does not align with other provisions in the municipal code, particularly Section 3.04.035 that allows off-street parking rates to be established and changed from time to time via resolution. Staff recommends streamlining the process and modernizing the municipal code to reflect the current practice of setting on-street and off-street parking rates based on policies and goals outlined in the LUCE and DCP. As part of a holistic parking management strategy, on-street parking rates should be set in tandem with off-street parking rates to facilitate the turnover of on-street parking spaces more frequently and making them available for short-term use, directing traffic off the streets into the parking facilities, and ensuring at least 15% availability at all times.', '3B – Adjust Free Disabled Placard Parking Policy in Off-Street Parking Facilities', 'Council adopted a policy via resolution to provide free parking for vehicles displaying ADA placards for the following on-street parking meters and off-street City parking facilities:', '· On-street parking meters (in conformance with State law)', '· Preferential parking zones 1-5 (in conformance with State law)', '· Main Library Parking Structure', '· Main Library Parking Surface Lot', '· Civic Center Parking Structure and Parking Lot (except during capacity events)', '· Beach Parking Lots (South, Central, and North)', '· Pier Deck Parking Lot', '· Parking Structure 10', '· Main Street Parking Lots (Lots 9, 10, 11, and 26)', '· Mid-City Parking Lots (Lots 7, 8, and 12)', '· Downtown Parking Lots (Lots 27, 28, 29, and 30)', 'Staff recommends adjusting this policy to eliminate free ADA parking for the Main Library Parking Structure and Parking Structure 10 as these facilities have higher average peak occupancies than some of the other parking facilities in the overall City parking portfolio. Additionally, Parking Structure 10 has a total of 81 parking spaces, two of which are reserved for ADA parking. By charging for ADA parking in these specific facilities, ADA parking spaces will become more available to residents and visitors by discouraging long-term transient parking and “storage parking” in these spaces.', 'This proposed adjustment was discussed with stakeholder representatives of the Commission for the Senior Community and the Disabilities Commission.', '3C – Adjust Rate for Annual Senior Beach Parking Permit', 'The annual Senior Beach parking permit allows California residents, ages 62 and over, to park at all Beach parking lots (excluding Pier Deck) during posted time limits of sunrise to sunset. The annual permit fee is $2.20 and is valid from April 1 to March 31. There are currently 3,000 permits made available to eligible California residents, with 42% of which are purchased by Santa Monica residents while the remaining 58% purchased by non-Santa Monica residents.', 'Below are the current rates for an annual Senior Beach parking permit in the following neighboring beach cities:', '· Los Angeles County Beaches and Harbor Senior Parking Permit - $25', '· Orange County Beach Parking Pass for Seniors and Disabled - $35', '· Long Beach Day Parking Pass for Seniors - $75', '· Huntington Beach Senior Parking Pass - $75', 'Staff recommends adjusting the rates to $25 to align with Los Angeles County Beaches and Harbor rates (lowest rate amongst the neighboring beach cities). This proposed pricing change was discussed with stakeholder representatives of the Commission for the Senior Community and the Disabilities Commission.', 'Section 4 – Alternative Pricing Strategies for Future Consideration', 'By way of background, below are some of the commonly used demand-responsive parking pricing strategies employed by various agencies to ensure availability at all times in their facilities:', 'Congestion Pricing – is a demand-side solution of setting prices to reduce parking, traffic and congestion during high peak occupancy or rush hours. This pricing method is supposed to encourage users who can be flexible in their usage times to shift their use away from peak periods to times when it is less expensive. Below are some of the congestion pricing options:', '· Time of Day Pricing (“Time Bands”) – set parking rates based on peak parking demand patterns (i.e. cheaper parking during low-demand morning hours, increased parking rates during high-demand afternoon hours, and reduce parking rates for low-demand evening hours)', '· Day of Week Pricing – sets parking rates based on the different demand patterns during weekday and weekends', '· Progressive (“Length of Stay”) Parking Pricing – sets parking rates to facilitate a desired rate of turnover, maintain rates for desired short-term parking at a lower rate and then escalate rates with time', 'Dynamic Pricing – is another demand-side solution that sets pricing based on real-time changes in the market. This pricing strategy would allow the City to increase rates when demand is high and lower rates when demand is lower based on real-time occupancies in each of the facilities. This would require a significant investment in new parking technologies and systems and each of the various parking and traffic systems would need to interface with each other in real-time to supply the necessary data to facilitate this pricing strategy. This strategy is not proposed for Santa Monica parking facilities at this time.', 'Section 5 – Annual State of the Citywide Parking Report', 'Staff recommends that Council direct staff to report annually on the State of Citywide parking. This report would including the following:', '· Analysis of parking revenues, including utilization and availability data by location, day of week, and parking type', '· Analysis of parking operating and capital expenditures, including progress reports on capital improvement projects', '· Operational assessment and services update', '· Parking asset management update including planned equipment replacement', '· Emerging parking trends and technologies', '· Key accomplishments', '· Various challenges of Citywide parking operations and proposed opportunities for improvement', '· Future year parking rate recommendations based on data analytics and Council adopted parking policies', '· Progress towards meeting Council strategic goals', 'Section 6 – Public Outreach and Communication with Boards and Commissions', 'Staff conducted study sessions with the following Boards and Commissions to ensure that the needs of the communities represented by the respective commissions were considered with the proposals included in this staff report:', '· Commission for the Senior Community – October 2017', '· Santa Monica Library Board – October 2017', '· Chamber of Commerce – November 2017', '· Disabilities Commission – November 2017', '· Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. – November 2017', '· Santa Monica Travel and Tourism – January 2018', 'Official feedback from each body was thoroughly considered and incorporated herein.', 'Attachment F includes formal responses from the respective bodies. Staff will return to the Boards and Commissions with additional study sessions to further discuss these topics and inform these stakeholders of broader parking management strategies.', 'Recommended Next Steps', 'Staff recommends the adoption of specific rate changes consistent with Option A to address Council concerns of traffic congestion, Downtown circulation, parking availability, and reductions in free parking. However, based on comments, feedback, and discussion at this study session, staff will return to Council at the March 27, 2018 Council meeting with specific rate proposals and enabling ordinances and resolutions.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2473'}], [{'Title': 'Introduction and adoption of an Emergency Ordinance setting forth regulations for shared mobility systems and devices and providing for generally applicable enhanced enforcement measures, and adoption of a Resolution establishing an impound fee and related administrative fines.', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Adopt an emergency ordinance, provided as Attachment A, adding Chapter 3.21 to the City of Santa Monica Municipal Code setting forth regulations for shared mobility systems and devices, adding Section 1.14.030 authorizing the City Manager to implement Administrative Instructions, and amending Section 1.08.010 to provide for civil penalties of up to $5,000 for violations of local law, and2) Adopt a resolution, provided as Attachment B, establishing an impound fee for shared mobility devices abandoned in the public rights-of-way and administrative fines for violations of Chapter 3.21, and3) Direct staff to establish a pilot program to assist with the development of a regulatory framework for shared mobility systems and devices.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Santa Monica staff, residents, and stakeholders have been actively pursuing the Council’s strategic goal of Establishing a New Model for Mobility. The goal is supported and enriched by connections with the Sustainable City Plan, Wellbeing Project, and Land Use and Circulation Element. Efforts such as GoSaMo have encouraged Santa Monica residents and visitors to try a variety of mobility options, including shared mobility devices such as bicycles and vehicles.', 'New forms of shared mobility devices and systems, such as dockless bicycles and motorized scooters, have begun operating in the Los Angeles area, including Santa Monica. These systems can provide benefits in an urban environment – but they present new concerns and dangers to public safety, particularly in light of the City Council’s Vision Zero to eliminate deaths and serious injuries from collisions – as well as compliance with the California Vehicle Code and the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA), particularly on public sidewalks. One of the critical safety concerns with these types of systems operating in Santa Monica is when the devices are left in the public rights-of-way in a haphazard way, causing obstructions to pedestrian and Americans with Disability Act (ADA) travel and access points, such as wheelchair ramps. Such unregulated devices have also caused collisions and accidents, some resulting in serious injuries. Accordingly, urgent regulatory actions are necessary to protect public health and safety. Several cities in the United States are addressing these same issues and have begun implementing pilot programs or new regulatory approaches to accommodate such devices. Staff recommends adoption of the proposed Emergency Ordinance to address immediate public safety concerns as a first step, while staff develops a pilot program to facilitate the development of a safe and more sustainable long-term regulatory framework for these devices.', "The proposed Ordinance further recommends enhancing the City’s tools to enforce this proposed Ordinance and other local laws more generally by authorizing the City Attorney's Office to seek civil penalties of up to $5,000 for each violation of local law.", 'Additionally, like many existing City enforcement programs, part of enforcing this Ordinance will require the undertaking of Administrative Hearings. The City Manager currently issues Administrative Instructions to interpret City policies with clarity, govern operation, and provide procedures to implement them. To reiterate longstanding practice and to further insulate the hearings process from legal challenges, staff recommends amending the Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) to clearly articulate the City Manager’s authority to implement these Administrative Instructions.', 'Background', 'New forms of shared use mobility systems are proliferating in cities throughout the United States. The most common are “dockless” shared bicycles but other forms such as shared electric bicycles, electric scooters, and mopeds also exist. Most rely on app-based rental, and GPS location services to identify the device. The “dockless” shared bicycles lock to themselves via a lock over the rear wheel. Cities have begun to respond through enforcement efforts against unlawful uses combined with pilot programs with responsible operators to create regulatory frameworks to integrate these devices into their existing transportation systems.', 'Pilot Regulatory Programs for Shared Mobility Systems', 'The City of Seattle created a pilot program in July 2017 to allow bike share companies to operate in the city under a permit. Currently Spin, Lime Bike, and ofo are operating under the City’s pilot program with over 9,000 bikes deployed.', 'In January 2018, the Austin, Texas City Council approved the creation of a “dockless” bike share pilot program, making it clear that the program was a one-year test. The program is expected to be implemented in May or June of 2018.', 'In San Francisco, the City has launched an 18-month pilot program. Only one company, JUMP Bikes, which offers peddle assist electric bicycles, has successfully fulfilled the requirements of the San Francisco Metropolitan Transportation Authority’s bike share permit application.', 'In December 2017, the Los Angeles City Council authorized the Los Angeles Department of Transportation to develop and enter into a contract with “dockless” bike share operators in Council District 15/Harbor District. A licensing agreement has been developed to address liability and indemnification, while Council considers the policy framework for a pilot.', 'New York City put out a public request for information to explore the feasibility of “dockless” bike sharing systems, taking into consideration its existing CitiBike bike share system by not allowing the dockless system to operate where CitiBike operates. The city expects to have a pilot program up and running by the summer or fall of 2018.', 'Breeze Bike Share', 'Santa Monica launched Breeze Bike Share in November 2015 with 500 bikes and 80 “stations”. Breeze bike stations consist of clusters of bike racks throughout Santa Monica, and geo-located on the Breeze smartphone app. The bikes offer flexible locking through on-board locks, which means that users can lock at a station, or choose to lock to a bike rack outside the station for a $2 surcharge. Breeze Bikes were purchased with grant funds, are owned by the City, and operated under contract by CycleHop. The Santa Monica Municipal Code was amended in August 2015 to enable Breeze Bike Share operations in the public right-of-way in SMMC Chapter 3.20. Metro Bike Share runs a traditional “smart-dock” bike share system in which bikes can only be locked to stations. Metro installed two stations in Santa Monica in 2017, located on the property they own at the Metro Expo Line stops in Downtown and at 17th Street.', 'Bird Rides, Inc.', 'Around September 2017, Bird Rides, Inc. (“Bird”) began offering shared electric scooter rentals in Santa Monica, without a City business license. Scooters began to arrive in Santa Monica in an unanticipated fashion on the city’s streets and sidewalks, posing significant safety concerns with respect to hazards/obstructions in the public rights-of-way and disabled access ramps. After being contacted by City staff, Bird obtained a Business License for its office location, and has pursued a Business License for its vending of scooters on private property. The City has issued an approval to vend its scooters on private property with conditions on its operations, particularly as they relate to scooters being placed in the Public Rights-of-Way (PRW). The conditions are currently being appealed by Bird.', 'Each morning Bird employees deploy scooters on sidewalks, primarily in the downtown, recollecting the scooters in the evenings. In addition to the hazards posed with the scooters being left in the public rights-of-way, hazardous user operation of the scooters have continued to be observed. These unlawful operations have resulted in accidents, some resulting in serious injuries. Bird scooters fit the definition of a “motorized scooter” as defined in Section 407.5[1] of the California Vehicle Code.  State law requires riders of motorized scooters to wear a helmet and prohibits riding on the sidewalk. Bird scooter riders are also required by the CA Vehicle Code to be over 16 years of age and possess a valid driver’s license or instruction permit. A motorized scooter may be operated on a bicycle path, trail or bikeway, but not on a sidewalk. If on a roadway, it must be operated in the bicycle lane, if there is one.', 'Discussion', 'This staff report is presented in three separate sections, 1) Shared Mobility Devices and Systems, 2) Civil Penalties, and 3) Administrative Instructions.', 'Section 1 - Shared Mobility Device Systems', 'The shared use market for mobility devices, such as bicycles, has seen a new model emerge that uses free-floating bikes without stations or docks. The devices can be located, unlocked, and relocked using a smartphone app. “Dockless” systems enable bikes and scooters to be left in any location, regardless of the presence of a rack or other object to secure it to.', 'Shared mobility systems, and in particular new forms such as e-bikes and e-scooters, can have benefits by providing additional mobility options. For users, this means quicker, easier, and cheaper access to a device that can be used to travel short distances, and a quick roll out of these options since the infrastructure of docking stations is no longer required.  However, one challenge presented by the newer dockless shared mobility devices is that operators and users may leave the devices haphazardly in the Public Rights-of-Way (PRW), creating accident causing obstacles, causing more congested pedestrian walkways and obstructing ADA travel and access points, such as ramps. Many users are not educated in safe operational requirements and thus may not properly operate such new devices (e.g. not wearing helmets, not riding on the sidewalk, and in some cases possession of a valid driver’s license or instruction permit). The City has responded to this by proactively sharing safety information to riders to ensure Santa Monica residents and visitors were equippedwithinformation on how to safely and legally operate motorized scooters. These efforts, included:', '· A blog post that received 1,267 viewswithan average of 3:24 minutes spent on the page,', '· Posts on Facebook, Twitter and Instagram with a total of 64,377 impressions,', '· Local and regional media coverage withsafety messages, and', '· Direct education of scooter users on the lawful and safe use of scooter practices by Santa Monica police officers.', 'Moreover, some operators choose to operate in complete disregard for applicable laws or safety, likely in an effort to maximize profits. The confluence of these factors has created serious public safety hazards throughout the City and necessitates immediate corrective actions.', 'In order to address the ongoing public safety concerns created by unregulated Shared Mobility Devices, such as scooters, staff recommends that Council adopt the attached emergency ordinance creating Chapter 3.21 – Shared Mobility Devices to establish the following provisions:', '1. Clarify the code to define shared mobility operations as vending and subject to Chapter 6.36 Vending.', '2. Unless otherwise approved by the City, prohibit the following activities:', 'a. Offering or displaying for rent a shared mobility device from the public rights-of-way or public property without City authorization.', 'b. Placing, parking, abandoning or leaving unattended a shared mobility device on the public rights-of-way or on public property.', '3. Clarify that shared mobility devices left in the public rights-of-way constitute an immediate hazard and are subject to immediate impounding.', '4. Establish authority to charge an impound fee.', 'Staff also recommends that the proposed provisions of Chapter 3.21 sunset on January 1, 2019 to provide time for staff to develop a pilot program and return to Council with updates to the Chapter that begin the process of potentially authorizing and regulating commercial shared mobility systems and devices.', 'Compliance', 'One of the critical safety concerns with these types of systems is when the devices are left in the PRW, causing obstructions to pedestrian and ADA travel and access points, such as wheelchair ramps. If a user or employee of the system leaves a device in the PRW or on public property, it is essential that operators of the system remove it. Additionally, it is unlawful for an operator itself to place the devices in the PRW. Since the technology that facilitates most shared mobility systems includes a Global Position System (GPS), companies that operate these systems know where they are located at any given time. It is this same technology that allows users to locate the device, and enables the definition of allowing pick-up and drop-off geo-fenced locations. As such a company has the information necessary to ensure the removal of the device to a safe and lawful location.', 'In order to ensure that companies are incentivized to remove the devices from the PRW themselves and that the City’s costs of enforcement, storage and removal are not borne by the public but by the party imposing such costs, staff recommends that Council adopt the attached resolution establishing an impound fee of $60 and Administrative Fines of $500 to $1000 for violations of the proposed provisions of Chapter 3.21 as follows:', 'Violation Description', 'Proposed Fine', 'Display, offer or make-available for rent any Shared Mobility Device in the PRW or on public property.', '$1,000', 'Install, place, maintain, operate, or facilitate the installation, placement, maintenance or operation of a Shared Mobility System in the PRW or on public property.', '$1,000', 'Place, park, or abandon any Shared Mobility Device in the PRW or on public property.', '$ 500', 'Facilitate the placement, parking, or abandonment of any Shared Mobility Device in the PRW or on public property.', '$1,000', 'Failure by operator to immediately remove any of its Shared Mobility Devices abandoned in any Public Area or the PRW', '$ 500', 'The $60 impound fee is a cost-recovery fee based only on the time of a third party company that would assist with the removal of any devices left in the PRW. Although staff has recently impounded devices, such as scooters operated by Bird Ride’s, Inc., no impound fee currently exists making these efforts ineffective. Once staff has more experience with implementing the process for impounding of mobility devices, a revised impound fee will be proposed with the FY2018-19 Exception Based Budget to account for staff time.', 'Due to the nature of the way Shared Mobility Systems operate and because of how they have been introduced to the public, users routinely leave the devices they rent in the PRW after arrival at the conclusion of their trip. Staff proposes to take proactive measures to remove the hazards created when users or operators leave the devices in the PRW, by contracting with a third party to monitor and remove the devices. The proposed impound fee is intended to recover the costs associated with these efforts by charging for each device that is impounded. Staff would monitor the frequency with which staff is having to remove the devices from the PRW; any company that continually fails to remove its devices from the PRW would also be subject to the proposed administrative fines, civil action, and/or criminal prosecution. It is important to note that enforcement related to devices left in the PRW will be focused on the operator not the user. To limit any criminal liability on the part of users, the law provides for only an infraction when any device is left in the PRW. Misdemeanor penalties would be available for other provisions of the ordinance, such as displaying or offering for rent a Shared Mobility Device in the City.  The Police Department would however continue to enforce the State Vehicle Code as it relates to the operation of vehicles, including shared mobility devices (e.g. not wearing helmets and in some cases possession of a valid driver’s license or instruction permit).', 'Section 2 - Civil Penalties', "Civil penalties can be an important tool to garner compliance with local law, including compliance with this proposed Emergency Ordinance. Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 1.08.010 currently does not set forth any civil penalty for violations of local law. While certain specific code provisions currently provide for civil penalties (e.g. SMMC 4.56.040), such provisions remain sparse within the Municipal Code. In order to bolster the City’s enforcement options for violations of local law, including this Emergency Ordinance, staff proposes to amend SMMC Section 1.08.010 to authorize the City Attorney's Office to seek civil penalties of up to $5,000 for each violation of local law.", 'Section 3 - Administrative Instructions', 'From time to time, the City Manager promulgates Administrative Instructions which guide a wide range of City operations, including Administrative Hearings. Administrative Instructions are intended to clearly interpret local law and provide procedures to implement them. Administrative Instructions are reviewed by all Department heads before implementation. To more clearly reiterate longstanding practice, staff recommends amending the SMMC to specifically articulate the City Manager’s existing authority to implement Administrative Instructions governing administrative hearings.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Impound fees, and possibly fines, will be collected as part of enforcement efforts, as well as there will be future contract costs related to the physical collection and impounding of the mobility devices abandoned in the public rights-of-way. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2778'}, {'Title': 'Introduce for First Reading an Ordinance Amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 2.04 Relating to Civil Service Rules and Regulations', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Introduce for first reading an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Sections 2.04.070 (Application for examinations), 2.04.160 (Appointments from eligible lists-Fingerprinting-Conviction Record), 2.04.180 (Temporary assignments) and 2.04.320 (Sick leave) of the Civil Service Rules and Regulations.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Santa Monica Municipal Code (“SMMC”) Chapter 2.04 encompasses the civil service rules and regulations that apply to City employees. As a result of recent changes in State law and regulations, it is necessary to update various civil service rules and regulations in order to comply with current State law. Staff has presented the proposed ordinance to the Personnel Board and notified representatives of the City’s recognized employee organizations. Staff now recommends adoption of the attached ordinance amending various sections of SMMC Chapter 2.04.', 'Background', "Several recent amendments and additions in State law have revealed a need for minor, conforming updates to SMMC Chapter 2.04. The Healthy Workplaces, Healthy Families Act of 2014 (Labor Code, §§ 245 et seq.) and consequent changes to California’s Kin Care law (Labor Code, § 233) provide all City employees with certain entitlements and protections in the accrual and use of paid sick leave. State Assembly Bill No. 1008, effective January 1, 2018, added Government Code section 12952, which makes it an unlawful employment practice under the Fair Employment and Housing Act to seek or consider a job applicant’s conviction history before a conditional job offer is made. The legislation also requires an employer considering an applicant's conviction history to make an individualized assessment of that history in relation to the specific duties of the job. State Assembly Bill No. 1487, effective January 1, 2018, added Government Code section 20480 to limit out-of-class appointments; the temporary appointment of an employee to an upgraded position or higher classification in a vacant position is now limited to 960 hours each fiscal year.", 'Discussion', "As a result of recent changes to State law described above, certain provisions of the civil service rules and regulations set forth in SMMC Chapter 2.04 need to be updated for consistency with current applicable law. The primary updates to the civil service rules and regulations are the following: (1) provisions in SMMC sections 2.04.070 and 2.04.160 related to substantive and procedural considerations of applicants' criminal convictions have been revised to comply with AB 1008 and to facilitate administrative efficiency; (2) SMMC section 2.04.180 has been modified to account for the additional limitation of 960 hours each fiscal year for temporary out-of-class appointments in vacant positions; and (3) various subdivisions of SMMC section 2.04.320 relating to sick leave have been revised for consistency with current State law.", 'City Charter Section 1012, subdivision (a), requires the Personnel Board to make recommendations to City Council on the amendment of civil service rules and regulations. Staff presented the attached ordinance to the Personnel Board at a regularly scheduled meeting on February 22, 2018, and following a public hearing thereon, the Personnel Board recommends that Council approve the revisions to the Municipal Code as set forth in the attached ordinance. Additionally, the City Attorney’s Office notified all bargaining unit representatives of the proposed ordinance and provided them with an opportunity to respond and provide comments.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2892'}], [{'Title': 'First Modification with ChargePoint to Provide, Install and Operate Electric Vehicle Charging Stations; Resolution to authorize application for MSRC funds', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '11. Resolutions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to agreement #10507 (CCS) in the amount of $493,247 including 10% contingency with ChargePoint, a California-based company, for the purchase and operation of 45 electric vehicle charging stations. This will result in a five-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $666,372 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.2. Adopt the attached resolution authorizing the application for incentive funds in the amount of $121,500 from Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) for Clean Transportation Funding for the 2017 Local Government Partnership Program to accelerate the transition to zero and near-zero emission vehicles. 3. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to apply for and accept the incentive funds, if awarded.4. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report, for the agreement modification and the incentive funds, in the event that the incentive funds are awarded.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'To advance the goal of having 300 electric vehicle (EV) charging ports in Santa Monica by 2020 as called for by the recently adopted Electric Vehicle Action Plan (Attachment A), the City plans to add 81 EV charging ports (45 stations) across the City. This includes 44 public and one fleet charging station. The City currently has 89 public charging ports (53 single-ports and 18 dual-ports) available at 71 charging stations (the City has a mix of single-port and dual-port stations). Staff recommends modifying the agreement with ChargePoint to procure the new charging stations for a total amended amount not to exceed $493,247, resulting in a new contract for an amount not to exceed $666,372 over five years.', 'Staff have identified incentive funding of $121,500 through the Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) Clean Transportation Program (Attachment B) to partially offset the one-time procurement and eligible installation costs. In order to be eligible to receive MSRC funding, cities must deliver a brief MSRC-provided presentation (Attachment C) to Council about the Clean Transportation Program and obtain an approved resolution from Council (Attachment D).', 'Background', 'Santa Monica has been a leader in adopting low emission vehicle technology and providing public charging infrastructure.', 'On November 8, 2011, Council held a study session on electric vehicle (EV) infrastructure (Attachment E). Staff presented the challenges to accommodating EV charging for residents, visitors, and employees as well as the pending installation of charging infrastructure.', 'Since then, the City has expanded its public charging infrastructure from 20 charging ports to 89 throughout the city. This total includes seven dual-port charging stations at the Civic Center Structure that were provided by UCLA through a grant-funded research project and one solar-powered charging station at the Airport Administration Office.Nine charging stationsat City Yardsare used exclusively for theCity’s vehicle fleet, whichnow includes over 130 electric vehicles.', 'On July 25, 2017, Council awarded a bid to ChargePoint for the installation of charging stations through Southern California Edison’s Charge Ready pilot program (Attachment F). Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with ChargePoint to install smart charging stations (16 stations, 31 charging ports) at the Civic Center Parking Structure roof for fleet vehicle charging Table 1). Smart charging stations are network connected, which allows for a range of functions including station usage monitoring, cost recovery (charging a fee), maintenance alerts, dynamic pricing, and customer notifications when batteries are full.', 'Table 1: New EV Charging Stations – Original Contract', 'Location', 'Notes', 'Dual-port Stations', 'Single-port Stations', 'Total Available Ports', 'Civic Center Parking Structure', 'Fleet', '15', '1', '31', 'Total Fleet Stations', '16', 'Discussion', 'The EV Action Plan is a guiding document for expanding the infrastructure needed to support the growing demand from EV vehicle owners. The plan establishes goals to expand the number of places where charging is available as well as set out policies for installing charging stations in apartment complexes, private residences, and other privately held locations. The proposed modification to this contract would allow the City to take the next important step to expand the number of charging stations, and provide them in more neighborhoods across the City.', 'The modification includes a capital cost, not to exceed amount of $278,197, including 10% contingency, and an operating cost, not to exceed amount of $215,050 for a total additional not to exceed amount of $493,247 over five years (Table 2). The capital cost includes a one-time purchase of equipment. Operating costs include ChargePoint network services and the ChargePoint Assure maintenance and warranty program (Assure is included at no cost the first year). After the first year staff will analyze maintenance costs and may choose not to proceed with the Assure maintenance program if it fails to prove cost effective.', 'Table 2: Original Contract + Modification', 'Capital Cost + 10% Contingency', '$278,197', 'Operating Costs', '$215,050', 'Total (Modification)', '$493,247', 'Original Contract Amount', '$173,125', 'New total not to exceed', '$666,372', 'The majority of existing charging stations are located in City-owned parking structures and surface lots; two charging stations are located on-street at Montana Avenue. All stations experience a high amount of usage, and staff regularly receive requests to add more charging stations.', 'Staff from the Office of Sustainability & the Environment, Street & Fleet Services, and Architecture Services divisions of the Public Works Department have proposed 27 sites for new and replacement charging stations (Table 3).', 'In response to community feedback to add new stations, rather than begin with replacements, most stations will offer brand new service. Staff are proposing to replace four stations that are obsolete and no longer useful to most EV drivers at Virginia Avenue Park, the Pier, the Solar Port & Water Resources Department. These existing stations are incompatible with EV models produced after the early-2000s.', 'In addition, staff recommends replacing the two existing stations at Montana Avenue, and adding one at this site in order to expand charging access in this area. The existing charging stations on Montana Avenue are highly utilized, however this older technology has no pricing mechanism to deter drivers from overstaying their allotted charging time. Staff frequently receives requests for additional stations and enforcement to encourage vehicle turnover. Costs to add electrical infrastructure for new EV charging sites on Montana Ave would be prohibitively expensive due to the necessary trenching and new service requirements. Replacing the older stations is a cost-effective way to enable more drivers to utilize the stations. The existing older charging stations will be repurposed to charge City fleet vehicles. The new station added at this site will utilize available electrical capacity in the existing service panel. These replacement stations also take advantage of a promotional rate offered by ChargePoint in order to improve charging facilities at a reduced cost.', 'Combined with the new stations, there will be a net gain of 79 publicly available charging ports and a citywide total of 168 public charging ports once all of the 45 stations are installed. The original contract and modification will add 32 fleet charging ports, for a new total of 46 charging ports designated for city fleet vehicles.', 'Table 3. New EV Charging Stations - Modification', 'Location', 'Notes', 'Single-Port Stations', 'Dual-Port Stations', 'Total Available Ports', 'Annenberg', 'New', '1', '2', 'Main Branch Library', 'New', '6', '12', 'Montana Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Ocean Park Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Fairview Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Memorial Park - Curbside', 'New', '5', '10', 'Marine Park', 'New', '1', '2', 'Virginia Ave Park', 'Replacement', '1', '1', 'Various – Ocean Park neighborhood (8 curbside sites)', 'New', '8', '16', 'Various – Wilmont neighborhood (8 curbside sites)', '15 New, 2 Replacement', '4', '13', '30', 'Santa Monica Pier', 'Replacement', '1', '1', 'Civic Solar Port', 'Replacement', '1', '2', 'Water Resources Division', 'Replacement (Fleet)', '1', '2', 'Total', '9', '36', '81', 'Total Stations', '45', '*Station locations are subject to change.', 'Curbside Charging Stations', 'The recently adopted Electric Vehicle Action Plan recommended adding curbside charging infrastructure in multi-unit residential neighborhoods.', 'Upgrades to the City’s streetlight network present opportunities to provide electrical infrastructure for EV charging. Staff is leveraging an existing project to modernize the streetlight electrical circuit in the Ocean Park neighborhood and install up to eight dual-port charging stations in the public right-of-way.', 'Staff have also proposed adding charging stations at up to eight new curbside locations in the Wilmont neighborhood and are working with Southern California Edison to determine feasibility of this effort. This area was selected based on the high density of the area and large volume of requests for charging stations.', '2017 Local Government Partnership Program (MSRC Funds)', "Funding for EV charging stations is partially available through the 2017 Local Government Partnership Program, which is funded by the Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) Clean Transportation Program. Funds are set aside for each city and county within the South Coast Air Quality Management District (SCAQMD) jurisdiction that participates in the AB 2766 Motor Vehicle Registration Fee (Subvention Fund) Program. The Local Government Partnership Program directly supports implementation of SCAQMD's 2016 Air Quality Management Plan (AQMP) by focusing MSRC investments on AQMP measures.", 'The MSRC allocated $121,500 to the City of Santa Monica through this program. Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure Installation is an eligible project category, and MSRC contributes up to 75% of the cost to purchase and install publicly accessible EV charging stations. Eligibility for MSRC incentive funding would require the City to enter into a reimbursement contract and meet specific deliverables.', 'Under the MSRC funding requirements, public EV charging sites must meet a 24-hour access requirement (no facility closures) in order to qualify for the 75% funding contribution. Facilities that do not meet the 24-hour access requirements are eligible to receive up to a 50% funding match. MSRC funds would be distributed on a reimbursement basis upon completion of approved project milestones and submittal of all required reports and invoices.', 'In order to participate, cities must obtain an approved resolution from City Council that acknowledges receipt of the MSRC-supplied presentation from city or county staff, authorizes the proposed project, and allocates the necessary matching funds. The program presentation must be presented to Council live as part of the application process. The application must also contain a project implementation plan, proposed budget, and implementation schedule. All projects must be completed within 60 months of contract execution. Program applications must be submitted by March 2, 2018.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On May 19, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals for the furnishing, delivery and installation of smart electric vehicle service equipment to replace existing charging stations, install new charging stations, and provide ongoing management services, such as networking and maintenance, in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirty-nine vendors downloaded the RFP. Ten firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Parking Division, Information Systems Department, Street & Fleet Division and Office of Sustainability & the Environment.', 'Evaluation was based on price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff then interviewed six shortlisted firms, evaluated the proposals, and conducted interviews. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, ChargePoint was selected as the best qualified firm. The original RFP allowed for sites to be added in addition to the initial specified sites.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to ChargePoint is $493,247 for an amended contract amount not to exceed $666,372. In addition to funds of $78,703 available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019157.589000, the contract modification requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', '1. Release the fund balance of $414,544 from reserve account 4.380236;', '2. Establish a transfer budget of $414,544 from 04695.570321 to 01695.570321;', '3. Appropriate $70,077 to account C019157.589000;', '4. Appropriate $121,500 to account C019157.589100; and', '5. Appropriate $222,967 to account 014261.555010.', 'The total amount of incentive funds available from MSRC is $121,500. If awarded, a revenue budget will be established at account 44426.407830 and an interfund transfer from account 44695.570140 to account 01695.570140 will be included in the Proposed FY 2018-19 Budget. The incentive funding will cover up to 75% of total project costs and requires local match funding to cover the remaining balance. Funds to cover remaining costs are included in the appropriation to account C019157.589100 above.', 'Future funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1136', 'ID': '2934'}]]
[[{'Title': "Proclamation: Women's History Month", 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2917'}], [{'Title': 'Approve First Modification for Property and Assessment Management Software', 'Department': 'Public Works, Airport Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Software as a Service Subscription Agreement #10362 (SAAS) in the amount of $27,226 with Yardi Systems, Inc., a California-based company, to obtain additional real property and asset management software licenses and change the anniversary date from January 25 to December 31.  This will result in a five-year amended agreement (including renewal options) with a new total amount not to exceed $106,510 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City uses Yardi Voyager®, a proprietary real estate property and asset management software created by Yardi Systems, Inc. (Yardi), to manage the City’s commercial real estate operations, execute lease agreements, run analytics, and provide accounting process services. Staff now requires additional software licenses to manage properties at the Airport due to the elimination of master tenancies. Staff requests a first modification to the agreement with Yardi in an amount not to exceed $27,226, for a new five-year contract total amount not to exceed $106,510.', 'Background', 'Yardi has provided real estate property and asset management software services to the Housing and Economic Development (HED) department and the Airport since November 21, 2007. Staff uses Yardi Voyager® software to execute leases, run analytics, and provide accounting process services as well as to perform multiple property management tasks. These tasks include, but are not limited to generating monthly courtesy notices for tenants, recording payments, collecting monthly late fees and security deposits, preparing monthly billing journal entries regarding lease and license agreements, tracking tenant insurance documentation, tracking lease/license expiration dates, maintaining tenant contact information, and assessing Consumer Price Index (CPI) increases annually.', 'On September 27, 2016, Council authorized a five-year agreement with Yardi for software services for an amount of $14,933 in year one with four one-year options to renew, subject to annual cost of living increases not to exceed 3% per annum, for a total amount not to exceed $79,284 with future funding contingent of Council budget approval (Attachment A).', 'The system was originally procured using a competitive process in 2007. The 2016 support agreement was approved using an exception to the competitive bidding process because Yardi is the only vendor able to support its proprietary Voyager software. On December 31, 2017, the City exercised its option to renew the agreement until December 31, 2018.', 'Discussion', 'Currently, HED has two ledger user licenses, and the Airport has three ledger user licenses and one read-only license. HED manages 157 leases and license agreements in Yardi Voyager®, and the Airport manages 540 lease spaces in Yardi Voyager®, including offices, hangars, tie-downs and land leases. Due to the phasing out of master leaseholds, an additional 69 leasable spaces located at three Airport properties (2828 Donald Douglas Loop North, 3026 Airport Avenue, and 3100 Donald Douglas Loop South) all of which will be tracked by Yardi in FY 2017-18.', 'Staff requires three additional ledger user licenses to support the management of the additional properties and further increase the efficiency of the existing property management functions. This modification would result in a modification not to exceed $6,508 in FY 2017-18 and an additional $20,718 over the three subsequent years of the agreement.', 'Staff also proposes a modification of the anniversary date of the contract to simplify the accounting process for the agreement, resulting in a one-year term from December 31, 2017 to December 31, 2018, with three remaining one-year options to renew. The modification of the term date would have no impact on the FY 17-18 budget.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In 2007, staff requested proposals for a web-based, fully integrated platform to manage commercial real estate operations, execute leases, run analytics, and provide accounting process services for HED and the Airport. Based on proposals submitted, Yardi Systems, Inc. was recognized as the best bidder.', 'Yardi Systems, Inc. is the only vendor that can provide maintenance and support for its proprietary Voyager software system and is therefore the exclusive vendor pursuant to Section 2.24.080(d) of the Municipal Code. Staff recommends Yardi Systems, Inc. to furnish and deliver/provide software updates and support for its proprietary Voyager® software system as an exception to the competitive bidding process. On September 27, 2016, Council authorized the Software as a Service (SAAS) Subscription Agreement No. 10362 as an exemption to the competitive bidding process.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Yardi Systems, Inc. is $27,226 for an amended contract total not to exceed $106,510.  Funds of $6,508 are available in the FY 2017-18 budgets in the Public Works and Housing and Economic Development departments. The contract will be charged to the following accounts:', 'Account Number', 'Department & Division', 'Amount', '33431.588500', 'Public Works - Airport', '$5,916', '012681.555060', 'Housing & Economic Development - EDD', '$ 592', 'TOTAL', '$6,508', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2304'}, {'Title': 'Award Contract for Transit Technology Consultant', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #143 to IBI Group, a California-based company, for a consultant to perform a system-by-system needs assessment of the Big Blue Bus’ transit technology infrastructure.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with IBI Group in an amount not to exceed $204,040 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The technological infrastructure of Big Blue Bus (BBB) is crucial to its operations and providing the best customer experience to over 13.6 million customers who ride BBB annually. As a mid-size transit agency, BBB relies on at least 20 different software and system applications, some of which are over 14 years old, to support its operation of 200 buses and 485 employees. In order to become more reliable, efficient, and better able to serve its customers and the Santa Monica community, BBB determined that a thorough analysis of its software and systems is needed in order to make strategic decisions about current and future technology needs. To do this, BBB is engaging a transit technology consultant to assist staff in conducting a system-by-system evaluation of BBB’s current software, hardware and systems to create a technology roadmap. Staff recommends award of a consultant professional services contract to IBI Group for a total project cost not to exceed $204,040.', 'Background', 'Big Blue Bus provides sub-regional transportation service to approximately 58 square miles of the greater Los Angeles area. Buses operate between 4:30AM and 1:30AM while the maintenance division is staffed 24 hours per day, seven days per week. Annual ridership is more than 13.6 million.', 'BBB uses software and system applications to manage transit service, maintenance work orders, personnel, customer service, public information, enterprise assets, system and route planning, and business operations. Many of these systems are not integrated due to variations in technology and compatibility. While each of these systems were the best fit for the BBB at the time of purchase, the technology landscape has changed rapidly and significantly as have the BBB’s technology needs as customers expect better on-time performance, more real-time information, and more efficient management of the BBB fleet.', 'Discussion', 'BBB needs to conduct a thorough analysis of its technology infrastructure and solutions – with specific regard to the unique operations and support needs of a transit agency – so that it can make strategic decisions about its current and future technology needs and purchases. To do this, BBB is engaging a transit technology consultant to do a system-by-system evaluation of BBB’s current software and systems and to create a technology roadmap based on that analysis. This consultant is responsible for the following deliverables:', 'The duration of the project is expected to be approximately one year, with the initial recommendations for a technology roadmap anticipated to be available in spring 2019. However, as the project progresses, staff will evaluate the cost/benefit as well as funding availability to implement a systems solution or software upgrade should it deem that the enhancement would provide a benefit to BBB customers, improve or enhance safety and security of BBB staff, or provide operational efficiencies before spring 2019.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On October 17, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for a Transit Technology Consultant. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Ads referring potential bidders to the city’s online bidding site were also published in two online trade publications. 1276 vendors were notified, and 105 prospective vendors downloaded the RFP. Four firms submitted proposals.', 'Proposals were submitted by IBI Group, Lumenor Consulting, Plante Moran, and Intueor.The proposals were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Big Blue Bus, Information Services Department, and Long Beach Transit. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience and technical competence;ability to meet project work plan and timeliness; quality control; cost of services/cost control;and responsiveness/presentation. Staff then interviewed the preferred firm.', 'Based on these criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends IBI Group as the best qualified firm to perform a system-by-system needs assessment of BBB’s technology infrastructure. This is based on its: 1) subject matter expertise with end-to-end transit technology systems; 2) specific experience with South California transit; 3)knowledge of systems from a full range of vendors and knowledge of emerging technologies; 4) history as innovators with bus rapid transit and transit signal priority implementations; and 5) proven focus on making transit work.', 'IBI Group has successfully conducted similar projects (needs assessments, transit system technology roadmaps, and technology strategic plans) as well as provided system implementation support for CAD-AVL and other onboard, business intelligence, and other transit-specific technology systems for clients throughout North America. Clients on the West Coast include TriMet in Portland, OR; King County and Community Transit in Washington State; AC Transit in Northern California; and LA Metro, Foothill Transit, and Long Beach Transit in our region. All references were positive.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to IBI Group is for an amount not to exceed $204,040. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget in account C410113.589000. If BBB moves forward with any procurement recommendations by the consultant, funds will be available in the Capital Improvement Program or as funding becomes available.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2716'}, {'Title': 'Olympic Well Field Groundwater Management Contract Amendment', 'Department': 'Public Works, Water Resources', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement #9916 in the amount of $1,573,000 (including a 10% contingency) and extend the term for an additional three years to June 30, 2021, with ICF International, a Virginia-based company, to continue the regulatory mandated groundwater monitoring and studies related to the remediation of groundwater contamination in the Olympic Well Field and for adaptive management of the City’s groundwater resources to help achieve the City’s water self-sufficiency goals. This will result in a seven-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $4,378,636, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'ICF International is the City’s environmental consultant responsible for implementing the Olympic Well Field Groundwater Management Program to monitor and remediate groundwater contaminated with volatile organic compounds (VOCs) by third-party manufacturing facilities. The City’s current four-year agreement expires on June 30, 2018. The Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board (LARWQCB) mandates the City continue to monitor Olympic Well Field groundwater quality to ensure Santa Monica’s wells successfully capture and filter out these VOCs until they are reduced to safe levels. Further, because the Olympic Well Field is a significant source of drinking water for the City, this resource is necessary to help achieve the City’s water self-sufficiency goals. Staff therefore recommends a second modification to Agreement #9916 with ICF International to extend the term by three years to June 30, 2021 in the amount of $1,573,000 (including a 10% contingency). This will result in a seven-year amended agreement not to exceed $4,378,636.', 'Background', 'The Olympic Well Field is the City’s second largest source of groundwater supply. Historically, the Olympic Well Field was adversely impacted by volatile organic compounds (VOCs) from several former manufacturing facilities in the immediate area. The City pumps groundwater for treatment and public consumption from two groundwater wells located in the Olympic Well Field. The City entered into Settlement and Release Agreements with Boeing and Gillette that formerly conducted business in the Olympic Well Field area.', 'Conditions set forth by the LARWQCB require the City to demonstrate that dissolved-phase VOC plumes in the Olympic Well Field are captured by the pumping of the City’s production wells. To document this condition, the City subsequently developed the Olympic Well Field Management Plan in June 2012 to guide its efforts to monitor water quality, model VOC concentrations in the groundwater, and demonstrate plume capture.', 'On June 10, 2014, Council approved award of a competitively bid agreement with ICF for a term of up to four years not to exceed $2,220,900 to implement the Olympic Well Field Management Plan (Attachment A). To support the implementation of the Olympic Well Field Management Plan, on March 22, 2016 the City Council authorized a first modification to the PSA not to exceed $584,736 for additional groundwater program activities including the installation and development of additional groundwater monitoring wells and the redevelopment of existing wells (Attachment B).', 'Discussion', 'This proposed second modification would extend the agreement, set to expire on June 30, 2018, by three years until June 30, 2021 for the continuance of groundwater program activities required by the LARWQCB, and several tasks necessary to support the City’s goal of water self-sufficiency (Attachment C).', 'ICF has been the City’s primary environmental consultant and liaison with the LARWQCB in the Olympic Subbasin since 2014. As such, they have specialized expertise and experience with the site geology and hydrogeologic flow modeling of the Olympic Well Field aquifers, upon which the City depends for a significant portion of its local water supply. They are also especially knowledgeable with the terms and requirements of the Olympic Subbasin remediation agreement between the City and the LARWQCB. Their original contract was to perform quarterly groundwater monitoring for the City Yards property that had underground storage tanks. Their scope of work was subsequently expanded via a modification in 2016 to include, among other things, installation of three additional groundwater monitoring wells per the request of the LARWQCB, installation of dedicated sampling pumps in the City’s monitoring well network, groundwater monitoring and reporting, numerical groundwater flow modeling to document Olympic Well Field VOC plume capture, and as-needed technical support. The scope of work for this proposed amendment includes the following tasks designed to support the Olympic Well Field Management Plan, document aquifer contamination cleanup, and achieve the City’s water self-sufficiency goals as they pertain to the Olympic Subbasin.', 'Task 1 - Groundwater Monitoring', 'Continue the quarterly groundwater quality monitoring and reporting as described in the Olympic Well Field Management Plan. The monitoring is required by the LARWQCB and includes the 22 monitoring wells currently in the network. This data is vital to the documentation of aquifer contamination cleanup and restoration.', 'Task 2 - Supplemental Olympic Subbasin Groundwater Flow and Transport Modeling', 'Supplemental groundwater flow and transport modeling is necessary to assess potential impacts the proposed new water supply wells and aquifer recharge may have on the current configuration of the identified groundwater VOC plume. Documentation of plume location, size and capture is required by the LARWQCB.', 'Task 3 - Hydrogeologic Studies to Support Adaptive Management of Groundwater Resources', 'As part of the City’s ongoing efforts to attain water self-sufficiency, additional groundwater transport and associated hydrogeologic studies are necessary to allow for the adaptive management of the City’s groundwater resources in and around the Olympic Subbasin. Specific tasks include the time-critical review and assessment of natural groundwater recharge in the basin, peer review of the updated sustainable yield analysis, and liaising with the United States Geological Survey (USGS) on behalf of the City to incorporate the City’s existing flow model into the USGS regional (basin-wide) flow model.', 'Task 4 - As Needed Technical Support', 'On an as-needed basis, miscellaneous technical support may be required by the City in support of its identified objectives of remediating the Olympic Well Field and, most importantly, achieving its water self-sufficiency goals. Potential tasks include, but are not limited to, preparation of specialized presentations or maps at the request of the City, analysis of remote sensing data, peer review of third-party plans and reports, and analysis of exploratory boring geology, geophysical logs, and water quality.', 'Consultant Selection', 'Because of ICF’s extensive and specialized knowledge of the Olympic Subbasin aquifers, its long-standing relationship and credibility with the LARWQCB on behalf of the City, and the time critical nature of the proposed scope related to assessing the updated sustainable yield analysis, the proposed second modification offers the best value to the City. It would be very time-consuming and costly to bring a new contractor up to speed on the intricacies of the Olympic Well Field hydrogeologic flow model, the extensive amount of existing groundwater data necessary to successfully implement the Olympic Well Field Management Plan and help the City achieve water self-sufficiency in a timely way. Due to time constraints and the fact that ICF has specialized knowledge and experience of the Olympic Well Field, staff recommends a second modification to Agreement #9916 with ICF International to extend the term by three years to June 30, 2021 in the amount of $1,573,000 (including a 10% contingency). This will result in a seven-year amended agreement not to exceed $4,378,636.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to ICF International is $1,573,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $4,378,636. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts.', 'C019045.589000', 'Water Mediation Settlement Funds', '$1,273,000', 'C259224.589000', 'Water Funds', '$300,000', 'TOTAL', '$1,573,000', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2776'}, {'Title': 'Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar (DInSAR) Contract Modification', 'Department': 'Public Works, Water Resources', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement #3200 in the amount of $100,000 with Earth Consultants International, Inc. (ECI), a California-based company, for a supplemental Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar (DInSAR) study of the Santa Monica Groundwater Basin (SMGB) to assist in identifying sustainable amounts of water available for future potable use and extend the term of the agreement. This will result in a five-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $172,740 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'A preliminary analysis of the Santa Monica Basin indicates there may be additional groundwater pathways that were previously unknown. Utilization of water from the Santa Monica Basin is a fundamental strategy in the City’s efforts to meet its goal of water self-sufficiency, and to maintain safe, sustainable local sources of water for Santa Monica. Additional study would determine whether those pathways exist or not. Therefore, staff recommends that Council approve a second modification to ECI contract #3200 in the amount of $100,000 and extend the term by 3 years to November 2021. ECI would conduct the required supplemental study as well as annual updates of the supplemental study to incorporate any new data that may become available.', 'Background', 'On November 15, 2016, the City retained ECI to conduct a preliminary Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar (DInSAR) study to assess, among other things, whether historic pumping activities at the City’s well fields may have caused compaction of the aquifer sediments, which could contribute to less water being produced. The preliminary study did not find evidence of significant sediment compaction but did identify previously unknown pathways for natural recharge of the City’s aquifers. If confirmed by this supplemental study, these previously unknown hydrogeologic pathways could be used to help site additional water supply wells in order to achieve and sustain long-term water self-sufficiency for the City.', 'DInSAR is a satellite-based radar technology that is capable of measuring very small changes in surface elevation. The level of detail and broad area coverage that DInSAR data can provide makes it a valuable and cost-effective tool for the management of local groundwater resources and sustainability. The method has been used for more than 20 years by government agencies and research institutions to assess the conditions of groundwater basins and monitor land subsidence in areas with significant groundwater extraction rates.', 'Discussion', 'Staff now seeks to build on the preliminary work done with ECI to better understand how these newly identified pathways could benefit the City’s groundwater resources. If confirmed by this study, the seasonal recharge could increase the current estimate of how much groundwater the City can sustainably pump from the Santa Monica Basin and provide a powerful planning tool for adaptive management of the City’s groundwater resources. The additional data would also be useful for the City’s required Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (SGMA) efforts including creation of a state-mandated Groundwater Sustainability Plan for the Santa Monica Basin by 2022.', 'The supplemental study would involve conducting a sequential analysis of paired interferograms (radar images), with an emphasis on more recent data obtained during the annual wet and dry seasons (October-April and May-September, respectively). The objective of the study is to determine whether short-term cyclical positive deformation (rising land levels) is due to inflow of seasonal natural recharge into the groundwater basin. These data, if confirmed, would be useful in refining calculations of basin recharge volumes and for planning sustainable pumping schedules for the City’s long-term water self-sufficiency objectives to be discussed with Council this summer.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In October 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for a DInSAR study of potential land elevation changes related to groundwater extractions and recharge for the Santa Monica Basin. The RFP was sent to five consulting firms drawn from a prequalified list. Of the five firms, two responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department.', '· Tetra Tech', '· Earth Consultants International, Inc. (ECI)', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: (previous experience, references, ability to deliver the scope of work, and specialized qualifications).  Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends ECI as the best qualified firm to perform DInSAR study.', 'Completion of additional DInSAR analysis is critical to updating the preliminary sustainable yield analysis and updating the City’s Sustainable Water Master Plan, which are currently scheduled for presentation to City Council in summer 2018. Due to time constraints and the fact that ECI successfully completed the initial study, a second modification to the existing contract with ECI is recommended as the most cost effective and efficient way for the City to proceed.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to Earth Consultants International, Inc. is $100,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $172,740. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C259223.589000.  Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2780'}, {'Title': 'Award Construction Contract for Access Path Replacement at Palisades Park and Virginia Avenue Park Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': 'Director Susan Cline', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #SP2467 to STL Landscape, Inc., a California-based company, for the Access Path Replacement at Palisades Park and Virginia Avenue Park Project;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with STL Landscape, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $786,500 (including a $71,500 contingency);Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Access Path Replacement at Palisades Park and Virginia Avenue Park Project would replace approximately 115,000 square feet of the existing decomposed granite (DG) that has worn down over time from use by pedestrians, joggers, and cyclists. This substantial use in conjunction with the impacts of the environment and weather over the years have created uneven surfaces along the pathways that degrade the experience of the users. Staff recommends STL Landscape, Inc. to replace the access paths in both parks for an amount not to exceed $786,500 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Discussion', 'To improve the condition of the DG pathways and enhance pedestrian safety, staff recommends replacing the worn down pathway material with new stabilized DG. The product selected for this project would be a natural, organic, permeable and non-eroding material.', 'Contractor Selection – Construction', 'On November 29, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the Access Path Replacement at Palisades Park and Virginia Avenue Park in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Forty-nine vendors downloaded the bid. Six bids were received and publicly opened on December 21, 2017:', 'Bidder', 'Bid Amount', 'STL Landscape, Inc.', '$ 715,000.00', 'GMZ Engineering Inc.', '$ 727,250.00', 'Environmental Construction Inc.', '$ 766,500.00', 'C.S. Legacy Construction, Inc.', '$ 856,096.00', 'PCN3, Inc.', '$ 877,950.00', 'Excel Paving', '$1,099,747.00', 'Engineer’s Estimate: $800,000.00', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City specifications. STL Landscape, Inc. has completed similar projects for Caltrans, Los Angeles County, Montebello Unified School District and the cities of Santa Ana, Claremont, Rolling Hills Estate and Santa Monica. Staff contacted references listed in the bid package, and all respondents reported that work performed by STL Landscape, Inc. was completed within the project requirements. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that STL Landscape, Inc.’s license is current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, STL Landscape, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder for the Access Path Replacement at Palisades Park and Virginia Avenue Park Project.', 'Construction Schedule and Management', 'Construction work is anticipated to begin in May 2018 and last for approximately four months. Staff is coordinating with Community and Cultural Services to phase construction at the two locations and ensure that impacts to park use are minimized to the extent possible during peak summer dates. Further delaying the project would fail to address community complaints and accessibility concerns related to the poor conditions of the parks’ pathways. City staff would provide construction management for this project, to include inspecting the contractor’s work during construction, verifying and documenting field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts as a result of the construction activities, attending the contractor’s safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings, and maintaining all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work conducted during construction. Construction management staff would coordinate with the Community and Cultural Services Department regarding park activities, and with the Public Landscape Division regarding maintenance activities on a daily basis.', 'Public Outreach', 'Due to the nature of this project, staff anticipates access interruptions to specific park areas. To mitigate these temporary public impacts, staff will conduct comprehensive outreach, including weekly updates on the City’s “Know Before You Go” (KBUG) web page and in the Santa Monica Daily Press. For work requiring temporary closures of park trails or facilities, highly visible signs would be placed at the parks to notify the public. Staff also plan to provide mailed notices, post information on social media, and the City’s webpage to help inform the community.', 'California Coastal Commission De Minimis Waiver', 'On November 27, 2017, the California Coastal Commission issued a Notice of “Permit Exemption/No Permit Required” allowing for the development of the project as described. Commission Reference Number: 5-17-0410-X.  The Virginia Avenue Park portion of the project is not located within the California Coastal Zone and therefore no permit exemption is required.', 'The project is categorically exempt from the provisions of California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15301(c) and Section 15302 of the CEQA Guidelines. Class 1 exempt projects include the "operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination." Class 2 exempt projects include the “replacement or reconstruction of existing structures and facilities where the new structure would be located on the same site as the structure replaced and would have substantially the same purpose and capacity as the structure replaced.” The project\'s replacement of decomposed granite for an existing bicycle/pedestrian pathway qualifies as a Class 1 and Class 2 project exempt from CEQA. In addition, none of the exceptionsspecified in Section 15300.2 of CEQA Guidelines would apply that would preclude the use of this CEQA exemption: the project site is not located in a sensitive environment, theproject would not have a significant effect on the environment, the project would not damage scenic resources, the project would not be located on a hazardous waste site and the project would not cause a change to a historical resource. Therefore, this project is categorically exempt from CEQA.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to STL Landscape, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $786,500. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:', 'Account No.', 'Description', 'FY 2017-18', 'C019166.589000', 'Access Path Replacement–Palisades Park', '$650,000', 'C019169.589000', 'Access Path Replacement–Virginia Avenue Park', '$136,500', 'Total Funds Available', '$786,500'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2828'}, {'Title': '2017 Bulletproof Vest Partnership Grant', 'Department': 'Police Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $29,070 from the United States Department of Justice (USDOJ) for the 2017 Bulletproof Vest Partnership (BVP) grant;2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant; andAuthorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) has been awarded a two-year grant of $29,070 from the U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ), Bureau of Justice Assistance (BJA) as part of the 2017 Bulletproof Vest Partnership (BVP) grant program. This grant would reimburse SMPD for 40 percent of the cost of approximately 35 replacement bulletproof vests purchased under the program. Funds must be spent by August 31, 2020.', 'Discussion', 'The Bulletproof Vest Partnership (BVP), created by the Bulletproof Vest Partnership Grant Act of 1998, is a unique U.S. Department of Justice initiative designed to provide a critical resource to state and local law enforcement.', 'Since 1999, more than 13,000 jurisdictions have participated in the BVP Program, with more than $430 million in federal funds committed to support the purchase of over 1.2 million bulletproof vests. The DOJ Office of Justice Programs’ BJA administers the BVP Program.', 'Bulletproof vests save lives by protecting officers from gunfire. The vests are an important resource for officer safety, which was one of the six main pillars identified in the Final Report of the President’s Task Force on 21st Century Policing released in 2015. The report states that every law enforcement officer should be provided with a bulletproof vest and that all law enforcement agencies should adopt policies that require officers to wear bulletproof vests.', "The Santa Monica Police Department currently provides a vest to every sworn and field assigned uniformed civilian employee and has a policy mandating that these employees wear their assigned vests. The City has been a recipient of these grant funds previously in 2006, 2010 and 2013 - 2016. These grant funds would help SMPD to continue to meet the mission of providing every law enforcement officer with a bulletproof vest. The 2017 program funding would provide for approximately 35 replacement vests. Bulletproof vests are on a five-year replacement cycle because of the degradation of the Kevlar from repetitive use; additionally, body moisture reduces the vest's ability to maintain the threat level guarantee, a circumstance that voids the manufacturer's warranty. The current grant award of $29,070 would support the purchase of the vests through August 2020.", 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Award of a $29,070 grant from the US Department of Justice Bulletproof Vest Partnership requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', '1. Establish revenue budget at account 20304.403754 in the amount of $29,070.', '2. Appropriate $29,070 to account 20304.578854 to reflect receipt of the U.S. Department of Justice Bulletproof Vest Partnership Grant.', '3. Funding is available in the amount of $43,729 in account 01304.544020 in the FY 2017 – 18 budget.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2848'}, {'Title': "Santa Monica Police Department's Participation in the Pink Patch Project", 'Department': 'Police Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': "Staff recommends that the City approve the Police Department's continued participation in the nationwide Pink Patch Project (PPP).", 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Pink Patch Program (PPP) is a collaborative effort of 224 public safety agencies whose goal is to raise public awareness about breast cancer and to fundraise for research and treatment. The funds are raised by the sales of a pink version of the Police Department’s traditional uniform patch among other commemorative items made available for purchase to the public. Proceeds are donated in equal amounts to two local community organizations: the Saint John’s Health Center Foundation Breast Center and UCLA Santa Monica Breast Center.', 'Discussion', 'Coordinated by the Los Angeles County Police Chiefs’ Association, the PPP is an innovative breast cancer public awareness campaign designed to stimulate conversation with community members about the life-saving benefits of early detection and intervention. On January 1, 2017, the Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) became a participating agency of the PPP. In a four-month period, the department raised $3,360 and subsequently donated funds to two selected local organizations that support the project’s mission, the Saint John’s Health Center Foundation Breast Center and the UCLA Santa Monica Breast Center.', 'The Police Department would like approval to continue the sales of the pink police patch, pink patch t-shirts and sweaters, among other commemorative items. All proceeds raised will be deposited into a designated City account and distributed annually in equal amounts to the Saint John’s Health Center Foundation Breast Center and the UCLA Santa Monica Breast Center.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The cost of the patches and other memorabilia will be absorbed by the proceeds from sales and there will be no expense to the City. Net proceeds will be distributed equally to the Santa John’s Health Center Foundation Breast Center and the UCLA Santa Monica Breast Center.', 'Finance has established the following accounts for the Pink Patch Project:', '1. Revenue budget account 04304.408960 to reflect proceeds of pink patches and other memorabilia.', '2. Account 04304.566130 to reflect expenses and proceeds distribution.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2849'}, {'Title': 'Selection of Default Phase 2 Renewable Electricity Tiers & Rates for the Clean Power Alliance of Southern California', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City CouncilApprove the recommended tiers of renewable energy to be offered for Phase 2 commercial customers and municipal accounts.Approve the transition of the City’s non-Direct Access accounts to be served by Clean Power Alliance of Southern California with the 100% renewable energy product.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In January 2015, Council directed staff to evaluate sub-regional Community Choice Aggregation (CCA) programs as a way to achieve community-wide reductions in greenhouse gas emissions from electricity generation by providing competitively-priced electricity from renewable sources to Santa Monica homes and businesses (Attachment A). Community Choice Aggregation or Community Choice Energy (CCA) allows local governments to purchase and sell electricity to customers in their jurisdictions as an alternative to traditional investor-owned utility (IOU) power procurement (Southern California Edison is the city’s IOU). In December 2017, Council voted to join Los Angeles Community Choice Energy (LACCE), since re-named the Clean Power Alliance of Southern California (CPASC) (Attachment B) because it has expanded beyond Los Angeles County cities. CPASC will offer multiple tiers of renewable energy products to customers of member cities, with the goal of achieving higher renewables than Southern California Edison (SCE), the existing electric utility.', 'As a member, Santa Monica can choose the default tiers of renewable energy products to be offered to Phase 2 commercial customers and municipal accounts. This selection will be finalized March 1 at the CPASC Board meeting. CPASC staff have recommended that member cities select a default tier for customers from tier structure options including 36%, 50% or 100% of renewable energy.', 'Staff recommends that Council recommend an alternative tier structure of 50%, 60-65% and 100% renewable energy, with the default product being 60-65% to maintain cost neutrality with SCE’s current base rates. In the event that CPASC does not accept the alternative tier structure, staff recommend that Council select 50% as the default tier product to be offered initially. Staff also recommends that eligible municipal accounts select the 100% tier. This recommendation would impact 13% of the City of Santa Monica’s energy accounts, at an approximate cost increase of $43,000 annually across various division utility accounts (Attachment C).', 'Background', 'On December 5, 2017, Council approved the first reading of the ordinance to join the Los Angeles Community Choice Energy (LACCE) and implement CCA in Santa Monica. Councilmember McKeown was selected as Santa Monica’s Director to the LACCE Board.', 'On December 7, 2017, the LACCE Board approved electricity rates for Phase 1 (County-owned accounts). For energy supplied at 60% renewable power, 25% carbon free power, and 15% unspecified power, the County accounts would see an average 2% discount on rates compared to Southern California Edison.', 'On January 17, 2018, the LACCE Board approved a power procurement strategy, and data and billing services for Phase 2, which would encompass all members’ municipal accounts and commercial customer accounts. Phase 2 is slated for June 2018 service launch.', 'On February 1, 2018, the LACCE Board approved a new name: Clean Power Alliance of Southern California (CPASC).', 'Discussion', 'Community Choice Aggregation or Community Choice Energy (CCA or CCE) allows local governments to purchase and sell electricity to customers in their jurisdictions as an alternative to traditional investor-owned utility (IOU) power procurement (California IOUs are Pacific Gas and Electric Company, San Diego Gas & Electric, Southern California Edison and Southern California Gas Company).', 'Local governments ‘aggregate’ the electrical demand of their community and procure power on their behalf. This is known as ‘energy generation’ and is paid by kilowatt-hour (kWh). The portion of the utility bill that is associated with energy generation is remitted back to the local government.', 'The incumbent IOU still conveys that power (transmission and distribution) to all customers and provides one utility bill to all customers (Southern California Edison is Santa Monica’s incumbent IOU).The portion of the utility bill that is associated with transmission, distribution and demand charges (paid by kilowatt priced at hourly intervals) is remitted back to the utility.', 'CCAs are established by a local ordinance voted on by the governing body of a county, city or special district (e.g. local water agency or public utility district). No public vote or referendum is required. CCA’s are opt-out programs, which means that utility customers are defaulted into becoming a CCA customer and must actively opt-out to remain with the incumbent IOU.', 'CPASC will launch electricity service to customers in phases: 1) LA County municipal accounts; 2) member city and county municipal accounts, and commercial customers; and 3) member city and county residential customers. The phases will initiate in February 2018, June 2018, and December 2018/January 2019, respectively.', 'On February 5, 2018, CPASC staff issued a memo instructing Board members to select their preference for default products to be offered for Phase 2 customers in their respective jurisdictions. Phase 2, which is anticipated to start in June 2018, will cover member city and county municipal accounts, and commercial customers. The memo offered Board members a three-tiered structure of 36%, 50% and 100% renewable energy (RE) products and requested members select the ‘default’ product to be offered to municipal accounts and commercial customers. Customers would have the options to opt up, down or out of the program entirely. Board members were instructed to voice their preliminary preference for a ‘default’ product to be offered (the product all customers would be offered by default) on February 12. The final tiers and rates would be approved at the CPASC Board meeting on March 1, 2018.', 'Staff, as well as the City’s appointed CPASC Board Member Councilmember McKeown, recommend adopting a more aggressive tier structure with higher renewable energy mixes that would not increase costs over SCE’s standard rates at the ‘default’ level. While CPASC staff are not currently offering the choice of a higher RE tier structure, staff is seeking Council direction to pursue a higher RE tier structure in order to encourage CPASC staff and board members to explore that option at the March 1 Board meeting.', 'SCE’s standard energy offering includes approximately 34% renewable energy for 2018. CPASC staff and its consultant, The Energy Authority, provided a comparison against SCE’s anticipated rates (Table 1). Staff estimates that a CPASC product of 60-65% RE could be cost-competitive with SCE’s base rate (34% RE), based on the rates confirmed for Phase 1 CPASC accounts. This “sweet spot” of maximizing renewable sources for electricity generation provides at a rate equal to what customers pay now for a mix of energy that is far more dependent on carbon would provide a “sweet green” tier most attractive to resident and business customers looking to maximize environmental benefits while minimizing additional costs.', 'Table 1. Estimated Rate Comparison', '(CPASC indicative rates vs. SCE’s rates)', 'Clean Power Alliance Plan (prepared by CPASC staff and contractors)', 'Net Bill Discount from SCE Standard Plan (34% RE)', 'Net Bill Discount from SCE Plans with Comparable RE Mixes', '36% Renewable', '-4%', 'N/A', '50% Renewable', '-3%', '-12%', '60-65% Renewable*', 'Recommended Option', '-2%', 'N/A', '100% Renewable', '+7%', '-10%', '* City staff analysis extrapolated from The Energy Authority’s data.', 'Commercial Accounts', 'Staff recommends that the Council approve the selection of 50%, 60-65% and 100% as the preferred tier structure for all commercial customers and municipal accounts, and that the 60-65% product be the default product offered. In the event that this more aggressive tier structure is not offered, staff recommends selecting 50% as the default product within the CPASC-proposed structure (36%, 50%, 100% RE). While it may not be feasible to change the tier rate structure initially, as the new entity gains traction and customers, the cost-competitive “sweet green” level of 60-65% may be added as an option with support from member cities focused on the environmental advantages of community choice aggregation.', 'Municipal Accounts', 'Since 1999, the City has procured 100% renewable energy through Direct Access – a unique status under state law that allowed the City to procure electricity directly from alternative energy service providers (and not SCE) for a certain period of time. New accounts are not eligible for grandfathered status under this law. Energy prices through Direct Access are up to 40% less than SCE’s rates, allowing the City to procure renewable power at much cheaper rates than what is available from SCE and what would be available from CPASC.', 'Currently, the City procures 100% renewable energy for its municipal accounts under Direct Access that complies with the State’s Renewable Portfolio Standard. The City pays approximately $1.4M annually to its Direct Access energy service provider for the electricity the City uses. In addition, the City pays SCE approximately $4.6M annually for its transmission and distribution services as the incumbent utility.  As City operations expanded, new electricity accounts were created, but were not eligible for Direct Access at the time of their creation. Of the City’s 695 electric accounts, 609 are under Direct Access and receive 100% renewable energy. The other 86 are not currently under Direct Access, and account for approximately 13% of municipal energy use (5.3 annual MWh out of the total 41.3 annual MWh).  These accounts are receiving SCE’s base level of renewable energy.', 'Staff recommends that these non-Direct Access accounts purchase energy through CPASC at the 100% renewable energy tier, bringing all accounts to 100% renewable energy and ensuring that the City is completely green-powered. Based on the preliminary analysis (Attachment C), these accounts would see a 7% increase in energy generation costs compared to SCE’s base kWh rate according to analysis prepared by The Energy Authority on behalf of the CPASC. The net impact to the affected accounts would be an approximate 5% increase, since energy generation represents only a portion of the utility bill (the remainder is for transmission and distribution).', 'Based on preliminary analysis of the most recent month of electric bills for the City, staff estimates this 5% increase would roughly translate into a cumulative $3,580 net increase per month for all municipal accounts purchasing CPASC energy. The annual cost would be roughly $43,000.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Recommending that the default tier for commercial energy customers in Santa Monica be 60-65% renewable would not have any fiscal impact on the City and is anticipated to be cost-neutral for those customers. Those customers would have the option to select a lower or a higher rate at their discretion.', 'Purchasing energy from the CPASC for the City’s non-Direct Access municipal accounts is estimated to cost roughly $43,000 annually above current energy costs. If the program begins in June 2018, the estimated monthly increase of $3,580 could be', 'covered in the FY 2017-18 operating budget in various accounts currently paying for non-Direct Access electricity. Budget approval for future years would be contingent on Council approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2888'}, {'Title': 'Cancellation of Regular City Council Meetings Scheduled for the March 13, 2018 and July 10, 2018, and Scheduling a Special Meeting for March 6, 2018', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council vote to:1. Cancel the regular meetings scheduled for March 13, 2018 and July 10, 2018 due to a lack of quorum; and2. Schedule a special meeting for March 6, 2018.', 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2894'}, {'Title': 'Approval of minutes for the January 9, 2018 Redevelopment Successor Agency meeting.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the Redevelopment Successor Agency approve the minutes for the January 9, 2018 meeting.', 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2915'}, {'Title': 'Annual Update on City Investment Policy', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review and approve the City’s revised Investment Policy; and2. Extend the delegation of investment authority to the Director of Finance, as City Treasurer, from March 1, 2018 through February 28, 2019.Staff also recommends that the Successor Agency Governing Board:1. Review and approve the City Investment Policy for Successor Agency Investments; and2. Extend investment authority to the Treasurer of the Successor Agency, from March 1, 2018 through February 28, 2019.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'State law requires that the City adopt an investment policy (Attachment A) and that the City Council annually consider the policy at a public meeting. The Santa Monica City Charter delegates the authority for investing City funds to the Director of Finance as the City Treasurer. State law requires that the Council delegate investment authority to the City Treasurer for a one-year period, renewable annually. The current delegation of authority carries through February 28, 2018. In addition, Santa Monica City Charter Section 711 delegates the authority to invest City funds to the City Treasurer.', 'Discussion', 'City investments are made only in those instruments specifically authorized by California State laws, primarily Sections 53601, 16429.1, and 53684 et seq. of the Government Code. Within these legal guidelines, the three primary objectives of the City’s Investment Policy and investment practices, in priority order are:', '· Safety – Safety of principal is the foremost objective of the City’s investment program. City investments shall be undertaken in a manner that seeks to ensure the preservation of capital in the overall portfolio by diversifying its investments among a variety of securities offering independent returns.', '· Liquidity – City investments are kept sufficiently liquid to enable the City to meet all operating requirements which might be reasonably anticipated by structuring the portfolio so that securities mature concurrently with anticipated cash needs to the extent possible. Investments are primarily made in securities with active secondary or resale markets. Additionally, an adequate liquidity buffer is maintained for extraordinary circumstances.', '· Rate of Return – The City’s investment portfolio is designed with the objective of attaining a benchmark rate of return throughout budgetary and economic cycles taking into account safety and liquidity requirements. The benchmark may vary from time to time depending on the economic and budgetary conditions present.', 'The City continues to abide by the highest professional standards in the management of public funds. While the investment strategy is flexible and can change based on market and economic conditions, the legal and policy guidelines governing these investment decisions remain relatively static. In addition, the City Investment Policy includes socially responsible investment principles. In recent years, the City has added divestment from fossil fuels and from banks providing funding to fossil fuel companies to the policy, which resulted in the sale of two Wells Fargo bonds from the City’s portfolio in 2017.', 'On an on-going basis, staff also reviews public agency investment best practices and regulatory or legal changes to ensure City compliance. Staff has reviewed the latest Local Agency Investment Guidelines Report issued by the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission. There are no significant statutory changes requiring revisions to the City’s Investment Policy. Minor revisions reflecting staffing changes in the investment process are included. Only minor wording revisions are included in this year’s update.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions. Staff provides monthly reports to the City Council and the City Manager describing the present status of City investments and monies held by the City, and summarizing all investment transactions for the month. Interest earnings from the City’s pooled investment portfolio are allocated to the various City funds based upon each fund’s share of total City cash and investments. Projected investment earnings for each fund are included in the FY 2017-18 Revised Budget. No budget action is required at this time.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2833'}], [{'Title': 'The Future of Big Blue Bus', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Transit Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '04. Study Sessions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff requests that the City Council review Big Blue Bus (BBB) governance, service design, and service delivery strategies and provide guidance to staff for framing the future of BBB.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary:', 'Big Blue Bus is the third largest municipal bus operator in Los Angeles County, providing service to the City and the Westside through 20 fixed route bus lines, a late night demand-response service from one of the Expo light rail stations, and a community Dial-A-Ride service (now branded MODE) that provides transportation to seniors and disabled City residents within the City limits. The service has a proud 90 year-history of providing cost-effective, high-quality bus transit to residents and neighbors of Santa Monica and offering connections to the region beyond. It has won the prestigious American Public Transportation Association’s Outstanding Transportation System award five times, last in 2011.', 'Since the inauguration of Santa Monica Municipal Bus Lines service in 1928, the system has matured to a sub-regional transportation operation, providing 54,000 daily trips to 58 square miles of LA County.', 'BBB has been tremendously successful as a leader in the County and the transportation industry. BBB has been a marketplace leader from technology innovations like BBB’s mobile phone applications for real-time schedule information and fare payment, to utilizing metrics to measure system performance to make informed decisions on service delivery, to leading the country in sustainability efforts by propelling buses with Near-Zero emissions engines fueled with Renewable Natural Gas (RNG).', 'As a result of historical transit ridership declines in the US and in LA County (per capita ridership has seen a consistent decrease since 2002), staff has undertaken a number of initiatives to provide more efficient and effective service, understanding that the cost for the provision of service has increased 1.17% over the last year. Should we continue to operate service in the current model, financial projections prepared for the Five Year Budget Forecast predict that the structural operating deficit could approach $11 million by FY19-20, and that subsequent years could exhaust BBB reserves by FY21-22.', 'Since providing the current level of service with the current service model would not be sustainable, the time has come to chart a new direction to ensure a sustainable transit model for our City’s residents, visitors and the Westside. We face the opportunity and challenge of adapting to the unfolding changes in mobility – including becoming more efficient in the delivery of our service, and focusing on enriching the customer experience in order to both retain current customers, and attract new ones. Staff is targeting the value that our service provides to our customers by improving the wellbeing of Santa Monica and Los Angeles (LA) residents, in addition to the value that we provide to the visitors who use our service.', 'While many agencies have decided to “wait out” the tectonic changes in our marketplace (thinking that these were cyclical ridership anomalies), BBB staff aggressively undertook new programs and projects to improve service quality, enhance the customer experience, and become nimbler. Customer amenities described in detail later in the report include mobile applications for fare payment and real time schedule information, discounted fares through TAP, Blue to Business, Discounted Youth Pass, and partnership with Lyft for late night and Dial-a-Ride (now branded MODE) service to the City.', 'Concurrently, staff has worked diligently to reduce and contain operating expenditures, including the engagement of a Third Party Administrator, Intercare Holdings, to manage our worker’s compensation program, installation of collision avoidance technology on the fleet to reduce accidents and support the City’s Vision Zero program, and streamlining the selection process and training program for Motor Coach Operators to optimize workforce availability. We have continued to use BBB Key Performance Indicators (KPIs) to enhance and improve operational performance and reliability (On Time Performance, Miles between Road Failures).', 'All these trends, challenges and opportunities take place in the context of Santa Monica’s Strategic Goal of “Creating a new model of mobility” set by the City Council in 2015. BBB is an integral player in this effort, and the future of our local and regional transit service is interwoven into discussions about bike, pedestrian and other modes of “first-mile, last-mile” connections between where people live, and where they journey for work, school, shopping, and services.', 'This report provides a summation of where we have been and the challenges we face today. It addresses some of the dramatic changes to the mobility landscape never before experienced by the transit industry. In looking to the future, staff seeks Council’s guidance on charting the future of BBB and poses three alternative options for framing the discussion:', '· Are we a leader?', '· Are we a partner?', '· Should we get out of the way?', 'The final section of this report, Where We’re Going: The Road to 2018, provides a comprehensive discussion on these three major areas for Council guidance:', '· Governance: A discussion on the appropriate future governing body for BBB as well as discussion on what policy and regulatory issues could be addressed to incentivize mass transit, define Santa Monica as a “Transit First” City, and allow the department to become nimbler.', '· Service Design: What should our transit system look like in the future based upon the Service Design options presented? Is the Council receptive to adopting new service planning standards understanding the current state of the market?', '· Service Delivery: How do we best provide efficient and effective service in the future? Is now the appropriate time to develop partnerships to provide more efficient service in order to maintain core service and provide other mobility options to the community?', 'Finally, since this study session will raise questions about governance and service delivery methodologies, a commitment to ensuring that a collective and collaborative approach is taken with all BBB staff to re-position BBB for future success is critical. Therefore, the BBB leadership team is committed to providing a thoughtful, engaging process for all levels of BBB staff to participate in an internal culture change to make this a successful journey serving all our diverse transit stakeholders: riders, community members and BBB staff.', 'Discussion', 'Where We’ve Been: The First 90 Years', 'During the first 90 years of service, BBB has been an industry leader in innovative approaches to service delivery and enhancing the customer experience. BBB is the third largest municipal bus operator in LA County providing service to the City and the Westside through 20 fixed route bus lines, a late night demand-response service from one of the Expo light rail stations, and a community demand-response service, MODE, that provides transportation to seniors and disabled City residents within the City limits, a service not offered by most other municipalities in LA County. This service is provided by BBB in addition to the complementary Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) paratransit service provided by Access Services.', 'The most recent comprehensive operational analysis, Evolution of Blue, was approved by City Council on April 28, 2015 and implemented in 2014-2016 to ensure that the system provided first-last mile connectivity to the seven new rail stations in the service area, and updated routes and schedules that had not been holistically analyzed in more than 15 years.', 'BBB has led the industry with transit technology by providing customer-friendly fare payment options through TAP, and was the second system in the County to also offer fare payment through a mobile ticketing app. Other technology applications include real-time schedule information available via mobile apps and at 34 bus stops in Santa Monica, customer and staff safety and security features through BBB’s CAD/AVL Radio System, on-board video surveillance systems, and proximity sensors and cameras installed on buses that alert operators to nearby pedestrians, bicycles, and vehicles in time to prevent collisions.', 'Over the years, the system has consistently ranked in the 90th percentile in customer satisfaction and in the industry for the following core strengths:', 'Fleet reliability, cleanliness, appearance, and sustainability: 100% of BBB’s fleet is propelled by clean RNG with projected further reduction of NOx emissions by more than 90 percent in 2018 with the current procurement of 27 more buses with near-zero emission engines. Average fleet age is less than 6 years, with an industry best practice of 8.5 years.', 'Infrastructure: BBB has a state of the art maintenance facility, fueling facility, and campus, as well as iconic on-street bus stop amenities at more than 235 stops in Santa Monica.', 'Strong brand: Customer satisfaction is at 94%.', 'Regional connectivity: BBB’s 58-square mile service area is dense with housing and jobs. BBB provides convenient connections to Metro’s Expo, Green, Blue, Purple, Red and Gold rail lines; Metrolink and Amtrak commuter rail; and Culver CityBus, Gardena Transit (Gtrans), Beach Cities Transit, Los Angeles Department of Transportation (LADOT) Commuter Express, LADOT Dash, Torrance Transit, Santa Clarita Transit, and Foothill Transit Silver Line bus service.', 'Last mile provider: Strong ridership on the Metro Rail system, particularly the Expo line, brings as many as 60,000 potential bus riders per day into our service area who are looking for last mile connections to their destinations.', 'World-class destinations: BBB serves Los Angeles Airport, Loyola Marymount University, Playa Vista, Marina Del Rey, VA campus in Westwood, Santa Monica College (SMC), University California, Los Angeles (UCLA), Westwood Village, Downtown Los Angeles, and Union Station.', "Workforce culture and development programs: BBB provides every employee with opportunities for training. This includes more than 16 annual hours of customized training on customer service, technology and fleet maintenance, safety and security, and de-escalation/self-defense tactics for front-line and safety sensitive staff. BBB's internal Supervisory Training and Education Program (STEP) also provides leadership training for front-line employees and develops their supervisory skills by allowing them to work as supervisors and instructors in an acting capacity.", 'Supervisory/management academy and other skills and curricula are available through internal and external programs facilitated by Southern California Regional Transit Training Consortium (SCRRTC), National Transit Institute (NTI), Transportation Safety Institute (TSI), American Public Transportation Association (APTA), and California Transit Association (CTA) as well as Santa Monica Institute (SMI).', 'Partnerships: Existing corporate and college contracts enable institutions to fund BBB fares as a benefit to their students and staff (including UCLA, SMC, Downtown Santa Monica, Inc., and Providence St. Johns Health Center). Business and college partnerships collectively make up 19% of BBB’s annual ridership and our new Blue to Business program provides further partnership opportunities.', 'Transportation Demand Management (TDM) initiatives: Targeted programs enable opportunities for broader ridership in addition to Blue to Business, including K-12 Youth (Blue to School) and transit assistance programs in our service area such as the LA County Transit Pass Subsidy Program intended for residents living in unincorporated parts of the County, the Low Income Fares are Easy (LIFE - formerly Rider Relief) program that provides transit discounts to low income LA County residents, and the Federal Employee Commuter Benefit Program.', 'Service reliability: On-time Performance (OTP) is consistently at 80% and the Road Call (RC) rate is over 19,000 miles between mechanical failures.', 'Figure 1 - On-time Performance in 2017 compared to 2016', 'Transit-Oriented Development (TOD) opportunities exist with the 4th Street/Colorado Avenue terminus site and Bergamot Station.', 'New technology to enhance the customer experience includes:', '· Real time schedule information through the NextBus app which allows customers to access the information using any type of mobile phone;', '· Smartphone apps such as the Transit App and Google Transit make use of BBB’s GTFS-RT (General Transit Feed Specification Real Time) open data feed for greater customer convenience at no cost to BBB;', '· Installation of regional TAP fare validators and offering of all BBB fare products on TAP for seamless fare payment, a system that has dramatically reduced boarding and dwell time;', '· The recently-opened LiNC Bus-Only Lane to improve travel speed for customers and provide enhanced operational efficiencies to invest these savings in more service on our busiest north-south corridor during commuter peak hours;', '· Solar powered real-time signs at 34 bus stops in the city; and,', '· Collision avoidance technology to address the Vision Zero city-wide effort and to improve safety on buses.', '· BBB is the first municipal transit agency in our region to offer mobile ticketing, allowing any customer with a smartphone to purchase, activate, and use mobile passes on our buses.', 'Partnerships with Federal, State, Regional, and City staff to leverage best practices with the advancement of new transportation technologies:  Connected and Automated Vehicle (C/AV) Technology development and pilot implementations are becoming prolific at cities throughout the country. Staff is actively participating in organizations such as the Intelligent Transportation Systems-California (ITS-CA), a public/private partnership formed to foster the development and deployment of advanced transportation systems within the State of California. Staff also serves on CONNECT-IT (Connect and Integrate Transportation Technology), the newly formed regional committee representing multiple jurisdictions in LA County that include 31 cities, several transit organizations, the Ports of Long Beach and LA, Caltrans, and others to develop a regional transportation technology architecture. BBB staff also supports the city’s Automated Vehicle (AV) Workgroup. Although many pilot programs are underway (as discussed in Appendix A) these organizations continue to analyze the potential threats and opportunities presented by emerging AV technology including safety, traffic congestion, infrastructure requirements, and other implications.', 'Technology Roadmap: With the advent of technology that would provide tremendous savings in the provision of mobility options and service, staff has initiated an analysis of all of our technology systems and is currently in the late stages of a procurement process to engage a consultant to perform a system-by-system needs assessment of BBB’s technology infrastructure. Recommendations will be prioritized based on cost/benefit and other criteria, including relevance in the changing transit marketplace, ease of implementation, and implementation timeline. Further information about BBB’s technology planning and demonstration programs planned and underway are explained in Appendix A.', 'Challenges & Changing Marketplace', 'As noted earlier, the public transit landscape has changed dramatically over the last three years. Transit ridership declines, particularly bus ridership, have been seen throughout not only the region and state but across all of North America.', 'BBB, like most other transit systems, saw a significant decline in ridership over the last three years, the most dramatic in FY15-16 and FY16-17 where ridership declined 11.58% and 19.56% respectively. However, ridership trends this year to date do show modest growth with August, October and November showing increases from .05% to over 4%, a positive trend that indicates we may have reached bottom, and BBB’s ridership performance in FY17-18 to date compares favorably with other municipal providers in our region as can be seen in the following figure.', 'Figure 2 - Bus Ridership FY17-18 YTD Comparison among Region’s Transit Providers', 'Although many in the industry predicted that ridership declines were “cyclical” due to economic changes, staff did not concur with this assessment and began a process of evaluating BBB ridership changes, demographic changes, and a new strategic direction.', 'In addition to conducting internal analyses, staff is participating in a regional ridership improvement task force formed in 2016 by BBB, Long Beach Transit, Culver CityBus and Metro to evaluate and address ridership retention and attraction of new customers. Staff is also participating in the LA County regional study of ridership patterns and providing data for the UCLA Institute of Transportation Studies recent work regarding transit ridership trends in the Southern California Association of Governments (SCAG) region, who just published their report a few weeks ago.', 'Based on information collected thus far, the following issues have directly influenced BBB ridership in recent years:', 'Disruptive factors affecting ridership trends in BBB’s service area, including opening of the Expo light rail extension to downtown Santa Monica: Route based analysis revealed that many riders shifted from BBB service to the Expo Line from BBB routes that ran parallel to the train. This affected Route 7, Rapid 7, and Rapid 10 customers most dramatically, as they can now reach their east-west destinations faster on light rail than by bus. However, ridership was lost on every BBB route at nearly every bus stop across the system, not just those directly impacted by the Expo light rail opening, indicating the presence of other forces at work. Staff efforts to better understand BBB’s changing ridership trends include an in-depth analysis using data compiled from customer satisfaction surveys, a non-rider survey of attitudes and opinions about transit, and public meetings.', 'Affordability of and access to driving in our region and state: Both automobiles and gasoline have become more affordable. Studies suggest that vehicle ownership rates may well be the “smoking gun” underlying transit’s precipitous decline in ridership.', 'o From 2000 to 2015, 2.4 million people moved into the County. During that same period, 2.1 million new automobiles were registered in the County, an almost 1:1 ratio of automobiles to new residents. According to US Census data, access to a vehicle increased most dramatically among lower income households (which have traditionally been considered public transportation’s “captive” riders.)', 'o In the entire SCAG region (Southern California Area Governments), the share of households without vehicles fell 30% between 2000 and 2015, while the share of households with less than one vehicle for each adult fell 14% as shown in the figure below from the report published in January 2018 by the UCLA Institute of Transportation Studies for SCAG.', 'Figure 3 - Zero Vehicle Households Decreasing, Especially in Low-Income Households', 'o Among foreign-born households, also traditionally transit users, percentage declines were larger; 42% decrease in the number of households without a vehicle, and 22% decrease in households with less than one vehicle, as shown in this figure from the same report.', 'Figure 4 - Zero-Vehicle Households Down among Recent Immigrants', 'o A recent BBB non-rider survey conducted in early 2018 on City and West Side residents who do not take public transportation comports to the data from the SCAG-UCLA Study that vehicle ownership was the number one reason that over 80% of the respondents no longer took public transportation.', 'Other external influences: Two other contributing factors affecting ridership trends in the region include the 2016 state legislation that provided driver’s licenses to an estimated 650,000 undocumented residents of LA County, who were most likely former transit riders; and gentrification of neighborhoods such as Central LA and the fringes of Downtown LA, causing losses of former transit commuters who had to relocate to more affordable housing well outside of the Los Angeles regional transit network and for whom driving or telecommuting became more viable options.', 'The rise of transportation network companies (TNCs) operating in our City and throughout the County offering affordable on-demand transportation alternatives and direct door-to-door service not only provides new mobility options for many of our former customers, but also presents a secondary issue of TNC’s conducting operations in BBB stops, hindering BBB’s ability to operate safely.', 'Deteriorated travel speeds: Traffic and congestion have had impacts on bus travel speed, which has slowed 4% in the last two years as traffic continues to worsen.', 'Regulatory cost of conducting business: While the past few years have been challenging for bus ridership and farebox revenue, operating costs for maintaining the current level of service have continued to increase due to higher wage rates and benefit costs, negotiated entitlements, and unfunded mandatory legislative actions at both the state and federal levels; e.g., National Transit Database (NTD), Safety Management Systems (SMS), Transit Asset Management (TAM), Family and Medical Leave Act (FMLA), the California Paid Sick Leave Law, and others.', 'Given the rising costs of operations, were BBB to continue to provide the current level of Revenue Vehicle Service Hours (RVSH) over the next two years, a potential budget deficit of approximately $11 million has been forecasted. This is not financially sustainable.', 'Where We’re Going: The Road to 2018', 'Framework', 'The following sections - Governance, Service Design and Delivery, and Fleet Composition - each provide opportunities for framing BBB’s future. Each section is prefaced with a series of questions to help Council formulate feedback for discussion. Staff also asks that Council consider each section in the framework of the questions that were posed in the Executive Summary.', '· Are we a leader? Do we continue to lead the industry and the County, understanding the inherent tradeoffs and risks?', '· Are we a partner? Is this the appropriate time to expand our partnerships with the private sector or other organizations?', '· Should we get out of the way? Is it time for an entirely new mobility model and framework and, if so, what is the transition period for getting there?', 'Governance', 'Is the Santa Monica City Council the appropriate policy body to govern a sub-regional bus operation? What actions can be taken to evolve our municipal policies and codes, many of which were developed in the 20th century, to keep pace with and embrace the disruptive technologies of the 21st century, to keep our City on the path to greater sustainability, and to add value to the services we provide to our citizens and visitors, especially mobility? What regulatory enhancements can be provided to truly identify Santa Monica as a “Transit First” community?', 'The governing body of the BBB has been the City Council of the City of Santa Monica since its creation as Santa Monica Municipal Bus Lines. While this relationship has been productive and rewarding for both parties, there may be reasons to re-examine that relationship now. Approximately 85% of BBB service is offered outside the City of Santa Monica in Los Angeles, Culver City, and in unincorporated sections of LA County. Santa Monica residents sometimes complain that the service is not locally focused and many erroneously assume that their City tax money underwrites BBB operations. While serving as the hub for a regional transit network provides advantages to Santa Monica residents accessing regional destinations and reduces traffic from incoming visitors and commuters, these advantages may be undervalued given expectations for local service.', 'Similarly, while BBB maintains cordial working relationships with our neighboring jurisdictions, our governing body does not contain representation or “champions” for those areas. As a result, constituents from those areas do not have an elected official to appeal to regarding BBB policy and actions, and BBB is sometimes challenged in obtaining cooperation to make needed changes or repairs to bus stops, street infrastructure, terminal availability, or bus routing. A transit board with representatives from all jurisdictions served might create a more effective and harmonious governance, and enhance BBB’s ability to confront current ridership trends.', 'In addition to the geographic and jurisdictional representation on a transit board, some transit systems have found value in assigning board members from constituent communities such as seniors, people with disabilities, or members of minority communities that are heavily represented in system ridership. An alternative local governance model might look more like the Airport Commission or Pier Board which supplements City Council oversight and enhances community participation in decision-making.', 'If sub-regional governance is not the answer, then what can be done to support BBB as a line department of the City that provides an invaluable service to not only citizens with their local and first-last mile mobility, but also moves more than 13.6 million people annually to their work, shopping, and entertainment options? BBB service is key to the economic health and wellbeing of not only the individuals who ride our buses, but of the City itself. With this in mind, what actions could be taken to evolve our municipal policies and codes, many of which were developed in the 20th century, to keep pace with and embrace the disruptive transportation trends and technologies of the 21st century? What regulatory enhancements could be adopted to truly identify Santa Monica as a “Transit First” community? For example, can citywide parking rate strategies be evaluated and eventually adopted to mitigate single occupancy vehicle trips to downtown, and with adoption of higher rates, incentivize the community to use another mobility option when traveling within the City?', 'Staff has identified best practices for how other municipalities are addressing congestion mitigation strategies, understanding that more TNCs transporting one or two passengers at a time bring additional congestion, pollution, and municipal code violations. Could policy changes for opportunities that do not currently exist within the framework of the City be considered? For example, the implementation of a new user fee for TNCs similar to Chicago’s new tax on Uber and Lyft could offset revenue loss and to help fund transit improvements and operations within the City. Should the City consider identifying TNC stops at strategic downtown locations to address the current practice of TNCs illegally staging in BBB’s stops, or stopping in the traffic lane, which negatively impacts bus operations safety as well as lane throughput and congestion?', 'Another approach to alleviating congestion is to encourage people to leave their cars and take public transit by implementing congestion pricing, which has a number of different applications including toll lanes already in use across the U.S. and in Southern California; but in this case specifically refers to assessing a fee on any vehicle entering city limits during rush hours. This approach is being discussed as a congestion-mitigation strategy in New York City; and has already been successfully implemented in London, Milan, Gothenberg, and Stockholm. This model is under consideration by the Southern California Association of Governments. By charging peak hour prices for driving, significant funds could be freed up to support transit systems and transportation improvements that support transit, bike and pedestrian mobility options.', 'Finally, administrative policy presents a governance challenge. Many projects require rapid implementation in a quickly changing technology environment, which can be impeded by a traditional procurement process that can result in technology solutions that are approaching obsolescence by the time of implementation. If BBB is to continue to take a leading role in our industry, be agile, and experiment with mobility options, staff suggests that Council consider a review of City policies/practices for procurements of new technologies, allowing for more pilots or iterative implementations, as well as considering updates to civil service policies for hiring, training, and development of staff.', 'The Service We Offer', 'How do we approach service design and what should our system look like in five years? Mobility options include all services currently offered by the City, and could include other service routes, more demand-response service open to the general public, Bus Rapid Transit (BRT) expansion on “bus-only” lanes, and additional express service to the South Bay/Long Beach and Ventura County.', 'How might our new service model best be delivered? Should BBB continue to operate all service and maintain all equipment? Should some service be contracted out in order to lower costs? Should service be delivered through a combination of these models? Should we operate only on major corridors and allow the private sector to fill in the service gaps and/or rely on other mobility options like bike/pedestrian? How are consumer preferences changing and how can those changes inform our decision-making?', 'Finally, how could we, as a City, evolve our mobility landscape to improve our constituents’ and visitors’ physical, economic, and social wellbeing through a “Transit First” approach whereby access to public transportation for citizens and visitors is seen as the basis of improved community wellbeing? Citywide street enhancements, corridor design, travel speed, universal electronic payment systems, bus stop placement, and transit-oriented development including affordable housing adjacent or close to mobility hubs with last-mile solutions complementary to fixed route transit (such as bicycle, scooter, pedestrian wayfinding, demand-response, and others) would all be designed with the transit customer in mind. For example, just as the recently opened LiNC bus-only lane is already increasing travel speed along that corridor for Route 3 and Rapid 3, additional bus-only lanes, Transit Signal Priority (TSP) and queue-jump to support more effective mass transit and other active mobility options could move more people to their destinations faster and more sustainably while at the same time improving operational efficiencies for Big Blue Bus. Best practices in other cities including Nashville, TN and Columbus, OH showing successful applications of this approach are described in Appendix B.', 'Staff has completed a great deal of work in service design and service delivery over the last five years, beginning with the Service, Design, Performance and Evaluation Guidelines adopted by Council in September of 2013. Service standards were adopted to ensure that service is provided equitably and fairly to all customer markets, understanding the resources available to do so. Using these standards, staff annually evaluates route performance and productivity to make informed recommendations and decisions on route and schedule changes.', 'Subsequent to that effort, staff embarked on a study of the impacts of rail expansion in the BBB service area. That study led to Evolution of Blue, recommendations on system modifications to interface with Expo to ensure first-last mile connectivity to the seven new stations in the BBB service area, as well as to preserve important market generators and existing high productivity bus corridors.', 'Shortly after the Council adopted the Evolution of Blue plan to restructure BBB service, the tremendous market changes described earlier in the section “Challenges and Marketplace” began to noticeably influence customer-riding behaviors. It became evident that additional factors beyond the changes adopted in Evolution of Blue were having dramatic impacts on the bus system. Ridership at all stops in the system declined nearly simultaneously, even on routes not impacted by the service changes. While it was clear that the rail system and ensuing bus route and schedule changes had removed some ridership, it also became clear that ridership was suffering for other reasons.', 'BBB ridership has stabilized in recent months as a result of a variety of ridership stabilization efforts taking place at BBB. However, this stabilization has been holding ridership steady at approximately 20% below levels seen just a few years ago. While the decrease in ridership is lamentable, BBB is in a far better position than most Southern California transit agencies that are still losing riders at a rate of 5% to 10% year over year (Figure 2 above). Put simply, this new stable level of ridership with BBB’s current level of service provided is not sustainable. The purpose of the following sections is to provide a menu of approaches that are economically viable and sustainable for the next five (5) years, and to allow BBB to continue to adopt and test new market initiatives and mobility approaches, as well as be nimble in the adaptation of technology advances and enhancements for improving the customer experience.', 'Service Design Options', 'Service design refers to passenger facing elements such as routes, schedules, span of service, frequencies, travel speed, fares and numerous other aspects that all influence how, when and where people take transit, and what it costs to operate the service. BBB intends to pursue a number of customer facing initiatives to improve the experience of using BBB that are not addressed in this discussion because they do not hold the potential to offer significant relief from the budget impacts identified. Rather than offering a comprehensive list, the following options are more narrowly focused activities that can be considered in whole or in part to significantly raise revenue, or cut costs, and in some cases increase passenger demand.', 'A status quo approach to service design is not recommended as it is not economically sustainable and would result in an increasing operating deficit and could mean depletion of reserves by FY21-22. From a community wellbeing perspective, any delay in action on service design increases the size of the measures that will need to be taken and will limit our flexibility to implement creative solutions.', 'Regardless of how we proceed with service design, the ridership losses we have suffered require the re-examination of our productivity standards. Currently, 45% of all weekday service and 38% of weekend service meets the minimum standards of productivity. Conversely, more than half of our service does not meet the standard. Productivity is defined as the number of passengers per hour that the service attracts. Unless we are prepared to pare half the BBB system, we are compelled to reset the minimum amount of riders that we find acceptable on our service.', 'Currently our productivity standards require 20 passengers per hour on local and commuter services (commuter service runs only in the peaks on weekdays) and 40 passenger per hour on Rapid and Express services in order for a route to be deemed sustainable. Staff is recommending adjusting that requirement to 12 passengers per hour on all services and then eliminating all services that do not meet that minimum. At 12 passengers per vehicle revenue hour, the average cost for providing a trip per passenger is $8.79. Even at the less restrictive standard of 12 passengers per hour, nearly a full 10% of today’s service would need to be eliminated in order for the system to meet the new standard.', 'With a new productivity standard in place, there are still choices to be made. Adherence to existing frequency standards, or adjustments to those same standards can be considered, and the decision as to whether to offer replacement service can also be considered. Furthermore, the suggested new standard of 12 passengers per hour may not be the correct threshold for a productivity standard. There is more than one path to reaching sustainability, and barring an unforeseen drastic increase in ridership, staff sees the need to explore these paths and to make choices. Following are two service design options for Council consideration and discussion:', 'Service Design 1 (SD1) – Establish a new productivity standard, retain current span of service standard, establish a new frequency standard, eliminate unproductive fixed route service, and provide demand response service: Under this model, services removed due to low productivity could be replaced with demand response service that provides similar service levels with lower cost per passenger. When service is removed and replaced by demand response, the customer would pay a base fare and BBB would provide a fixed contribution. Customers who incur costs above the base fare and BBB contribution would pay any additional balance. As an example, because this type of demand response service would be defined as a “premium” service, a higher fare would be charged ($1.75 to $2.50). In combination with a lower operating cost, and a fixed limit to the BBB contribution to the ride, the cost per passenger trip could be held to less than $7.', 'There are no proposed changes to Span of Service standards under this option. Those standards currently call for corridor service starting at 5am to 6am with a shut down time of midnight on weekdays, and a one hour later start time on weekends. Local service has the same start time as corridor service on all days and a shut down time of 9pm on all days.', 'This service design option also suggests the adjustment of minimum frequency standards that recognize the changing preferences of consumers. The current standards are every 30 minutes minimum for local service and every 15 minutes for Rapid and Express service during all days of the week. A new standard proposed under this option would be every 20 minutes on weekdays and every 30 minutes on weekends on all services.', 'Regarding frequency of service, many corridors would have higher service levels than the minimums in order to meet the current ridership demand (Santa Monica Blvd. every 10 minutes on weekdays, Pico Blvd. every 15 minutes on weekdays, etc.), but the minimums would be rigorously enforced and communicated to the public as part of the BBB brand.', 'At all times, the service would be required to obtain a minimum average of 12 passengers per hour productivity, or face elimination. At those times when the route is not running due to low productivity, passengers would be able to obtain a demand response shared ride that would pick them up and drop them off along the route corridor subject to the start and end times of the service day offered by the Span of Service standards which remain unchanged.', 'The advantage of this option is that it offers a low per passenger cost of service during low productivity times, while retaining the basic route structure and potential for route ridership growth. When and if the demand response ridership grows sufficiently to exceed the 12 passengers per hour threshold, the fixed route service could be reinstated during that hour, and the demand response service pared back. In this way, the route becomes a flexible service corridor able to offer as much or as little service is demanded by the public. In this way, costs are controlled, and passengers are provided service that does not suffer in frequency or convenience as a result of low demand.', 'The exception to this reinvestment approach is the Rapid 10, the Downtown Los Angeles Express that does not reach 12 passengers per vehicle revenue hour for any period long enough to offer even a limited service day, and would be proposed for elimination under this plan. However, the long route length does not make this service a candidate for alternative, reasonably priced demand response service.', 'The table below shows what the weekday service might look like under this scenario. Blue areas would identify fixed route service at a 20 minute or better frequency, and pink areas would be subsidized demand response service along those routes. In a preliminary analysis at the above level of frequency and productivity standards, staff estimates savings of approximately $5.8 million could be realized after service reductions and reinvestment to meet minimum frequency standards. $1.2 million of those savings would be re-invested in the new demand response mobility opportunities providing over 170,000 annual trips. The resultant savings would be utilized to rebuild reserves and used to leverage federal and state capital and planning funding.', 'Figure 5 - Weekday Service Modifications under the Service Design 1 (SD1) Model', 'The last element of this service design approach would be a phased approach to raising fares over a three- to five-year period in order to sustain a 20% farebox recovery ratio. The service model would include premium pricing in order to achieve Council adopted farebox recovery policies.', 'Service Design 2 (SD2) - Establish a new productivity standard, retain current span of service standard, establish a new frequency standard, eliminate unproductive fixed route service, but limit reinvestment of savings in a demand response service during hours when productivity standards are not met. This approach provides core fixed route service on productive lines and eliminates unproductive service with limited reinvestment. This model is similar to those that Houston Metro and Seattle recently undertook to pare unproductive service and focus on core productive service to improve frequency and span of service. The difference between this option and the first option would be the limit of reinvestment in demand response service where fixed route service was eliminated.', 'Staff conducted a small-scale version of this in FY2013-14 after the Council adopted the Planning Standards. Underperforming service was eliminated or reduced; and, in that case, the service hours were reinvested in core routes such as Route 1, Route 2, Route 3, Route 7, and Rapid 3 and 7.', 'Under this scenario, several compromise alternatives could be considered:', '1. No replacement service for routes or route segments that are eliminated; in a preliminary analysis staff has estimated that, with no reinvestment, savings of approximately $5.8 million could be realized under this option. Savings would be utilized to rebuild reserves that would be used to match federal and state capital and planning funding.', '2. Limited replacement service for routes or route segments. This approach invests some of the savings into limited demand response zones. Staff could evaluate options that do not necessarily reproduce the fixed route alignment with a demand response alignment, but instead look at demand response zones that transport riders the last mile to the transit network in whichever way is most expedient and efficient.', 'The disadvantages of this option are twofold. One, the lack of demand response service in some areas may further erode fixed route ridership during productive hours; two, where last mile demand response zones are offered, if they do not reproduce the route corridor, they may complicate the option to restore fixed route service if and when demand response ridership increases. However, the implication of further savings beyond those offered in SD1 cannot be ignored as the balance of the fixed route elimination savings would be recognized as overall savings, which would be utilized to rebuild reserves that would be used to match federal and state capital and planning funding.', '3. No replacement service for routes or route segments combined with investment in new markets to be piloted over an 18-month period and implemented if successful. Suggested new markets might include:', 'a. A BRT or express bus network that would provide service to the South Bay, Long Beach, Malibu, and Oxnard.', 'In a preliminary analysis, staff has estimated that the annual savings of approximately $5.8 million in service cuts would require a reinvestment of approximately $1.5 million to create a Santa Monica to South Bay Express or a Santa Monica to Oxnard Express, or approximately $3 million annually to implement both depending on service levels.', 'b. Development of a water ferry service that would operate two routes, one from Santa Monica or Marina del Rey to Malibu, then to Oxnard, and a southern route that would operate from Santa Monica or Marina del Rey to the South Bay, then to Long Beach and the Orange County line.', 'BBB has not developed a pricing model for ferry implementation.', 'Implementation of service into any of these new markets would likely require limiting service expansion to a selection of only one or two key services in order to realize projected savings, with a preliminary estimate selecting a single new market for reinvestment would generate a net savings of approximately $3 million. These savings would be utilized to rebuild reserves that would be used to match federal and state capital funding.', 'Service Design 3 (SD3) - Limit service outside of Santa Monica: This option considers the possibility of transforming BBB from a sub-regional provider to a local provider of transit. With 85% of current service outside of Santa Monica, this option would vastly shrink the size of BBB. This proposal would involve abandoning most service outside of Santa Monica and offering the abandoned routes to neighboring agencies such as Metro, Culver City Bus or LADOT to absorb. These agencies could not be forced under current regulations to absorb those routes, nor could they be forced to continue to run them if they deemed them unproductive after initial adoption. Additionally, even if they did adopt the routes, control of fares and levels of service would shift to other agencies.', 'Limited City service would continue to be operated, and could be supported with Measure M and R Local Return, and Prop A Local Return. However, the total funding from these measures and Prop A amounts to approximately $3 million annually. Additionally, formula Measure R and M funding of over $16 million would be reallocated to other service providers in the County.', 'In the past, the City dedicated Local Prop A funding to provide the Tide and Ride shuttles. Those services were deemed unproductive. A partnership with Santa Monica Travel and Tourism and hotels could provide matching funds that would enhance core service routes to connect popular destinations downtown and fringe destinations like Montana Avenue or SMC from the downtown core.', 'It should be noted here that many of BBB’s most productive services cross the city line and have more than half of their service miles outside Santa Monica, including routes 7 and Rapid 7 on Pico Blvd, Routes 3 and Rapid 3 on Lincoln Blvd, and route 1 on Main Street and Santa Monica Blvds. Those high productivity corridors correspond to lower costs per passenger and all of those routes consistently fall below the mean cost per passenger ($5.10 in FY2017) of the BBB system.', 'Conversely, some of the Santa Monica based services consistently have lower productivity and the consequence of a higher costs per passenger including Routes 18, 41, 42, and 43, which all fell above the mean cost per passenger for FY2017. It is a likely outcome that a local-only service model would suffer lower productivity overall and higher costs per passenger than the current sub-regional model.', 'Due to the high level of unknowns, staff has not estimated the financial impact of this approach; however, implementation of this approach would greatly diminish BBB’s funding opportunities.', 'Service Delivery Options', 'Service delivery refers to the types of vehicles that are used, the agency that is running the vehicles, the pay and benefits programs offered to bus operators, maintenance and support staff, and other factors divorced from issues such as routes, schedules and fares. While there is always some crossover between service delivery and service design, the next section focuses on considerations of service delivery.', 'Considering the market factors and internal challenges we face today, the following service delivery options are being considered by staff. When considering these, the range of options can include subcontracting the entire organization, to subcontracting different business functions as described below.', 'Subcontracted Operations: Understanding that the Council recently read the BBB Staff Information Item on the FY2016-17 BBB Performance Report, the current model of delivering fixed route service cannot continue to be sustained financially. Several routes have fallen below the Council adopted performance standards for consecutive quarters. In order to address delivering the current level of service efficiently, staff considered subcontracting some or all of the operation of the BBB system to a private contractor. This is a common approach to cost savings and one employed by LA Metro, Foothill Transit, as well as numerous other transit districts regionally.', 'Subcontracted costs are generally 10-25% lower due to lower wage and benefit rates. Single functions or multiple business functions can be subcontracted including Motor Coach Operations, Mechanical Support, Motor Coach Cleaning and other functions. The implementation of subcontracting routes, geographic portions of the service area, or an entire turn-key operation are options that are industry best practice, depending upon the goals that have been established by the organization. The advantage of this option is the ability to retain higher levels of service and low passenger impacts, while still reducing costs.', 'An example of a total turn-key privately contracted service delivery model is found locally at Foothill Transit, where all service and maintenance of the fleet are provided by an outside vendor. Foothill Transit has two (2) contractors established through geographic model where one contractor provides service to some communities from one garage, and a second operates service in a different area from a second facility. Foothill Transit administrative staff are all employees of the District and report to a district-wide board of directors. Administrative staff are maintained as District employees to administer contractual agreements, monitor performance, and sustain grant development/management. All liability and any relevant employee agreements would be assumed by the contractor.', 'In a preliminary analysis, staff has estimated that entering into an agreement with a private sector company that is suited for this work could generate annual savings of approximately $8-20 million annually depending on wage rates, employee benefits, and other similar factors.', 'Offer Select Routes to Neighboring Transit Partners: This model would shrink BBB service in size through turning over routes to Metro, Culver CityBus, LADOT, or other transportation providers in the region. The actual process that would take place is the abandonment of a route by BBB and the implementation of service by another agency at the same time, often by agreement.', 'This process is not without risks, as transit providers are under no obligation to accept the invitation to implement new service, or if they do accept to undertake it initially, to continue the routes as designed, or to run the routes at all, if they deem them unproductive after a trial period (usually two years). The recent closure of the Venice Metro base of operations on Main Street leaves West Hollywood as the closest Metro garage to Santa Monica, and distance from service is a key consideration when looking at adoption of new routes.', 'As stated above, the inherent risk to this model is that the new provider is under no obligation to continue to operate the service, and if it determined that it was prudent to abandon this service, the City could potentially lose its sub-regional connection to the County bus, rail, and other mobility options if this happened. Council would likely face decisions regarding service abandonment in terms of the sub-regional corridors that form the basis of BBB service.', 'Moving to More Demand Response Services Where Ridership is Low: This model begins to blur the line between service delivery and service design because it entails elements of both. The premise here is that where ridership falls below a certain determined level, fixed route service would be eliminated and demand response service implemented along the corridor. This is presented as a separate option to the concept offered in SD1 and SD2, because there are myriad possibilities in this type of service replacement that are not considered in either SD1 or SD2. Higher fixed route productivity standards could be considered, which would drive more fixed route service elimination and more replacement with demand response. Route productivity standards could be differentiated based on route length, providing the opportunity for different levels of demand response subsidy depending on distance travelled, and many other options for varying fares and subsidies could be considered.', 'The sophistication of the demand response technology available implies that this option could introduce significant levels of nuance that BBB could use to drive consumer behavior. Recent innovations in on-demand transportation have resulted in easier access to shared fleets and sophisticated calling, scheduling, dispatching, and couponing of rides being available at a low cost through TNC’s. The advantage to this option is the ability to provide the same or similar customer experience (wait time, cost, travel time) at a lower cost per passenger. Service would be provided during the same hours as fixed route, and would be available within the corridor at stops or major intersections.', 'Fleet Composition', 'BBB has been an industry leader in sustainability. It was one of the first agencies to adopt an alternative fuel path and is currently operating a fleet of 200 buses using Renewable Natural Gas (RNG). In 2017, BBB was the first agency in the country to adopt the Near-Zero emission engine produced by Cummins for all new bus procurements as well as for repowering of buses at mid-life. As of the end of 2017, BBB has 25 new buses and 15 repowered buses with the Near-Zero Engine, the most in the entire country. By the end of 2019, BBB will have 120 vehicles with the Near-Zero engines, reducing our current NOx by 91.5%.', 'Understanding that BBB’s service delivery model will change, what will the fleet of the future look like? How should we convert the fleet to Zero Emissions and Autonomous-Connected Vehicles, and what is the cost to build the necessary infrastructure? What are all of the relevant cost implications to do so, and what is the appropriate timeline? Staff will provide a detailed analysis of these technologies and options to Council at a future study session that is scheduled for later this spring.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Action', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of study session discussion. However, the financial concerns raised will require decisions to address the structural deficit. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2754'}, {'Title': 'Mobility Strategic Goal Update and Discussion', 'Department': 'Mobility (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '04. Study Sessions', 'Recommendations': 'Discuss progress toward the Council’s Strategic Goal of creating a new model of mobility and provide future direction on the three action areas of increasing transit usage, walking and biking; eliminating severe and fatal collisions (i.e. Vision Zero); and creating a complete and connected mobility network throughout Santa Monica.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary:', 'Given the severity of regional and local traffic congestion – and the economic, environmental, and safety costs of overreliance on cars – the City of Santa Monica has recognized the need for a comprehensive new approach – and developed a clear vision for a diverse transportation network that promotes people walking, biking, carpooling, and taking transit. This vision aligns with both the City’s General Plan and the City’s larger Framework for promoting wellbeing and sustainability – and a city that works for everyone.', 'The Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) of the General Plan (2010) set an inclusive and forward-looking mobility policy foundation, but could not predict the recent technology advances that pose new opportunities and challenges regarding use of the public right-of-way, public-private partnerships, data, and management strategies. This set of updated core principles to aid in day-to-day decision-making is based on adopted policy documents:', '· Put people and safety first.', '· Give all people access to mobility choices.', '· Pioneer a clean mobility future.', '· Design great streets for health and wellbeing.', '· Leverage private sector innovation in new mobility that serves community needs.', '· Strengthen government services with data-driven decision-making.', 'In August 2015, Council identified “Creating a new model of mobility" as one of its five Strategic Goals. Early work on the Mobility Strategic Goal yielded progress through the opening of Expo Light Rail, Breeze Bike Share, Evolution of Blue and GoSaMo mobility campaign. The report outlines more recent work, organized around the Mobility Strategic Goal\'s three target areas: increasing trips on foot, bike, and transit; eliminating severe injury and fatal collisions; and\u202fcreating a complete and connected mobility network.', 'Increasing transit, walking and biking trips:', 'Enabling alternative travel options requires a combination of revamped infrastructure and imaginative initiatives. The biennial Capital Improvement Program (CIP) organizes, prioritizes, and allocates funding for the numerous annual infrastructure maintenance and improvement projects. Mobility staff is preparing potential projects to be considered for funding in the next capital budget based on the following criteria: identified in adopted plans to complete bike, pedestrian and transit networks; advance work toward Vision Zero; leverage outside transportation funds; and coordinated with adjacent projects or maintenance efforts.', 'Vision Zero:', 'Vision Zero is a City target to eliminate severe injury and fatal collisions by the year 2026 for all roadway users. Vision Zero is an audacious goal but anything less would be unacceptable, and major cities like New York have shown that Vision Zero action plans can make major improvements.\u202f\u202fSanta Monica staff is working every day and across all departments to encourage safety on the street. Nonetheless, in 2017, 9 people were killed and 25 severely injured on Santa Monica streets. Speeding and distracted driving were among the greatest causes of these tragedies.\u202fA Priority Network Map was created to identify areas that will be first to receive more detailed evaluation of collision reports, to better understand the conditions occurring, the factors contributing to a crash, and what countermeasures would be effective.', 'Staff has prepared a 2-year work plan of strategic actions to advance Vision Zero within the larger goal of promoting a new model of mobility. The 2-year approach contains elements that are specific, measurable and concrete, allows sufficient time to test new tactical interventions and strategies, and incorporate elements into departmental work plans. Achieving Vision Zero will necessitate that all departments take a role. In the next year, staff will create and implement an outreach plan outlining steps the City is taking to make streets safer for all modes, how to be safe and attentive while traveling, and what everyone can do to participate in saving lives, highlighting that speeding and distracted driving are the leading causes of collisions.', 'Complete and connected mobility network:', 'The opportunity to create a safer and more seamless transportation system has been unlocked by technology and innovation. But it does not come without its drawbacks. The latest innovations in transportation that are happening today, particularly shared mobility, autonomous vehicles and vehicle electrification simultaneously support and undermine sustainability, equity, economic, and quality of life outcomes. Cities across the country are grappling with these new opportunities and challenges - starting pilot projects, reorganizing for new work flows, and developing tools to deal with the myriad data, communications, regulation, operation and maintenance challenges.', 'The report discusses the opportunities and challenges, and presents a range of short and mid-term steps in advocacy, infrastructure, data management and policy with the intent to encourage:', '· Vehicle automation that is safer for people on the street, and which does not increase local congestion and emissions, and', '· Shared mobility that supports transit and shared rides, expands mobility options, increases roadway efficiency, and reduces emissions.', 'Council input is needed on the approach, desired level of engagement and leadership, and content of specific steps. These work efforts are new, and are not currently in the planned projects, and Council direction can inform the level of effort toward staffing and resources.', 'Background:', 'On July 6, 2010, Council adopted the LUCE, the heart of the State-mandated General Plan, that sets the City\'s broad transportation policy foundation. It identified the City\'s street designations, transportation goals, demand management approach, parking policies, and established the goal of "No Net New Trips." This goal commits to using transportation management tools in a way that avoids any increase in vehicle trips in the evening peak period by 2030. The LUCE also recommends dozens of circulation and mobility action items. On November 22, 2011, Council adopted the Bike Action Plan as the LUCE\'s first action item, and staff has reported annually on Plan implementation since 2013.', 'Council identified a "New Model for Mobility" as one of the City’s top five Strategic Goals at an August 23, 2015 City Council meeting. This was consistent with the City’s proactive and on-going work on mobility policy, programs and implementation. The Mobility Strategic Goal seeks a more diverse mobility system that is convenient, attractive, cost-effective, customer-oriented and that supports community values of wellbeing and sustainability.', 'On February 23, 2016, Santa Monica adopted the Pedestrian Action Plan, consistent with LUCE recommendations.', 'This new model of mobility is linked not just to transportation, but to livability and accessibility. This is a broad-ranging movement that requires renovating our public streets, diversifying and improving mobility options and encouraging people to use them. Three target areas for the Mobility Strategic Goal were identified in a subsequent August 25, 2016 Information Item:', '1. Increasing trips on foot, bike, and transit', '2. Eliminating severe injury and fatal collisions', '3. Creating a complete and connected mobility network', 'At the February 14, 2017 City Council Meeting, Council instructed staff to prepare a report documenting the progress of several initiatives, including the Pedestrian Action Plan, Bicycle Action Plan, and Vision Zero. On May 9, 2017 the Council gave direction regarding creation of a Vision Zero strategy to reduce and ultimately eliminate severe injury and fatal collisions.', 'Discussion:', 'The City’s General Plan provides a comprehensive vision for preserving Santa Monica’s unique sense of place and planning for a dynamic and livable future: “The LUCE conserves the City’s neighborhoods and historic resources, expands open space, and creates new opportunities for housing where few or none currently exist. It reduces the amount of regional commercial growth and encourages smaller-scale local-serving uses and housing. It encourages new development connected directly to transit, creating a multimodal transportation system that incentivizes walking, biking and transit. It also encourages local-serving retail within walking distance of existing and new neighborhoods, serving to reduce greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions.” (Executive Summary)', 'The LUCE highlights the importance of treating streets as public spaces and the need to actively manage the street network to achieve our goals. It also puts equity at the forefront, insisting that public streets serve all people regardless of age, ability or mode choice. Streets were further identified as places that support public life, health, economic resiliency, and neighborhoods. Street space is understood to be managed as a limited resource, with a need to mitigate demand while also increasing efficiency. LUCE paints an inclusive picture of the role of streets, never losing sight that streets are meant for people first and are part of our community and social gathering spaces.', 'Since 2010 when the LUCE was adopted, many new and unforeseen transportation technology advances have occurred, resulting in new services and new uses of street space. These services include curbside passenger pick-up/drop-off, electric bicycle and scooter riding, and on-demand delivery services to name just a few. Santa Monica will need to adapt within this rapidly-changing environment and develop new tools to effectively manage public space for the common good.', "Reinforcing the community's core mobility goals and principles is an important first step to guide ad-hoc decision-making and set a foundation for longer-term efforts.\u202fThe following principles come from Santa Monica's adopted community plans, with minor updates that address current technological advances:", '· Put people and safety first – reverse decades of single-purpose engineering to increase automobile speed at the expense of all else, because no person should have to feel in danger or endanger another – and streets ultimately should be designed for people.', '· Give all people access to mobility choices - create a transportation environment that provides for everyone, diversifies available options, and provides equal access regardless of age, income, race, gender, or ability.', '· Pioneer a clean mobility future - reduce emissions from transportation to slow global climate change, by reducing demand and increasing the supply of efficient options.', '· Design great streets for health and wellbeing - create complete streets that are safe, pleasant and beautiful to provide social gathering places, strengthen community connections and help people thrive.', '· Leverage private sector innovation in new mobility that serves community needs - harness the investment in new mobility to increase the diversity of mobility options, with careful partnerships that protect community safety and resiliency.', '· Strengthen government services with data-driven decision-making - Create strength in government services by using a data-driven process to align new transportation services with Santa Monica values. Leverage and train a responsive workforce that can effectively use data to leverage resources to maximize public benefits.', 'These principles will help guide the day-to-day work of designing, managing and maintaining the mobility system that we have today and are creating for tomorrow.', 'The remainder of this report is presented in the order of the Mobility Strategic Goal target areas to provide an update on work efforts:', 'A. Increasing the number of trips made by walking, biking and transit', 'B. A 2-year strategic action list that advances Vision Zero', 'C. A Connected and Complete Transportation Network', 'A. Increase the number of trips made by walking, biking and transit', 'Increasing transit, walking and biking trips takes a combination of street improvements, and programs to encourage use. Street improvements should create better people-oriented places with high quality walking, biking and transit facilities, while programs create a culture in which active transportation is seen as a part of daily life.', 'Santa Monica has made great strides in more inclusive street design, but streets change slowly so the majority of our streets still reflect the last 100 years of investment in automobiles. Recently-adopted plans describe a new vision for streets that are more complete with safer crossings, well-lit walkways, dedicated transit facilities, protected bikeways and full tree canopies. Specific implementation projects are included in plans like the Bike Action Plan, Pedestrian Action Plan, Downtown Community Plan, Bergamot Area Plan, and Urban Forest Master Plan.', 'The work of creating and maintaining complete streets has never been more important. Technology is transforming transportation, and while there remain many unknowns, there is widespread confidence in the need for complete streets and the continued role of walking, biking and shared mobility in the future of our cities and personal wellbeing. This requires continued renovation to provide wider sidewalks, a protected bike network comfortable for kids and families, streamlined vehicle lanes that move people in less space, and dedicated transit facilities for efficient shared vehicles.', 'With an ever-evolving landscape of new transportation, as discussed later in the report, the capital budget will be crucial for enabling projects that maximize efficiency and equity in the street network as the number of mobility options continues to evolve. For example, how can we move people smoothly, comfortably, and safely with the smallest per-person footprint such as in a dedicated high-occupancy vehicle network, or in a protected bikeway.\u202fOr as electric bikes and scooters are increasingly available, how can these space-efficient devices have safer travel lanes. Similarly, with the growing challenges of climate change adaptation, how can streets encourage low- and no-emission mobility options and cluster options into convenient mobility hubs. This will take concerted efforts and investments in the existing infrastructure to create the transportation future our community envisions.', 'City programs like Transportation Demand Management (TDM), GoSaMo, parking management, and public outreach efforts maximize the return on investment in street improvements. These programs provide the “carrots and sticks” that motivate people to use multiple mobility options. Incentives include Breeze bike share discount days, employer transit pass subsidies, or personalized travel planning services; disincentives are often financial like parking pricing or congestion pricing. This section ends with an overview of current and upcoming programs that support mode shift.', 'A1. Projects Recently Completed', 'The Mobility Strategic goal benefitted from many long-awaited transformative projects. The opening of the Expo Light Rail connected Santa Monica to a county-wide network of rail lines, and the Colorado Esplanade transformed an auto-oriented street to an enticing people-oriented street. These and other projects create a momentum on which the Mobility Strategic goal could build. Other recent efforts include:', '· Evolution of Blue integration of Expo and service increases (2016, 2017)', '· Lincoln Boulevard Peak Bus Lanes (2017)', '· 12 Downtown Pedestrian Scrambles (2016)', '· Creative Crosswalks Pilot (2016)', '· California Incline and Protected Bikeway (2016)', '· Downtown Community Plan - requiring wider sidewalks on Lincoln Blvd (2017)', '· Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway lighting - 9th to 19th Streets (2017)', '· 4th Street Sidewalk widening and pedestrian lighting (2017)', '· Safe Routes to School - Samohi protected and green lanes, network connection from Michigan to 6th Street on Pico (2016, revised 2017)', '· Green bike lanes on Main Street and Broadway (2014)', '· Safe Routes to School - 15mph speed limit & striping refresh at 4 schools\u202f(2018)', '· Blue @ Night service at 17th/SMC Expo station (2016-present)', '· Santa Monica Free Ride operations (2014-present)', 'Encouragement and TDM:', '· Buy One, Get One Free (BOGO) Promotion, GoSaMo Campaign, CarFree Friday (2016, 2017)', '· COAST Open Streets Festival (2016, 2017)', '· GoSaMo Transportation Management Organization launch (2016)', 'Adopted plans developed with community input generated the momentum behind these projects. Specifically, the LUCE policies and actions, Bike Action Plan 5-year and 20-year project lists, and Pedestrian Action Plan 5-year list provide guides. Attachment A identifies the progress made on the Bike Action Plan program and project lists, and Pedestrian Action Plan 5-year project list.', 'This work has yielded dividends - from 2016 to 2017 the number of resident drive-alone trips dropped 4 percent, from 64% to 60%, replaced by a combination of biking, riding Expo, carpooling and taking car services [Resident Travel Surveys 2016, 2017]. Breeze bike share reported over one million bike trips taken in the first 18 months of operation.\u202fExpo Light Rail also introduced people to new transit, and transit to new people; reaching the 2030 ridership projections in just one year.\u202fGoSaMo campaign got people in touch with these services. Through community engagement at over 15 community events, social media outreach, Seascape, and a GoSaMo website, the campaign achieved over 60 million impressions, including over 15,000 people in person and had over 25,000 website visits. Understanding of how to use Expo jumped 27%, and how to use Breeze jumped 21% according to a GoSaMo before/after survey.', 'A2. Mobility-Related CIP Projects Underway', "Santa Monica's Capital Improvement Program (CIP) organizes, prioritizes, and allocates funding for the numerous infrastructure maintenance and improvement efforts taking place each year. The CIP includes over 200 active projects addressing multiple health and safety requirements, infrastructure needs, and community and Council priorities. Mobility is an ongoing focus of the CIP, and over a dozen mobility projects are currently in process. The projects are in various stages of design and construction including administrative processes with procurement and Caltrans approvals. In addition to contributing to Mobility Strategic Goal mode shift targets, the mobility projects also create safer streets that contribute to the Vision Zero target. See Attachment B for more project details and maps.", 'Current Mobility Project', 'Cost (approx.)', 'Primary Funding Source', 'Est. Complete', '17th Street Pedestrian Lighting, Crossings, and Protected Bikeway: design of safer connections to Expo Light Rail, Santa Monica College, and the hospitals', '$7.2m', 'CMAQ', '2021', 'Lincoln Boulevard new pedestrian crossings with refuge islands, and lighting', '$3.3m*', 'TIF', '2020', '26th St/Bergamot Connectivity - Olympic Boulevard Sidewalks 26th to Stewart, and Stewart Street lighting and protected bike lanes, Colorado to I-10', '$2.8m', 'STPL', '2020', 'Michigan Ave Greenway - 20th Street Bike Connection: Bridge improvements and reconnecting Michigan over I-10 for pedestrians and bikes.', '$1.2m', 'ATP 1', '2021', 'Bike Network Linkages to Expo upgrading miles of bikeways between Wilshire and Pico Boulevards with high visibility green paint, bike detection, and 1,000 bike racks.', '$3.4m', 'Metro CFP', '2018', '4th Street Phase II bicycle and pedestrian improvements between Colorado and Olympic Boulevard.', '$2.0m', 'ATP 2', '2020', 'Real-time Downtown Parking availability sign system, and pedestrian/bicycle wayfinding in ½ mile radius around each Expo station.', '$1.5m', 'Metro CFP', '2019', 'Pier Deck to Beach Bike Path Connection for bicyclists and pedestrians', '$1.4m', 'Metro CFP', '2022', 'Safe Routes to School: crossing, sidewalk and curbside improvements adjacent to 4 schools.', '$1.5m', 'General Fund', '2019', 'Safe Routes to School - Edison Language Academy access improvements on Kansas, Stewart, Delaware Streets', '$700k', 'SRTS', '2018', 'Airport Avenue Sidewalk and protected bike facility - Bundy to 23rd Street', '$2m*', 'Airport Fund', '2021', 'North Beach Trail improvements creates separate parallel paths for bicycle and pedestrian traffic.', '$1.6m*', 'Beach Recreation Fund', '2021', 'Wilshire Boulevard Corridor Safety Enhancements Study', '$500k', 'Caltrans Planning grant', '2020', '*Project may request additional funding in later phases.', 'Many of the mobility projects leverage limited City funding for external grant funding like Metro Call for Projects (CFP), the Active Transportation Program (ATP), or Safe Routes to School (SRTS). To be more competitive, grant match is usually proposed of 10-20% of project construction cost which comes from a combination of Prop C, Prop A, TDA Article 3, Transportation Impact Fee (TIF), or general funds. The grants and their match funds are also programmed through the biennial CIP. Most recently, grant agencies have favored transit access projects such as first/last mile connections to rail stops and allocated funds to “disadvantaged communities” as defined by a third party source like CalEnviroScreen 3.0. This has resulted in Santa Monica being less competitive, and may be a concern for future grant funding. Nonetheless, staff has tried to advance projects that build a complete citywide network of infrastructure, pedestrian lighting, landscaping, and other improvements.', 'The timing of project completion is determined by many factors including grant administration requirements, local procurement processes, project complexity and staff availability. For example, in order to use ATP grant funds for design or construction, each phase must receive funding authorization from the California Transportation Commission prior to release of our local Request for Proposals. Administration and procurement can easily add 1-2 years to each project. While the Mobility Division has been successful in winning over $20 million in grant funds for a dozen projects, the availability of staff to implement them has been a challenge. Reallocation of time from regulatory work has helped relieve some of the pressure, but there is still a backlog of projects and slow progression that has to accommodate competing priorities.', 'Not shown on the list of projects is the City’s significant and on-going maintenance work. When maintenance necessitates the reconstruction of street sections, there is an opportunity to rebuild with multi-modal improvements. The result may occasionally be improvements outside of priority areas or networks, but the cost and time needed for the improvements are significantly reduced. PW and PCD staff share the goal of aligning maintenance and multi-modal facility construction efforts, and are identifying the tools needed to do it effectively such as maps and communication protocols. Staff has yet to undertake the work to develop systems that would make this possible.', 'A3. Goals for Future Mobility-Related Capital Projects', 'Council will consider a Biennial Capital Improvement Budget in May and June. Broader capital priorities will be presented to Council for consideration at the Budget Study Session in the context of wider-ranging infrastructure needs. Mobility Staff prepared a number of proposed feasibility, planning, design and construction efforts for consideration in context of all the requests. The staff approach to prioritizing proposals for mobility projects in this cycle is:', '1. Complete Streets projects identified in adopted plans that complete bike, pedestrian and transit networks. These projects are based on a community input process and consideration of network and modal connections. Projects come from Bike and Pedestrian Action Plans, LiNC Plan, Downtown Community Plan, Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway. Examples: Ocean Avenue Protected Bikeway (California to Colorado) identified in the Downtown Community Plan; Safe Routes to School improvements at 6 schools identified in the Pedestrian Action Plan.', '2. Project development for Vision Zero and Neighborhood Greenway improvements. Pursue crash evaluation and feasibility study for improvements on the Vision Zero priority network, and initial Neighborhood Greenways in Bike Action Plan. Examples: Ocean Avenue Safety Assessment and Preliminary Design; Pico Boulevard Crossing Enhancements - Stewart to Urban Streets; Washington Avenue Neighborhood Greenway Preliminary Design and Outreach.', '3. Projects that leverage outside transportation funds. Stretch local dollars with state and federal funds, with the tradeoff that grant funds constrain project scope and introduce additional administrative steps (usually with Caltrans) that delay project delivery.\u202fExample: Programming grant funds recently received for Wilshire Boulevard pedestrian safety investigation.', '4. Projects that are coordinated with adjacent maintenance or new projects. If work is being done by the City or an adjacent property, leverage work to maximize public outcomes. For example, when a road is being repaved add new lane striping, or when a property is being redeveloped coordinate construction of adjacent sidewalk and intersection upgrades. This may reorder projects identified in an adopted plan.\u202fExamples: Pearl Street preliminary design adjacent to Santa Monica College and JAMS Auditorium reconstruction; Addition of 26th Street/Olympic Boulevard northeast corner pedestrian crossing to the Olympic Boulevard sidewalk construction.', "Recent legislative changes have created additional transportation funding opportunities through Local Return funds from Measure M, the countywide sales tax that passed in 2016, and Senate Bill 1 that increased statewide gas taxes, a portion of which flow back to local governments. These complement prior local return sources from Proposition A, Proposition C, Measure R, and dedicated State and Federal transportation programs which get allocated through the City's budget process. Supplementing existing staff and resources with these funds will help offset other capital funding limitations and will help address expectations for mobility improvements and other community priorities.", 'The speed of delivering these projects directly affects progress on the Mobility Strategic Goal. For example, efforts to grow walking and biking trips depend on increasing evening lighting and protected lanes and crossings. Project delivery schedule is driven by the numerous steps in procurement and approvals, and staffing availability. As the city endeavors to reach Vision Zero (discussed more below) and to facilitate significant mode shift, streamlining of procurement methods, alignment of staffing resources, and better interagency collaboration will be needed to reduce project delivery schedules and enable more facilities to be built in a timely fashion.', 'A4. TDM Efforts to Increase Walking, Biking and Transit', 'Transportation Demand Management is the term often given to the suite of efforts, both “carrots and sticks,” which are used to transfer drive-alone trips to other modes. TDM helps to reduce demand to manage the roadways as a limited resource, enabling more people to move in the same amount of space. Santa Monica has a TDM program to enforce trip-reduction regulations on employers, and does educational and promotional events focused on Safe Routes to School. The City’s programs in parking and traffic management need to work together with TDM so that the systems reinforce the policy goals. Recent accomplishments in TDM include:', 'Project Name', 'Project Description', 'GoSaMo Mobility Campaign (FY16-17)', 'Timed with Expo Light Rail opening, the City piloted a campaign designed to help people get "excited, equipped, and trying" new mobility options. Timeless elements from the campaign continue to be used as collateral material in other work efforts. GoSaMo helped make the City\'s diverse and sometimes disparate mobility efforts legible to community members.', 'Transportation Management Organization (TMO)', 'A Citywide Transportation Management Organization was created in 2016, called the "GoSaMo TMO" available to assist residents, employees, and businesses with mobility information. They have one full-time contracted specialist, under contract until 2019.', 'TDM Ordinance Increases (eff 1/1/16)', 'Council updated the TDM Ordinance in 2016 that requires the promotion of transportation options. The Update added regulations for developments over 7,500 square feet, to decrease the threshold for employers that must implement site reduction programs, and to increase the employer reduction targets. Prior to update, the ordinance reduced over 4,000 trips in the AM and PM peak.', 'Events and Promotions', "Monthly Ride with the Mayor, Santa Monica Family Bike Festival, National Night Out, Kidical Mass, and dozens of outreach events brought information to people. Breeze Bike Share promotional days like free Breeze Birthday and Valentine's Day rides bring new people to the system.", 'Efforts are concurrently underway to improve the customer experience of compliance with the TDM Ordinance. Using the CityGrows platform (from the 2016 Hack the Beach winner) staff is working to create an online employee survey tool and Emission Reduction Plan tool. These are big steps forward that enable data collection and data-informed decision-making as staff advises employers on what incentives and measures are most effectively working locally.', 'In the next two years, two programs will be piloted based on Metro grants that the City was awarded. An Active Aging pilot program, also known as Safe Routes for Seniors, will outreach to seniors with mobility information, training, and to seek input on access concerns. A Localized Travel Planning effort is also funded, to provide personalized “concierge” service to residents and employees regarding travel route planning and testing new modes. Both efforts are already programmed into the budget, and will be tracked and evaluated with performance metrics.', 'Both the GoSaMo TMO and GoSaMo mobility campaign could be leveraged for more reach to compel behavior change. Each could also be expanded to outreach to specific market segments, such as people who currently drive to Santa Monica for recreation, a group not currently addressed with the TDM Ordinance or resident outreach programs. Currently the TMO contract extends to early 2019. The GoSaMo campaign funds have been expended, but the graphic identity continues to be used in other efforts. Reactivation of the GoSaMo campaign would require staff and outreach resources.', 'Parking and Pricing Tools', 'Santa Monica has a rich reserve of on-street and off-street parking in Downtown and therefore plays an important role in the parking market. Parking has been historically under-priced in busy areas, providing a hidden subsidy for driving alone that undermines efforts for sustainable transportation and transit. Actively managing parking pricing is an effective tool that is supported by local policy and can play a role in facilitating mode shift. Parking revenue should help to facilitate mobility options, with continued reinvestment of parking revenue in transportation alternatives, and their on-going system operations.', 'On May 10, 2016 Council reviewed and approved revised Downtown parking rates that are better aligned with market rates, and that support the LUCE target of 85% parking availability through pricing and incentive structures. On August 8, 2017 Council eliminated parking minimums in Downtown through the Downtown Community Plan, and established maximums that will encourage more sharing of existing parking spaces. Action: Continue to actively review and adjust parking prices citywide as market rates change, and revisit parking management and construction policies to encourage sharing existing resources.', 'B. Initiate a 2-Year Program Pursuing “Vision Zero” in Santa Monica', 'The second component of the Mobility Strategic Goal is Vision Zero, the elimination of all fatal and severe injury roadway collisions by 2026. A testament to the City’s commitment to wellbeing, Vision Zero will ensure that our streets are safe for all, regardless of age, ability, income or mode. While audacious in scope, anything less would be unacceptable.', 'The notion of Santa Monica promoting safety on our streets is hardly new. Policies in the Land Use & Circulation Element, programs in the Bicycle and Pedestrian Action Plans, and daily staff work across all departments encourages safety. For example:', '· Police Traffic Services daily patrol, speeding enforcement, distracted driving operations, DUI checkpoints and community engagement.', '· Roadway maintenance and cleaning which among many benefits ensures visible striping and functioning signals, and reduces bicycle crashes, vehicle damage and unpredictable driver behavior; and maintains safety lighting for intersections and roadways.', '· Sidewalk and crosswalk monitoring and regular maintenance.', '· Safe Routes to School education and encouragement programs that raise awareness of student safety and driver behavior in school zones.', 'These efforts, coupled with a long history of safety projects and a host of capital projects in the pipeline reflect the on-going commitment to community wellbeing and protection.', 'But more must be done to achieve Vision Zero, as evidenced by the 9 people killed and 25 severely injured on Santa Monica’s streets in 2017 (two pedestrians were killed on Pacific Coast Highway, which is under State jurisdiction, and one person was killed by a driver in a public parking lot). Both the 2017 death and injury figures represent increases from the 2006-16 average of 4 deaths and 22 severe injuries per year.', 'This unfortunate trend is not unique to Santa Monica. According to the National Safety Council, between 2014 and 2016, fatalities involving automobiles in California were up 19 percent, even worse than the lamentable national increase of 14 percent. Notable exceptions are New York City and San Francisco which embarked on comprehensive and far-reaching Vision Zero programs of education, speed management, and safer facilities to protect people. According to Governing Magazine, both cities experienced the fewest number of traffic fatalities in 2017 since records started being kept in 1910 and 1915, respectively. Notably, New York City experienced a 32 percent reduction in pedestrian fatalities between 2016 and 2017.', 'Vision Zero reframes priorities of how we design, manage, and enforce our roads. For decades, street performance has been measured primarily in vehicle capacity and delay, encouraging policies and designs that prioritize vehicle speed and throughput over people’s overall safety. Vision Zero changes ideas about what streets must accomplish, prioritizing the health and safety of people above all else. Achieving Vision Zero will necessitate that all departments take a role - such as placing traffic calming to manage speeding, reallocating roadway space to barriers that protect people walking and biking, targeting enforcement on dangerous distracted driving, adapting emergency response, and prioritizing engagement efforts to focus on safety education, and communication tools.', 'Staff has created a work plan of strategic actions for achieving Vision Zero by 2026, included as Attachment C, and complemented by the Priority Network Map. The map was created by evaluating 11 years of fatal and severe injury data starting in 2006. The map identifies areas where fatal and severe injury incidents have occurred, and is a guide for subsequent efforts. These areas would be the first to receive more detailed evaluation of collision reports, so that any necessary countermeasures can be identified. This interim step is crucial to better understand the conditions occurring, the factors contributing to crashes, and what countermeasures would be effective.', 'The strategic actions also identify a number of process and information improvements that can help to align city work efforts to the Vision Zero goal. Aligning these work efforts with a priority for eliminating severe and fatal collisions will help to leverage existing resources toward the Vision Zero goal. When reviewing the work plan, what quickly comes into focus is that these efforts touch many City functions, and will require a committed inter-departmental team to achieve it.', "The Vision Zero strategic actions represent a 2-year work plan, with elements that are specific, measurable and concrete. This approach allows sufficient time to test new tactical interventions and strategies, and is necessary to adapt and realign departmental work plans. Progress will be tracked in SaMoStat, the City's performance management system in order to have relentless follow-up and assessment. Based on the first 2 years, work efforts that are producing results will be reinforced while any resources allocated to tactics that are not working will be redirected to other efforts. The constant assessment will be used to guide a longer-term action plan.", 'The Vision Zero work plan is organized into five key areas:', '· Data-driven decision making: Develop a precise, data-driven decision-making system. Identify the locations of highest need and evaluate collision reports to identify the most effective countermeasures. Share data between departments and regularly convene a safety task force of key City departments. Evaluate capital improvement projects and programs to learn what works and where changes are needed.', '· Safer streets for all ages and abilities: Speed is the biggest factor in whether a collision is minor or fatal. Design and enforce street operations so that drivers travel at appropriate speeds where people are walking and biking. Build a network of neighborhood greenways, low-stress routes that parallel busier corridors and connect to parks, schools, jobs and services. Conduct regular enforcement operations targeting speeding and distracted driving, especially along the Priority Network.', '· An engaged and alert community: For too long, collisions have been accepted as an unfortunate cost of travel, so long as our friends and loved ones are not among the victims. Cause a shift in awareness by engaging with the community through presentations about roadway safety.', '· Supporting policies: Institutionalize Vision Zero principles in our daily work to support the work in other categories. Ensure roadway safety is a prioritized metric in the City’s budget process, create policy to minimize construction impacts to road users, and advocate for safety improvements to Pacific Coast Highway, which is managed by Caltrans.', '· Safer vehicles: Improve the safety of City fleet vehicles and their operators. Educate drivers about cyclists and the maneuvers they make to improve predictability and safety. Establish local policy regarding autonomous vehicles and identify smaller-footprint fleet vehicles to enable slower street designs.', 'In 2017, Council allocated $500,000 for a first phase of Vision Zero projects including:', 'Vision Zero Jump Start Efforts', 'Cost (approx.)', 'Est. Complete', 'Status', 'Improve the Pico/Stewart crossing with a curb extension at the southeast corner to increase pedestrian visibility and reduce exposure to collisions.', '$100k', '2019', 'Procurement', 'Improve either the Santa Monica Boulevard/6th Street or Broadway/5th Street intersections with curb extensions and leading pedestrian intervals.', '$180k', '2018-19 (temporary)', 'Procurement & outreach', 'Install Rapid Rectangular Flashing Beacons to increase vehicle yielding at two Wilshire intersections and near two school locations.', '$120k', '2018', 'Devices no longer approved for new installs; looking at alternatives', 'Pilot bicycle and pedestrian protections on Arizona Avenue at McKinley Elementary, and near Franklin Elementary.', '$80k', '2018-19', 'Procurement & outreach', 'Install leading pedestrian intervals at 25 signalized intersections throughout Santa Monica (based on volumes, crash history and adjacent destinations)', 'Staff time', '2018', '27 intersections, with plans for approximately 25 additional locations', 'Continue enforcement and education operations', 'Staff time', 'On-going', 'On-going', 'There are numerous dispersed lane striping, crosswalk, and signage projects that could help mitigate the speeding and driver behaviors leading to collisions. Some Vision Zero cities have developed streamlined implementation teams for these projects, including New York City and Austin, Texas. The teams vertically integrate the evaluation, design and construction functions to expedite implementation within these larger cities with dedicated transportation departments. On-call contractors could serve a similar function to design and construct countermeasures, and supplement staff for outreach.', 'Vision Zero cities are working on realigning processes, work plans and budgets for managing the public street. This significant coordination effort leverages existing work efforts to deliver new results, and changes business as usual. Options to relocate or add staff capacity to lead Vision Zero alignment efforts and to provide quicker response would advance Vision Zero. Concurrent creation of on-call or pre-qualified contractors and design consultants and an on-going operating budget for this work would enable staff to more rapidly respond to community requests and install pilot countermeasures.', 'This month, the City began work on the Vision Zero communications and outreach effort building from the GoSaMo campaign. The work will focus on creating and implementing an outreach plan that will inform the community of how the City is taking steps to make streets safer for all modes, how to be safe and attentive while traveling, and what everyone can do to participate in saving lives, highlighting that speeding and distracted driving are the leading causes of collisions. As this work develops, we will keep the community informed.', 'C. Connected and Complete Transportation Network - A New Model for Mobility', 'Creating a "Complete and Connected Transportation Network" is the third target of the Mobility Strategic Goal, and seeks to provide people with a suite of adaptable options to meet the varying needs of the traveler and the situation.\u202fNew tools for creating a connected and complete transportation system are being unlocked by technology and innovation.\u202fPeople now have on-demand ride-hailing (Uber/Lyft), bike share and car rentals available on their smart phone. And driverless vehicles are in rapid development. This section discusses the benefits and challenges of these new technologies with a focus on the intersection of vehicle automation, shared mobility, and electrification, and how transportation technology can be shaped to achieve Santa Monica’s community goals.', 'The cultural changes generating these transformative technologies extend well beyond the scale of Santa Monica, but the City can choose how to engage and incorporate them. Their effects on streets, transportation systems, safety, congestion and emissions are still very much local issues. This section provides links to the work of lead cities that are developing flexible adaption strategies. Ideas for short-term (1 year) and mid-term (2-3 year) activities for Santa Monica are in Attachment E, and summarized below along with a list of current staff work efforts that support the overall approach.', 'Benefits and Challenges of New Transportation Technology', 'There is unprecedented levels of private sector investment in transportation technology development, fueled by the market demand for easier and cheaper mobility. Technology companies and auto manufacturers are investing heavily in research and development of new computer-driven vehicles and business models based on providing mobility services (not just vehicle sales). Transportation services have multiplied with the help of venture capital funds, which reportedly continue to subsidize operations. Access to mobility options, increased convenience, and a competitive cost per mile (whether subsidized or not) have been game-changers for individuals and cities. Vehicle automation, shared mobility, and electrification are associated with a number of environmental, social and transportation benefits, as well as a number of challenges in those same categories.', 'Vehicle Automation:', 'Partially automated vehicles are in testing, and some predict fully driverless vehicles as early as 2020. Autonomous vehicles could transform the way people and goods move through cities. How automation rolls out will depend on many choices. For example, will people primarily own their automated vehicle, or will they be commercial fleet services for hire; will automated vehicles be more or less able than human drivers to safely interact with people on the streets; will transit and goods delivery jobs be replaced or complemented? For some, automated vehicles are a technological innovation that will eliminate congestion and barriers to free movement, for others automation is an extension of the auto-dependence that has generated the congestion we have today and will have the same result.', 'Benefit', 'Challenge', 'Riders would gain productive use of driving time. Driverless fleet services could offer reduced per mile costs due to staff savings. Youth, seniors and people without a license could travel independently.', 'AVs would induce new and longer trips (measured in vehicle miles traveled or VMT) and emissions. Cars traveling more miles will increase congestion, requiring appropriate countermeasures to curb negative externalities. Professional drivers could lose gainful employment.', 'Action: increase vehicle sharing to mitigate increased VMT (shared rides, and shared ownership if applicable), create tools to maximize street person-capacity and vehicle efficiency.', 'Shared Mobility:', 'Shared Mobility refers to a very diverse collection of services that facilitate the sharing of rides and/or vehicles, including car-sharing, ride-hailing, bike-sharing, micro-transit, etc. A helpful list of types and definitions from the Shared Use Mobility Center is included in Attachment D. Shared mobility services are typically pay-per-use services based on a credit-card enabled account. Some services are new and some are duplicative but add consumer convenience or other amenities. Similarly, some shared devices are new but others just operate in a new way. These services are coming from the private sector, which raises some concerns about longevity and equity. For example what happens when new services cannibalize public transit but then go out of business? How can people without credit cards get access? And what should cities do when private sector car-services create so much congestion that no vehicles can move, and even bike lanes are blocked? And as new devices proliferate, how can space be created for safe movement and access? The principles discussed above can help inform the process of answering these questions, and the continued work of managing street space for the movement and access of all.', 'Benefit', 'Challenge', 'Riders get as-needed access to transportation services. Increases travel options, including replacing short trips with zero- or low-emission devices that also require less right-of-way space to move. Research shows reduced vehicle ownership and VMT among people who use multiple shared services. Can reduce overall cost of transportation per capita.', 'Shared services are drawn to activity centers, adding to congestion and slowing public transit service where it is most needed. Ride-hailing services add to VMT and emissions, and rarely offer zero- emission options. Some services and devices add functionality or convenience, but some cannibalize transit riders. New shared mobility devices can clutter public rights-of-way. Lack of access by users without smart phones or credit cards.', 'Action: support public mass transit through infrastructure and service improvements, prioritize the highest-capacity shared ride services and lowest-emission modes.', 'Electrification:', 'Improved battery quality and longevity are reducing electric vehicle (EV) and fuel costs, and improving range - leading to consumer savings and increased EV use. There are positive signs that market forces will propel on-going EV market penetration. Santa Monica recently adopted an EV Action Plan to catalyze electrification.', 'Benefit', 'Challenge', 'Reduced consumer cost of vehicle ownership and fueling. Using renewable energy supply can significantly reduce net transportation emissions compared to non-renewables. New smaller electric mobility devices such as electric shuttles and electric bicycles/tricycles can reduce overall power load and space needs.', 'Reduced consumer travel costs typically induce use and miles traveled. EVs still add to congestion and suffer from it.', 'Action: maximize renewable energy sourcing, encourage diverse electric mobility choices.', 'Safety: Cars driven by a computer would eliminate driver error as a cause of collisions. Since driver error is a factor in 95% of incidents and distracted driving is on the rise, automation is expected to save lives. The system of software, sensors, communication and equipment necessary for a computer to drive a vehicle is complex. Technology is progressing rapidly, but premature deployment is life-threatening. Auto makers are adding passenger protections, but automated response to less predictable roadway users like people walking and biking, and construction workers remains a challenge. Action: Advocate for a focus on the safety of people in the public streets from the private sector.', 'Data: As cars get smarter, the amount and type of data they process, collect and produce increase exponentially. Fast and stable communication networks are the backbone of an AV’s location and orientation systems. Cars will also increasingly produce information about roadway conditions, travel speeds, vehicle operations, origins and destinations, and much more. Who owns the data (automakers, software providers, or customers), and who has access to it (private sector, public sector) are important policy discussions happening at the highest government levels. Action: Advocate for consumer privacy as well as secure public access to operational data that can assist with roadway management and maintenance.', 'What have other Lead Agencies done?', 'Cities across the country are grappling with these new opportunities and challenges. They have initiated new work efforts and areas of exploration to guide change so that it best fits within their communities. Many have developed pilots and other strategies to test and reflect on the results. Some have crafted policies and plans to guide the myriad efforts on data, communications, regulation, operation and maintenance.', '· Seattle Department of Transportation "New Mobility Playbook" - Outlines a series of collective efforts to advance safety, justice and sustainability and avoid congestion, unsafe streets and expensive, exclusive services. SDOT is restructuring to create a New Mobility Program partially funded by new mobility permit revenues, and align staff and resources with the playbook strategies.', '· Los Angeles Department of Transportation "Transportation Technology Strategy”- The strategy defines a roadmap for integrating shared mobility, technology-enabled transportation experiences, and AVs into department planning and operations to maximize the benefits to public safety, sustainability and roadway efficiency. LADOT is integrating recommendations from the technology strategies into the 2018-2020 work program including investments to modernize equipment, using data driven metrics to guide decisions, and creating a citywide plan for autonomous and shared mobility services.', '· North American City Transportation Officials (NACTO) "Blueprint for Autonomous Urbanism" - The blueprint describes the critical role that cities play in designing safe streets that provide for more modes of travel and people, encourage more active and shared travel, and that maximize space for people concurrent with deploying autonomous vehicles.', '· Shared Use Mobility Center "Shared Mobility Action Plan for Los Angeles County" - The plan focuses on strategies and tactics to reduce the number of vehicles by 2% in LA County. The plan stipulates that this modest but impactful change can be achieved by expanding existing networks including transit, car sharing, bike sharing, and building mobility hubs throughout the County.', 'Two themes in the work of lead cities are to proactively renovate streets and to continue to provide crucial transportation services, to ensure that there is service equity and continuity. Many also note that cities can strategically influence mobility choices through system management and pricing structures so that the most sustainable, equitable, and efficient systems are the most convenient and cost-effective. For example, cities are considering how to organize roadways so that higher-occupancy vehicles and low-emission modes receive lane or intersection priority. Another theme is the realignment of work groups to adapt to the significant changes in policy questions, public/private partnership, data, and outcomes. Cities are staying engaged in this environment of rapid change so they can be proactively ready for new challenges.', "Santa Monica has already engaged with some of the changes, forging partnership with Lyft for Dial-a-Ride services and launching a successful citywide bike share system. However examples like the arrival of electric scooters this fall provided perspective on the scale and complexity of these challenges, particularly when initiated by the private sector. Existing regulations, infrastructure (both operational and physical), and resources aren't suited to shared mobility options. Staff will be coming forward in the upcoming months with a proposed trial program for shared mobility services. But the scale and scope of this challenge necessitates a much broader strategy including a range of actions, investments, and management tools.", 'What can Santa Monica do?', "At this early stage, Santa Monica can start with identifying priorities for engaging with both automated vehicles and shared mobility so that each contribute to, rather than detract from, our community's shared vision for the future. Applying the principles articulated earlier, Santa Monica should specifically work toward:", '· Vehicle automation that is safer for people on the street, and which does not increase local congestion and emissions, and', '· Shared mobility that supports transit and shared rides, expands mobility options, increases roadway efficiency, and reduces emissions.', 'As succinctly stated in the NACTO Blueprint: "The New Mobility network has public mass transit as the backbone of the transportation network, while autonomous vehicles, biking and walking complement the core parts of the network and provide service where mass transit is not as efficient. Public agencies and private companies could work in tandem to actively manage the network with volume, mode and speed thresholds controlled through real-time pricing and curbside demand management." By pursuing this vision, Santa Monica streets can move more people with fewer vehicles which creates opportunity to repurpose road space for community members. With more people on the street, our streets become safer and we get closer to eliminating tragic injuries and fatalities. And when clean energy powers the vehicles we use, we can eliminate the 65% of Santa Monica\'s emissions that come from transportation and achieve carbon neutrality by 2050.', "Many of the City's existing work efforts already support new mobility because of Council and executive leadership over recent years. Continuing the following efforts will help support the long-range goals:", 'Existing Work Efforts', 'Departments', 'Investing in transit, especially on high volume routes, and regularly evaluating transit system performance', 'BBB', 'Renovating streets with additional safety measures and protections for vulnerable people on the street, and streets that prioritize sustainable and active modes like transit, walking and biking', 'PCD, PW', 'Collaborating among departments in planning for autonomous and shared mobility through AV and Shared Mobility working groups', 'PCD, ISD, PW, PD, CMO, CAO', 'Collaborating regionally on interoperability efforts and transportation planning through the Westside COG and Metro', 'PCD, CM', 'Using parking pricing and parking sharing tools to maximize use of existing parking resources', 'PCD', 'Expanding EV charging and implementing occupancy management tools', 'PW', 'Fostering a culture of mobility innovation through the Mobility Strategic Goal', 'PCD, CM', 'Developing the Citywide Economic Strategy to identify new transportation funding mechanisms that build fiscal stability', 'HED, CM', 'Providing mobility information to support travel diversity and behavior change', 'PCD, BBB', 'In spite of this good work, new technology has disrupted "business as usual" for transportation planning and management, and the complementary efforts of other departments. Similar to Vision Zero, cities are having to adjust structures, work plans, budgets and procedures to maintain effectiveness. Attachment E outlines a number of new short-term (1-year) and mid-term (2-3) year steps in advocacy, infrastructure, data management and policy for Council consideration and feedback such as:', 'Advocacy', '· Join State and Federal legislative advocacy for multi-modal safety, equity and sustainability', '· Engage the public in discussions about new mobility', '· Outreach to senior, low-income, communities of color, and people with disabilities to reduce barriers to new mobility', 'Infrastructure & Services', '· Pursue additional transit and high-capacity vehicle prioritization', '· Pilot low-emission micro-transit service for shorter intra-city trips', '· Fill in service gaps with flexible providers with low- or no-emission vehicles', '· Co-locate multiple shared mobility and EV charging\u202fin on-street Mobility Hubs', '· Develop a long-term permitting system for shared mobility devices with performance criteria', '· Consolidate sensor and communications equipment for streetscape quality', '· Develop connectivity strategies for Purple Line subway extension to the VA', 'Policy', '· Create performance metrics for street efficiency that move people in fewer vehicles', '· Develop a new curbside management strategy, starting with Downtown', '· Consider transition strategies needed during periods of partial automation', '· Develop new street design criteria and operational targets', '· Create criteria for reallocation of underutilized street space to protect pedestrians, and create green space in neighborhoods and gathering areas', '· Reorganize and expand capacity to successfully engage with mobility changes', 'Data', '· Develop data-sharing, partnership, and performance protocols for new mobility', '· Engage with third-party data platforms for secure open data', "Council input on the priorities listed in Attachment E and summarized above, including input on the city's desired level of engagement and leadership on these issues, would help to guide next steps. Each effort could be worthwhile, but is also above and beyond the existing work of staff. A prioritization will help staff to allocate appropriate time and resources. Additional study session could also help to determine a strategic work plan with staffing, budget and resources.", 'In the near term, PCD is preparing a pilot program for Council consideration that would enable permitted shared mobility devices to use portions of the public right-of-way. This was an unplanned effort, and accommodated due to unforeseen private actions and significant community concerns. The pilot will enable testing of permit conditions and operating options, to be followed with revisions and updates based on lessons learned and data evaluation.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of this study session’s policy discussion. However, pursuing a new model of mobility involves a significant shift of capital and staff resources to achieve, including transportation-related funding sources, grant opportunities and private investment. Staff will use comments received at this study session to inform priorities for mobility-related projects and allocation of staff resources and return to Council as specific budget actions are required in the future. Council will consider the FY 2018-20 Biennial Capital Improvement Program Budget at a Budget Study Session in May.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2622'}], [{'Title': 'First Modification with ChargePoint to Provide, Install and Operate Electric Vehicle Charging Stations; Resolution to authorize application for MSRC funds', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '11. Resolutions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to agreement #10507 in the amount of $493,247 including 10% contingency with ChargePoint, a California-based company, for the purchase and operation of 45 electric vehicle charging stations. This will result in a five-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $666,372 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.2. Adopt the attached resolution authorizing the application for incentive funds in the amount of $121,500 from Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) for Clean Transportation Funding for the 2017 Local Government Partnership Program to accelerate the transition to zero and near-zero emission vehicles. 3. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to apply for and accept the incentive funds, if awarded.4. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report, for the agreement modification and the incentive funds, in the event that the incentive funds are awarded.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'To advance the goal of having 300 electric vehicle (EV) charging ports in Santa Monica by 2020 as called for by the recently adopted Electric Vehicle Action Plan (Attachment A), the City plans to add 81 EV charging ports (45 stations) across the City. This includes 44 public and one fleet charging station. The City currently has 89 public charging ports (53 single-ports and 18 dual-ports) available at 71 charging stations (the City has a mix of single-port and dual-port stations). Staff recommends modifying the agreement with ChargePoint to procure the new charging stations for a total amended amount not to exceed $493,247, resulting in a new contract for an amount not to exceed $666,372 over five years.', 'Staff have identified incentive funding of $121,500 through the Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) Clean Transportation Program (Attachment B) to partially offset the one-time procurement and eligible installation costs. In order to be eligible to receive MSRC funding, cities must deliver a brief MSRC-provided presentation (Attachment C) to Council about the Clean Transportation Program and obtain an approved resolution from Council (Attachment D).', 'Background', 'Santa Monica has been a leader in adopting low emission vehicle technology and providing public charging infrastructure.', 'On November 8, 2011, Council held a study session on electric vehicle (EV) infrastructure (Attachment E). Staff presented the challenges to accommodating EV charging for residents, visitors, and employees as well as the pending installation of charging infrastructure.', 'Since then, the City has expanded its public charging infrastructure from 20 charging ports to 89 throughout the city. This total includes seven dual-port charging stations at the Civic Center Structure that were provided by UCLA through a grant-funded research project and one solar-powered charging station at the Airport Administration Office.Nine charging stationsat City Yardsare used exclusively for theCity’s vehicle fleet, whichnow includes over 130 electric vehicles.', 'On July 25, 2017, Council awarded a bid to ChargePoint for the installation of charging stations through Southern California Edison’s Charge Ready pilot program (Attachment F). Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with ChargePoint to install smart charging stations (16 stations, 31 charging ports) at the Civic Center Parking Structure roof for fleet vehicle charging Table 1). Smart charging stations are network connected, which allows for a range of functions including station usage monitoring, cost recovery (charging a fee), maintenance alerts, dynamic pricing, and customer notifications when batteries are full.', 'Table 1: New EV Charging Stations – Original Contract', 'Location', 'Notes', 'Dual-port Stations', 'Single-port Stations', 'Total Available Ports', 'Civic Center Parking Structure', 'Fleet', '15', '1', '31', 'Total Fleet Stations', '16', 'Discussion', 'The EV Action Plan is a guiding document for expanding the infrastructure needed to support the growing demand from EV vehicle owners. The plan establishes goals to expand the number of places where charging is available as well as set out policies for installing charging stations in apartment complexes, private residences, and other privately held locations. The proposed modification to this contract would allow the City to take the next important step to expand the number of charging stations, and provide them in more neighborhoods across the City.', 'The modification includes a capital cost, not to exceed amount of $278,197, including 10% contingency, and an operating cost, not to exceed amount of $215,050 for a total additional not to exceed amount of $493,247 over five years (Table 2). The capital cost includes a one-time purchase of equipment. Operating costs include ChargePoint network services and the ChargePoint Assure maintenance and warranty program (Assure is included at no cost the first year). After the first year staff will analyze maintenance costs and may choose not to proceed with the Assure maintenance program if it fails to prove cost effective.', 'Table 2: Original Contract + Modification', 'Capital Cost + 10% Contingency', '$278,197', 'Operating Costs', '$215,050', 'Total (Modification)', '$493,247', 'Original Contract Amount', '$173,125', 'New total not to exceed', '$666,372', 'The majority of existing charging stations are located in City-owned parking structures and surface lots; two charging stations are located on-street at Montana Avenue. All stations experience a high amount of usage, and staff regularly receive requests to add more charging stations.', 'Staff from the Office of Sustainability & the Environment, Street & Fleet Services, and Architecture Services divisions of the Public Works Department have proposed 27 sites for new and replacement charging stations (Table 3).', 'In response to community feedback to add new stations, rather than begin with replacements, most stations will offer brand new service. Staff are proposing to replace four stations that are obsolete and no longer useful to most EV drivers at Virginia Avenue Park, the Pier, the Solar Port & Water Resources Department. These existing stations are incompatible with EV models produced after the early-2000s.', 'In addition, staff recommends replacing the two existing stations at Montana Avenue, and adding one at this site in order to expand charging access in this area. The existing charging stations on Montana Avenue are highly utilized, however this older technology has no pricing mechanism to deter drivers from overstaying their allotted charging time. Staff frequently receives requests for additional stations and enforcement to encourage vehicle turnover. Costs to add electrical infrastructure for new EV charging sites on Montana Ave would be prohibitively expensive due to the necessary trenching and new service requirements. Replacing the older stations is a cost-effective way to enable more drivers to utilize the stations. The existing older charging stations will be repurposed to charge City fleet vehicles. The new station added at this site will utilize available electrical capacity in the existing service panel. These replacement stations also take advantage of a promotional rate offered by ChargePoint in order to improve charging facilities at a reduced cost.', 'Combined with the new stations, there will be a net gain of 79 publicly available charging ports and a citywide total of 168 public charging ports once all of the 45 stations are installed. The original contract and modification will add 32 fleet charging ports, for a new total of 46 charging ports designated for city fleet vehicles.', 'Table 3. New EV Charging Stations - Modification', 'Location', 'Notes', 'Single-Port Stations', 'Dual-Port Stations', 'Total Available Ports', 'Annenberg', 'New', '1', '2', 'Main Branch Library', 'New', '6', '12', 'Montana Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Ocean Park Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Fairview Branch Library', 'New', '1', '1', 'Memorial Park - Curbside', 'New', '5', '10', 'Marine Park', 'New', '1', '2', 'Virginia Ave Park', 'Replacement', '1', '1', 'Various – Ocean Park neighborhood (8 curbside sites)', 'New', '8', '16', 'Various – Wilmont neighborhood (8 curbside sites)', '15 New, 2 Replacement', '4', '13', '30', 'Santa Monica Pier', 'Replacement', '1', '1', 'Civic Solar Port', 'Replacement', '1', '2', 'Water Resources Division', 'Replacement (Fleet)', '1', '2', 'Total', '9', '36', '81', 'Total Stations', '45', '*Station locations are subject to change.', 'Curbside Charging Stations', 'The recently adopted Electric Vehicle Action Plan recommended adding curbside charging infrastructure in multi-unit residential neighborhoods.', 'Upgrades to the City’s streetlight network present opportunities to provide electrical infrastructure for EV charging. Staff is leveraging an existing project to modernize the streetlight electrical circuit in the Ocean Park neighborhood and install up to eight dual-port charging stations in the public right-of-way.', 'Staff have also proposed adding charging stations at up to eight new curbside locations in the Wilmont neighborhood and are working with Southern California Edison to determine feasibility of this effort. This area was selected based on the high density of the area and large volume of requests for charging stations.', '2017 Local Government Partnership Program (MSRC Funds)', "Funding for EV charging stations is partially available through the 2017 Local Government Partnership Program, which is funded by the Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee (MSRC) Clean Transportation Program. Funds are set aside for each city and county within the South Coast Air Quality Management District (SCAQMD) jurisdiction that participates in the AB 2766 Motor Vehicle Registration Fee (Subvention Fund) Program. The Local Government Partnership Program directly supports implementation of SCAQMD's 2016 Air Quality Management Plan (AQMP) by focusing MSRC investments on AQMP measures.", 'The MSRC allocated $121,500 to the City of Santa Monica through this program. Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure Installation is an eligible project category, and MSRC contributes up to 75% of the cost to purchase and install publicly accessible EV charging stations. Eligibility for MSRC incentive funding would require the City to enter into a reimbursement contract and meet specific deliverables.', 'Under the MSRC funding requirements, public EV charging sites must meet a 24-hour access requirement (no facility closures) in order to qualify for the 75% funding contribution. Facilities that do not meet the 24-hour access requirements are eligible to receive up to a 50% funding match. MSRC funds would be distributed on a reimbursement basis upon completion of approved project milestones and submittal of all required reports and invoices.', 'In order to participate, cities must obtain an approved resolution from City Council that acknowledges receipt of the MSRC-supplied presentation from city or county staff, authorizes the proposed project, and allocates the necessary matching funds. The program presentation must be presented to Council live as part of the application process. The application must also contain a project implementation plan, proposed budget, and implementation schedule. All projects must be completed within 60 months of contract execution. Program applications must be submitted by March 2, 2018.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On May 19, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals for the furnishing, delivery and installation of smart electric vehicle service equipment to replace existing charging stations, install new charging stations, and provide ongoing management services, such as networking and maintenance, in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirty-nine vendors downloaded the RFP. Ten firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Parking Division, Information Systems Department, Street & Fleet Division and Office of Sustainability & the Environment.', 'Evaluation was based on price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff then interviewed six shortlisted firms, evaluated the proposals, and conducted interviews. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, ChargePoint was selected as the best qualified firm. The original RFP allowed for sites to be added in addition to the initial specified sites.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to ChargePoint is $493,247 for an amended contract amount not to exceed $666,372. In addition to funds of $78,703 available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019157.589000, the contract modification requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', '1. Release the fund balance of $414,544 from reserve account 4.380236;', '2. Establish a transfer budget of $414,544 from 04695.570321 to 01695.570321;', '3. Appropriate $70,077 to account C019157.589000;', '4. Appropriate $121,500 to account C019157.589100; and', '5. Appropriate $222,967 to account 014261.555010.', 'The total amount of incentive funds available from MSRC is $121,500. If awarded, a revenue budget will be established at account 44426.407830 and an interfund transfer from account 44695.570140 to account 01695.570140 will be included in the Proposed FY 2018-19 Budget. The incentive funding will cover up to 75% of total project costs and requires local match funding to cover the remaining balance. Funds to cover remaining costs are included in the appropriation to account C019157.589100 above.', 'Future funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2582'}], [{'Title': 'Request of Councilmembers McKeown and Himmelrich that staff return to City Council with an ordinance stating that it shall be a defense to an eviction if a child under the age of 18 or any educator resides in the unit, the child or educator is a tenant in the unit or has a custodial or family relationship with a tenant in the unit, the tenant has resided in the unit for 12 months or more, and the effective date of the notice of termination of tenancy falls during the school year, as upheld in the attached case.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2906'}, {'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer and Mayor Pro Tem Davis that the Council direct staff to draft a resolution reaffirming the City’s position against offshore oil and gas drilling, seismic oil exploration, oil and gas leasing, fracking and other well stimulation in Federal and state waters off the Pacific coast.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2913'}, {'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer, Mayor Pro Tem Davis and Councilmember O’Day that the Council allocate up to $20,000 of discretionary funds to the establishment of a Bob Holbrook scholarship fund, in recognition of his 32 years of public service to the City of Santa Monica (8 years as a SMMUSD board member and 24 years as a member of the City Council). The funds will be used to establish a scholarship fund for a Santa Monica student interested in pursuing an education in civic engagement or public service and for an ad campaign to solicit additional funding.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1135', 'ID': '2914'}]]
[[{'Title': 'City Manager Report: Trades Interns Program', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2886'}], [{'Title': 'Modification to Trapeze EAM Maintenance Contract', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support', 'Sponsors': 'Director Edward F. King', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to agreement #9508 (CCS) in the amount of $179,613 with Trapeze, Inc., a Canadian corporation, to complete a business process review, workflow improvements that include software upgrades, and implement a State of Good Repair and Capital Planning module. This would result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $1,295,370, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'BBB must make system upgrades to comply with recently published Transit Asset Management (TAM) guidelines from the Federal Transportation Administration (FTA). Therefore, staff recommends executing a fourth modification to the agreement with Trapeze in the amount of $179,613 to complete a Business Process Review (BPR), workflow improvements that include software upgrades, and implementation of the State of Good Repair and Capital Planning (SGR/CP) module that BBB currently owns. This would result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $1,295,370.', 'Background', 'Big Blue Bus utilizes several products from Trapeze. These products integrate to provide support to BBB for fleet maintenance, and fueling. On November 2011 (Attachment B) City Council authorized the purchase of the Trapeze EAM (Enterprise Asset Management) Fleet Maintenance Software, which went live in March of 2013. In January 2013 (Attachment C), City Council authorized the upgrade of the Fuel Focus fuel management system to fully integrate its fuel system with the maintenance system. In October 2017 (Attachment D), City Council authorized additional years of maintenance services for the EAM product. BBB continues to use the modules of the EAM system for tracking work orders, preventative maintenance management, warehouse inventory management, fueling controls, and other maintenance management functions.', 'Discussion', 'On July 26, 2016, the Federal Transportation Administration issued its final rule requiring transit agencies to maintain—and document—minimum TAM standards. The rule requires public transportation providers to develop and implement out transit asset management (TAM) plans, to include an asset inventory, condition assessments of inventoried assets, and a prioritized list of investments to improve the state of good repair of their capital assets. The final rule also establishes state good repair standards and four state of good repair (SGR) performance measures. Transit providers are required to set performance targets for their capital assets based on the SGR measures and report their targets, as well as information related to the condition of their capital assets, to the National Transit Database. The rule sets an October 1, 2018 deadline for completing a TAM plan.', 'On February 9, 2017, BBB conducted a review of its software to ensure compliance with the established guidelines. The assessment identified opportunities for enhancements in the areas of asset management, warranty, and reporting functions, including the implementation of the SGR/CP module, which BBB currently owns but has not implemented. BBB is in the midst of completing a comprehensive TAM plan that includes improvements to meet the established guidelines. This modification would allow staff to work with Trapeze to implement additional services required to address critical needs within the system, complete a business process review (BPR), and implement the SGR/CP modules of the EAM software. Implementation of these enhancements would ensure that BBB complies with the TAM guidelines by the October 2018 deadline.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Trapeze is $179,613, for an amended contract total not to exceed $1,295,370. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget. The contract will be charged to account C410113.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2815'}, {'Title': 'Award of Property Tax Information and Audit Services', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #148 to HdL Coren & Cone, a California-based company, to provide property tax information consulting and audit services.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with HdL Coren & Cone for an estimated amount of $141,000 over a five-year period with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Since 1997, HdL Coren & Cone (HDLCC) has provided the City with property tax information consulting and audit services needed to ensure that the City receives all property tax revenues due for economic planning and analyses, property tax revenue trend reports to forecast City property tax revenues, bond disclosure report updates, and other consulting services as needed.  In November 2017, the City solicited bids for property tax information and audit services. Based on evaluation responses to the Request for Proposals (RFP), staff recommends that the City negotiate a new five-year contract with HDLCC. The annual amount for information and consulting services is $25,000. The annual amount for auditing services is approximately $3,200 based on average actual costs over a five-year period.  Based on these figures, the estimated total value of the contract over the next five-year period will be approximately $141,000.', 'Background', 'Since 1992, the City has contracted for property tax information consulting and auditing services. Services provided also included fiscal consulting services associated with tax allocation bonds issued by the former Redevelopment Agency (Agency). The City’s current contract with HDLCC (Contract #9686 CCS) was authorized by Council on January 22, 2013 (Attachment A). The contract provided a five-year term and expires on February 20, 2018.', 'Discussion', 'Local taxes represent approximately two-thirds of the projected fiscal year 2017-18 General Fund revenues, with property taxes projected to account for 16% (14% property tax and 2% real property transfer tax) or $64.4 million.  Property tax revenues result from a 1% levy on the assessed value of all real property in the City. The base property tax levy of 1% of property assessed valuation is collected by the Los Angeles County Tax Collector and is distributed to various public agencies located in the County including cities, school districts, and special districts. The City’s share of the 1% levy is approximately 14-17% depending on the area of the City where the property is located.  The City’s real property transfer tax is assessed on the sale of real property in the City at a rate of $3.00 per $1,000 of transfer value.  Property tax information and audit services are specialized in nature and require in-depth knowledge of local and state government operations and legislation.', 'HDLCC would work with the Finance and Housing and Economic Development Departments to prepare annual tax reports and property tax audits; reconcile the Annual Auditor Controller Assessed Valuation reports; and prepare assessment appeal information.  As part of its property tax service, HDLCC would prepare preliminary and final property tax reports for all City tax districts and former Redevelopment project areas and present the data to the City and Agency. Consultant staff would assist the City in forecasting property tax revenues and the City’s share of residual payments, calculating statutory pass-through payments to taxing entities, preparing fiscal consultant reports, and updating bond disclosure schedules and reports.  Property tax auditing services would assist in identifying misallocated property tax revenues and enhance the revenue recovery process.  Audits conducted on secured and unsecured property tax rolls would ensure that each parcel is coded to the appropriate tax entity.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On November 13, 2017, the City published a Request for Proposals (RFP #148) for property tax information and audit services.  The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding website and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions.  A total of 579 vendors were notified and 20 vendors downloaded the RFP. Proposals were received from the following two firms:', '· HdL Coren & Cone', '· MuniServices, LLC', 'An evaluation panel composed of representatives from the Finance and the Housing and Economic Development departments reviewed and ranked the proposals using the criteria set out in the RFP.  Based on the selection criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, HDLCC was recommended as the best qualified firm to provide property tax information and audit services.  HDLCC was selected based on the firm’s long standing and documented success in audit recoveries, ability to meet project work plan goals in a timely manner, experienced and qualified staff, methodology that would be used to maximize City revenues, financial stability, pricing, available resources, and compliance with City scope of work.  Staff thoroughly reviewed and analyzed each proposal’s methodologies for improving process efficiencies to ensure that the City maximizes the collection of revenues and takes advantage of new and existing technologies.  HDLCC’s estimated annual cost to provide property tax information consulting services is $25,000 plus a one-time 25% fee for property tax audit recoveries.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to HDLCC is for an estimated annual amount of $25,000 for property tax information consulting services plus $3,200 for audit recovery services (based on historical averages), resulting in an estimated five-year total of approximately $141,000. Funds are available in the FY 2017-19 biennial budget in the Finance Department.  The contract will be charged to account number 012241.555060 and future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2832'}, {'Title': 'Second Modification to Agreement with Avolve Software for System Customization Services', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement No. 10279 (CCS), in the amount of  $66,199 with Avolve Software, an Arizona-based corporation, for professional services related to ProjectDox system customizations. This will result in a three year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $224,871, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City uses Avolve Software’s Electronic Plan Check Management System, ProjectDox, to enable the public, design professionals, and architects to upload and track their electronic plan submittals through the City’s plan check process. Staff can review and comment on submitted plans, compare original submittals against subsequent submittals, and approve the plans online. Last year, ProjectDox was upgraded to improve functionality and enable integration with the City’s permitting and plan check review systems. Staff now recommends executing a second contract modification with Avolve Software to complete system customizations to improve building plan check processes and expand system functionality for use by other City processes, such as City Planning’s entitlement review process.  The total cost of these additional services would be $66,199, resulting in a three year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $224,871.', 'Background', 'The City uses a suite of software tools for permitting and plan check review. Since 2009, the City has used Avolve’s ProjectDox as its Electronic Plan Check Management System. Avolve Software ceased support and maintenance of the City’s version of ProjectDox in 2015 due to the obsolescence of certain technical components. After evaluating potential solutions, staff determined that the upgraded version of ProjectDox was the only system that provided the essential functionalities to review and approve plan checks within a user-friendly interface and integrate with the City’s permitting software, Accela Automation.', 'Vendor Selection', 'Based on staff’s evaluation of available software options, the City recommended Avolve’s ProjectDox to provide upgrade, implementation and integration services on a sole source basis. The advanced technology and features that Avolve Software has developed for its ProjectDox system are only supported and can only be maintained by Avolve Software. On April 12, 2016 (Attachment D), Council authorized the sole source professional service agreement with Avolve Software in the amount of $158,672 for services related to implementation and integration services to upgrade ProjectDox. The City subsequently modified the professional agreement to extend the contract term for one additional year under the same contract terms.', 'Discussion', 'In October 2017, staff upgraded ProjectDox to the latest version and implemented a new Building plan check workflow process. Since then, staff has identified several emerging issues which would require Avolve Software to modify the integration. Not resolving these issues will require staff to manually fix data and increase the risk of human error.', 'To date, construction developers are required to submit 27 sets of paper plans to the City for a City Planning’s entitlement review. These plans are routed manually for review by various departments and/or committees. This paper-based review process is cumbersome, inefficient, and environmentally unsustainable. As part of the current ProjectDox upgrade project, staff recommends expanding the scope of services with Avolve Software to facilitate the integration and implementation of the City’s entitlement review process.', 'The standard City Planning entitlement workflow provided by Avolve Software does not integrate with the City’s permitting system. The lack of integration will require staff to perform redundant data entry in both ProjectDox and City’s permitting system. Therefore, staff recommends Avolve Software for implementation and integration services of the planning entitlement process.', 'These enhancements will enable staff to leverage the full benefits of the ProjectDox system and eliminate the need to submit paper plans.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Avolve Software is $66,199, for an amended contract total not to exceed $224,871. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department and FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts:', '01321.533580  $54,450', 'C018008.589000  $11,749', 'TOTAL  $66,199', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2837'}, {'Title': 'Approval of Design Agreement for the Fire Station No. 5 Dormitory Tenant Improvement Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #SP2469 to HH Fremer Architects Inc., a California-based company, to provide design services for the Fire Station No. 5 Dormitory Tenant Improvement Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with HH Fremer Architects Inc., in an amount not to exceed $138,895 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City seeks to remodel Santa Monica Fire Station No. 5, located at 2450 Ashland Avenue, to reconfigure dormitories to provide privacy, gender separation and sound insulation for firefighters assigned to various shifts; repair water rot and other plumbing issues, and bring the building into compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) and other building codes. The Fire Station No. 5 Dormitory Tenant Improvement Project was approved in the 16/17 CIP biennial budget. Staff recommends Council approval of an agreement with HH Fremer Architects Inc. in an amount not to exceed $138,895 (including a 10% contingency) for this project.', 'Discussion', 'The main dormitory and adjacent restrooms at Fire Station No. 5 have not been renovated since the building was constructed in 1982. The existing dormitory is a large, single room separated into individual, semi-private spaces that are divided by wooden lockers. In this current configuration, the semi-private rooms do not allow shift changes to occur without disturbing firefighters utilizing the dormitory, nor does the layout consider privacy or gender separation. The proposed design would minimize disruptions during shift changes and incorporate the new fire station alerting system, designed to reduce overall response times and properly zone separate alerting areas in the fire station.', 'Additionally, other adjustments would be made to Fire Station No. 5 in this project. The existing three restrooms would be renovated to meet current code requirements including the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA), California Building Code (CBC) and all other applicable code requirements. Moisture in the bathrooms over time has caused plumbing issues and rot which would be addressed with new finishes along with appropriate water protection.  The intermediate distribution frame (IDF) closet used for computers and communications equipment would be reorganized. Finally, the consultant would design an updated heating, ventilation and air-conditioning (HVAC) system and electrical and lighting systems for the newly configured space.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On November 6, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide design services for demolition and renovation of the Fire Station No. 5 dormitory and adjacent restrooms. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.075(a) provisions. A total of 63 vendors downloaded the RFP. Eight firms responded:', '· BOA Architecture', '· (fer) studio', '· HH Fremer Architects Inc.', '· Kitchell', '· Lewis Schoeplein Architects', '· March Studio', '· MINARC', '· William Loyd Jones Architect', 'Responses to the RFP were reviewed by staff from the Public Works Department. Evaluation was based on fees, previous work experience on similar projects, track record performing public sector work, hourly rates for services, demonstrated understanding of the project scope, work approach, project team qualifications and proposed schedule. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends HH Fremer Architects Inc. as the best qualified firm to provide design services for this project. HH Fremer Architects Inc. provided a clear fee structure, exhibited a solid understanding of the project scope, and has completed projects of similar size and scope. In addition, the project team displays good composition with required skills, and has experience working with governmental agencies. Staff contacted references that had previously worked with HH Fremer Architects and all highly recommend the firm.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to HH Fremer Architects Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $138,895. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C010162.589023.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2840'}, {'Title': 'First Modification to Agreement with Innovative Resources Consultant Group for Staff Development, Team Building, and Coaching Services', 'Department': 'Human Resources Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Agreement #10421 (CCS) in the amount of $150,000 with Innovative Resources Consultant Group (IRCG) for staff development, team building and coaching services. The amended agreement would be for a new total amount not to exceed $270,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. The five-year term of the contract would remain unchanged.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City is committed to providing staff with leadership training and coaching, both in for teams, with and small work groups, and with individuals. For over the last 15 years City Departments intermittently have worked with Innovative Resources Consultant Group (IRCG) to provide such services. Through the proprietary Personalysis® methodology, IRCG gathers information on an individual’s staff’s work style and strengths to improve team dynamics and communication through workshops and smaller sessions. IRCG also assists individuals to improve leadership and management skills, and facilitates strategic planning. Council last approved a contract award to IRCG in January 2017, which is set to expire in March 2020. However, due to on-going and greater than expected demand for IRCG’s services citywide, staff recommends increasing this contract by $150,000 for a new not to exceed amount of $270,000. The five-year term of the contract would remain unchanged.', 'Background', 'Innovative Resources Consultant Group (IRCG) through individual department agreements, has provided teams leadership training and coaching to teams and individual staff in the Planning and Community Development, Housing and Economic Development, Finance, Community and Cultural Services, Information Services, and Human Resources Departments and the City Manager’s Office with facilitation and leadership training and coaching. The City paid approximately $222,000 to IRCG across six separate agreements through October 2016. On February 4, 2014, the City entered into a 10-month agreement (No. 2814) for coaching for the Community and Cultural Services (CCS) Department in an amount not to exceed $7,500. Between December 2014 and June 2016, three modifications were executed to expand the scope of the project, increase the contract authority to $79,000, and to extend the term to June 30, 2017. On October 25, 2016, Council approved a fourth modification to the agreement in the amount of $120,000 (Attachment A). This modification, agreement No. 10386 (CCS), extended the contract terms through 2020 and provided a more centralized agreement for use citywide. On January 24, 2017, Council approved a new agreement (Attachment B), with IRCG to recognize that the organization dissolved as a corporation but no other changes were made. As of January 2018, there is approximately $44,000 remaining on the contract.', 'Discussion', 'The $120,000 contract amount provided in the fourth modification back in October 2016 was based on an estimate of staff need. This estimate was based on previous years’ engagements with ICRG, which were typically done department by department. Since execution of that fourth modification, which consolidated the use, City staff have requested and used approximately $76,000 in services, outpacing the original estimates and providing a more accurate reflection of the need for assistance in building stronger teams and better communication between staff . The additional increase reflects this more accurate use and now accounts for services on a City-wide basis. It also takes into account the ongoing necessity for these services as the City continues to regularly integrate new staff members with current members at all levels of the organization. In addition, it allows for the significant changes in executive leadership in the City and the desire to strengthen relationships among these leaders. Finally, it is essential that the City continue to strengthen its work teams as staff progresses towards a more open and modern working environment where communication and work style will be of key importance.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'Staff has determined that IRCG is exclusively qualified to perform this work because of the proprietary methodology and IRCG’s extensive experience with the City’s professional culture and staff relationships, both recently and historically. Although there are other vendors that use the Personalysis® method, they would not have the same level of expertise nor access to IRCG’s institutional knowledge and experience of the organization. Training and coaching effectively requires the establishment of trust and the building of strong relationships. Other vendors would need to gather more information and build relationships to be effective which would lead to higher costs and seriously delayed time in responding to coaching and leadership needs. Therefore, staff believes that IRCG is the most effective provider of these Personalysis®-based services to the City and is uniquely qualified to continue to provide those services. For these reasons, Council approved the October 2016 agreement as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Municipal Code Section 2.24.080 (d). Competition does not exist because only one vendor possesses the unique ability or capability to meet the particular requirements of the solicitation, such as a good or service that is copyrighted, patented or otherwise only available from one license holder.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The first modification to Agreement #10421 (CCS) to be awarded to IRCG is $150,000, for an amended total compensation not to exceed $270,000. The contract amounts would be charged to various accounts as departments identify a need for services. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 budget within the department operating budgets and would be encumbered as needed. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2841'}, {'Title': 'Second Modification to Police and Fire Dispatch Software Maintenance and Support Agreement', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to;1. Negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement #9087-CSS in the amount of $1,200,000 with Public Safety Systems, Inc. (PSSI), a Maryland-based company, to provide software maintenance and support for the public safety dispatch, records management and mobile data systems. This five-year extension will result in a 15-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $2,453,390 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval and;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue purchase orders with PSSI for the purchase of software and software licenses utilizing an exception to the competitive process per SMMC 2.24.080(d), in an amount not to exceed $750,000 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Police and Fire Departments utilize highly sophisticated and specialized software for dispatching, records management and mobile data systems developed by and purchased from Public Safety Systems, Inc. Police and Fire periodically need to purchase new software modules and additional software licenses and to have interfaces (also developed by Public Safety Systems, Inc.) to connect to other third-party systems associated with dispatching, records management and mobile data systems. Staff seeks to extend the existing Software Maintenance and Support Agreement with Public Safety Systems, Inc. in an amount of $1,200,000 combined with additional authority to purchase software and software licenses for use with mobile phones/tablets and integration with the City’s Computer Aided Dispatch system, Closed-Circuit Television System, 9-1-1 System and Fire Station Alerting System, as needed, in an amount of $750,000. This would result in a new total contract amount not to exceed $3,203,390 over a 15-year period.', 'Background', 'Public Safety Systems, Inc. provides the Computer Aided Dispatch (CAD) and mobile data systems used by the Office of Emergency Management Public Safety Communications Center, the Police and Fire Departments to allow for comprehensive public safety resource management from a single software platform. The integrated CAD and mobile data systems also integrate Police’s Records Management System (RMS). The RMS enables Police to electronically process incident/crime reports and related information from computers and mobile phones/tablets, fulfill various statistical reporting needs both locally and to State and Federal agencies and interface systems with various third-party applications used for crime mapping, data management and data sharing.', 'On July 14, 2009 (Attachment A), Council authorized a contract with Public Safety Systems, Inc. for software maintenance and support in an amount not to exceed $560,000 for a period of five years, through June 30, 2014.  Council subsequently approved a modification to the contract with Public Safety Systems, Inc. on October 14, 2014 to extend maintenance and support services through June 30, 2019, in an amount not to exceed $693,390 (Attachment B).', 'Discussion', 'During the last year, the Police Department has purchased additional software from Public Safety Systems, Inc.  through the issuance of purchase orders not exceeding the threshold that would require Council approval. The software was purchased for use with mobile phones/tablets issued to Police Officers and field-based civilian personnel. The newly purchased software enables the Police Department personnel to retrieve data from and/or enter data into the CAD and RMS systems. The software also enables the Police Department personnel to perform routine queries of various Federal and State law enforcement computer systems such as checking for wanted persons, validate restraining orders and confirm driver license status. The warranty period for the new software ends in March. Staff seeks approval to add the new software to the remaining term of the Software Maintenance Agreement to ensure ongoing support.', 'Staff seeks the authority to purchase software and software licenses from Public Safety Systems, Inc. as required in an amount not to exceed $750,000 over a five-year period. Plans exist to expand the use of the software applications provided by Public Safety Systems, Inc., including deployment of new iOS-based mobile data software for the Fire Department, integration of the CAD system with the City’s Closed-Circuit Television (CCTV) system, integration of the CAD system with a new Fire Station Alerting System planned for 2018, integration of the CAD system with the Fire Department’s new contract ambulance company, and expansion of mobile device deployment for Police. All of the planned expansion will result in more efficient use and better integration of existing systems. The implementation requires complex integration with the existing systems which can be provided only by Public Safety Systems, Inc.', 'Staff seeks the authority to extend the Software Maintenance Agreement for an additional five-year term for an amount not to exceed $1,200,000. The proposed extension would include maintenance of the existing CAD, RMS and mobile data systems, the recently purchased software for the Police Department’s mobile phones/tablets and for the future planned purchases of mobile data software for Police and Fire, CCTV, station alerting and CAD integrations and related applications. The mission critical software provided by Public Safety Systems, Inc. is highly specialized for emergency services and is tightly integrated with the various other computer systems utilized by the Office of Emergency Management, Police and Fire, including the City’s 9-1-1 system, newly implemented radio system and various business applications. The CAD, RMS and mobile data systems have been enhanced and modified over the years to fully meet the City’s needs. In order to ensure the planned projects can be completed and ongoing support and maintenance of the existing systems provided by Public Safety Systems, Inc., and to protect the significant investment that has been made into the systems to date, an extension of the maintenance contract is needed.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'A sole source maintenance with agreement with Public Safety Systems, Inc. is necessary to ensure ongoing support for the software systems. Purchase of additional licenses, software modules and interfaces for integration with the CAD, RMS and Mobile Data systems are available only from Public Safety Systems, Inc. as the License Holder of the source code. As specified in SMMC 2.24.080(d) Competition does not exist because only one vendor possesses the unique ability or capability to meet the particular requirements of the solicitation, such as a good or service that is copyrighted, patented or otherwise only available from one license holder.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The contract modification to be awarded to Public Safety Systems, Inc. is $1,200,000 for an amended contract not to exceed $2,453,390. Funds for FY 2017-18 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Police Department, Fire Department and other departments as required. The maintenance and support portion of the contract will be charged to accounts 01304.533580 and 01312.533580. Additional software purchases are funded from various budgets, including department operational budgets, grants and capital improvement projects. Software will only be purchased if funds are available in the appropriate account. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2844'}, {'Title': 'Award of Replacement Mobile Computers for Police', 'Department': 'Police Department', 'Sponsors': 'Chief Information Officer Joseph Cevetello', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4309 to Lehr Auto Electric Inc., a California-based company for the purchase of 75 mobile computers for the Police Department.2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order to Lehr Auto Electric, Inc. for 75 mobile computers for the Police Department in the amount not to exceed $367,230.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Police Department utilizes highly rugged mobile computers in its vehicles to enable officers to access the Computer Aided Dispatch (CAD) system to receive calls for service, query various Federal and State databases for wanted vehicles and persons, enter incident/crime reports into the Records Management System, and operate the in-vehicle camera system. The existing mobile computers, installed in 75 vehicles primarily assigned to Patrol and Community Services Officers, are now in need of replacement. Staff recommends a purchase order with Lehr Auto Electronic in an amount not to exceed $367,230 to replace the existing computers.', 'Discussion', 'The Police Department has utilized mobile computers in its vehicles for approximately 20 years. On January 20, 2012, Council authorized purchase of 75 mobile computers from Lehr Auto Electric, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $565,292 (Attachment A). The mobile computers currently installed in police vehicles have been in use for more than five years and are no longer supported by the manufacturer. The computers are incapable of running current versions of the Windows operating system and various software applications used by Police, limiting the ability to properly apply the latest software security. The computers need to be replaced.', 'The proposed new mobile computers would support the latest version of the Windows operating system and other software applications, ensuring that the latest available security is being utilized and would continue to integrate with the existing Automatic Vehicle Location system and recently purchased in-car camera systems. The selected model will also integrate with the existing computer mobile computer docks installed in the Police vehicles, thereby saving the expense of new computer docks and related hardware. Furthermore, the existing mobile computers cannot be removed from the vehicle thereby limiting their use for some functions, such as field-based reporting. The new computers could be used in and out of Police vehicles, thereby allowing officers to enter reports while working at an incident scene.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On December 4, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver 75 Panasonic CF-31 mobile computers in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 47 prospective vendors downloaded the bid. 4 bids were received and publicly opened on December 21, 2017:', 'Lehr Auto Electric, Inc.', '$367,230', 'Southern Computer Warehouse, Inc.', '$406,665', 'Hypertec USA, Inc.', '$447,075', 'IT Gurus of Atlanta, LLC', '$663,855', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price and compliance with City specifications. Based on these criteria, Lehr Auto Electric, Inc., is recommended as the best bidder.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The purchase order to be awarded to Lehr Auto Electric, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $367,230. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019172.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2845'}, {'Title': 'Construction Change Order for the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to construction contract #4418 in the amount of $50,000 with STB Stone, Inc., a California-based company, for additional construction services for the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project. This will result in an amended contract with a new total amount not to exceed $207,300. 2.  Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to agreement #10531 (CCS) in the amount of $107,845 with Plumbing by Todd R. Marsh, Inc., a California-based company, for additional plumbing contractor services for the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project. This will result in an amended contract with an amount not to exceed $307,845 for one year, with two additional two-year renewal options in the amount of $840,808 including an increase of 2% each year, for a total amount not to exceed $1,148,653, over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On December 20, 2017, STB Stone, Inc. began demolition of the existing tile and associated drywall substrate in the locker rooms at the Santa Monica Swim Center as part of the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project. During construction, the contractor discovered extensive corrosion and deterioration of the existing metal stud framing throughout both the male and female locker rooms. The damage was so severe that the existing metal stud framing members were no longer attached to the floor. Moreover, during the demolition of the wall that separates the men’s and women’s locker rooms the contractor discovered that the plumbing drains, vent systems and water lines were compromised. Repair of these severe structural and plumbing issues were not part of the original scope of the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project; however, it was critical that it be completed immediately. Due to the urgent nature of the repairs and to avoid extensive delays to the public programming that occurs at the Swim Center or to use by Santa Monica College, staff directed the contractor to proceed with the urgent repairs and is now seeking formal Council approval. Staff requests Council authorization to execute first modifications to: construction contract  #4418 in the amount of $50,000 with STB Stone, Inc. to repair the locker room framing and first modification to agreement #10531 in the amount of $107,845 with Plumbing by Todd Marsh to repair the locker room plumbing. The City anticipates reopening the Swim Center to the public and resuming regularly scheduled programming in February 2018.', 'Background', 'On December 14, 2017, the City Manager executed construction contract no. 4418 with STB Stone, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $157,300 (includes 10% contingency and $5,800 allowance for unforeseen conditions) for the Santa Monica Swim Center Locker Room Tile Replacement Project. The contracted scope of services is for construction services for the removal and replacement of the existing tile and drywall substrate in the locker rooms at the Santa Monica Swim Center located on the campus of Santa Monica College. This project is being completed as part of the annual facility renewal that occurs during the closure of the Swim Center at the end of each year. The project was bid formally, but because the selected best bidder was below the Council threshold of $175,000, Council approval was not required to initiate the project. As the unforeseen structural issues are so extensive, the cost of repairs will result in a modified contract amount which will require Council approval.', 'On September 12, 2017, (Attachment C), Council authorized the City Manager to execute an agreement with Plumbing by Todd R. Marsh, Inc., for citywide plumbing contractor services, in an amount not to exceed $200,000 for the first year and a total contract amount not to exceed $1,040,808 over a five-year period. Due to unforeseen plumbing repair costs, a first modification to the first-year contract amount is also needed.', 'Discussion', 'In December 2017, STB Stone, Inc. began demolition of the existing tile and associated drywall substrate in the locker rooms at the Santa Monica Swim Center. It became evident that the condition of the existing metal stud framing and plumbing would not be able to accommodate the reinstallation of new drywall and tile due to extensive rust, corrosion, and deterioration that was uncovered.', 'The Santa Monica Swim Center Tile Replacement Project was originally planned to be completed in 30 calendar days, in order to not produce adverse impacts or extensive delays to the public programming that occurs at the Swim Center or to facility use by Santa Monica College. City staff determined that immediate repairs to the framing and plumbing were required to complete all construction work in a timely manner. Staff directed the contractor to proceed with the urgent repairs and is now seeking formal Council approval.', 'Staff recommends:', '· A first modification to construction contract #4418 in the amount of $50,000 with STB Stone Inc. to add framing repair to the original scope of work at the Santa Monica Swim Center, which will extend the structural life of the locker rooms for up to 15 years. This will result in an amended construction contract total amount not to exceed $207,300.', '· A first modification to agreement #10531 (CCS) in the amount of $107,845 with Plumbing by Todd R. Marsh, Inc. for the plumbing repairs of drains, vent systems and water lines at the Santa Monica Swim Center locker rooms. This will result in an amended agreement total amount not to exceed $1,148,653.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On October 11, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish construction services for a tile replacement project at the Santa Monica Swim Center in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24071(a) provisions. Twenty-three vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on October 30, 2017.', 'Vendor', 'Bid Amount', 'STB Stone, Inc.', '$137,200', 'P & P Develop, Inc.', '$177,956', 'Bids were evaluated based on criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. The bid submitted by STB Stone, Inc. demonstrated an understanding of the approach, tasks, and methodology necessary to complete the required services. Based on these criteria, STB Stone, Inc., the lowest bidder, was recommended as the best bidder.', "On May 9, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for citywide plumbing contractor services that included multi-year renewal options in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.100(a). A total of 20 vendors downloaded the bid. Four bids were received and publicly opened on May 25, 2017, per Attachment D. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Todd R. Marsh Inc. was not the lowest bidder when considering the hourly labor rates, but offered competitive pricing, the fastest guaranteed response time and the second lowest pricing for renewal options. Moreover, Todd R. Marsh, Inc. has provided the City with responsive and satisfactory service. Amgreen Solutions offered the lowest hourly labor rate, but its pricing is significantly lower than the established Prevailing Wage rates required by state law, demonstrating non-compliance and thus its bid was inadmissible.", 'Construction Schedule', 'Staff originally anticipated construction at the Santa Monica Swim Center to be completed in early February 2018. However due to the unforeseen structural issues, staff now anticipates construction to be completed in late February 2018.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The first modification to be awarded to STB Stone, Inc. is $50,000, for an amended construction contract total amount not to exceed $207,300. Funds are available in FY 2017-2018 Capital Improvement Program budget in account M014078.589000.', 'The first modification to be awarded to Plumbing by Todd R. Marsh Inc. for an amended agreement not to exceed $307,845 for one year, for a total amount not to exceed $1,148,653 over a five-year period. Funds are available in FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account M010085.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2852'}, {'Title': 'Award Contract to Transpo Group for Engineering Design Services for the Downtown Real-Time Parking Project', 'Department': 'Traffic Management (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP#141 to Transpo Group, Inc., a Washington-based company for Engineering Design services for the Downtown Real-Time Parking Signs Project.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Transpo Group, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $94,730 for one year, with two-additional one-year renewal options in the subtotal amount of $10,270, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $105,000 over a three-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Downtown Real-Time Parking Project is identified in the City’s Downtown Community Plan as a means to reduce traffic congestion and help drivers more quickly find available parking. This project will develop construction-ready plans, specifications, and estimates for real-time parking and traveler information signs for motorists traveling to Santa Monica’s Downtown parking garages adjacent to 2nd Street, 4th Street, and the Pier that conform to the City’s wayfinding standards. Staff recommends Transpo Group, Inc. prepare the engineering design and construction documents in an amount not to exceed amount of $105,000 over a three-year period.', 'Background', 'In 2014, the City completed the Real-Time Beach Parking Project that installed 21 digital signs that direct motorist to the beach parking lots. These signs operate daily to display wayfinding messages and lot occupancy and space availability on a real-time basis.', 'In 2016, City staff began coordinating with key Downtown stakeholders and other City Departments to explore the expansion of the current real-time system into the Downtown. Discussion topics included location, size, and aesthetics of the proposed signs. Several meetings were held including staff from Downtown Santa Monica Inc., Santa Monica Place (Macerich), and Santa Monica Pier Corporation.', 'In 2017, the City completed the installation of 100 static wayfinding signs in Downtown. The signs vary in size and conform to the City’s latest wayfinding sign standards.', 'Discussion', 'This project involves the engineering design of two types of dynamic message signs (DMS) to be located within the Downtown area bounded by Ocean Avenue, California Avenue, Pico Boulevard, and 6th Street. Both types of signs will conform to the City’s latest standard for wayfinding signs. The first type is a small, two-sided DMS proposed at the entrance to seven Downtown parking garages indicated in Attachment A. The second type of DMS is a full matrix sign that can display multiple lines of text and graphics.These DMS will be placed at 18 strategic locations near City entrances indicated in Attachment B. The DMS will be integrated with the City’s parking availability system and display messages directing motorists from the freeway off-ramps to the nearest available parking facilities based on real-time occupancy conditions.', 'The DMS will also have the capability to display custom messages and will assist the management and diversion of traffic during special events, planned closures, or unexpected incidents.The final locations for sign installation will be determined in coordination with other City departments, including Community and Cultural Services, Finance, Information Services, and Public Works.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On October 17, 2017, the City published a Request for Proposal (RFP) to obtain engineering design services for the Downtown Real-Time Parking Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 41 vendors downloaded the RFP. Four proposals were received on November 9, 2017 from the firms listed below.', '· Advantec Consulting Engineers', '· Kimley-Horn and Associates', '· Michael Baker International', '· Transpo Group Inc.', 'Proposals were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073 and as outlined in the RFP, which included Experience/Technical Competence, Ability to Meet Work Plan and Timelines, Project Approach, Cost of Services and Cost Control, Stability/ References, and the Value Added/ Breadth of Service.', 'In January 2017, the selection committee, comprised of staff from Planning and Community Development, recommended Transpo Group, Inc. to provide the engineering design services for this project. Transpo Group demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with real-time parking projects, and similar capital improvement projects in the City of Seattle, Puget Sound Transit, and San Francisco. Transpo Group also demonstrated through past projects its ability to offer project design on schedule and at a competitive price. Based on thesecriteria, Transpo Group is recommended as the best qualified firm.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Transpo Group Inc., is for an amount not to exceed $105,000. Funds of $105,000 are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget. The contract will be charged to account C010994.589000 – Parking Guidance System.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2856'}, {'Title': 'Proposed Use of 10 Parking Spaces in Parking Structure 7 by Electric Automotive Dealer Tesla', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a modification to the Agreement for Lease, Operation, and Maintenance of Parking Facilities executed July 28, 2010 with Macerich SMP LP to designate 10 parking spaces within Parking Structure 7 for use by Tesla, a proposed electric automotive tenant of Santa Monica Place/Macerich, Inc.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Macerich currently leases Parking Structures 7 and 8 from the City. As part of this lease, Macerich is responsible for all maintenance and repairs, and has a revenue sharing arrangement with the City. The lease requires Macerich to provide 1,852 parking spaces on a non-exclusive basis for members of the general public. It is also entitled to purchase a certain number of parking key cards for general and valet parking use. Macerich is seeking a modification to the Lease Agreement that would allow Macerich to sublease 10 of the public parking spaces in Parking Structure 7 to Tesla, a proposed tenant of Santa Monica Place, to park vehicles to be used for test driving. If Tesla does not move forward with the sublease, the modification to the Lease Agreement would not be implemented. The modification of the Lease Agreement would allow Macerich to sublease 10 parking spaces only during the term of Tesla’s sublease.', 'Discussion', 'Macerich currently has an Agreement for Lease, Operation, and Maintenance of Parking Facilities (Lease Agreement) and other license agreements with the City that generally provide for the following:', '· Parking revenue from Structures 7 and 8 are split equally between Macerich and the City after parking facilities taxes and certain expenses (e.g. Parking Operator) are deducted as agreed to in the lease agreement.', '· Macerich is responsible for all maintenance and upkeep costs and utilities for the structures, including cleaning, painting, and repairs.', '· Macerich contributes to the cost of the Parking Access and Revenue Control Equipment.', '· Macerich has the right to purchase 278 keycards for general parking on the 5th and 6th levels in Structures 7 and 8. However, please note, the requirement that individuals who purchase one of these key cards park on the 5th and 6th levels of the parking structure is not actively enforced by City staff due to limits on staff’s ability to track where these individuals park. Without additional technology or manual tracking which is resource intensive, it is cost prohibitive and not practical for staff to ensure compliance with this provision.', '· Forty-three (43) of the 278 key cards are licensed to be used for valet in designated spaces on the ground floor of Parking Structure 8 (see Attachment A).', '· Macerich has the right to install and operate an interior parking guidance system.', '· Macerich is required to provide 1,852 public parking spaces', 'Contract Modifications', 'Staff recommends a modification of the Lease Agreement and to allow Macerich to sublease 10 of the public parking spaces in Parking Structure 7 to Tesla in connection with Tesla subleasing space situated on the first and second levels of the Santa Monica Place shopping center, at the entrance to the shopping center at the intersection of Broadway and 3rd Street Promenade. This location serves as the entrance to Santa Monica Place from the 3rd Street Promenade.', 'Tesla will be engaged in sales of electric vehicles similar to how it operates in other shopping malls, using the 10 parking spaces for parking and charging of the tenant’s test drive vehicles and for parking by its customers. Tesla currently has a number of California sales locations in malls, such as The Village at Corte Madera, Americana at Brand in Glendale, Westfield Century City, Fashion Island in Newport Beach, Fashion Valley in San Diego, and The Grove in Los Angeles. Following are two examples of Tesla locations with vehicles available for test driving, although these are not reflective of what would be within Structure 7, particularly since the parking spaces would not be allowed to be roped off as they are in these locations. A more accurate reflection is provided later in this report.', 'Brea Mall located in Orange County  Westfield Century City in Los Angeles', 'The spaces will be located on the 3rd level of Parking Structure 7 immediately adjacent to the 2nd level of the tenant’s space (see attachment B). The tenant space has an exit door for easy access to the vehicles, however, this door will not be permitted as a customer entrance to the tenant space and no showroom furniture would be allowed in the parking area. Additionally, no employee parking will be allowed in the spaces.', 'Under this modification, Macerich would also purchase an additional 10 parking key cards for use by Tesla for the daily maximum rate established by Council for the Parking Structure. Replacement fees for key cards will also apply. The maximum daily amount is currently $17.50. This would be an annual revenue of $6,387.50 for each space for a total annual revenue of $63,875 for all 10 parking spaces; revenues that would otherwise not be collected based on current occupancies. These revenues will be included in gross revenues and subject to the revenue sharing provisions of the Lease Agreement, less applicable Parking Facilities Tax, consistent with all other parking revenues generated in Parking Structure 7. The agreement includes a fixed parking rate that is based on the current daily maximum daily rate established by Council, which changes from time to time, therefore the revenue could increase or decrease if Council adopts a different daily maximum rate in the future.', 'Average peak parking occupancy recorded in Parking Structure 7 for the last fiscal year was 68% on the weekdays and 82% on the weekends. The highest peak occupancy recorded in Parking Structure 7 last fiscal years was 97% for limited periods of time on certain days in July and August of 2016, and the next highest was during the LA Marathon in March 2017 when occupancy reached 91% at times. During periods of peak occupancy, more than 250 parking spaces are open at all times on weekdays and 150 spaces on the weekends in the structure, and staff does not anticipate any disruption to parking availability for the general public or loss of revenue.', 'Macerich and Tesla will be responsible for the cost of all improvements necessary. Proposed improvements would include:', '· The Tesla name on the west wall above three of the spaces', '· Painting of the door area from the tenant space to the parking facility and other minor aesthetic enhancements', '· Lighting', '· Installation of 10 Electric Vehicle (EV) Chargers', 'Although the following picture is of a Tesla charging station, it is a representative example of what Tesla has proposed for the west wall.', 'Domain Northside Mall Tesla Charging Station – Austin, Texas', 'If Telsa does not move forward with the lease, this modification would not be implemented. The term of the modification would be set to the same term as the lease agreement between Tesla and Macerich, and would terminate if Tesla vacates the space.', 'Providing this option would assist with securing a tenant for a space that has been empty since December 2015 after Kitson vacated the space, with a couple of pop-up stores having occupied the space short term. Providing the spaces would not disrupt parking availability.', 'CEQA', 'The proposed parking management public valet program is exempt from the provision of CEQA pursuant to CEQA Guidelines Section 15061(b)(3) in that it can be seen with certainty that the proposal will not result in significant adverse environmental impacts since the modification only represents an operational change to the use of the existing parking spaces and will not result in the creation of any new parking demand.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future. Approval of the modification of the agreement will generate gross annual revenues in the amount of $63,875. These revenues will be subject to the revenue sharing provisions of the Lease Agreement, less applicable Parking Facilities Tax, consistent with all other parking revenues generated in Parking Structure 7. The agreement includes a fixed parking rate that is based on the current daily maximum daily rate established by Council, which changes from time to time, therefore the revenue could increase or decrease if Council adopts a different daily maximum rate in the future.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2857'}], [{'Title': 'Second Reading and Adoption of Interim Zoning Ordinance Amending Portions of Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.07.030 to Revise Development Standards for Maximum Parcel Coverage, Maximum Building Height, and Additional Minimum Stepbacks for Upper Stories in the R1 Single-Unit Residential District', 'Department': "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance amending portions of Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.07.030.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'At its meeting on January 23, 2018, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending portions of the Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.07.030 to revise development standards for maximum parcel coverage, maximum building height, and additional minimum stepbacks for upper stories in R1 single-unit residential district.', 'The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2873'}], [{'Title': 'Approval of minutes for the December 12, 2017 Housing Authority meeting.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council/Commissioners approve the minutes for the Housing Authority December 12, 2017 meeting.', 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2883'}, {'Title': 'Financial Status Update and FY 2017-18 Midyear Budget', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Budget Division', 'Sponsors': 'Director Susan Cline, Director Donna Peter', 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council, Housing Authority, and Parking Authority:Appropriate FY 2017-18 midyear revenue and expenditure budget adjustments and approve corresponding adjustments to the FY 2018-19 budget plan (Attachment A).Staff also recommends that the City Council:1. Receive the FY 2017-18 through FY 2021-22 Financial Status Update;2. Adopt a Resolution establishing new classifications and adopting salary rates for various positions (Attachment B) and approve the position and classification changes (Attachment C);3. Adopt a Resolution authorizing the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $450,000 with a required local match of $60,000 from Caltrans Sustainable Communities Planning Grant Program for a Wilshire Boulevard Safety Enhancement Study, and to accept all grant renewals (Attachment D);4. Authorize the City Manager to accept an additional grant awarded in the amount of $200,852 with a required local 12% match from Caltrans for the Safe Routes to School program;5. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $28,595 from the State of California for software and hardware improvements to maximize patron benefits from library internet connections, and to accept all grant renewals; and6. Receive public comment on federal Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnership Act (HOME) Program funds.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The midyear budget update (The Update) provides an opportunity to apprise Council and the community on the City’s five-year financial forecast and new information on longer-term trends for the City, as well as present proposed midyear budget changes. The Update informs the City Council and community of the City’s current and projected fiscal status as the City begins the budget process that will result in the adoption of the FY2018-19 budget as well as the Capital Improvement Plan Biennial Budget. Overall, the forecast has improved since the last update, and restraint shown in midyear expenditure changes contributes to this. However, signs of changes in certain areas of the local economy are becoming more pronounced, and uncertainties related to high-value expenditures and revenues persist. Moreover, the recent stock market volatility reminds us that the current national economic expansion will not go on forever and is already one of the longest on record.', 'This upcoming budget is the second year of the operating biennial budget and the first year of the capital improvement program (CIP) biennial budget. In the second year of the biennial budget process, staff reviews and adjusts the plan for the next year to account for changes in revenue and operating expenses necessary to complete the two-year workplan.', 'The Update shows three years of positive General Fund structural balances before an anticipated shortfall in FY 2020-21 and in FY 2021-22. The projected funding gaps are due primarily to anticipated increases in pension costs in spite of the City’s significant prepayments to the retirement system. It is important to highlight that the gaps would be significantly greater if the prepayment had not been made. This represents a change from the last forecast as indicated in the following table:', 'FY 2019-20', 'FY 2020-21', 'FY 2021-22', 'May 2017 Projected Shortfall', '$3.8 million', '$10.3 million', '$18.8 million', '(3.7% of the GF budget)', 'February 2018 Projected Shortfall', 'Positive fund balance', '$0.3 million', '$10.6 million', '(2.4% of the GF budget)', 'These improved estimates are due primarily to projected lower costs for retirement and healthcare. These lower than previously projected costs are a result of the City’s $45million pay down of unfunded pension liability and a negotiated one-year rate maintenance with the City’s primary health insurance provider.  On the revenue side, staff has converted some revenue sources from one-time to ongoing streams based on recent years’ actuals (e.g., partial Transient Occupancy Taxes from short-term home rentals, Building and Safety fees).', 'The financial status of other funds remains relatively stable.  As previously reported, the Housing Authority Fund is projected to require subsidies through the end of the forecast period.  The Cemetery Fund is projecting operating structural deficits, and staff are assessing operations to provide a long term plan for the fund.  The Pier Fund is also projected to require subsidies as the combination of operating and large capital expenditures are outpacing the growth of revenues during the forecast period.', 'Proposed FY 2017-18 midyear revenue adjustments result in a $11.8 million, or 1.7%, increase over the citywide revenue budget, and expenditure adjustments result in a net $4.9 million or a 0.8% decrease over the citywide expenditure budget.', 'This strong performance allows the City to fully fund the future $8 million construction cost of the Civic Center Multi-Use Sports Field with $1 million in additional funding. The report also includes a staff recommendation to accept grants for the Safe Routes to School program, Wilshire Boulevard Safety Enhancement Study, and software and hardware improvements at the Santa Monica Public Library.', 'Finally, the City must hold two public hearings prior to the adoption of a One-Year Action Plan allocating federal CDBG and HOME Program funds.  This public hearing will satisfy one of the two meeting requirements to receive public input and recommendations for the Proposed FY 2018-19 Action Plan.  The City will hold another public hearing prior to the adoption of the Proposed FY 2018-19 Action Plan.', 'Background', 'On June 27, 2017 (Attachment E), Council adopted the first year and approved the second year of the FY 2017-19 Biennial Budget; and adopted the second year of the FY2016-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget.  On October 24, 2017 (Attachment F), based on year-end financial results, Council approved certain revisions to the FY 2017-18 Adopted Budget that adjusted expenditures and staffing.  Since October, staff completed a midyear review of all revenues and expenditures and is proposing budget adjustments for programs, activities, and revenues that have changed significantly.  These adjustments will align the FY 2017-18 Revised Budget with current operations.', 'Discussion', 'Economic Update', 'While the City’s General Fund forecast continues to show revenue growth, the City, along with cities across the country, has entered a period where changes in the economy at large, such as on-line sales, and regional factors such as alternative transportation choices, are beginning to impact our traditional revenue streams.', 'The U.S. economy continues to grow at a consistent pace.  Economic growth as measured by GDP was positive in 2017 for the eighth consecutive year with the recent quarter averaging growth of nearly 3%. Most economists are projecting continued growth (2.5-3% range annually) over the next two years.  Unemployment is at its lowest level since 2000.  The housing market remains strong, and inflation, while showing some signs of increase, continues to be low.  The Federal Reserve has begun to increase interest rates and is expected to continue these increases over the next one to two years in an effort to “normalize” rates.', 'However, the economy is not without risks.  The current economic recovery period is one of the longest in the post WW II period, and history would indicate that the economy is likely to head into a recession sometime within the next five years.', 'The State economy recovered strongly from the “Great Recession.” While the State budget has also expanded in recent years to attempt to correct long term issues, and the Governor’s FY 2018-19 Budget predicts a healthy surplus, the State budget is not without risks. A recession could reduce State revenues by an estimated $20 billion annually over several years. Also, the effect of Federal tax law changes cannot yet be measured.', 'Santa Monica’s economy remains relatively strong due in large part to its geographic location and its diversified tax revenue base.  However, there are signs of moderation in the local economy’s growth rate. General Fund revenue growth has begun to slow after several years of strong increases.  Average annual growth the last three years has been less than 4% following growth rates of over 8% in the three years of recovery following the recession. Also, as with the State and national economies, the threat of a recession could significantly alter revenue projections.  More information on some of the City’s key revenue sources is provided below.', 'Property values in the City remain the third highest in Los Angeles County for a City with the 19th largest population.  The FY 2017-18 assessed value increase was 5.8%, the third consecutive year in the 6% range.  Moderate increases of 3-4% are projected over the next five years.', 'Sales tax, which includes both sales and use and transaction and use tax, growth rates are expected to be modest, reflecting the loss of several large tax generators and the global shift of retail activity from brick and mortar businesses to on-line businesses. City taxable sales are projected to grow by less than 2% in FY 2018-19 and with future annual growth rates of less than 3%.', 'Tourism, which provides a major stimulus to the local economy by creating jobs and producing revenues, continues to show strength.  Transient Occupancy Taxes have increased at an average annual rate of over 9% over the last seven years, and revenues are expected to continue having healthy increases over the forecast period, reflecting the recent opening of two new hotels and another one that is under construction and anticipated to open within the next three years. One area of uncertainty over the forecast period is the impact that new registration requirements for home share hosting platforms will have on current revenue projections.', 'Business License Taxes are expected to show some weakness over the forecast period, reflecting the anticipated loss of at least one major taxpayer as well as a moderating of the local economy.  Utility Users Tax revenues are expected to remain relatively flat over the forecast period as revenues from telecommunication services continue to drop.  Parking Facility Taxes are expected to grow by approximately 1.7% per year over the forecast period as declines from City downtown parking facilities are offset by increases from private parking facilities and beach parking.  Interest rates have risen sharply over the last year after the historically low levels over the prior seven years resulting in greater investment income. While a gradual increase is expected over the forecast period, rates are still expected to remain at relatively low levels.', 'Staff is closely monitoring parking revenues, a consistently strong revenue source for the City that is projected to decrease by 7% in FY 2017-18, reflecting a significant shift in how people travel into and around the City, primarily as a result of EXPO light rail and ridesharing services providing alternative modes of transportation for visitors and community members.', 'General Fund Financial Status Update', 'The General Fund Financial Status Update reflects revised revenue projections as well as staff’s proposed operating and capital budget changes included in this staff report.  Increased revenues, primarily Transient Occupancy Taxes and Building and Safety fees, the City’s pre-payment of pension contributions (paying down the City’s unfunded liability) and lower than anticipated increases in medical benefit costs significantly reduce the timing and size of projected future shortfalls.', 'Staff has completed three forecast scenarios that contemplate Best, Probable, and Worst Case impacts on the General Fund.  The chart below shows the three forecast scenarios.', 'The Probable scenario, which serves as the baseline for the forecast, shows the General Fund experiencing a potential shortfall of approximately $0.3 million in FY2020‑21 that increases to $10.6 million (2.4% of the General Fund budget) in FY2021-22.  The major challenges to the City’s budget continue to be pension, health insurance and workers’ compensation costs, which are projected to grow at average rates of 6.3%, 8.5%, and 10% per year, respectively, over the remaining four full years of the forecast.  Overall, operating expenditures are anticipated to grow an average of 3.6% per year during this period, while ongoing revenues are anticipated to grow an average of 2.8% per year.', 'In the Best Case scenario, bolstered by higher increases in revenues, the General Fund would be positive throughout the forecast period, with a positive balance of $3.9million in FY 2021-22.  In the Worst Case scenario, which shows the effects of a possible recession as well as intensification of some potentially negative trends in the areas of parking and sales, transient occupancy and business license tax, the General Fund would experience a shortfall of $0.6 million in FY2018-19 that would increase significantly to $29 million in FY 2021-22.', 'Other Funds', 'Other major funds that are included in the Financial Status Update fall into two categories: 1) funds that operate with sufficient revenues to sustain necessary operating and capital needs, and 2) funds that have a structural deficit where ongoing revenues are not sufficient to cover ongoing expenditures.', 'Self-Sustaining Enterprise Funds', 'The Water and Wastewater Funds have sufficient revenues to cover current operations.  Based on existing analysis, rate increases in the Water Fund allow the implementation of the Sustainable Water Master Plan while also maintaining reserve levels.  As noted at the recent public hearing to adopt the current rates, additional studies are underway to further assess the financial needs to achieve Water Self-Sufficiency and those reports are scheduled to be presented to the Council this summer.  The Wastewater Fund continues to have adequate revenues and reserves to meet current operational and capital expenditures.', 'The Resource Recovery and Recycling (RRR) Fund will maintain a positive fund over the next five years.  There are several upcoming proposals that may potentially have a substantial impact on the financial stability of the fund, including various solid waste and recycling initiatives and pilot programs, the Fund’s share of costs to complete the Corporate Yards modernization project, and the displacement of the recycling contractor at the Corporate Yards that will result in additional costs for transporting the City-collected recycling materials to an offsite location.  Staff will continue to monitor fund performance and consider the need for a rate increase in the future.', 'The BBB Fund will also maintain a positive fund balance over the next five years.  BBB, like most transit agencies in the country, continues to be confronted with reduced ridership, and BBB staff is focused on strategies to improve ridership and ensuring that services are cost effective and relevant.  The fund will receive additional revenues from the voter-approved Measure M, which allocates an additional ½ cent sales tax to agencies in order to improve traffic congestion, keep transit fares affordable and improve bus systems.', 'The Airport, Beach, and Community Broadband Funds will generate adequate revenues to sustain their operations throughout the next five years.', 'Funds Requiring Subsidies', 'The Housing Authority Fund has a projected operating structural deficit of approximately $0.7 million to $1 million annually throughout the forecast period.  The Housing Authority will require an annual operating subsidy from the Special Revenue Source Fund.  This assumes that U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) funding to housing authorities will not be reduced.', 'The Cemetery Fund is projecting an operating structural deficit of approximately $0.2million to $0.6 million annually during the forecast period.  The implementation of the green burial program has not realized the anticipated growth in the fund.  The fund required a General Fund loan at the end of FY2016-17 and is projected to require General Fund loans throughout the forecast period.  Staff is assessing operations to provide a long term plan for the Cemetery Fund.', 'The Pier Fund is not able to sustain an adequate balance to cover both its operating costs and large capital expenditures.  Capital needs that are unable to be funded by the Pier Fund during the forecast period must compete with General Fund-supported capital needs.', 'FY 2017-18 Midyear Budget Adjustments', 'At midyear, staff recommends revenue budget changes based on actual performance and new information, and proposes adjustments to the expenditure budget as necessary to most effectively maintain operations.', 'Revenue Adjustments – General Fund', 'Recommended revenue adjustments to the FY 2017-18 budget result in a net increase of $9.4 million.  However, only $1.4 million of the net increase is expected to be ongoing. Significant increases include:', '· $3.1 million in Transient Occupancy Taxes', '· $1.3 million in Documentary Transfer Taxes', '· $1.5 million from Building & Safety/Planning fees', '· $1.0 million in Business License Taxes', '· $0.9 million in Interest Earnings', '· $8.0 million pay down from Gillette settlement (one-time)', 'Significant decreases include:', '· -$3.9 million in parking related revenues', '· -$1.1 million in Sales Taxes', '· -$0.9 million in Transaction and Use taxes', '· -$0.5 million in Other Fees/Charges', 'Revenue Adjustments – Other Funds', 'Significant revenue adjustments in other funds include:', '· Housing Authority Fund (12) – decrease of $1.9 million in Section 8 Housing Assistance Program revenues.  An explanation is shown in the expenditure section below.', '· Community Development Block Grant (19) – increase of $1.2 million primarily reflects changes in timeline for certain projects.', '· Pier Fund (30) – increase of $0.8 million reflecting actual Pier tenant rentals and vendor rents.', '· Local Return (45) – increase of $1.1 million to reflect the first annual allotment of Measure M Local Return funds.', '· Parking Authority (77) – increase of $0.7 million to reflect interest on promissory note repayments from the Successor Agency.', 'A full listing of revenue adjustments is included in Attachment A.', 'Operating Expenditure Adjustments – General Fund', 'FY 2017-18 proposed General Fund operating expenditure appropriations result in a decrease of $2.6 million.  Significant appropriations include:', '· $3 million decrease to reflect PERS pay down savings.', '· $2.4 million addition to reflect first year debt service payment for the City Services Building.  Future year debt service payments will be paid from the CIP allocation.  Due to timing, first year payment would adversely impact projects already underway.', '· $1.7 million decrease to reflect health insurance savings due to negotiated one-year maintenance of premium rates.', '· $0.7 million decrease to reflect lower than anticipated Measure Y and GSH Transaction and Use Tax funds to the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District and Measure GSH funds for the affordable housing program.  This is a direct result of the flattening of sales and use and transaction and use tax revenue.', '· $0.5 million decrease to adjust the portion of Parking Structure 7 and 8 revenues paid to Macerich as a result of lower than anticipated parking revenues.', '· $1.5 million increase to appropriate prior year savings previously set aside in reserves to pay for the defeasement of the 2009 Public Safety Facility lease revenue bond.', 'In addition, funds of $1 million are recommended to be set aside to fully-fund the construction of the Civic Center Field, increasing the funding set aside for design and construction to $8 million (anticipated total project budget).', 'Operating Expenditure Adjustments – Other Funds', 'FY 2017-18 proposed midyear appropriations include a net $2.2 million decrease in other funds. Significant changes reflected in the request include the following:', '· Other funds will decrease by $2.1 million to reflect health insurance savings ($1.1million) and PERS paydown savings ($1 million).', '· In the Housing Authority Fund, a $1.9 million decrease to reflect reduction in Section 8 program expenditures.  Voucher issuance and voucher utilization rates are lower than anticipated due to highly competitive market rental rates available to voucher-holders;', '· In the Wastewater Fund, a $2 million decrease to correct the budgeted amount for amalgamated system sewerage charge, based on updated information.', '· In the Special Revenue Source Fund, a net $0.6 million increase to the budget resulting from a decrease in an interfund transfer in (shown as a budget credit) to reflect lower than anticipated GSH funds set aside for the affordable housing program ($0.2 million) and to reflect transfer of Lantana development agreement funds to the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District for costs associated with construction of playground facilities at the Edison Language Academy ($0.4 million).', '· In the Airport Fund, a $0.8 million increase for additional lease brokerage and property management services, reflecting the substantial number of properties now under the management of the Airport Division due to the elimination of master leasehold agreements.', 'Personnel Changes', 'This report includes staffing adjustments to reflect ongoing operational changes and the results of classification and compensation studies.  A Salary Resolution detailing new classifications and salary rates is reflected in Attachment B.  Staffing adjustments are detailed in Attachment C.  These changes result in no net increase of Full-Time Equivalent (FTE) employees.  Together, position changes result in a net decrease of $0.01 million – an increase of $0.02 million in the General Fund and a decrease of $0.03 million in the other funds.  Changes reflecting reorganizations to accommodate changing needs include the replacement of the vacant Transit Community and Government Engagement Manager position with a Strategic Transit Planner in the Big Blue Bus Department (a net budget decrease of $30,000), and the replacement of a vacant Human Resources Assistant position with a Senior Human Resources Analyst in Human Resources (a net increase of $22,000).', 'Capital Improvement Program Budget Adjustments', 'The midyear changes to the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget are largely grant funded appropriations and budget adjustments to enterprise fund projects that result in a total net increase to the CIP budget of approximately $0.9 million.  The changes include three key projects that can advance as a result of available grant resources.  Budget changes are detailed in Attachment A, and the most significant changes are summarized below.', 'Metro Grant Funds', 'On September 26, 2013, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Authority (MTA) notified the City of its successful grant application for the Citywide Signal Detection project. Funding for this project was projected to be available in FY 2018-19; however, MTA has notified the City of the availability of funding for FY 2017-18. Staff recommends expediting the timeline for this project and allocating the $540,480 of Metro grant funds and $135,120 of TDA Article III local match funds, which are also available now, in FY2017-18.', 'Caltrans Safe Routes to School Grant', 'The City was awarded funding for an Edison Safe Routes to School project in 2012 to design and construct curb extensions, dual curb ramps and pavement striping in the vicinity of Edison Language Academy.  In September 2017, City staff was awarded additional funding in the amount of $200,852 from Caltrans and recommends appropriation of those funds to the Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School project at this time.  The required localmatch of $48,135 is fundedby the Pedestrian Action Plan Implementation CIP project and isbudgeted in the FY2017‑18 CIP Budget.', 'Caltrans Sustainable Communities Planning Grant Program', 'The Caltrans Sustainable Communities Planning Grant Program is a competitive grant program that provides funding for transportation and land use planning projects to reduce transportation-related GHG emissions.  On October 20, 2017, staff submitted an application for a Wilshire Boulevard Safety Enhancement Study to evaluate collisions and identify targeted safety enhancements along the Wilshire Boulevard Corridor.  The application was prepared based on priorities of the City Council, adopted plans and programs.  On December15,2017, the City was awarded $450,000 in grant funds.  Staff is requesting authorization to accept the grant funds and budget the required local match of $60,000 from Transportation Impact Fees (TIF) revenues, for a total project cost of $510,000.', 'Other CIP budget increases include augmenting the budget for several existing projects which include the following projects:', '· Irrigation Control Replacement project funded by water demand mitigation fee revenues for water conservation measures;', '· Auto Meter Reading Pilot project to fund software costs of expanding the program, funded by the Water fund;', '· Computer Equipment Replacement Program to purchase replacement network switches and security enhancement solutions, funded by the Computer Equipment Replacement Fund;', '· Pier Carousel ADA Upgrades project that will implement required improvements, funded by the Pier Fund; and the 4th Court Bike Connection project to implement the construction phase, funded by the Special Revenue Fund.', 'Included is a budget reduction to the Hyperion Capital Payment project which funds payment to the City of Los Angeles Bureau of Los Sanitation due to savings as a result of recalculated charges based on actual sewer flows and a reconciliation credit back to the City.', 'Acceptance of Grants', 'Caltrans Safe Routes to School Grant', 'As mentioned above, in September 2017, City staff was awarded additional funding in the amount of $200,852 from Caltrans.  Staff is requesting authorization to accept the additional grant funds from Caltrans.', 'Caltrans Sustainable Communities Planning Grant Program', 'As mentioned above, on December15,2017, the City was awarded $450,000 in grant funds.  Staff is requesting that Council adopt a resolution authorizing the City Manager to accept the grant funds from Caltrans.', 'State of California Library Grant', 'Santa Monica Public Library was awarded a Libraries Illuminated grant of $28,595 to support the purchase of cutting-edge technology that helps libraries provide innovative services and programming that fulfills the potential of their broadband connections.  The goal is to use these technologies to design unique learner-centered experiences – 3Ddesign workshops that support personal application of iterative design processes, virtual reality experiences that stimulate creative self-reflection, and family technology challenges to develop critical thinking and promote family-togetherness.  The grant is supported by the California Library Services Board and funds are managed through the Southern California Library Cooperative.  Staff is requesting authorization to accept the grant funds from the State of California.', 'Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnership Act (HOME) Program', 'To receive federal Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnership Act (HOME) Program grant funds, the City must prepare and submit a Council-approved One-Year Action Plan to HUD by May 15, 2018.  The Action Plan outlines how the funds will be expended and confirms that the funded activities are consistent with the City’s Five-Year Consolidated Plan adopted by Council on May12,2015.  The City must hold two public hearings prior to the adoption of a One‑Year Action Plan allocating federal CDBG and HOME Program funds.  This public hearing will satisfy one of the two meeting requirements to receive public input and recommendations for the Proposed FY 2018-19 Action Plan.  The City will hold another public hearing prior to the adoption of the Proposed FY 2018-19 Action Plan.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Recommended FY 2017-18 midyear budget adjustments result in a $11.8 million, or a 1.7% increase over the citywide revenue budget, and expenditure adjustments result in a net $4.9 million or a 0.8% decrease over the citywide expenditure budget.  Details for FY2017‑19 midyear adjustments are in Attachment A.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2740'}, {'Title': 'Future of COAST Open Streets Festival', 'Department': 'Community & Cultural Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council review and comment on the future of COAST and direct staff to proceed with the following proposal to:1. Present the COAST Open Streets event annually through 2020, as an evolution of the Santa Monica Festival and the City’s signature event 2. Hold future COAST open streets events in the samelocation and 2-mile route asthe 2016 and 2017 events(i.e.,Ocean Ave.from WilshireBlvd.to ColoradoAve.,Colorado Ave.betweenOcean Ave. and5thSt.,Main St.fromColorado Ave.toMarineSt.).3. Evaluate the event at the five-year mark (2020) for continuance and location. This evaluation will be informed by the updated Cultural Plan for the City, which will assess strategies for citywide events.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', "COAST is a distinctly Santa Monica community celebration thatuses art to transformtwo miles of city streets into a fun, car-free experience that empowers people to take action against climate change, embrace a pro-planet lifestyle and experience thecity on foot and bicycle.The event reinforces the City's commitment to sustainability, the arts, and mobility.", 'COAST began in June 2016, when the City initiated a new open streets event to celebratethe opening of the Expo Lineand Colorado Esplanade and give the community new ways to experience the city and its streets. Over 50,000 attendees participated in the event’s first year.', "In 2016 COAST took the place of the Santa Monica Festival (SMF) which is usually held in early May. Instead, an Expo opening ceremony and station celebrations were held in late May 2016. The open streets event followed a few weeks later in early June 2016. Many elements of the SMF were integrated into the first COAST, such as educational elements, experiences and hands-on activities that reinforced the City's commitment to sustainability, the arts and mobility.", 'The similar and overlapping event goals, components, partnering departments and staff for the SMF and COAST would have made production of both events in 2017 duplicative. Due to its success, popularity, and alignment with the City’s Strategic Goals, COAST was repeated in 2017 and the SMF was not held. Additional SMF components were included in COAST in 2017, including a performance stage and community resource booths.', 'After two years of presenting COAST, staff evaluated both the SMF and COAST through the lens of the City’s Budget Framework for a Sustainable City of Wellbeing; the City’s Strategic Goals; the policies of the Bike and Pedestrian Action Plans and the City’s Cultural Plan. Staff believes that COAST furthers the City’s desired outcomes, goals, and policies beyond the SMF’s impact and is a new model of civic participation in the arts, sustainability, and mobility. Therefore, staff recommends Council adopt COAST as the City’s new signature event, with the same route through 2020, as an evolution of the SMF. An evaluation of COAST at the five-year mark (2020) would look at its future frequency and location. This evaluation would be informed by the vision for citywide events and creative experiences that will be detailed in the next iteration of the City’s Cultural Plan. Some\u202ffunds\u202fhave been secured\u202ffor each year through 2020,\u202fbut\u202fan annual funding gap remains.\u202fStaff anticipates closing that gap by securing new ongoing funding sources.', 'Background', 'The City presented the SMF annually for 24 years, from 1991 until 2015. The SMF started on the Santa Monica Pier and moved to Clover Park in 1994. Over the years, the SMF evolved into a celebration of the community’s commitment to the arts, culture and the environment and became the City’s signature event. Through the performing and visual arts, workshops, food and a range of family activities, the SMF honored the cultural richness of Santa Monica as well as the environmental practices that sustain it. The SMF was a partnership between the Cultural Affairs Division of the Community and Cultural Services Department and the Office of Sustainability and the Environment and was produced by Community Arts Resources (CARS), in collaboration with city staff.', 'On May 20, 2016, the second phase of the Expo Metro Line, which connected Santa Monica with Downtown Los Angeles opened. Santa Monica’s first COAST open streets event was held on Sunday, June 5, 2016 from 9 am – 3 pm, as the hallmark community celebration of the opening of the Expo Light Rail and Colorado Esplanade. Given the timing of the Metro opening ceremony and station celebrations in late May, COAST in early June, and limited staff and financial resources, the SMF, which normally tookplacein May or June,was cancelled that year (Attachment A).', 'COAST planning was led by an interdepartmental team consisting of staff from the Cultural Affairs Division, Mobility Division, Office of Sustainability and the Environment,and the Office of Communications. Through the bid process, staff designated and hired the event production team Community Arts Resources (CARS) to produce both 2016 and 2017 events. Staff from nearly all City departments contributed to making the event happen, including 193 staff members who worked the day of the event.', 'The event gave pedestrians and bicyclists access to twomiles of car-free city streets, running the length of Ocean Ave. and Main St. between Wilshire Blvd. and Marine St.. Artists and performers along the route created opportunities to enjoy music, dance and visual art. COAST featured thematic hubs that engaged thousands of people in activities and discussions around mobility, art, sustainability and current issues such as the Downtown Community Plan.', 'An estimated 50,000 participants attended COAST 2016. The total cost of $354,000 was funded by multiple sources, including a grant from Metro, funds that had been allocated to the SMF in prior years from the Cultural Affairs Division and Office of Sustainability and the Environment, and funds from the Office of Communications.', 'Following COAST 2016, staff solicited feedback. Enthusiastic responses from people who participated in the event were received, noting how satisfying it was to walk and bike freely in the middle of Santa Monica streets. Because the overall response to the event was so positive, and so many requests to repeat it were received, an interdepartmental staff committee evaluated the feasibility of continuing COAST. Staff reviewed the City’s existing calendar, community participant and stakeholder feedback, available staff and financial resources, the overall impact of the event and the City’s current goals, as well as the resources required to support other city-produced events.', 'As a result of the evaluation, as outlined in the Coast Open Streets Festival 2017 Information Item (Attachment B), staff concluded that combining the SMF and COAST in 2016 created efficiencies for the staff, budget and community resources needed for both events. In 2017 COAST was held a second time providing an opportunity to fine tune the event by addressing some of the issues that were identified during the first COAST.', 'While the first COAST was held in June to coincide with the arrival of the Expo Line, the business community, particularly those along the COASTroute, indicated a preference for fall, since the summer is already a busy time. City staff adjusted accordingly. The second open streets event was held on Sunday, October 1, 2017. The hours for the 2017 event were also adjusted to respond to the flow of attendees in 2016; there was lighter attendance in the morning and higher attendance in the afternoon. The 2017 event was held from 10 am – 4 pm, instead of from 9 am – 3 pm.', 'COAST 2017 had an estimated 40,000 participants and cost $390,000. The $36,000 costincreasefrom 2016was due to the addition of a stage and booths for community organizations, as well as enhanced activities on the OceanAvenueportion of the route. The event was fundedwith$150,000 of Pedestrian Action Plan implementation funds,grant funds fromNational Endowment for the Arts, support from partner organizations focused on activating Ocean Avenue, and funds usually allocated for the SMF.', 'The second iteration of COAST built on lessons learned from the first year including making the Ocean Avenue leg, which had been lightly attended in 2016, more dynamic and engaging with a stage, picnic tables and interactiveart experiences outside of the Camera Obscura Art Lab in Palisades Park.The stage and community and City resource booths reflected elements of the SMF and were added in lieu of hosting both events.', 'During Council’s March 28, 2017 consideration of a contractual services agreement with Community Arts Resources (CARS) to produce COAST 2017, Council asked staff to return for a discussion on the future of the SMF and COAST. The timing of this report allows staff enough time to produce either event in 2018, based on Council direction.', 'Discussion', 'The purpose of COAST is to be a distinctly Santa Monica community celebration thatuses art to transformtwo miles of city streets into a fun, car-free experience that empowers people to take action against climate change, embrace a pro-planet lifestyle and experience thecity on foot and bicycle.', 'Many of the City’s key priorities are in direct alignment with COAST, as articulated in the City’s Budget Framework for A Sustainable City of Wellbeing, the City’s Strategic Goals, the Bike Action Plan, the Pedestrian Action Plan, and the City’s Cultural Plan, Creative Capital.', 'COAST intersects with all six of the outcome areas within the budget framework for A Sustainable City of Wellbeing. Theevent:', '· Engages and connects the Community through free, interactive elements and creates a safe space for everyone;', '· Encouragesawareness and action through inspiring hands-on experiences directly related to taking care of our PlaceandPlanet;', '· IntegratesLearning opportunities asa part of the COAST experience, includingtours and art and bike workshops;', '· Offers a safe and fun way for the community to experience biking and walking,whichimprovesHealth;', '· Allows attendees to exploreDowntownand Main Streetstoresand restaurants,and encourages spending locally,supporting Economic Opportunity;and', '· Allowsattendees, whether residents or not,toexperience the City and interact with approximately 200 staff, City Council and Commissioners in a different way, giving them firsthand experience of the City’s values and therefore its Governance.', 'COAST also meets three of the City’s Strategic Goals. Through its Mobility Strategic Goal, Santa Monica is actively working to encourage mobility options in support of walking and biking, enabling residents to get around comfortably without depending on their cars. Inspiring people to enjoy and support Santa Monica’s uniquely walkable andbikeableenvironment is a foundation of the target to increase active transportation, transit and shared rides inthe new model of mobility. This vision includes enjoyable events wherecommunity members can gatherandsocialize in our shared streets like they did during COAST.', 'Santa Monica’s Bike Action Plan and Pedestrian Action Plan discuss open streets events as “signature encouragement” programs.', 'Encouragement programs complement education, enforcement and new physical improvements like enhanced crosswalks, bikeways and protected facilities to make getting around on foot and bicycle in Santa Monica comfortable, convenient, safe and attractive.Openstreets eventsdraw participants into experiences of walking and biking that help them gain confidence and comfort using these modes.Research from across the US shows that open streets events engage a more diverse population in active transportation than other efforts.', 'In addition to advancing new models of mobility by recasting streets for walking and biking, the event supports local businesses and offers hands-on educational and cultural programming designed for people of all ages. These activities further the City’s goals of creating an Inclusive and Diverse Community and one where people Learn and Thrive.', 'COAST also meets a key goal of the City’s Cultural Plan, Creative Capital, to "develop major new arts and cultural festivals, to celebrate and explore Santa Monica\'s innovative cultural identity and address the community\'s desire for more festivals." The event is a celebration unique to Santa Monica which demonstrates the City’s commitment to art, mobility and preserving our planet.', 'Staff Recommendations', 'Presenting COAST as the City’s Signature EventStaff recommends presenting COAST as the City’s signature annual event through 2020. City goals have evolved since the inception of the SMF. In addition, audience participation trends show that, increasingly, people want to attend events that provide unique experiences they cannot readily find elsewhere. Although both COAST and the SMF are community focused and encourage people to participate locally in an active environment that is both fun and educational,COAST is more in alignment with the City’s current goals, while providing a unique way to experience Santa Monica. Open streets events didn’t exist when the SMF started. These events are now a key and recognized way to engage the community in trying new modes of mobility with success. Of the 157 COAST 2017 attendee surveys, 54% said how they choose to get around might change based on their participation in COAST, and 83% said they feel more comfortable cycling, walking or using Metro, Expo or Big Blue Bus after attending an event like COAST.', 'The City produces or co-produces over 30 events throughout the city annually. Combining the SMF and COAST in 2016 and 2017 created efficiencies in the staff, budget and community resources needed for both events. Staff believes that this single event done exceptionally well provides broader community engagement and community-building opportunities in a much more effective manner. COAST is an evolution of the SMF that is reflective of the City’s current priorities and contributes to achieving desired goals.', 'Participant reviews and utilization statistics reinforce that COAST had a greater benefit and impact than the SMF. COAST offers a celebration that draws a broader audience and a higher percentage of residents than the SMF.Attendance at COAST is roughly four times that of the SMF with COASTestimatesat 50,000 in 2016 and 40,000 in 2017. Attendance at the SMF was estimated at 12,000 in 2014 and 13,500 in 2015. While there is a perception that the SMF draws more Santa Monica residents than COAST, event surveys show otherwise. Based on SMF attendee surveys from 2014and 2015, 37% of attendees (5,002 people) were residents compared with 50% for COAST 2017 (20,000). Although the cost of COAST is greater than the cost of the SMF, it serves more people, has a bigger footprint, offers expanded opportunities for civic engagement, and promotes a range of cultural experiences, sustainability education, and mobility options.', 'Responses from the COAST 2017 attendee survey also highlight the event’s success in meeting its objectives,such as inspiring people to experience Santa Monica’s uniquely walkable andbikeableenvironment,increasing active transportation,and bringing the community together and creating more of a sense of connection.Overwhelmingly (94%), survey respondents indicated that they “perceived COAST as improving Santa Monica.”', 'Attendees elaborated further, writing that COAST improves Santa Monicaby:', '· Building community, promoting sustainable transport', '· Feelingmore connected to the city and my neighbors', '· Bringingthe community together, great for families, promotes active living', '· Gettingto meet potential new merchants &city personnel', '· Making biking and walking part of a lifestyle option possible', '· Engaging more directly with City of Santa Monica – awareness and experiences', '· Spreading awareness about different transportation methods, environmental/sustainability concerns, resources for the community & energy', '· Encouragingpeople to spend quality time together while exercising anddecreasing theircarbon footprint', 'Although the SMF had a unique sense of community and offered opportunities for residents to connect with City staff and learn about City resources, these meaningful and valuable experiences occur throughout the year, in multiple locations. Community organizations and city services are well represented at various annual City produced events, including: the Arts & Literacy Festival; the Climate Fest; National Night Out; the Buy Local Health & Fitness Festival, and the Fall Festival.Community-building also happens at the new Meet Me at Reed cultural programs, Jazz on the Lawn, and year-round programming at Virginia Avenue Park.', "Oneprized aspect of both COAST and the SMF is the ability to interact with City Council members and leaders. Given COAST's large footprint, staff has been working to explore ways to provide meaningful interaction between attendees and City elected officials and leaders. Staff will continue to refine this element and develop new ways to facilitate this engagement, such as riding a “multi-person bike” (Attachment C) with a City Council member and other fun and interactive activities.", 'Holding COAST Annually Through 2020', 'Since it can take a few yearsof iterativeadjustmentsand refinements to find the right balance of programming for an event, staff recommends that COAST be held annually through 2020. Staff also recommends thata reviewbe implementedafter the fifth year of COAST toevaluate its future frequency and location. This evaluation will be informed by the vision for citywide events and community-building experiences that will be detailed in the next iteration of the City’s Cultural Plan.', 'The Contractual Services Agreement with Community Arts Resources (CARS) for COAST Open Streets Festival Production for 2017 has an option to extend. If Council approves moving forward with COAST, staff would extend the contract for the production of COAST 2018.', 'Proposed COAST Route Through 2020', 'Staff recommends keeping the same location and route through 2020.  Holding the event in the same location allows attendees to get familiar with the area, route andexperience. The current COAST route is exceptionally community-oriented and is a shared space.The routehas the infrastructure to support the event, including parking and City facilities. COAST also engages Main Street’smany communitydestinations such as the Farmers Market, Ocean Park branch library, community garden and parklets. The route showcases many of the City’sdestinations, including the Civic Center, Pier, Palisades Park and downtown Santa Monica.', 'Staff considered shortening the two-mile route by removing Ocean Avenue or Main Street in order to concentrate activities and reduce the budget and production needs. However, reducing the footprint would make it more of a street festival and less of a car-free experience. The current route and length arepart ofthe requirements for Metro’s $149,000 grant to support COAST 2018. These include providing opportunities for people to ride transit, walk or ride a bike possibly for the first time; for civic engagement to foster understanding and support for walking and biking infrastructure at the local level; and opportunities for people to see that biking and walking is good for business, and community health. According to Metro, of allof the open streets events that they fund, Santa Monica’s is one of the most successful. It also happens to be the shortest. During the planning phases of both COAST 2016 and 2017 staff were deliberate that this event be unique to Santa Monica, reflect its priorities and showcase its landmarks and businesses. Shortening the route would no longer meet event goals or Metro’s grantgoals. Further, shortening the route would weaken the connection to the City’s Mobility Strategic Goal.', 'Re-Envision Community Involvement', 'To incorporate elements and involvement from past participants of the SMF, COAST 2017 introduced booth spaces for community organizations and city services. The addition of these booths provednot to be the most effective way to reach the public. The booth model was one of the more passive elements of a highly interactive event. It took away fromanddiminished the mobility, sustainability and art focus of the event and ultimately impacted the energy and flow of the event. The booth element also impacted allocation of resources related to cost as well as set up and tear down.', 'In future COAST events, staff would strive to re-envision community involvement that is not tied to stationary booths but inclusion that encourages engagement along the route such as a decorated bike parade, interactive games, and program integrated activities. This would allow city staff, community organizations and civic leaders to volunteer andshare information about services and programs and build relationships and new connections in a fun, and organic way.', 'Alternatives', 'Alternating COAST and the Santa Monica Festival', 'One option staff considered was alternating COAST and the SMF every other year. With this approach, the events may lose the attendee momentumand event awareness,thusnegatively impacting attendance. Annual events build from year to year without the challenge of starting again, can be quickly iterated and improved, and become anticipated traditions. People come to know what to expectand when to expect it. It is for these reasons that staff does not recommend alternating years for COAST and the SMF.', 'Changing the Route', 'Staff also explored the idea of changing the route for COAST. Staff recognizes that changing the route could engage new communities, create cross-neighborhood connections and invigorate and highlight different neighborhoods. However there are significant downsides, especially for such a new event. Each move requires a new traffic management and outreach plan, which means more time, money,staff resources,and complications. A move also means needing to establish new relationships with the businesses and residents along the route. Efficiencies of building on what works at a specific site isdiminished. Also, if the new location isn’t along the train route, the connection to public transportation is lost.Therefore staff recommends COAST have five years to establish its footing on the existing route before considering changing the route.', 'Holding the Santa Monica Festival Annually', 'Reverting to the SMF would mean returning to a familiar event held each May in Clover Park. Based on the experience with past Santa Monica Festivals, staff anticipates this model of event would continue to draw a smaller audience with fewer residents than COAST.  While less expensive to produce, there would also be less business engagement and less of the city itself being showcased. The SMF is limited by its location and scale. Its location is also not as convenient using public transportation as COAST. Main St. and Ocean Ave. are more of a communal, shared space and are welcoming to a broader cross section of people. COAST includes a platform for people to experience mobility and streets in a new way, discover businesses, enjoy a cultural event and the City’s iconic landmarks and vistas.', 'Holding Both COAST and the Santa Monica Festival Annually', 'Staff sees COAST as an evolution of SMF, not a replacement for it. There is a fair amount of overlap in terms of messaging and reach between the two events. The events take the same amount of time and staff time to produce, but COAST gets a broader draw. Since many of the staff and funding sources are shared for both events, in order to be able to sustain both with current resources, the level of engagement and planning would need to be spread among the two events, likely decreasing the total resources available for each.', 'Another option is to allocate enough funds for the full production of two signature events and designate different staff to lead each one. Since each event requires about six months to produce, has the same staff leads and the same production team, it would be essential to spread the events out, identify different staff leads, and potentially a new event production team. The City may need to look at reducing the amount of smaller citywide events in order to present two signature events. As it is, the City has a full annual event calendar including the Arts & Literacy Festival, the Climate Fest, National Night Out, the Buy Local Health & Fitness Festival, and the Fall Festival, in addition to the new Meet Me at Reed cultural programs, Jazz on the Lawn, Dia de los Muertos, the Airport ArtWalk and year-round events at Virginia Avenue Park.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'COAST 2016 and 2017 were funded by both general fund dollars and outside sources, including grants and partnership funding, which provided a necessary and substantial amount of the event funding. Funding for 2018 would follow the same model. The budgeted amount for COAST 2017 was $400,000. The actual event cost was $393,000. For 2018, staff has determined that a budgeted minimum of $415,000 (with a target amount of $450,000 if additional outside funding can be secured) is necessary to produce a community-wide event of this scale, allowing the event to grow, activate more of the route with programming and allow for cost fluctuations.', 'As outlined in the document\u202fCOAST Funding\u202f2016 – 2020 (Attachment D), funds\u202fhave been secured\u202ffor each year through 2020\u202fbut\u202fa gap in funding\u202fremains for each year, ranging from\u202f$101,000 in 2018\u202fto $250,000 for 2019 and\u202f2020.\u202f The City general fund dollars will continue to be $165,000 annually. Outside sources of funding that are expected to continue are provided by in-kind matches of services from multiple departments, grants, and partnership funding. New funding sources will also be explored and may include Measure R and Measure M Local Returns, fundraising through the Santa Monica Arts Foundation and grants. The COAST Funding 2016 – 2020 (Attachment D) does not include these anticipated outside sources of funding.', 'The increase in budget from the $400,000 in 2017 to $415,000 for 2018 would allow for necessary adjustments to grow the event programming such as adding more interactive installations and performers targeting areas of the route that were more sparsely populated, and to respond to stakeholder and attendee suggestions for improvement. This budget also allows for Consumer Price Index (CPI) increases and a possible increase in safety costs.', 'Once staff has direction from Council to move forward with COAST, staff will work to secure sustainable funds through 2020. While there are financial impacts to producing COAST as presented with this report, there is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2800'}], [{'Title': 'Establishment of Preferential Parking Zone OO on portions of Centinela Avenue, Franklin Street, Berkeley Street, Stanford Street, Yale Street, Harvard Street, Princeton Street, Lipton Avenue, and Montana Avenue, and adoption of a Resolution establishing Preferential Parking Regulations.', 'Department': 'Mobility (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '11. Resolutions', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Establish Preferential Parking Zone OO to include:· Centinela Avenue and Franklin Street between Lipton Avenue and the north City limit, · Berkeley Street between Lipton Avenue and Stanford Street, · Stanford Street between Lipton and Montana Avenues, · Yale, Harvard, and Princeton streets between Washington and Montana Avenues,· Lipton Avenue between Stanford Street and Centinela Avenue, and · Montana Avenue between 26th and Stanford streets. The parking regulations on these streets shall be: “Two hour parking 9 A.M. to 6 P.M., daily, except by permit.”Approve the attached Resolution (Attachment D) establishing Preferential Parking.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Residents of two blocks of Lipton Avenue between Stanford and Franklin streets have submitted qualifying petitions requesting creation of a new preferential parking zone. The residents assert that non-resident parking is impacting their ability to find parking near their homes. As installing preferential parking regulations on individual blocks has the possibility of spillover impacts on the surrounding area, community meetings were held to consider preferential parking for the entire neighborhood. Parking studies conducted in the area in October 2015 and September 2017 confirm that street parking on non-permitted streets in the area have high to moderate usage during daytime hours with the highest usage on streets near Wilshire Boulevard and Montana Avenue.', 'Staff recommends creating Preferential Parking Zone OO, approving preferential parking regulations for the following blocks:', '· Centinela Avenue and Franklin Street between Lipton Avenue and the north City limit,', '· Berkeley Street between Lipton Avenue and Stanford Street,', '· Stanford Street between Lipton and Montana avenues,', '· Yale, Harvard, and Princeton streets between Washington and Montana avenues,', '· Lipton Avenue between Stanford Street and Centinela Avenue, and', '· Montana Avenue between 26th and Stanford streets.', 'The parking regulations on these streets shall be “Two hour parking 9 A.M. to 6 P.M., daily, except by permit.”', 'Should Council approve the recommended action, it is estimated that permit sales for the 3000 and 3100 blocks of Lipton Avenue, the only two blocks that have completed a qualifying petition to date, would generate approximately $515 annually, which would offset, but not fully recover, the cost to the City of issuing permits to residents. Additionally, new signage would be required at an estimated one-time cost of $1600.', 'Background', 'Preferential parking is a tool the City uses to manage non-resident parking on residential streets, as authorized bySanta Monica Municipal Code Chapter 3.08and the California Vehicle Code. Preferential parking regulations manage the use of on-street parking to make parking more available for residents near their homes. Only residents who live on a block with preferential parking restrictions are eligible to purchase a permit. Permits may be used within two blocks of the permit holder’s address.', 'Residents may petition to initiate a preferential parking zone at any time. Upon receipt of a petition representing two-thirds of the residential units on a block, a parking occupancy study of the neighborhood is conducted and a community meeting is held. In evaluating petitions, staff typically evaluates the larger neighborhood, rather than an individual block, due to the potential for parking displacement when regulations are established or changed. As a result, staff typically recommends that the Council pre-approve preferential parking regulations for more than one block to streamline and expedite the process for adjacent blocks should some displacement occur. SMMC 3.08.030 provides Council with the authority to create preferential parking zones.', 'Once Council approves preferential parking regulations, they are implemented on the blocks that have submitted qualifying petitions. Preferential parking regulations are not implemented on blocks that have been pre-approved by the Council until the time that the residents of those blocks submit qualifying petitions representing two-thirds of the residential units on the block.', 'Discussion', 'The residents of Lipton Avenue between Stanford and Franklin streets have submitted complete petitions requesting creation of a new preferential parking zone. The existing preferential parking regulations in the area were approved at various times in the City’s history, with the earliest zone dating back to 1986, and are not consistent from block to block. In general, the surrounding area includes different iterations of the preferential parking regulation type: “Two hour parking, except with permit.” The surrounding preferential parking regulations are:', '· Zone LL (to the south of Lipton Avenue)', 'o “Two hour parking 9 A.M. – 6 P.M. Monday to Saturday, except by permit,”', '· Zone YY (Washington Avenue and to the south of Washington Avenue)', 'o “Two hour parking 9 A.M. – 10 P.M., daily, except by permit,”', '· Zone QQ (Washington Avenue and to the south of Washington Avenue)', 'o “Two hour parking 9 A.M. – 6 P.M., Monday to Friday, except by permit,”', '· Zone BB (Yale Street south of Washington Avenue)', 'o “One hour parking 9 A.M. – 6 P.M., Monday to Friday, except by permit,”', '· Zone TT (26th Street between Montana and Washington avenues)', 'o “Two hour parking 9 A.M. – 10 P.M., daily, except by permit,” and', '· Zone D (Stanford Street south of Lipton Avenue)', 'o “No parking all day Saturday and Sunday, No parking 9 P.M. – 2 A.M. Monday to Friday, two hour parking 9 A.M. – 6 P.M. Monday to Friday, except by permit.”', 'The existing area regulations and petition blocks are shown in Attachment Existing parking regulations and petition blocks map.', 'Parking demand in the area is high due to its proximity to the Wilshire Boulevard business district. An on-street parking occupancy survey for the Northeast Neighborhood area was conducted in October 2015 for both weekend and weekday time periods from 7 A.M. to 10 P.M. Due to staff turnover, there was a delay in moving forward with the initial parking study results. To confirm that the data from the study was still representative of parking usage in the area, staff conducted a follow-up study in May 2017. Based on input from residents and the Northeast Neighbors Neighborhood Organization, the area under consideration for preferential parking was subsequently expanded to include the remaining streets west of Stanford Street and east of 26th Street without preferential parking. To analyze this new area, an additional parking study was conducted in September 2017. To evaluate the effectiveness of existing regulations, the streets between Wilshire Boulevard and Lipton Avenue which currently have preferential parking regulations were included in this study. A summary of the data is included as Attachment Parking occupancy data. The following were the key findings of the studies.', '· Street parking usage was consistently higher during the weekday period with the highest parking usage overall occurring during the time period 9 A.M. to 6 P.M. During this time period the street parking usage was moderately high in the range of 65% to 85% with the exception of Lipton Avenue.', '· Lipton Avenue had the highest parking occupancy in the area with street parking reaching 100% usage on weekdays during the midday. The Lipton Avenue blocks are about a quarter of the length of the other blocks in the area and comparatively have a smaller supply of on-street parking available. Unlike the other blocks, a change of two to three cars parking on one of the Lipton Avenue blocks would significantly change the respective block’s parking occupancy by 10-20%.', '· The evening and weekend periods typically had lower parking occupancies at or below 65%; there would be at least several spaces available on each block during this time period.', '· The study showed that the existing “Two hour parking 9 A.M. to 6 P.M. Monday to Saturday, except by permit” regulations on blocks near Wilshire Boulevard such as Centinela Avenue and Franklin Street were effective in maintaining a substantial amount of street parking for residents throughout the day.', 'Additionally, staff reviewed anticipated future development along Wilshire Boulevard to get an estimate of future on-street parking conditions and needs. The majority of anticipated new development would be along Wilshire Boulevard and is planned as fast casual food restaurants along with a marketplace. Both development types would be expected to generate the highest parking demand during the midday and early afternoon for the weekday and weekend. There is currently no proposal for the area that would include bars or other venues, which typically have peak parking demand in the evening. The parking data and review of proposed developments for Wilshire Boulevard indicates street parking demand is and would be in the future highest between the hours of 9 A.M. and 6 P.M. and that open street parking spaces are and would in the future be more consistently available during the evening period.', 'Community Input', 'Residents, businesses, property owners, and the neighborhood organization were notified of the proposed preferential parking zone by mail and invited to a July 17, 2017 community meeting at the Montana Branch Library to discuss preferential parking. At this meeting there was a request by residents and the Northeast Neighbors Community organization to consider additional nearby blocks west of Stanford Street and east of 26th Street for preferential parking. A follow-up meeting was held on November 13, 2017 to discuss inclusion of this new area. The main themes from the two meetings were:', '· general consensus from the community that street parking is an issue on some streets, particularly on streets closer to Wilshire Boulevard, with the majority of the attendees in support of preferential parking regulations that would allow two hour parking without a permit;', '· there were differing opinions on the appropriate time frame for preferential parking regulations; some residents thought Monday through Friday during the day would be appropriate while others thought regulations should be daily and extend into the evening;', '· residents expressed concern that new development on Wilshire Boulevard would increase non-resident use of street parking during the weekend and night and make it more difficult for residents to park; and', '· some residents expressed that on-street parking is not an issue and that they would prefer no preferential parking regulations.', 'A list of the comments received at the two meetings and in writing is included as Attachment Community comments.', 'Recommended Preferential Parking Regulations', 'The parking studies conducted in the area showed the highest parking usage between 9 A.M. and 6 P.M. Additionally, the parking study showed the existing regulations “Two hour parking 9 A.M. – 6 P.M. Monday to Saturday, except by permit” for blocks between Wilshire Boulevard and Lipton Avenue are effective in maintaining street parking spaces for residents throughout the day, and indicate that night time regulations are not necessary to maintain adequate street parking for residents. Based on this and to maintain consistency with surrounding regulations, the recommended preferential parking Zone OO would consist of the following blocks:', '· Centinela Avenue and Franklin Street between Lipton Avenue and the north City limit,', '· Berkeley Street between Lipton Avenue and Stanford Street,', '· Stanford Street between Lipton and Montana avenues,', '· Yale, Harvard, and Princeton streets between Washington and Montana avenues,', '· Lipton Avenue between Stanford Street and Centinela Avenue, and', '· Montana Avenue between 26th and Stanford streets.', 'The recommended regulations are “Two hour parking 9 A.M. to 6 P.M., daily, except by permit.” The recommendation is to apply the regulations daily as the surrounding area has a variety of existing preferential parking regulation time-periods Monday to Saturday, Monday to Friday, and daily. Daily is typically the easiest for residents and visitors to understand as it is consistent day to day, and residents cited increased weekend activity for both Saturday and Sunday.', 'For Montana Avenue, which straddles the border of Los Angeles and Santa Monica, Los Angeles residents living on the north side of the street would be eligible for parking permits similar to nearby Zone E on 26th Street. Additionally, Franklin Avenue becomes Bristol Avenue once it crosses the border between Los Angeles and Santa Monica. Preferential parking signage would not be installed on Bristol Avenue as it is controlled by Los Angeles, but to avoid area residents inadvertently getting parking tickets it is recommended that Los Angeles residents of Bristol Avenue be eligible for preferential permits. There is no clear demarcation, such as a cross street, when Franklin Street becomes Bristol Street. To a typical person Bristol Street and Franklin Street would appear to be the same street block. The Bristol Street segment is short with 12 single family residential parcels bordering the street.', 'Alternatives', 'The Council could maintain the existing conditions or adopt different hours and types of restrictions than those recommended.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The proposed project has been determined to be categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA), pursuant to Article 19, Section 15301 (c) which defines Class 1 exempt projects in the following way: “Class 1 consists of the operation, repair, maintenance, permitting, leasing, licensing, or minor alteration of existing public or private structures, facilities, mechanical equipment, or topographical features, involving negligible or no expansion of use beyond that existing at the time of the lead agency’s determination.” The exemption includes: “Existing highways and streets, sidewalks, gutters, bicycle and pedestrian trails, and similar facilities.” Preferential parking zones involve only the issuance of permits for the use of an existing public street and include negligible or no expansion of the existing use.', 'Next Steps', 'If preferential parking regulations are approved, regulations would be implemented on the 3000 and 3100 blocks of Lipton Avenue within approximately ten weeks. This allows time for residents to apply for permits, staff to process applications, signs to be ordered, manufactured, and installed, and a grace period between the installation of signs and the enforcement of preferential parking regulations. Additional blocks within the zone would have preferential parking implemented approximately ten weeks after receipt of a qualifying petition signed by residents representing two-thirds of the residential units of that block.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The approval of Preferential Parking Zone OO would generate $515 in ongoing revenues beginning FY 2017-18 from the sale of an estimated 19 new resident and visitor permits. Funds for the one-time cost related to the purchase of new signage for Preferential Parking Zone OO totaling $1600 are included in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department.'], 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2761'}], [{'Title': "Recommendation to accept Victor Davich's resignation from the Santa Monica Library Board and authorize the City Clerk to publish the vacancy.", 'Department': 'City Clerk 13-Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2875'}, {'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer and Councilmember McKeown that the Council allocate $19,000 of discretionary funds to Beautify Earth, a 501(c)(3) non-profit, to match funds aiding in the production of murals at three businesses in the Pico neighborhood and four Santa Monica public elementary schools, and for the establishment of “Civic Love,” a new beach trash cleanup and marketing campaign.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2884'}, {'Title': 'Request of Mayor Winterer and Mayor Pro Tem Davis that the Council allocate $10,000 of their discretionary funds as a matching grant to retain Bergamot Station’s City Garage, a facility crucial to our community’s long-term plans for a cultural campus at Bergamot, where City Garage has continued to struggle with a 2017 100% rent increase from the private entity holding the master lease.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2887'}, {'Title': 'Request of Councilmember O’Connor that the Council direct staff to notify owners and residents of properties located in the R1 Zone, by mailing, of the adoption of the Interim Ordinance changing the development standards in the R1 Zone and provide contact information and links to a website where residents can get more information and sign-up to be notified about future public hearings regarding the process and changes to the R1 development standards.', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '13. Councilmember Discussion Items', 'MeetingID': '1134', 'ID': '2891'}]]
[[{'Title': 'Award Construction Contracts for Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2429 to Sully-Miller Contracting Company, a California-based company, for construction services for the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project, an Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) grant-funded project (Grant No. XP-00T79601 and XP-96945401);2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Sully-Miller Contracting Company in an amount not to exceed $2,785,300 (including a 15% contingency);3. Award RFP #2429 to Willdan Engineering, a California-based company, for construction management and inspection services;4. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Willdan Engineering in an amount not to exceed $219,791 (including a 10% contingency);5. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'To maintain safe and reliable water delivery to Santa Monica homes and businesses, the Water Division routinely replaces the oldest water mains that are nearing the end of their useful lives. The Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project would replace approximately 4,755 linear feet of water distribution pipelines on Ocean Park Boulevard, 17th Street, Ocean Avenue, Ashland Avenue and Grant Street.  Staff identified the pipelines for replacement from a long-term replacement and maintenance plan based on service records, condition, capacity demands, and age.', 'On October 26, 2017, the City issued a Notice Inviting Bids for construction services. Staff recommends Sully-Miller Contracting Company as the best bidder for the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project for an amount not to exceed $2,785,300 (including a 15% contingency). Additionally, on November 2, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals for construction management and inspection services for this project. Staff recommends Willdan Engineering to provide construction management and inspection services for this project in an amount not to exceed $219,791 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Background', 'In 2006, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) awarded a $529,900 reimbursable grant (Grant Number XP-96945401) to the City of Santa Monica, with $460,700 in matching City funds for a total of $990,600.', 'On September 12, 2006, the City Council accepted the grant funds (Grant Number XP-96945401) from the EPA for the Santa Monica Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project (Attachment A).', 'In January 2012, the EPA awarded another grant to the City for the Santa Monica Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project (Grant Number XP-00T79601) which included $848,000 in reimbursable grant funding and $693,818 in local match funds for a total of $1,541,818', 'On June 14, 2016, the City accepted the grant funds (Grant Number XP-00T79601) for the Santa Monica Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project (Attachment B) and awarded a Professional Services Agreement to Cannon Corporation to provide engineering design services, develop construction documents and provide engineering support during the construction phase of the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project. The remaining balance of these grants in the amount of $965,803 will be used to offset some of the $3,005,091 in project costs. The table below summarizes the grant funds, local matches and the expenditures for each.', 'Grant Amount', 'Local Match Amount', 'Balance', 'Grant No. XP-96945401', '$529,900', '$460,700', '$990,600', 'Expenditure', '($412,097)', '($348,677)', '($760,774)', 'Grant No. XP-00T79601', '$848,000', '$693,818', '$1,541,818', 'Expenditure', '($0)', '($0)', '($0)', 'Remaining Balance', '$965,803', '$805,841', '$1,771,644', 'To date, the City has spent $348,677 of the $460,700 local match funds and $412,097 of the $529,900 Grant Fund Number XP-96945401. The remaining balances of the grant funds and local match funds for this grant are $117,803 and $112,023, respectively, and both of these balances were rolled over to fund the Water Infrastructure Reliability Project.', 'Both grants were made pursuant to the Federal Water Resources Development Act and titled Water Infrastructure – Santa Monica Reliability Improvement Project. Initially, the project comprised both a potable and recycled reservoir.', 'Discussion', 'The City operates and maintains a 205-mile (1,082,400 linear feet) network of water distribution mains with pipeline sizes ranging from 6 to 36 inches. The City’s water system serves over 93,000 residential and business customers, providing approximately 12 million gallons of water per day.', 'The water distribution system consists of transmission main lines, distribution main lines, service laterals, water meters, valves, and fire hydrants. Over time, the useful life of all these components diminish due to aging, soil conditions, and corrosion buildups. To ensure the continuous delivery of an adequate, high quality and reliable supply of water to customers, the City takes a proactive approach in identifying and replacing pipelines that are approaching the end of their useful lives. In 2011, the Water Resources Division developed the Five-Year Capital Improvement Program Business Case Evaluations Study Report to identify and prioritize the replacement of aged cast iron water mains (Attachment C). The study focused on the oldest cast iron pipe installations built prior to the 1970s. The study provides the estimated cost and likelihood of potential water main breaks while making recommendations to replace and upgrade the aged water mains throughout the city.', 'In July 2017, the City hired JD7 Technologies to conduct a video inspection and pipeline condition assessment for potable water mains while in service and under full pressure. JD7 Technologies performed the video inspection on pipeline segments identified by City staff in the Business Case Evaluation Study Report as potential candidates for replacement. This video inspection of pipeline condition assessment was a subsequent effort to confirm that the segments previously identified by City staff for replacement are indeed the most vulnerable pipelines in the system. Staff also reviewed maintenance records to identify the most problematic areas where unexpected low water pressure occurs.', 'Using the information gathered from the Business Case Evaluation Study Report, Video Inspection and Pipeline Condition Assessment Report, and the City’s maintenance records, staff selected the following segments for replacement and upgrades:', '· Ocean Park Boulevard - from 14th Street to 18th Street', '· 17th Street - from Pearl Street to Ocean Park Boulevard', '· Ocean Avenue - from Pico Boulevard to Bay Street', '· Ashland Avenue - from 3rd Street to 4th Street', '· Grant Street - from Lincoln Boulevard to 6th Street', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The project is statutorily exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 21080.21 of CEQA, which exempts pipelines of less than one mile. In addition, Section 15302 (Class 2 -Replacement/Reconstruction) of the CEQA Guidelines provides exemption for a class of projects involving the replacement/reconstruction of existing facilities, including the replacement of existing utility systems involving negligible or no expansion of capacity. The project would replace existing water mains that are aging and inadequate. Two of the new water mains will be moderately upsized, but would not represent a substantial increase in capacity. In addition, none of the exceptions specified in Section 15300.2 of CEQA Guidelines would apply that would preclude the use of this CEQA exemption – the project site is not located in a sensitive environment, the project will not have a significant effect on the environment, the project would not damage scenic resources, the project would not be located on a hazardous waste site, and the project would not cause a change to a historical resource.', 'California Coastal Commission De Minimis Waiver', 'On January 31, 2017, the California Coastal Commission issued a Notice of “Permit Exemption/No Permit Required” (Commission Reference Number: 5-17-0035-X), allowing for development of the project as described.', 'Contractor Selection – Construction', 'On October 26, 2017, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 67 vendors downloaded the bid and 3 bids were received and publicly opened on November 30, 2017. Bid results are as follows:', 'Bidder', 'Bid Amount', 'Sully-Miller Contracting Company', '$2,422,000', 'AMPCO Contracting, Inc.', '$2,493,525', 'Colich & Sons', '$3,248,175', 'Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff recommends Sully-Miller Contracting Company, the lowest bidder, as the best bidder based on price, quality of services offered and experience with similar projects. Sully-Miller Contracting Company provided four references for recently completed projects, and a number of ongoing projects. All references contacted reported that the work performed by Sully-Miller Contracting Company was completed in a timely and cost-effective manner while maintaining consistent quality. The Contractors State License Board also verified that the contractor and subcontractors’ licenses are current, active and in good standing.', 'Consultant Selection - Construction Management/Inspection', 'On November 2, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for construction management and inspection services for the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Forty firms downloaded the RFP. The following seven consulting firms submitted proposals: Berg & Associates Inc., CivilSource, GK & Associates, KOA Corporation, SA Associates, Wallace & Associates, and Willdan Engineering.', 'Responses to the RFP were evaluated by a selection panel of staff from the Civil Engineering Division. The EPA’s guidelines for professional services require that services agreement be awarded based on demonstrated competence and professional qualifications. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience, references, proposed project work plan, proposed project team, creativity, demonstrated technical competence and understanding of the project scope. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Willdan Engineering as the best qualified firm to provide construction management and inspection services, for an amount not to exceed $219,791 (including 10% contingency). Willdan Engineering demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with similar projects in the cities of Santa Monica, Downey and Pomona. Through past projects, Willdan Engineering also demonstrated its ability to offer experienced construction management and inspection teams that can conduct high quality construction management and inspection at competitive hourly rates.', 'Services provided by Willdan Engineering would include construction management, continuous inspection of the contractor’s work, verification and management of field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts resulting from construction activities, attending the contractor’s safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings, keeping records of all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work performed during construction and conducting public outreach.', 'Public Outreach', 'Public outreach during construction of this project would be provided by Willdan Engineering, the City’s construction management consultant. Weekly updates on the City’s “Know Before You Go” (aka KBUG) website and Monday editions of the Santa Monica Daily Press would be provided. In addition, updates regarding the project would be provided on the City’s social media network.', 'Properties impacted by the project would receive two construction notices. The first general notice would be mailed to properties adjacent to the proposed work site two weeks prior to the start of construction. Two days prior to the start of construction, a second notice would be subsequently hand-delivered to each adjacent property with detailed information regarding the planned construction activity, potential impacts, and contact information. The notices would be prepared by Public Works staff and Willdan Engineering and would be distributed by the contractor (Sully-Miller). A project-specific outreach campaign, including one-on-one coordination with impacted businesses on Ocean Park Boulevard and Ocean Avenue, would commence prior to the start of construction and continue throughout the project.', 'Construction Timeline', 'Staff anticipates that construction would begin in March 2018 and would be completed by January 2019. To mitigate traffic impacts in the areas of Ocean Park Boulevard between 14th and 18th streets and Ocean Avenue south of Pico Boulevard, construction would be completed at nighttime from 8 p.m. to 6 a.m. Monday to Friday and on Saturdays as needed. Staff anticipates no more than three weeks of after-hours work. Nighttime work would help alleviate lane closures and traffic impacts during the day, thus mitigating impacts to residents and commuters traveling to and from Santa Monica College and John Adams Middle School.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Sully-Miller Contracting Company is for an amount not to exceed $2,785,300 (including a 15% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:', 'Account Number', 'Account Name', 'Amount', 'C200609.589000', 'Water System Improvement', '$ 117,803', 'C209196.589000', 'EPA Water Main Replacement', '$ 848,000', 'C250609.589000', 'Water System Improvement', '$ 112,023', 'C259196.589000', 'EPA Water Main Replacement', '$ 693,818', 'C250136.589000 City Match Fund', 'Water System Improvement', '$1,013,656', 'TOTAL $2,785,300', 'The contract to be awarded to Willdan Engineering is for an amount not to exceed $219,791 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C250136.589000 (Water Funds).', 'The City will be reimbursed for the remaining $965,803 EPA grant balance.'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2722'}, {'Title': 'Approval of Fourth Modification to Agreement with Aeroplex Group Partners, LLC. for Santa Monica Airport Commercial Real Estate Management', 'Department': 'Public Works, Airport Division', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification toProfessional ServicesAgreement No. 10262 (CCS) in the amount of $50,325 with Aeroplex Group Partners, LLC (“Aeroplex”), a California-based corporation. The modification will eliminate provisions for Aeroplex to provide minor repairs and maintenance of City-owned properties (reducing the contract by $180,675) and add services for additional commercial leasing, property management and consulting services for the Santa Monica Airport (increasing the contract by $231,000, including a 10% contingency). This will result in a three-year amended agreement, expiring on June 30, 2018, for a new total amount not to exceed $1,328,340.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City currently contracts with Aeroplex to assist City staff with commercial real estate leasing, property management and consulting services for City-owned aviation properties at the Santa Monica Airport. Staff anticipates that the need for commercial real estate leasing and property management services for City-owned real estate assets in the current fiscal year will exceed the current agreement with Aeroplex.', 'Currently the City is negotiating a lease with Atlantic Aviation, a former master tenant located at 2828 Donald Douglas Loop North. Under the proposed lease agreement, the City would assume control of 22 properties previously subleased by Atlantic Aviation. Additional real estate brokerage and property management services will be required for these properties, since the Airport is not currently staffed to effectively manage 22 additional direct tenants. The additional real estate brokerage services and property management services are estimated to cost $210,000 plus 10% contingency for a total additional cost of $231,000 in FY 2017-18.', 'Staff recommends that Council approve afourth modificationin the amount of $50,325. The modification would eliminate provisions for Aeroplex to provide minor repairs and maintenance of City-owned properties (reducing the contract by $180,675) and add services for additional commercial leasing, property management and consulting services for the Santa Monica Airport (increasing the contract by $231,000, including a 10% contingency). This would result in a three-year amended agreement, expiring on June 30, 2018, with a new total amount not to exceed $1,328,340.', 'Background', 'On March 24, 2015, Council directed staff to contract out professional services to assistCity staff with commercial real estate leasing and property management services for City-owned properties at the Santa Monica Airport (Attachment A). Following the Request for Proposals for commercial real estate firms to act as a leasing andproperty managementagent and provide real estate consulting, on July 13, 2015 the City entered into Professional Services Agreement No. 3022 (CCS) with Aeroplex for an amount not to exceed $79,990 to provide assistance to City staff in negotiating leases for City-owned properties located at the Santa Monica Airport, including brokerage services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period, and to provide property management and consulting services for those properties.', 'Due to the acquisition of additional properties that required property management services, on March 1, 2016, Council approved a first modification to the agreement, increasing the amount to $404,990 for year one with two one-year renewal options in the amount of $325,000 in FY 2016-17 and $325,000 in FY 2017-18 at the sole discretion of the City for a total amount not to exceed $1,054,990 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval (Attachment B).', 'On September 26, 2016, the City Manager authorized a second modification to Agreement No. 10262 (CCS), increasing the minimum monthly property management fee paid to Aeroplex from $4,000 to $15,000 to account for increased workload. The modification did not require additional funds.', 'On July 1, 2016 the City exercised its first option to renew the agreement, adding $325,000 for brokerage and property management services.', 'On November 22, 2016, Council approved a third modification to Agreement No. 10262 (CCS), increasing the amount by $223,025for FY 2017-18, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $1,278,015 (Attachment C). The modification was requested for Aeroplex to assume responsibility for minor repairs and maintenance ofthe City-owned properties, using its own employee and contracted resources, and to assist the City in developing a business plan for a City-owned and -operated Fixed-Base Operator (FBO) at Santa Monica Airport. Of the modification amount, $63,340 was allocation to non-aviation maintenance, and $16,335 to aviation maintenance in FY 2016-17.', 'On July 1, 2017 the City exercised its second option to renew the agreement, adding an additional $99,000 for maintenance and repairs, and $325,000 for brokerage and property management services.', 'Discussion', 'The Airport manages 500 leases and license agreements for City-owned assets and properties including offices, hangars, and land leases. Of these 500 leases, staff is currently responsible for 420, and Aeroplex is responsible for the remaining 80 properties. There are four full-time employees on Airport staff dedicated to property management and various administrative tasks related to properties including management of events and filming at the airport. The property management tasks include but are not limited to:  acquiring new tenants, negotiating and executing new leases, generating courtesy notices to tenants monthly; recording of payments; collection of late fees and security deposits monthly; preparing billing journal entries regarding lease and license agreements monthly; tracking of tenant insurance documentation; tracking of lease/license expiration dates; maintaining tenant contact information; processing tenant leases and commercial operation permits, and assessing Consumer Price Index increases annually. In addition, staff manages the day-to-day communication with tenants regarding repairs and maintenance needs, and works with facilities and the CIP Project Manager to address concerns in a timely and cost-effective manner. Airport staff is currently working at capacity to provide the above services in accordance with the City’s expectations for customer service.', 'Lease Brokerage and Property Management', 'Currently the City is negotiating a new lease with Atlantic Aviation, located at 2828 Donald Douglas Loop North. Atlantic Aviation currently holds a master tenancy for the property. On August 12, 2014, Council approved Airport Leasing Guidelines that, among other things, requires the phase out of master tenant agreements and prohibits sub-leasing. Therefore, the negotiations with Atlantic will transfer management of its subtenants for hangars and office spaces to the direct control of the City. Once the new lease is executed, 22 previously subleased tenancies will be reverted back to direct oversight by the City (Attachment D).', 'The formerly subleased properties consist of 4,000 square feet of office space and 56,887 square feet of hangars.', 'Staff recommends that Aeroplex negotiate new leases on behalf of the City, and provide property management services for the said properties. In order to provide brokerage and commercial property management and consulting services for the additional 22 properties staff anticipates that the need for additional funding in the current fiscal year will exceed the current agreement amount of $1,278,015.', 'The current agreement with Aeroplex awards them commissions for completing any renewal, new lease, or other occupancy agreement at the Santa Monica Airport during the contract period. The commission for a month-to-month lease term is a one-time payment equal to the first month’s rent, but in no case less than $1,000. Commission for longer lease terms is calculated at 5% of the gross rent and fees paid by the tenant to the Santa Monica Airport for the term of the lease or agreement. For property management services, Aeroplex receives a fee of 5% of the gross rent. Aeroplex is reimbursed for out-of-pocket property management expenses that are authorized by the City. All expenditures for maintenance and capital improvements to properties managed by Aeroplex would be the responsibility of the City.', 'Staff anticipates additional brokerage service costs of $155,500 and property management service costs of $54,500 for a total of $210,000 plus a 10% contingency for a total additional expense of $231,000 in FY 2017-18.', 'Maintenance', 'Staff recommends amending the scope of services to eliminate provisions for Aeroplex to provide minor maintenance needs for leased facilities at 3100 Donald Douglas Loop North including,butnot limited to minor roof repairs, flooring, painting, addressing mold issues, fire extinguisher annual maintenance, hangar door repairs, pest control, minor plumbing repairs, and minor electrical services using its own employees and contractors, consistent with the City’s procurement policy and procedures and in accordance with any federal, state and local labor laws. It has proved difficult for Aeroplex to provide these services, and the funds have largely remained unused. In FY 2016-17, none of the $81,675 in allocated funds were expended. These funds were rolled over to FY 2017-18. The City exercised its one-year option to renew, adding an additional $99,000 for maintenance services in FY 2017-18, for total of $180,675. None of the funds have been expended year-to-date.', 'On November 13, 2017, the Airport hired a full-time CIP Project Manager whose duties include supervising the maintenance and repair of City-owned properties at the Airport. Releasing the funding for maintenance and repairs from this contract would allow staff to ensure that funds are available to ensure that the work is completed in a timely manner. Staff recommends that the scope of services be modified to eliminate Aeroplex’s responsibility for minor repairs and maintenance. This change to the scope of services would reduce the total contractual amount by $180,675.', 'Consultant Selection', 'On April 1, 2015, the City published a Request for Proposals for commercial real estate firms to act as a leasing andproperty managementagent. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in theSanta Monica Daily Pressin accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-one vendors downloaded the RFP. Five firms responded: Aeroplex Group Partners, CBRE Group Inc., Corporate Realty Group, PAR Commercial Brokerage, and Property Management Associates Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff fromthe Airport Division of the Public Works Department and Housing and Economic Development. Staff evaluated proposals based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073 andlisted in the RFP.Based on these criteria, staffrecommendedAeroplex as the best qualified firmto assist City staff in negotiating Airport leases, including broker and property management services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to Aeroplex is$50,325for an amended agreement total not to exceed $1,328,340. No budget modification is required for the elimination of maintenance services as City staff will utilize the budget to perform the required maintenance.', 'A budget appropriation for the additional leasing and property management services will be included in the FY 2017-18 Midyear Budget for Council approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2782'}, {'Title': 'Award Contract for Engineering Design Service for Runway Pavement Removal and Repurposing', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP# 2533 to AECOM, a California-based company, to provide engineering design services for excess runway, taxiway and infield pavement removal and repurposing at Santa Monica Airport (SMO);Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with AECOM, in an amount not to exceed $267,575 (including a $24,325 contingency), with an allowance of $25,811 for optional Airport Geographic Information System (AGIS) work, for a total amount not to exceed $293,386 over a one-year period.Authorize the budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Santa Monica Airport (SMO) Runway Shortening Project was completed in December 2017, leaving 736 feet of excess pavement on each end of the runway after the runway was reduced to an operational use of 3,500 feet. The excess pavement cannot be used by aircraft and is no longer an integral part of operations at SMO. As required by Federal Aviation Administration guidelines, 300 feet of this 736 feet immediately adjacent to the runway ends is needed for the Runway Safety Area (RSA) to protect aircraft should they exceed the runway. The remaining 436 feet of excess runway that falls outside the RSA will be hydroseeded. On September 26, 2017 (Attachment A), Council directed staff to proceed with the procurement of engineering design services to pulverize in-place and stabilize the existing pavement within the RSA as well as remove all unused pavement outside the Runway Safety Area (RSA) and treat the graded surface with hydro seeding.', 'Staff recommends the award of RFP# 2533 to AECOM, a California-based company, to provide engineering design services for excess pavement removal and repurposing at SMO in an amount not to exceed $267,575 (including a $24,325 contingency), with an allowance of $25,811 for optional Airport Geographic Information System (AGIS) work should the repurposing project require an update to the FAA’s AGIS records pertaining to SMO, for a total amount not to exceed $293,386 over a one-year period.', 'Background', 'On February 28, 2017, Council awarded Feasibility Professional Services Agreement 10436 (CCS) to AECOM to study reducing the length of Runway 3-21 at the Santa Monica Airport (SMO) from 5,000 to 3,500 feet (Attachment B). The agreement included an initial feasibility phase to provide runway shortening options for Council consideration and selection.', 'On April 24, 2017, staff issued an Information Item responding to Council’s inquiry about a potential phased interim project for the removal of pavement at the ends of the runway and evaluation of future uses of the excess runway area (Attachment C). The Information Item provided an update on those topics, as well as the overall status of the runway-shortening project.', 'On May 24, 2017, Council selected the center-aligned shortened runway option from the two options presented for runway shortening construction (Attachment D). At that meeting, Council also:', '· Authorized staff to proceed with further design of the preferred option to establish a guaranteed maximum price (GMP) for a design-build agreement between the City and AECOM to complete runway shortening construction prior to December 31, 2017;', '· Adopted Resolution No. 11044 stating that the runway shortening project is categorically exempt from review under the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA); and', '· Directed staff to investigate pavement removal options for the unused and abandoned portions of the runway, taxiways and adjacent in-field pavement that could be implemented as a separate and distinct project once the runway shortening project concluded.', 'On August 8, 2017, Council authorized the City Manager to execute a design-build agreement with AECOM for a GMP of $3.52 million to complete runway shortening construction by December 31, 2017 (Attachment E). Construction began in early October 2017 and was completed on December 23, 2017.', 'On September 26, 2017, City Council selected Option 1 from the three options presented by staff (and listed below) for excess pavement removal and repurposing at SMO (Attachment A).', '· Option 1 - Remove all unused pavement outside the Runway Safety Area (RSA) and hydro-seed. Pulverize in-place and stabilize pavement within the RSA.', '· Option 2 - Remove all unused pavement outside the RSA and install artificial turf. Pulverize in-place and stabilize pavement within the RSA.', '· Option 3 - Pulverize in-place all unused pavement outside and within the RSA and stabilize.', 'All options involve removing unused pavement outside and within the RSA. Hydro-seeding (or hydraulic mulch seeding) is a planting process that uses a thick fluid mixture, called a slurry, of seed and mulch which is sprayed over prepared ground. The slurry typically has other ingredients including fertilizer and fiber mulch that accelerate the growing process by maintaining moisture around the seeds. The hydro-seeding mixture would be composed of drought-tolerant grasses and other low-lying ground cover native to southern California and suitable for installation around airport runways and taxiways. Figure A below depicts how the hydro-seeded areas are likely to appear once completed.', 'Discussion', 'Figure B below depicts the abandoned pavement that is potentially eligible for removal, and shows its relation to the Runway Protection Zone (RPZ) and Runway Safety Area (RSA). The RPZ is located at ground level beyond the ends of the runway to enhance the safety and protection of people and property on the ground. For airports in urban areas, due to historical circumstances, the RPZ often extends beyond the airport boundary and into the surrounding neighborhood. At the Santa Monica Airport (SMO), the RSA extends 300 feet beyond the active runway.', 'Figure B - Abandoned pavement removal options at SMO.', 'The existing runway pavement consists of approximately 6 inches of asphalt surface pavement over approximately 8 inches of concrete pavement. The abandoned taxiways, shoulders and in-field areas consist of variable asphalt and concrete pavements ranging from 3 to 8 inches thick.', 'The runway shortening project reduced the runway length on both ends by 736 linear feet, which is unusable for aircraft operations and can be repurposed. The blue shaded areas in Figure B above represent the pavement that will be removed and repurposed as part of this project. The rectangle outlined in orange within the blue shaded area delineates the RSA, which is adjacent to each runway end and is 300 feet long and 150 feet wide. The RSA must be consistent with the City\'s obligation to comply with the terms of the Stipulation and Order/Consent Decree ("Consent Decree") filed in the matter of City of Santa Monica v. United States of America, et al., Case No. 13-CV-8046-JFW (VBKx) (C.D. Cal.). Furthermore, the RSA must be well-graded with no ruts, humps or surface depressions and capable of supporting Aircraft Rescue and Fire Fighting (ARFF) equipment. Additionally, the first 150 feet of the RSA adjacent to each runway end, which includes the blast pad, must be essentially non-erodible under jet blasts to minimize the generation of Foreign Object Debris (FOD) that represent a major hazard to all aircraft.', 'The project will repurpose over half a million square feet of pavement and to ensure proper drainage and keep the runway clear of debris, especially during rain events, a comprehensive civil site design is required. By June 2018, AECOM will perform the following duties to deliver construction plans and associated documents needed for the removal of the runway:', '· Conduct pavement investigations, including borings, to characterize the thickness and structural characteristics of the existing pavement in the removal areas', '· Conduct a survey of the pavement removal areas and prepare design base maps', '· Research to identify existing utilities within the removal areas', '· Perform a hydrology analysis of the airport site to identify drainage considerations as a result of the proposed pavement removal project', '· Prepare preliminary and final construction plans, specifications, and cost estimates, including civil, electrical, drainage, landscaping and irrigation plans as required', '· Prepare construction phasing, safety and erosion control plans as required', '· Conduct meetings with the FAA and Airport stakeholders to present preliminary design materials as necessary during various stages of the project', '· Respond to Requests for Information (RFIs) from prospective bidders during the bidding period', '· Review submittals and respond to RFIs from the selected contractor during construction', '· Provide a complete set of As-Built plans that reflect the final project as it was constructed', '· Complete Airport Geographic Information System (AGIS) survey and design work, if required, and submit to the City and FAA', 'Consultant Selection', 'On March 22, 2016, staff issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQs) for Consulting Aviation Services in anticipation of any future planning, environmental, and engineering projects at SMO. The RFP was posted on the City’s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Sixty-eight vendors downloaded the RFQ. Two proposals were received, one from Mead & Hunt, and the other from AECOM. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. Both consultant teams were pre-qualified to provide aviation consulting services at SMO.', 'On November 23, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP #2533) to provide engineering design services for Santa Monica Airport Runway Repurposing. The RFP was emailed to the two pre-qualified aviation consultants: Mead & Hunt and AECOM. Both consultants submitted proposals on December 14, 2017.', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience, references, work plans, project team, cost, and delivery schedule. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends AECOM as the best qualified firm to provide engineering design services for Santa Monica Airport Runway Repurposing Project based on their extensive experience with some of the largest airports in the country including Los Angeles International Airport and John F. Kennedy International Airport. In addition, AECOM was pre-qualified and selected for the Runway Shortening Project for the City. AECOM’s expertise and efforts were instrumental in allowing the City to implement the runway shortening design and construction prior to the end of 2017.', 'Anticipated Schedule', "Staff anticipates the following completion schedule for implementing excess pavement removal, based on the City's design-bid-build procurement process. The schedule has been extended by approximately two months to allocate additional time during design. Completion of construction is anticipated for April 2019.", 'Contract Execution – January/February 2017', 'Final Design Completion – June 2018', 'Construction Award – October 2018', 'Construction Completion – April 2019', 'California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) Determination', 'It has been determined that removal of the excess runway pavement at the Santa Monica Airport (SMO) would be categorically exempt from CEQA pursuant to Sections 15301 and 15304 of CEQA Guidelines. Section 15301 provides a Class 1 exemption for the minor alteration of existing public or private facilities involving negligible or no expansion of use. Section 15304 provides a Class 4 exemption for minor public or private alterations in the condition of land and/or vegetation. The project would make improvements to existing unusable pavement at SMO, which will include the removal of existing pavement and the installation of a stable surface (hydro-seeded soil and mulch). Therefore, the project qualifies as a Class 1 and Class 4 exemption. In addition, none of the exceptions specified in Section 15300.2 of CEQA Guidelines would apply that would preclude the use of this CEQA exemption - the project site is not located in a sensitive environment, the project will not have a significant effect on the environment, the project would not damage scenic resources, the project would not be located on a hazardous waste site, and the project would not cause a change to a historical resource. Therefore, this project is determined to be categorically exempt from CEQA. A Notice of Exemption for this project was filed with the Los Angeles County Registrar-Recorder/County Clerk on October 6, 2017.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to AECOM is for an amount not to exceed $293,386. Award of this contract requires an additional FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget appropriation of $293,386 from the Airport (33) Fund to Airport Runway Repurposing Account C339222.589000. Future maintenance costs could range between $20,000 and $50,000 annually and would be paid from the Airport (33) Fund. Upon completion of the final design and selection of the final hydroseed mix, a more definitive maintenance budget will be established.'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2784'}, {'Title': 'Agreement Modification No. 2 to Provide Schematic and Construction Documents, Bidding and Construction Administration Services for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': '1. Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to agreement #10553 (CCS) in the amount of $364,859 (including a 10% contingency) with RJM Design Group, Inc., a California-based company, for the preparation of construction documents, bidding and negotiation, and construction administration services required to complete the design for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project. This would result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $534,997.2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'To ensure the timely completion of the next steps to keep the City’s commitment to construct the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field, staff requests authorization to execute a second modification to the existing design agreement with the consultant, RJM Design Group, Inc. (RJM). The additional scope of work to be added to the original agreement would include the preparation of construction documents, bidding and negotiation, and construction administration services for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project. As the schedule was reported to Council in June 2017, this modification is being delivered a month early and would allow final design services to keep the project on schedule to open the sports field by (or before) spring 2021.', 'Background', 'On February 9, 2016, staff presented the Civic Working Group’s Final Report and proposed next steps for the Civic Auditorium to Council (Attachment A). Council directed staff to explore the possibility of placing a temporary synthetic turf sports field including temporary restroom facilities at the corner of 4th Street and Pico Boulevard, to work with partners such as the Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD) and Santa Monica College (SMC) on funding options, and to return to Council with cost estimates for design and construction of the field.', 'On June 14, 2016, Council approved the second year of the FY16-18 Capital Improvement Program budget, in which $200,000 was identified for design services for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project (Attachment B).', 'On October 25, 2016, staff presented a quarterly update on the project at a Council Study Session (Attachment C). At that meeting staff was directed to initiate a discussion with the California Coastal Commission regarding the temporary sports field project and its removal of approximately 600 spaces of surface parking; to continue discussions with SMMUSD regarding a potential partnership project to include subterranean parking and a possible permanent field with a possible softball component having a clay infield; and reissue the Request for Proposals (RFP) to a wider range of potential firms for the design of the sports field in an effort to identify a fee proposal that aligned with the $200,000 approved budget.', 'On January 17, 2017, staff issued an information item per Council direction to provide an interim progress update for the sports field project (Attachment D).', 'On February 28, 2017, staff delivered an update to Council regarding discussions with the California Coastal Commission, and negotiations with SMMUSD to develop a permanent multipurpose sports field with the possibility of a clay infield for softball and subterranean parking, and intent to award feasibility and concept design services for the field project to RJM (Attachment E). Council directed staff to continue negotiations with SMMUSD for the partnership project and set a definitive deadline of June 17, 2017 to either reach an agreement for development of a permanent field over subterranean parking or end negotiations and proceed with advancing the temporary field.', 'On June 27, 2017, following completion of the site analysis and conceptual design study by RJM, staff presented an economic study, design feasibility analysis and two concept design options for a multipurpose sports field at the Civic Center (Attachment F). Option one was a temporary field with a synthetic turf overlay for softball with no new parking spaces. Option two was a permanent field with a synthetic turf softball overlay with subterranean parking. Council directed staff to advance plans for a temporary field with no added parking and continue discussions with SMMUSD to determine if softball accommodations, including a synthetic turf infield overlay and softball-related amenities, should be included in the final project program.', 'On September 26, 2017, following notification that SMMUSD was not interested in pursuing a softball field overlay, Council authorized a first modification to the agreement with RJM in the amount of $94,198 for schematic and design development services required for future submission of the project to the California Coastal Commission, which resulted in an amended agreement not to exceed $170,138 (Attachment G).', 'Discussion', 'To advance plans for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project, as directed by Council, staff recommends that Council authorize a second modification to the agreement with RJM for final design services. Staff entered into a contract for design services in a phased approach, rather than awarding complete design services, to maximize flexibility and cost savings for the project. The additional scope of work to be added to the original agreement would include the preparation of construction documents and bidding and construction administration services in the amount of $364,859 (including 10% contingency).', 'This second modification would allow RJM to complete all design services required for construction of a 120-yard by 75-yard California Interscholastic Federation (CIF) soccer field, suitable for lacrosse, with 5-yard buffer zones, security and ball containment fencing, equipment and maintenance storage and modular restroom facilities.', 'This second modification would result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $534,997 and would allow the project to expeditiously secure a construction permit upon notification of approval by the California Coastal Commission.', 'Next Steps', 'Staff anticipates the following next steps:', '· Return to Council in fall 2018 for amendment of the Civic Center Specific Plan following the completion of a parking study.', '· Return to Council in summer/fall 2019 for authorization to award the construction agreement upon securing California Coastal Commission approval.', 'Staff anticipates that construction will be completed on schedule in spring 2021.', 'Vendor Selection', 'On October 31, 2016, the City published a Request for Proposals for feasibility concept study and design services for design of the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 92 vendors downloaded the RFP. Nine firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works and Community and Cultural Services departments.', '· AHBE Landscape Architects', '· BFS Landscape Architects', '· Brightview Design Group', '· David Volz Design', '· Hirsch & Associates, Inc.', '· HOK', '· Pleskow Architects', '· Rios Clementi Hale Studios', '· RJM Design Group', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: cost of services, understanding of the project, experience on similar projects and feedback from references. Staff then interviewed three shortlisted firms. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommended RJM Design Group, Inc. as the best firm to provide professional design services for the Civic Center Multipurpose Sports Field Project based on the firm’s expertise with field design, cost of services, understanding of the project, and feedback from references.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to RJM Design Group, Inc. is $364,859 (including a 10% contingency), for an amended agreement total not to exceed $534,997. The agreement modification requires the following FY 2017-18 budget changes:', '1. Release of fund balance from reserve account number 1.380255 of $364,859.', '2. Appropriate $364,859 to account C019194.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2786'}, {'Title': 'Recommendation to Remove Santa Monica Public Library Fines for Youth (0-18 years)', 'Department': 'Library Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that City Council approve the proposed change in Library policy to remove fines for youth (ages 0 to 18) and eliminate outstanding fines previously accrued for these cardholders estimated to be $50,300 (inclusive of current Library records). The removal of fines will ensure access to the wealth of information, learning and cultural exploration available to them at Santa Monica Public Library with a Library card, further supporting literacy and success in school from an early age.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Santa Monica Public Library (Library) ensures access to digital and physical learning resources for all ages. The Library is often a primary place to build a foundation of early literacy and learning for our youngest customers. Students rely on Santa Monica Public Library as a place to study and meet curricular as well as entertainment and extracurricular needs.', 'Current active youth (0-18 years) accounts total 7,100. The number of those unable to use their accounts to access databases, checkout materials, and use the internet due to overdue fines is 766 for an estimated $12,627 in fines. This means that they have accrued fines of at least $5.00 and therefore cannot use the Library until after they pay the fine. This impacts youth’s ability to access and utilize library resources needed for developing literacy skills, building homework support, and other educational pursuits.', 'The Library recommends elimination of youth fines going forward and a one-time waiver of all outstanding fines, which are estimated to be $50,300 (inclusive of current Library records) for youth Library accounts. If approved the change will take place with inception of Fiscal Year 2018-19 and will decrease annual fine revenue by $24,000 –11% of the revenue received for all fines annually. Outstanding items will still be subject to fees resulting from lost or damaged items. The Library asks for Council’s support in this important initiative to overcome the hurdle created by library accounts blocked by fines for youth to guarantee their success in the future. The City could make no better investment. The reduction of youth fines has worked successfully in other local communities such as Altadena, City of Los Angeles (Student Success Card) and most recently throughout Los Angeles County, thus, encouraging stronger youth use of library services.', 'This effort reflects the City Council’s goal to invest in learning opportunities at all stages of life through the Learn + Thrive strategic goal as well as ensuring the wellbeing of youth through learning and their success later in life.', 'Background', 'Santa Monica Public Library active youth cardholders number 7,100, with 766 as of this writing, blocked because they owe $5.00 or more in fines. In this discussion, “fines” refers to the monetary penalties incurred by returning library materials past their due date. “Fees” are those penalties resulting from lost or damaged items, along with associated processing fees. Several studies have indicated that fines are not prohibitive in the quick return of materials, as youth must rely on various means, including adults for access to the library. Instead, youth and their adults usually make a decision not to return and associate the library with a poor experience. This recommendation is for the elimination of fines only for youth cardholders, regardless of the material type borrowed.', 'Current fines by item type – Table 1', 'Item type', 'Fine per day', 'Children’s materials', '15 cents', 'Adult/Teen materials', '25 cents', 'DVDs all users', '$1.00', 'Discussion', 'The Library’s mission is to provide resources, services and a place to encourage the community to read, connect, relax and learn. As a recognized longstanding learning institution, the Santa Monica Public Library embraces policies and practices that remove barriers to information access. Anecdotally, it has been reported that patrons stop using the library when cards are blocked due to fines.', 'At the November 8, 2017 special Santa Monica Public Library Board meeting, the Board voted 4-0 with one member absent to endorse the report recommendation from Library staff and recommend the elimination of fines for youth cardholders.', 'Circulation of Youth Materials', 'A notable downturn in circulation for children and teens material is apparent since 2012. Many factors may contribute to that decrease, access to more information digitally, adoption of the non-resident fee, which was in effect July 1, 2013 through February 1, 2016, and the decreasing youth population in the City.', 'Decline in youth material circulation – Table 2', 'Youth Material Circulation', 'FY13/14', 'FY14/15', 'FY15/16', 'FY16/17', 'Juvenile', '-9.12%', '0.50%', '-8.49%', '-1.64%', 'Teen', '-15.68%', '4.36%', '-11.66%', '-11.72%', 'Total', '-11.14%', '1.63%', '-9.44%', '-4.59%', 'According to the 2014 Youth Wellbeing Report Card (see attached weblink 2014 Youth Wellbeing Report Card) those 18 years and under comprised 15% of Santa Monica’s total population, which was then 92,987. There is a decline in youth in the community based on the 2000 census for Santa Monica showing 14,057 youth. That number currently is 13,340 according to the 2016 estimated census for Santa Monica in American FactFinder.', 'A potential cause in the decline in use among youth could be tied not just to the primary factors noted above, but to fines that might prevent their using the Library regularly.', 'Outstanding fines on Youth cards are minimal according to the Library’s Integrated Library System and date back to 1998.', 'Outstanding fines for Children and Teen Accounts previously accrued and currently due in Polaris the Integrated Library System – Table 3', 'Patron Code', 'Status', '#', 'Balance', 'Juvenile (0-11)', 'Active', 'blocked', '373', '$6,064', 'unblocked', '805', '$1,533', 'Inactive', 'blocked', '424', '$8,818', 'unblocked', '313', '$758', 'Total', '$17,173', 'Teen (12-18)', 'Active', 'blocked', '393', '$6,563', 'unblocked', '666', '$1,305', 'Inactive', 'blocked', '1311', '$22,945', 'unblocked', '841', '$2,271', 'Total', '$33,084', 'Total Outstanding Fines for Children and Teen Accounts', '$50,257', 'Student success programs and fine free status', 'The largest public library in Southern California, Los Angeles Public Library (LAPL), has a newly adopted Student Success card (see attached weblink for Student Success Card) for children and teens in partnership with the Los Angeles Unified School District. Essentially, all students enrolled in the District receive a special category LAPL Student Success card that is exempt from fines and renewal requirements.', 'On December 19, 2017, The Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors instructed the Los Angeles County Librarian to implement a fine-free student library card for students 17 years old and under.', 'Santa Monica Public Library and the Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District are in the process of developing a program that ensures all students receive a library card to support their success all through school. Removing fines for youth is a first step in the process.', 'Fine Free Movement', 'A robust nationwide movement is afoot in support of fine-free public library services. There is no indication, according to current data, that fines serve as a deterrent or promote return and use of library materials. With increasing frequency, libraries point to the value of fine-free accounts, especially for youth.', 'Library Journal published “Doing Fine(s)? / Fines & Fees” by Jennifer A. Dixon and Steven Gillis on April 4, 2017 (see attached weblink Library Journal). Because most libraries moving to fine-free accounts have done so in the past 2 years, the authors found that the impact on circulation of library materials was less discernable at this point. Instead, they focused on the good will benefits and how so far, the removal of fines brought people back to the library and improved staff interactions with patrons at the point of return. Habitually late library users would probably continue to behave in the same manner. The immediate impact for youth would be a positive experience and surprise at learning there were no fines upon returning late items.', 'A number of local libraries have adopted fine free status for youth including Altadena Library District, City of Los Angeles Public Library, and LA County Library.', 'Plan to implement fine free status', 'The Library has formed an ad hoc committee to implement outreach to children through Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District, Santa Monica private schools, Community Corporation, Housing and Economic Development family clients, and Community and Cultural Services to increase library registration and use. The fine free status for youth accounts for those ages 0-18 will have a significant impact on the number of youth accounts. A general marketing campaign is expected in collaboration with the Office of Communications and local news outlets.', 'Financial Impact and Budget Actions', 'The approval of eliminating overdue fines for youth cardholders will decrease ongoing Library Fines revenues by $24,000 per year and remove approximately $50,300 in outstanding fines previously accrued and currently due in Polaris the Library’s Integrated Library System. Fiscal Year 2018-19 budget for account 01613.401600 should be decreased by $24,000 and an updated fine resolution will be submitted during the Fiscal Year 2018-19 Exception-Based Budget.'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2805'}, {'Title': 'Award of Design Agreement for the Memorial Park Feasibility Study and Master Plan', 'Department': 'Public Works, Architecture Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #SP2509 to AHBE Landscape Architects, a California-based company, for the feasibility study and master plan design of the Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with AHBE Landscape Architects, in an amount not to exceed $326,706 (including a 10% contingency).', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project would combine the existing 10.3-acre Memorial Park with an adjoining City-owned 2.9-acre site to the north into a newly renovated and expanded community park. The recommended feasibility study and master plan would examine existing conditions and park program elements, and propose a single cohesive park program and layout with a focus on sports fields, particularly baseball and softball. Staff recommends entering into an agreement with AHBE Landscape Architects to provide feasibility study and master plan design services for an amount not to exceed $326,706 (includes a 10% contingency). Staff will return to Council in fall 2018 to present the preferred master plan option for final approval.', 'Background', 'Santa Monica’s Parks and Recreation Master Plan, adopted in 1997, (Attachment A) stated that it was necessary to consider redefining the role of Memorial Park to better serve the community. Staff recommended the development of a Memorial Park Master Plan as part of the 1997 Recreation and Parks Master Plan (Attachment B). However, the City did not take control of the Fisher Lumber site until 2005, and in lieu of a viable alternate site, the Fisher Lumber site has since housed the City’s Colorado Yards and Public Landscape Division’s equipment and staff.  A Memorial Park Master Plan has not yet been developed.', 'In October 2004, Council adopted resolution 9987 (CCS) approving a negative declaration and authorizing the City Manager to negotiate and execute a purchase of sale agreement for the property located at 1601 14th Street, at the time occupied by Fisher Lumber. The acquisition would preserve the possibility of expanding Memorial Park, although no project to expand Memorial Park was contemplated at that time (Attachment C).', 'On March 22, 2016, Council adopted the recommendation of the Recreation and Parks Commission and staff and formally selected the City’s highest priority park projects to be included in the Los Angeles Countywide Parks Needs Assessment Report (Attachment D). The Recreation and Parks Commission’s Recommendations included the expansion of Memorial Park to include the former Fisher Lumber Site as a priority project to be included in the Countywide Needs Assessment Report.', 'Today, Memorial Park is Santa Monica’s primary public park for diamond sports, including little league baseball, Santa Monica High School softball and baseball teams, and adult league softball and baseball. The park also houses the only public gymnasium in Santa Monica.', 'Funding for preliminary planning and design for the Memorial Park Expansion Project was included in in the 2016-2018 Capital Improvements Program Adopted Biennial Budget. Funding options for construction will need to be explored and identified pending the completion of the Master Plan.', 'Discussion', 'The Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project consists of two adjacent land parcels. Parcel 1 is the existing 10.3-acre Memorial Park site. Parcel 2 is the adjoining 2.9-acre former Fisher Lumber site to the north of the existing park. The two adjoining parcels are bound by Colorado Boulevard to the northwest, 16th Street to the northeast, Olympic Boulevard to the southeast and 14th Street to the southwest.', 'Parcel 1 includes six baseball/softball fields, a skate park, four tennis courts, gated children’s play structures, on-site parking, restrooms, a dog run area and three City-owned and operated community buildings. The existing buildings house the Santa Monica Police Activities League (P.A.L.), the community fitness room, staff offices and the Memorial Park gymnasium. Along the proposed project’s Northwest boundary sits Parcel 2, the former Fisher Lumber site, which currently houses the City’s Public Landscape Division offices, covered storage areas and vehicle and equipment storage lots. The City is considering relocating the Public Landscape Division offices to a site at the Santa Monica Airport.', 'The core objective of this feasibility study and master planning process is to complete site analysis, define the project program requirements and study options to arrive at a conceptual master plan.  The master plan is intended to inform the design and phased construction of the Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On August 22, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide feasibility study and master plan design services for the 13-acre Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Section 2.24.075(a) provisions. A total of 120 vendors downloaded the RFP. Ten proposals were received and publicly opened on September 28, 2017. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works, Planning and Community Development (PCD) and Community and Cultural Services (CCS) departments. The 10 firms that submitted proposals are listed below:', '· AHBE Landscape Architects', '· Brightview', '· Design Workshop', '· Koning Eizenberg', '· KSA Design Studio', '· MIG', '· Studio-MLA', '· Rios Clementi Hale Studios', '· RJM Design Group', '· SWA Landscape Architects', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: fees, previous work experience on similar projects, track record performing public sector work, hourly rates for services, demonstrated understanding project scope, work approach, community outreach, project team qualifications and proposed schedule. Staff then interviewed two shortlisted firms, AHBE Landscape Architects and SWA Landscape Architects, for interview. Based on the above criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends AHBE Landscape Architects as the best qualified firm to provide feasibility study and master plan design services for the Memorial Park Redevelopment and Expansion Project. AHBE Landscape Architects provided a clear fee structure, exhibited a full understanding of the project scope, and has completed projects of similar size and scope. In addition, the project team displayed good composition with required skills, and has experience working with governmental agencies and conducting community outreach. Staff contacted references that had previously worked with AHBE and all highly recommend the firm.', 'Next Steps', 'Pending Council approval, staff expects to begin design work in March 2018. Staff would return to Council in October 2018 to present a preferred design option and to solicit Council’s comments and recommendations. The selected design would be further developed, and staff would return to Council in January 2019 for approval of the Final Master Plan document.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement to be awarded to AHBE Landscape Architects is for an amount not to exceed $326,706. Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019154.589000.'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2806'}, {'Title': 'Contract Approval for Design Services for Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Pedestrian and Bicycle Improvements', 'Department': 'Mobility (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP #133 to KOA Corporation, a California based company, to provide engineering and design services for the Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project.Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with KOA Corporation in an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 15% contingency) for an initial two-year term and a one-year renewal option.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'One of the City Council’s five Strategic Goals is the creation of a new model of mobility to improve access for Santa Monica residents to get around within and beyond their community.', 'To promote pedestrian and bicyclist safety and access to the Expo 26th Street/Bergamot Station and Expo Corridor Bike/Ped Path, the Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project (the “Project”) would enhance linkages to the Expo station, facilitate walking and biking, and support a safer and barrier-free network. Specifically, the Project would install sidewalks on Pennsylvania Avenue between 26th and Stewart Streets where no sidewalks currently exist; create a protected bikeway along Stewart Street between Colorado and Kansas Avenues; and reconfigure the atypical 3-street, 5-leg Olympic/Nebraska/Stewart intersection.', 'These Project elements are identified as a priority in the Bike Action Plan adopted in 2011 and the Pedestrian Action Plan adopted in 2016 because they increase access to transit, and make biking and walking easier and safer. Staff recommends KOA Corporation (KOA), a planning and engineering consultant, to provide the design services for the Project in an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 15% contingency).', 'Background', 'The City began planning for the arrival of Expo light rail nearly a decade ago when updating the General Plan Land Use & Circulation Element (LUCE). Adopted in 2010, following a six-year community engagement process, the LUCE puts forth a land use, urban design, and transportation vision for the City that both establishes new districts comprised of mixed residential and commercial land uses and creates a multi-modal transportation system that provides safer access and mobility options for all. Building on LUCE recommendations, and with community input, the 2011 Bike Action Plan prioritized a Stewart Street protected bike facility; the 2013 Bergamot Area Plan identified preliminary streetscape recommendations for Pennsylvania Avenue and Stewart Street and developed a concept for reconfiguring the Olympic/Nebraska/Stewart intersection; and the 2016 Pedestrian Action Plan identified Pennsylvania Avenue sidewalk gap closure and the reconfiguration of the Olympic/Nebraska/Stewart intersection as priority projects.', 'In the Fiscal Year 2016-2018 Capital Improvement Project (CIP) Budget, Council budgeted CIP Funds of $2,800,000 comprised of local and federal funds for the design and construction of both this Project and the adjacent Olympic Boulevard Improvements Project. The Olympic Boulevard Improvements Project will create a sidewalk along the north side of Olympic Boulevard between 26th and Stewart Streets and install pedestrian amenities. Due to the procedural requirements and extended timeline related to federal-funded projects, only local funds are being applied to the Olympic Boulevard Improvements Project so that it may be designed and constructed in advance of the Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project. At the December 12, 2017 (Attachment A) Council meeting, Council authorized staff to execute a contract with KOA Corporation to provide engineering and design services for the Olympic Boulevard Improvements Project in an amount not to exceed $200,000 (including a 15% contingency). The Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project will proceed on a separate, but coordinated, timeline using a mix of local and federal funding.', 'Discussion', 'The Project area is located within formerly industrial lands with wide roadways and limited pedestrian and bicycle infrastructure. Now adjacent to an Expo light rail station, the Project is needed to meet the changing needs and uses for the Project area. The Bergamot Area Plan designates Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue as “Complete Streets.” Complete Streets serve station linkages and provide access for all: pedestrians, vehicles, bicycles, and transit. This Project will create new pedestrian connections along Pennsylvania Avenue between 26th and Stewart Streets and enhance bicycle facilities along Stewart Street between Colorado and Kansas Avenues (see Attachment B). Improvements include:', '· Installation of new ADA-compliant sidewalks on Pennsylvania Avenue.', '· Creation of a protected bikeway on Stewart Street.', '· Enhanced bike connection on Colorado Avenue between Stewart Street and Yale Avenue.', '· Improved crosswalk and curb ramps at the north leg of the Stewart Street/Olympic Boulevard intersection.', '· Pedestrian-oriented lighting to enhance visibility, increase safety, and accommodate increased pedestrian volumes.', '· Reconfiguration of the atypical 3-street, 5-leg Olympic/Nebraska/Stewart intersection to reduce/eliminate left-turn conflicts from Nebraska Avenue.', '· Pedestrian and/or bicyclist amenities, such as benches, shade structures, bike racks, and trash containers, as needed.', 'This local- and federal-funded Project will coordinate with the adjacent Olympic Boulevard Improvements Project, but will follow on a separate timeline.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On September 19, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) #133 to obtain design services for the Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 250 vendors downloaded the RFP request. Three proposals were received on October 19, 2017. Following a review of submittal requirements, all three proposals were accepted and evaluated to determine the best qualified person or firm based on the criteria outlined in the RFP, which included understanding of the work to be done, experience with similar kinds of work, quality of staff for work to be done, capability of developing innovative or advance techniques, familiarity with state and federal procedures, financial responsibility, and demonstrated technical feasibility.', 'On November 6, 2017, the Evaluation Team comprised of staff from Planning and Community Development and Public Works recommended KOA to provide the design services for this project based on its team composition and experience with similar projects in the Cities of Claremont, Long Beach, San Diego, and Temple City; project approach and understanding; and commitment to deliver the project to the City on schedule and within budget. Based on Section 2.24.073 of the Municipal Code and these criteria, KOA is recommended as the best qualified firm.', 'Next Steps', 'KOA would initiate background research and data collection; conduct required survey work; and identify design alternatives to be considered. Following the public outreach process, KOA would develop and deliver a City approved, community supported, and technically vetted final design and construction documents. Due to the federal funding component of this Project and required environmental clearance and Caltrans coordination, staff anticipates 12-18 months for the design phase of the project depending on Caltrans coordination, with public outreach beginning summer 2018 and construction beginning summer 2020.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The professional services agreement to be awarded to KOA for the Stewart Street and Pennsylvania Avenue Improvements Project is for an amount not to exceed $315,000 (including a 15% contingency) for an initial two-year term and a one-year renewal option.  Funds are available in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:', 'Account   FY 17/18', 'C459141.589000 $215,000', 'C019094.589000 $100,000', 'Total   $315,000'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2814'}, {'Title': 'Approval of Agreement for Water and Wastewater Consulting Services for SCADA Systems Integration and Support', 'Department': 'Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP# 125 to Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC, a California-based company for professional services to conduct a comprehensive survey of the City’s Supervisory Control and Data Acquisition (SCADA) system for water and wastewater facilities, development of a SCADA Master Plan, development and implementation of SCADA Standards, and consulting services on future water and wastewater related capital improvement projects.Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC, in an amount not to exceed $560,750 (including $50,977 in contingency) over a five-year period with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Like most water utilities, the City of Santa Monica manages water production, treatment, and distribution via a Supervisory Control and Data Acquisition (SCADA) system. SCADA is an automated computer control system for remotely monitoring, operating, and storing data for a process. Currently, SCADA exists for City water and wastewater facilities, but the component systems are disparate, unstandardized, and isolated from one another. Centralization and standardization of potable and wastewater system hardware and software is necessary to enhance operational and reporting efficiencies of the City’s water systems. The City has established a goal of complete water self-sufficiency by the year 2020 achieved by the combined effects of water conservation, advance treated water reclamation, and increased storm water reuse, though this goal is also reliant on the efficient deployment and operation of current and future water resources. Modern SCADA provides diagnostics and user-friendly means of controlling plant processes to help achieve optimal plant performance and operational decision-making. At this time, staff recommends executing an agreement with Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC (Vertech) to complete a comprehensive survey of the City’s SCADA system, develop a SCADA Master Plan, establish and implement system standards for modern SCADA, and provide maintenance and on-call system support. The contract would be for an amount not to exceed $560,750 (including 10% contingency) over a five-year period.', 'Background', 'The City’s water production, treatment, and distribution system consists of over 250 miles of pipeline, the Arcadia and Charnock water treatment facilities, four reservoirs, ten wells, a wastewater collection system of over 150 miles of pipeline, the Moss Avenue Pumping Station (MAPS), the Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF), two sewer flow monitoring stations, and five remote urban runoff diversions to sewer. These facilities are located both in the City and the City of Los Angeles. From the 1990’s through the early 2000’s, the City’s water and wastewater telemetering and remote control systems were limited in their abilities to control many of the critical operating functions and monitored only basic functions such as reservoir and wet well levels, pump speeds, and intrusion alarms. On September 16, 2008 (Attachment A), Council authorized a contract to provide SCADA system design and improvements for the MAPS and SMURRF facilities to enhance operational efficiencies for the two sites. This included purchase of the required hardware and software for SCADA system implementation at the facilities.', 'On July 27, 2010 (Attachment B), Council authorized a contract to purchase and integrate additional hardware and software for SCADA at Water and Wastewater facilities. Council later authorized extension of this contract on September 24, 2013 (Attachment C). The work performed under these contracts improved process efficiency by adding limited remote site monitoring from the Arcadia Water Treatment Facility and integrating water and wastewater systems onto a common SCADA software platform. However, communication with remote sites via unreliable telemetering systems still remains inconsistent, control abilities remain limited, and process graphical representation is outdated. If not addressed, these limitations could hinder implementation of two major initiatives, the Clean Beaches Initiative (CBI) and the Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP), which require enhanced system control and functionality, including robust monitoring and forecasting tools for system optimization.', 'Discussion', 'Accurate and timely reading and recording of water and wastewater facility data is crucial to operating the systems effectively. As the City’s SCADA system exists today, its graphics do not present data to operators according to present-day International Society of Automation (ISA) standards for Human Machine Interfaces (HMI). Use of high-performance HMI enables operators to monitor and keep systems running at optimal levels and allows them to foresee treatment plant upsets. Such functionality can aid operators in mitigating plant shutdown severity and duration, if not prevent shutdown altogether due to its reporting of useful statistics, metrics, and diagnostics. Monitoring functionality is also limited, particularly for the remotely operated sites. This limitation results in response personnel having to travel to the sites to determine the nature of a problem when an alarm rings on the phone. With more reliable system communication and improved monitoring and control capability, an operator could remediate issues remotely.', 'To enhance system functionality, staff recommends hiring the expertise of Vertech, a qualified industrial-process-control-integration consultant to undertake a holistic system survey and generate a SCADA Master Plan that is relevant to the present state of the City’s Water and Wastewater control systems. Such a report would highlight the strengths and weaknesses of the current state of the City’s SCADA infrastructure and reveal gaps to overcome. Staff would then use this information to implement measures that enhance operation in accordance with present-day standards and available technology. Furthermore, staff would work with the consultant to develop SCADA standards for programming and developing graphical interfaces. Such an approach has been proven to be successful in other public agencies, such as the City of Guelph Water Services Department in Ontario, Canada which shows favorable results in reliability of automatic control schemes, ease of operating equipment from SCADA and troubleshooting automation problems, and efficiency in future automation development due to implementing SCADA standards. Integration of future City projects, such as the CBI and the SWIP, would be implemented in accordance with the established standards. Improving SCADA-provided operational-awareness would aid the City in its goals of water self-sufficiency due to increase in potable water and reclaimed water facility operating efficiency.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'On July 14, 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposal for professional services to perform an assessment of the City’s water and wastewater SCADA system, provide a roadmap for implementing upgrades/enhancements to the system, and provide on-call integrator services, training, and user documentation. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 2,537 vendors were notified, 66 vendors downloaded the RFP, and 11 firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department and the Information Services Department. Bids were received from the following firms: ACS Engineering, Inc., Aspect Engineering Group, Beavens Systems Inc., Cannon Corporation, Control Automation Design, Enterprise Automation, KDC Systems, Northern Digital, Inc., ProUsys Inc., Technical Systems, Inc., and Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC.', 'Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: technical competence, experience, staffing capability, project timeliness, cost of services, quality control, cost control, company stability, client references, value added, and breadth of service. Staff then interviewed three shortlisted firms. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC as the best qualified firm to provide SCADA services based on favorable feedback from reference checks and their proven track record of working with municipalities to generate comprehensive SCADA Master Plans, develop SCADA standards, and successfully implement system improvements. Vertech has performed Programmable Logic Controller (PLC) and SCADA system hardware and software upgrades for multiple public agencies. Their project history includes developing PLC and SCADA standards, performing retrofits of outdated software and hardware, and migrating old SCADA systems to modern systems with minimal downtime for municipalities, including Irvine Ranch Water District, Adelanto Public Utilities Authority, Orange County Sanitation District, City of Buckeye, International Boundary and Water Commission Nogales, and City of La Verne.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'The contract to be awarded to Vertech Industrial Systems, LLC is for an amount not to exceed $560,750 (including 10% contingency). Funds of $174,334 for expenses estimated to be incurred in FY 2017-18 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in the Public Works Department as listed below:', 'Account', 'FY 2017-18', 'Total Contract', '25671.560010', '$ 49,800', '$ 174,603', '31661.560010', '$ 49,800', '$ 174,603', '31661.566450', '$ 37,367', '$ 105,772', '31661.566631', '$ 37,367', '$ 105,772', 'Total:', '$ 174,334', '$ 560,750', 'Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2826'}, {'Title': 'Modification to Software License Agreement for Performance Portal', 'Department': "City Manager's Office, Administration", 'Sponsors': 'City Manager Rick Cole', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that Council:1. Amend the existing contract (#10452) between the City and Socrata, Inc. (#360108);2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract amendment with Socrata, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $56,000; and3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In Fiscal Year 2017-2018, the City of Santa Monica (“the City”) established SaMoStat, a performance management program designed to set outcomes and goals and use data to drive the achievement of results towards those goals. The City undertook such an effort to establish outcomes and goals for the 2017-19 budget, developing the Framework for a Sustainable City of Wellbeing. The SaMoStat program is designed to effectively and efficiently manage City resources towards those established outcomes. To facilitate the SaMoStat program, staff would like to leverage the City’s existing relationship with Socrata, which it uses for its open data platform, to use Socrata Performance, a software program designed to allow governments to track and manage performance metrics.', 'The requested funding would allow the City to amend its existing agreement with Socrata to begin the process of developing a citywide dashboard to manage and track progress on metrics. This dashboard will allow the City to track key performance metrics towards outcomes in the Framework for a Sustainable City of Wellbeing. This will result in a second modification to add $56,000 amount to the contract for a new five-year agreement not to exceed $272,264. In the first modification, written in April of 2017, the City merged all agreements with Socrata into one contract. This staff report seeks to modify this agreement to provide for additional funding and scope to develop a citywide dashboard.', 'Background', 'In May of 2014, the City entered into an agreement with Socrata, Inc. (“Socrata”), for the purposes of developing an open data program. The initial agreement was for a three-year term at a cost not to exceed $105,000, below the threshold requiring Council authorization. On April 25, 2017, Council authorized the first modification to this agreement to extend the term of the agreement for two years at a cost of $111,264, resulting in a new total contract amount not to exceed $216,264 (Attachment A). This modification also merged all existing contracts with Socrata under one master agreement.', 'In 2014, the City also contracted with Socrata for two-project specific projects – the Youth Wellbeing Report Card and the Sustainable City Plan. These agreements were done under separate contract from the main agreement. The Youth Wellbeing Report Card is no longer available, as it was a pilot project, but the Sustainable City Plan site can be found at data.sustainablesm.org.', 'SaMoStat project will utilize the Open Performance platform. As efforts are underway to connect all performance management plans and activities, the long-term goal is for the inclusion of metrics from the Sustainable City Plan into a larger City-wide dashboard.', 'Discussion', 'The City restructured the 2017-2019 budget into the Framework for a Sustainable City of Wellbeing. Under this new construct, the City identified six outcomes, based on principles of sustainability, the Wellbeing Index, and principles of good governance as follows:', '1. Foster a save, connected, and engaged community (“Community”);', '2. Protect natural resources and cultivate an exceptional and resilient built environment (“Place and Planet”);', '3. Champion lifelong education achievement and opportunities for continuous personal growth (“Learning”);', '4. Nurture opportunities for enriched physical, social, and emotional health (“Health”);', '5. Support community needs through a stable, vibrant, and diverse local economy (“Economic Opportunity”); and', '6. Cultivate a trustworthy and participatory local government through equitable, transparent, and effective process (Governance).', 'More on the SaMoStat and the Framework can be found at https://beta.smgov.net/samostat.', 'In July of 2017, the City held its first SaMoStat meeting, relative to the Homeless Strategic Goal. Based on best practices from other cities, SaMoStat is a management tool designed to identify goals and outcomes, and use data to track success, monitor progress, and make decisions. SaMoStat is administered by the Chief Performance Officer (“CPO”) Tim Dodd and is based on four tenets:', '1. Accurate and timely intelligence;', '2. Effective tactics;', '3. Rapid deployment of resources; and', '4. Relentless follow-up and assessment.', 'Several other cities, such as Baltimore, Maryland, and Louisville, Kentucky successfully implemented similar programs. During the 2017-2018 fiscal year, the “stat” process includes all five strategic goals. Each goal team has met at least once and will begin meeting monthly in January 2018.', 'Departments will begin to participate in SaMoStat, based on both readiness and interest. The CPO is now working with departments across the City to develop a suite of metrics tied to activities in the Framework, with a completion date of January 10, 2018.', 'Socrata Performance will provide the City with a dashboard through which departments can track progress towards metrics associated with activities in the Framework. This dashboard will allow for back-end data systems to support metrics, and provide for display functionality that will allow users to access a variety of information associated with metrics. The metrics will be organized according to the Framework and will be used by departments to measure progress.', 'Under this modification, Socrata will provide the Socrata Performance toolkit and provide consulting services to help deploy the dashboard and integrate it with the City’s open data platforms. Staff will work with Socrata to begin the implementation process this spring, with a goal of 15 metrics included in the platform by summer 2018. The plan is to make the site publically available in FY 2018/19.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In May 2014, the City entered into an agreement with Socrata to provide robust open data hosting capabilities. The agreement was entered into as an exception to the competitive process per SMMC 2.24.080(d) as the exception to competitive bidding because the Socrata Open Data service is copyrighted, patented, or otherwise only available through Socrata. At the time, Socrata was the only open data provider capable of delivering the functionality, interoperability, and user experience deemed acceptable by the City. In particular, Socrata was the only provider that would allow end-users to create their own data visualizations. Moreover, Socrata had then, and still maintains today, a large foothold in the open data software space. Many large, complex organizations utilize Socrata to power their open data portals. Socrata customers include the Cities of New York, Chicago, Los Angeles, San Francisco, and Seattle.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The agreement modification to be awarded to Socrata, Inc. is $56,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $272,264. Funds of $18,801 are available in the FY 2017-18 budget in account SO015601.589000. Award of the contract modification requires a budget transfer of $37,199 to account SO015601.589000 from accounts SC015501.589000 ($36,925) and SC015502.589000 ($274).', 'The agreement will be charged to account SO015601.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2836'}], [{'Title': 'Appeal 17ENT-0186 of the Planning Commission’s approval of Conditional Use Permit 17ENT-0075, Variance 17ENT-0147, and Fence/Wall Modification 17ENT-0148 permitting the establishment of a Child Care and Early Education Facility for up to 20 children at 2953 Delaware Avenue', 'Department': 'Development Review 3', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '06. Administrative Proceedings', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council deny the appeal and uphold the Planning Commission’s approval by taking the following actions:1. Approve Conditional Use Permit 17ENT-0075 2. Approve Variance 17ENT-01473. Approve Fence Modification 17ENT-0148 4. Adopt the Statement of Official Action, pursuant to the draft findings and conditions.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'On May 18, 2017, the applicant, Laila Taslimi, filed a Conditional Use Permit (17ENT-0075), Variance (17ENT-0147), and Fence Modification (17ENT-0148) for a change of use of a 1,478 square-foot, single-unit dwelling located at 2953 Delaware Avenue (R1 Single-Unit Residential zoning district) to a Child Care and Early Education Facility. On September 6, 2017, the Planning Commission approved these applications. There would be no additional floor area. The facility would serve up to 20 children with four classrooms and outdoor play areas in the front yard (765 square feet) and the rear yard (1,833 square feet, including decks). The CUP allows year-round operation with a regular program between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 5:30 p.m., with possible early drop-off from 7:30 a.m. and late pick-up by 6:00 p.m. In addition to the Director, the applicant anticipates employing up to five staff. The project includes three on-site parking spaces, a loading space, an on-street short-term parking space and two short-term bike parking spaces. The approval included three variances to allow:', '1) Parking that is not located in a garage as required by SMMC Section 9.28.070.A.1.a.', '2) Parking in the front yard setback as prohibited by SMMC Section 9.28.070.A.1.', '3) One on-site passenger loading space instead of the two passenger loading spaces as required by SMMC Section 9.28.080.E.4.', 'In addition, the Planning Commission approved a Fence Modification to allow a front yard fence of more than four feet in height. The Planning Commission approved the fence to a maximum of five feet with specific design requirements for transparency and landscaping, subject to staff approval prior to building permit issuance. The fence runs along the front yard property line for 29 feet, after which it turns in 18 feet and continues behind the proposed car and bike parking spaces.', 'Appeal', 'On September 20, 2017, Nada Shamonki filed an appeal (17ENT-0186) of the Planning Commission’s decision to approve the CUP, Variance, and Fence Modification applications. The appeal form states that Ms. Shamonki represents “Residents for the Preservation of Gandara Park Neighborhood,” and requests that City Council overturn the Planning Commission’s decision based upon the strong opposition by the entire neighborhood; new traffic generated by the childcare facility; that the proposed childcare facility violates the LUCE; that the area is already well-served by preschools; and that the childcare facility does not meet mandatory CUP findings.', 'The appellant expressed objection to the manner of the hearing and strongly disagrees with the Planning Commission’s exercise of its discretionary authority in the matter to approve the application despite a large contingency of neighbors who testified or submitted written testimony opposing it. The full appeal narrative is provided in Attachment C.', 'A public hearing before the Council was scheduled to be held on December 5, 2017, and noticing was provided as required by the Zoning Code. At the December 5, 2017 Council meeting, prior to opening the public hearing, the Council continued the item to January 23, 2018. This is a de novo hearing and the Council may consider all aspects of the application as well as matters raised in the appeal. This report includes project description and analysis, the Planning Commission’s action, and the points of appeal together with staff responses. This report concludes with a recommendation from staff to uphold the Planning Commission’s decision on the CUP, Variance, and Fence Modification, based upon the findings and subject to the conditions in the Draft Statement of Official Action provided in Attachment B.', 'Background', 'Existing Conditions and Setting', 'The following table provides a brief summary of the project location. Additional information regarding the project’s compliance with applicable municipal regulations and the General Plan is available in Attachment A.', 'Site Location Map & Aerial View (park added, not to scale)', 'Zoning District:', 'R1 (Single-Unit Residential)', 'Land Use Element Designation:', 'Single Family Housing', 'Parcel Dimensions (Area):', '50’ x 130’ (6,500 square feet)', 'Existing On-Site Improvements (Year Built):', 'Single-family home (1940)', 'Rent Control Status:', 'N/A', 'Adjacent Zoning Districts and Land Uses:', 'North: R2 (Multiple-Unit Dwelling) East: R1 (Single-Unit Dwelling) South: R1 (Single-Unit Dwelling) West: R1 (Single-Unit Dwelling)', 'Historic Resource Inventory', 'Not listed on HRI.', 'Zoning Code', 'SMMC 9.08.020: CUP required for a Child Care and Early Education Facility in the R1 zoning district.', 'The subject property, on the north side of Delaware Avenue between Dorchester Avenue and Yorkshire Avenue, contains a 1,478 square foot home built in 1940, and expanded with a 375 square foot rear addition in 1951. A 366 square foot, two-car garage is accessed from the rear alley. All properties on this block of Delaware Avenue are developed with single-family residential uses, most of which are one-story structures. The adjacent block to the north, which is zoned R2 (Low-Density Residential), contains two-story apartment buildings, and shares a rear alley with the subject property. Ishihara Park on Exposition Boulevard is across the street from that block.', 'Project Description', 'The applicant requests a Conditional Use Permit (CUP) to allow the establishment of a Child Care and Early Education Facility for up to 20 children, ages 4-6. The facility’s regular program hours are proposed to be between 8:00 a.m. and 5:30 p.m., Mondays through Fridays. The facility would have four classrooms and outdoor play space in the front and back yards totaling 2,598 square feet, exceeding the State minimum standard of 75 sq. ft. per child (1,500 sq. ft. total). The applicant plans to allow early drop-off from 7:30 a.m. for parents who need to maintain their work schedules, and those children must remain indoors until 8:00 a.m. (see Condition #4). Late pick-up until 6:00 p.m. may be offered. In addition to the Director (applicant), the facility would employ three or four childcare staff initially, who would be scheduled to ensure that staff-child ratios comply with or exceed State requirements. With full enrollment, an additional teacher is anticipated, for a total of six staff including the applicant.', 'The existing garage would be demolished and replaced with two surface parking spaces and one passenger loading space, including spaces that comply with ADA requirements. In lieu of one of the two required loading spaces, the applicant requests to use one on-street parking space in front of the property for short-term (15-minute) parking during the facility’s operational hours. Mobility and Transportation Engineering staff indicated that this on-street, short-term parking request is feasible, but they can only consider a request if Council approves this application. Parking restrictions on the street allow two-hour parking during the day except by permit. There are also street-cleaning restrictions. Parking would be allowed in the same manner in this proposed short-term space outside of the use’s authorized hours.', 'Requested Variances', 'Variances from three Code requirements are requested as part of this proposal. SMMC 9.28.070 requires that all parking in the R1 District must be located in an enclosed garage, which is appropriate for single-unit dwellings but is not practical for the functioning of a childcare use. SMMC 9.28.070 also precludes using the existing front driveway for a required parking space, as this application proposes in order to provide the three required parking spaces on-site. These requirements are the subjects of two of the variances being requested.', 'The third requested variance addresses a technical conflict between the Zoning and Building Codes. Although SMMC Section 9.31.120(D) anticipates allowing the Director to approve a passenger loading space on the street in front of the property, the Building Code would require extensive modifications to the sidewalk to provide full ramping for ADA access for that loading space, which would necessitate the removal of a mature street tree and impact the character of the street. To avoid this, in consultation with Mobility staff, the applicant requests to provide a short-term parking space instead of the on-street passenger loading space that the Director is allowed to approve, also on the street in front of the property. In this way, the variance facilitates a way to meet the intent of the requirement while maintaining compatibility with the neighborhood.', 'In addition to City permits, childcare facilities are closely controlled by the California State Department of Social Services, which imposes its own requirements and limits the number of children based on spatial or other considerations. The project will be required to meet all State licensing requirements.', 'Planning Commission Action', 'On September 6, 2017, the Planning Commission held a public hearing on this application. Following staff’s presentation, the applicant provided testimony and 27 members of the public addressed the Commission, of which 21 were neighborhood residents speaking in opposition. Project opponents cited:', '· Complaints about traffic, which has greatly increased over the last year since the introduction of the Expo Line with at-grade crossing at Stewart Street. Many expressed fear that additional trips generated by the use at morning and evening peak hours would block the alley or increase the time it will take them to leave the street in the mornings;', '· Objection to using a residential home for a non-residential business;', '· Concern that the applicant’s proposal to bring children to Ishihara Park would displace residents’ access;', '· Concern that a front yard fence, requiring a modification, is incompatible with the neighborhood character on a street that is largely without fences; and', '· Worry that the facility will lead to neighborhood deterioration and reduced property values.', 'Members of the public who supported the project cited:', '· The need for more accessible, high-quality preschool programs to serve families in the Santa Monica community;', '· Support for the economic diversity aspect of the project;', '· Personal connection with and respect for the applicant’s character and vision; and', '· Personal testimony that living near a school is typical for the city’s neighborhoods and is not detrimental for neighbors (speaker living near elementary school).', 'The Planning Commission discussed the project’s merits, neighborhood concerns, draft findings and conditions. By a vote of 6-1, the Commission approved the Conditional Use Permit for the childcare facility use. Also by a vote of 6-1, the Commission approved a front-yard fence modification up to five feet (one foot less than requested), with conditions requiring that the fence step back from the property edge and have increased transparency and greenery. By unanimous vote, all three variances were approved. The Commission revised the conditions of approval to direct the applicant to explore the feasibility of revising the site plan to add another parking space at the rear, to require encouragement and assistance to employees to bike to work, and to conduct recruitment outreach to try to find qualified staff living locally within the City and particularly in the 90404 zip code. The applicant has accepted the Commission’s conditions of approval. Subsequent to the Planning Commission meeting, the applicant explored the feasibility of revising the site plan to add another parking space at the rear but found that this option was not feasible.', 'Additionally, the applicant voluntarily agreed to offer tuition assistance to low and moderate income families within the 90404 zip code to ensure that 1/3 of the children at the facility live within a ¼-mile radius. The applicant also voluntarily agreed to consult with Connections for Children and other members of the Early Childhood Wellbeing program to serve children most in need of services.', 'Entitlement Summary', 'The following summarizes the purposes for the requested entitlements in this application (statutory findings for all permits are included in Attachment B):', 'Conditional Use Permit (CUP): Pursuant to the findings contained in SMMC Section 9.41.060, a CUP may be approved to allow a use that is generally consistent with the purposes of the Zoning District where it is proposed but requires special consideration to ensure that it can be designed, located, and operated in a manner that will not interfere with the use and enjoyment of surrounding properties', 'Variance: Pursuant to the findings contained in SMMC Section 9.42.040, variances provide a mechanism for relief from the strict application of the Zoning Ordinance where the Ordinance would deprive the property owner of privileges enjoyed by similar properties because of the subject property’s unique and special conditions.', 'Fence Modification: Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.31.120.A, the Code allows childcare facilities to have front yard fences up to four feet in height by right, in order to comply with State regulations for enclosing play yards. Additional height requires a formal modification request, pursuant to the findings contained in SMMC Section 9.43.080. The applicant requested up to a six-foot fence, designed with stepback and landscaping. The Planning Commission approved a modification to allow a semi-transparent front yard fence with a maximum height of five feet, stepping back from the front retaining wall to provide sufficient greenery.', 'Site Plan with Landscaping', 'Discussion', 'The following analysis of the project’s consistency with the City’s General Plan goals and policies and compliance with the Zoning Code is followed by analysis of the appeal.', 'Childcare Uses: City Policies to Reflect a Priority Community Need', 'The City Council has acknowledged and addressed a community need to provide more high quality childcare in Santa Monica through prioritizing supportive policies in the General Plan Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE, Goal CE9) and the Child Care Master Plan. The goal reflects the community’s recognition that education begins prior to kindergarten. In fact, one of Council’s five strategic goals adopted in August 2015, Learn + Thrive, aligns with the decades of collaboration between the City, School District, College, non-profits, and residents to foster a lifelong learning community that thrives.', 'The Council has also established a Child Care & Early Education Task Force that meets regularly to actively support quality programs and access for all economic groups. Childcare is the first “step” in Santa Monica’s Cradle to Career initiative to support healthy development and well-being for the City’s youngest residents. According to Connections for Children (CFC), a regional childcare resource and referral agency that receives funding through the City’s Human Services Grants Program to improve access to quality early care, there are always low and moderate-income families seeking subsidized childcare on their waitlist. Typically, about 60% of these families are in the 90404 area code. The number changes constantly, but at recent points in time, there have been between 50 and 60 families with 80-100 children on the list. This data does not include families seeking childcare that are able to pay full tuition. There are no statistics on these families, which may be either residents or those who work in the City and desire childcare near work. CCS staff reviewing the proposed project have also noted that the applicant has outlined an operating plan that offers a full-day program, acceptance of children in need of tuition assistance, and collaboration with Connections for Children to accept families who qualify for childcare subsidies. In this way, the proposed facility particularly caters to the strongest need in the childcare network for high quality programs that accept subsidies and lower income children as participants.', 'Addressing Potential Use Conflicts through the CUP and Specific Use Standards', 'During the 2015 Zoning Ordinance revision, the Council implemented LUCE Goal CE9 and Policy CE9.1 to integrate childcare uses into the neighborhoods, by adopting specific use standards for compatibility and fee incentives. The Council expanded the potential locations for childcare facilities to all neighborhoods, including R1 Zoning Districts, through the discretionary CUP process. Childcare facilities are among the very few non-residential uses permitted in single-family zoning districts. The CUP requirement and Specific Use Standards, outlined in SMMC Section 9.31.120, reflect the expectation that there are potential conflicts to be addressed when allowing a childcare use in a residential neighborhood. Potential issues include daily vehicle trips and parking, noise, and the appearance and changed use of a residential home with a non-residential use. The Planning Commission’s approval of the application included conditions to address these issues, as discussed further below.', 'Compliance with Childcare and Early Education Facilities Specific Use Standards', 'The Zoning Ordinance Specific Use Standards were developed to address the particular characteristics, needs and potential impacts of childcare uses in order to facilitate development of high quality childcare while promoting compatibility with surrounding uses. In residential zones, through the CUP process, additional conditions can be included as appropriate to reflect the specific circumstances of the proposed facility in proximity to residential uses. The CUP conditions should protect neighborhood residents while ensuring that the facility is able to operate its educational and developmental program to provide high quality childcare and early education that meet the needs of working families.', 'The proposed project is required to be consistent with specific standards regulating Childcare and Early Education Facilities (SMMC 9.31.120). These standards pertain to: allowing a four-foot front yard fence, or higher with approval of a modification, to enclose a play yard; providing a minimum amount of outdoor play area space in compliance with State licensing requirements; limiting outdoor activity hours; allowing the Director to approve one required passenger loading space on the street adjacent to the facility; requiring compliance with State and other licensing requirements; and designating a neighborhood liaison to address concerns during both construction and operation of the facility. Draft conditions #2, #6, #9, #12 and #13 incorporate the Code’s operational requirements.', 'The specific use standards that reflect the facility’s physical design include providing sufficient indoor and outdoor space as required by State law, providing a passenger loading plan, and allowing higher front yard fences than typically allowed in residential zones to enclose a play yard. The proposal complies with the space requirements and the Mobility Division has reviewed and determined that the parking and passenger loading spaces shown on the site plan comply with the Code’s dimension, access and visibility requirements.', 'The Planning Commission approved a modification to allow the front yard fence up to five feet in height in order to facilitate the need for the fence to be four feet in height from the interior as required by State law due to the grade differential between the street and the property. The fence would be offset by 18” from the existing two-foot retaining wall at the property line, with landscaping required to soften the interface with the sidewalk. The fence height would be considered to be five feet per SMMC 9.04.050.D (Measuring Fence, Wall and Hedge Height), which states that the height of a fence located within five feet of a public sidewalk is measured from the closest point on the sidewalk. The fence would run for 29 feet along the front property line from the southwest corner. It would then turn back for 18 feet and continue at the full five foot height to the east property line. Fencing in the rear and side yards is permitted to be up to eight feet.', 'State requirements for childcare facilities specify that a fence must be designed to “keep children from leaving the outdoor activity area unnoticed but will not in and of itself present a hazard.” Accordingly, a fence need not be solid, but must ensure that children are not able to climb over it (see Fence/Wall Modification, below). The Planning Commission’s approval requires maximum transparency within these guidelines.', 'Conditions for Special Events', 'Quality childcare programs promote strong communications with the children’s parents. The applicant plans to hold regular Family Forums, which may be held during or outside of operational hours. These meetings gather parents who are familiar with the site and the rules for neighborhood consideration, but it is important for neighbors to receive communications about them if they are planned outside of regular operational hours. Condition #1 requires notice to properties within a 300-foot radius of the property at least one week in advance in such cases.', 'In addition, Condition #5 allows the PCD Director to approve up to two events annually based on the same findings required for Temporary Event Permits for activities related to the childcare but not specifically for the families, such as a fundraising event that is typical for non-profits. Notification would be required to neighbors within a 300-foot radius of the property. A request to hold the event must be submitted at least 45 days in advance. Although the applicant has stated that at this time, they do not anticipate doing these types of events, this condition sets forth appropriate limits and conditions to avoid disruption to the neighborhood should such an event be contemplated in the future.', 'Transportation/Parking', 'As described above, the applicant is providing the number of automobile and short-term bicycle parking spaces that the Code requires for this use. The Mobility Division has reviewed the parking dimensions and access and the proposed bike racks, determining that they are acceptable. Passenger loading is satisfied with one on-site space and a request (by variance) to substitute an on-street short-term parking space for the second loading space, which the Code allows the Director to approve on the street adjacent to the property. The main reason for requesting this substitution is to avoid passenger loading space standards that would negatively affect the neighborhood by changing the sidewalk and requiring removal of the street tree in front of the house.', 'The childcare use would introduce new weekday traffic patterns on the street in that up to 20 children would be dropped off in the mornings and picked up in the evenings Mondays through Fridays. Although some may be siblings, and some may carpool, walk or bicycle, it is inevitable that the childcare facility will result in additional trips to the location.', 'The peak morning drop-off time for the childcare facility would take place between 7:45 and 8:30 a.m. Parents are required by law to bring their children into the facility and sign them in, and to sign them out in the afternoon/evening when they pick them up.', 'Prior to the Planning Commission hearing, staff heard from several neighbors who expressed frustration about increased traffic on Delaware Avenue since the Exposition Line became operational last year. Their input indicates that Delaware Avenue has become a popular cut-through street during morning and evening peak hours when traffic on Stewart Avenue tends to back up. Changes to traffic patterns that have occurred since opening the Expo Line are unrelated to the current request, but are considered as an existing condition in terms of analysis of this request.', 'Neighbors sharing the alley with the property expressed concern about having their access blocked by parents’ cars in the mornings. A project condition (#10) requiring a drop-off and pick-up plan was developed in order to help control the additional trips to the street and alley to access the childcare facility and avoid inconvenience to the neighboring residents at these times. The drop off and pick up plan, subject to the Mobility Division’s approval prior to Certificate of Occupancy issuance, requires specific assignments to all parents to use either the street or the alley, with consideration to the anticipated arrival time of each family, in order to distribute trips. Parents would need to sign an agreement to drive and park in a manner that respects and avoids inconvenience to the neighborhood. The condition also requires all parents to sign a Drop-Off and Pick-Up Agreement, agreeing to abide by its terms.', 'The total number of 20 children is small enough that there is capacity between the rear loading space, the front short-term space and other nearby street parking or on-site parking spaces for parents to safely park and sign in their children. Parents do not generally bring their children to daycare all at the same time, and bringing or retrieving a child generally takes no more than 10 minutes, although it could be more if parents need to speak with staff or settle in their children. At times that staff has visited the site and observed use of street parking, it appears that the two-hour parking restriction keeps employees of nearby businesses from parking on the street, leaving ample street parking for the short-term needs of parents coming to the childcare. Based on the above, staff concludes that the proposed plan for dropping off and picking up children from the center is feasible and through its implementation, disruption to the neighborhood can be substantially avoided.', 'The applicant has stated that she intends to encourage alternatives to driving to the site, although the decisions that parents make are largely out of the applicant’s control. The applicant can actively encourage employees to rideshare, which could make on-site parking spaces available to meet other needs.  Condition #15 requires rideshare encouragement including transit passes and encouraging bike commuting. Condition #17 also encourages the applicant to demonstrate that a good faith effort has been made to recruit qualified staff that reside within the 90404 zip code.', 'Variance Analysis: Key Findings and Justification', 'Approval of the proposed Variances requires that the City Council make all nine of the required Variance findings pursuant to SMMC Section 9.42.040. All findings have been drafted to support the variances in Attachment B. Some findings of special note in considering approval of this Variance include:', '· There are special circumstances or exceptional characteristics applicable to the property that do not apply to other properties in the vicinity.', '· Granting of such variance will not be detrimental or injurious to the property or improvements in the general vicinity and District.', '· Strict application of the provisions of this Ordinance would result in practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships, not including economic difficulties or economic hardships.', '· Strict application of the provisions of this Ordinance would result in unreasonable deprivation of the use or enjoyment of the property.', 'Special Circumstances or Exceptional Characteristics', 'Finding 9.42.040(A) states the following:', '“There are special circumstances or exceptional characteristics applicable to the property involved, including size, shape, topography, mature trees, location, surroundings, identification as a Historic Resource, or to the intended use or development of the property that do not apply to other properties in the vicinity under an identical zoning classification.”', 'This finding is supported because the proposed childcare is an exceptional use in the R1 District so the “special circumstances” are due to the intended use of the property. The R1 parking standards are oriented toward compatibility of single-unit uses, which is the predominant use in the zoning district. While childcare facilities are conditionally permitted, the standards do not really consider the very different functioning of parking and loading for these uses as compared with single-unit homes. Enclosing the parking in a garage is not practical for this use, and it would necessitate a very large structure in order to meet ADA requirements, which are not applicable to single-unit homes. The childcare use must accommodate three parking spaces as well as at least one loading space on the property. Use of the front driveway in a similar manner to the previous residential use, which had a driveway that could be used for additional parking, meets the needs of the use. However, as a required space, it is not permitted, which is again a special circumstance occasioned by the proposed use. The last variance, to reduce one loading space and provide instead an on-street, short-term parking space, is also justified by the special circumstance of the childcare use, which is the only such use in the district that is allowed an on-street loading space. However, the Building Code requirements for passenger loading, as opposed to short-term parking, create a special circumstance because it would compel the applicant to modify the sidewalk and provide ADA-compliant ramps that would be incompatible with the neighborhood’s character, particularly because they would require removal of a mature street tree. Granting this variance addresses the conflict caused by these requirements, given the special circumstances of the childcare use.', 'Not Detrimental nor Injurious to Surroundings', 'Finding 9.42.040(B) states the following:', 'The granting of such variance will not be detrimental nor injurious to the property or improvements in the general vicinity and district in which the property is located.', 'The project provides all required parking, and one passenger loading space on-site. The Director may approve a second passenger loading space for a childcare facility on the adjacent street, but a short-term street parking space is requested in place of the on-street loading space in order to avoid the need to make right-of-way modifications that would be inconsistent with the character of the residential neighborhood street. In making this finding, it should be considered that neighborhood residents typically park their cars on front driveways, although driveways are not considered their required parking. Designating the front driveway as one of the three required parking spaces for the use supports the childcare’s activity while resulting in essentially the same use of the driveway as it served for the previous use as a residence and does not substantially alter the relationship of the property’s access to the street. Concerning the reduction of one loading space, with substitution of a short-term parking space, the Code already allows the Director to approve one on-street loading space in front of a childcare. The short-term space would not be injurious to the surrounding improvements in the general vicinity because it would function similarly and thus meet the intent of the Code requirement, while avoiding the interruption of the consistent, residential streetscape and street tree pattern. Furthermore, the space will be available for general use outside of the facility’s operating hours. Thus, this finding can be made for all three of the requested variances.', 'Practical Difficulties or Unnecessary Hardships', 'Finding 9.42.040(C) states the following:', '“The strict application of the provisions of this Ordinance would result in practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships, not including economic difficulties or economic hardships.”', 'The strict application of the Code, requiring alley-accessed parking in a garage and prohibiting parking in the front yard setback area, would result in hardship for the childcare use, which is required to provide a total five parking and loading spaces rather than the usual two spaces needed in this district. The requirement for parking in a garage accessed from the alley, combined with ADA requirements that do not normally apply to single-family homes, would result in the need to develop a large three-car garage structure. Providing such a structure would then leave insufficient space along the 50-foot property width to provide the required refuse, recovery and recycling storage and an accessible passenger loading space. Additionally, the childcare facility might be forced to reduce the amount of play area and possibly the number of children served in order to meet all parking location and access requirements in the rear of the property in an enclosed structure.  Furthermore, the garage structure would increase lot coverage and be less compatible with the surrounding properties. Concerning the reduction of one loading space, with substitution of a short-term parking space, the Code’s nomenclature that designates only a loading zone and not a short-term parking space option, would result in practical difficulties due to Building Code requirements to modify the sidewalk with ramps for ADA access that are not compatible with the single-unit residential area and not required for short-term parking. However, the short-term parking will provide equivalent service for the drop off and pick up of children at the childcare facility. Therefore, this finding can be made for all three of the requested variances.', 'Unreasonable Deprivation of the Use or Enjoyment of the Property', 'Finding 9.42.040(J) states the following:', '“The strict application of the provisions of this Ordinance would result in unreasonable deprivation of the use or enjoyment of the property.”', 'The General Plan encourages childcare and the Zoning Code conditionally permits the use in this single-family zoning district, but requires more parking than a residential use, while still within an enclosed garage. These locational requirements reflect residential needs and character, but on a typical lot such as the subject property, the requirements taken together become unreasonable for the establishment of a childcare facility. Requiring the applicant to construct a three-car garage in the rear of the property, as well as providing an ADA-compliant loading space would preclude optimal siting to meet the needs of the childcare, which deprives the applicant of the property’s use, including a potential reduction in play area and enrollment. Furthermore, due to the need for one space more than the typical single-family residential use in the R1 District, allowing the additional space to be located on the existing front driveway is necessary to allow the facility to serve 20 children, making it possible to develop a viable facility. In this way, the variances in combination provide relief from the strict application of the Zoning Ordinance to avoid unreasonable deprivation of the property’s use for providing childcare to the community, a use that is conditionally permitted in the R1 District.', 'Neighborhood Compatibility', 'In terms of form and physical appearance, the Code’s CUP findings require that a childcare facility have a physical design that is compatible and relates harmoniously to the surrounding neighborhood.', 'The proposed facility will utilize a structure that has been part of this single-family neighborhood for 67 years, making only minor changes to the exterior in order to comply with building code exiting requirements. Demolishing the existing garage would change the property’s appearance from the alley, but would have relatively little impact on the neighborhood’s appearance since it is a secondary structure not visible from the street, and surrounding properties have high rear walls. The applicant is developing a landscaping plan that creates a garden setting, with emphasis on a natural appearance in the front yard. This type of landscaping design is typical in front yards in single-family neighborhoods throughout Santa Monica and compatible with this street.', 'Placement of the required third parking space, discussed above, on the driveway (by variance) would be compatible with the pattern that exists on the street because it involves minor modification to the existing front driveway and follows the neighborhood pattern. It is typical in this neighborhood to park cars on the front driveway.', 'The most atypical feature of the childcare facility in relation to the surrounding street is the front yard fence, which State law requires in order for the area to be utilized for outdoor play yard space. Due to the slope of the lot, the existing front yard is raised two feet above the sidewalk level, and is held back by a retaining wall. The five-foot fence that the Planning Commission approved by modification would require some excavation of the front yard so that the interior of the fence would be no less than four feet to comply with State law. The fence would run along 29 feet of the property line and would be set 18” back from the existing front retaining wall. The setback space would be used to create a bench and landscaping that softens the effect that the fence will have on the street, which otherwise is mostly free of fences. As designed and conditioned, the fence maintains compatibility with the neighborhood to the greatest extent possible while meeting State requirements.', 'Landscape Architect’s rendering of proposed front fence and landscaping', 'The fence/wall modification findings, as summarized at the beginning of this report, are made to assure that the increased height of the fence is compatible and necessary to mitigate impacts from adjacent land uses, and that it will not be detrimental to the property, neighboring properties and the overall integrity of the neighborhood. These findings can be made because the Specific Standards for Childcare and Early Education Facilities explicitly recognize the potential need for higher front yard fences to enclose play yards that are required to meet State standards for these uses, which justifies the need for the fence. The design as conditioned is sensitive to the surroundings and therefore the fence would not be detrimental to the surrounding uses and neighborhood.', 'Condition #9 would require the Director to review the materials and style of the fence prior to issuance of building permits to ensure that it has the greatest possible transparency. The condition also requires removal of the fence should a residential use be reestablished in the future.', 'Noise', 'The proposed facility will provide full-time childcare (8:00 a.m. to 5:30 p.m.) for up to 20 children. Children dropped off earlier, between 7:30 a.m. and 8:00 a.m., would be required to remain indoors (Condition #4) as would those children still present after sunset (Condition #6). Some children may stay for an extended day until 6:00 p.m. Simultaneous activities would take place both indoors and outdoors, such that at any given time, groups of children are distributed around the center, utilizing the classrooms, and play yards on both sides of the property. The application states that the planned operations and itinerary would be such that it would be a highly unusual occurrence to have all children outside at the same time.', 'SMMC 4.12.025 (Noise Ordinance) provides the following general regulation:', 'It shall be unlawful for any person to make, produce, maintain, cause or permit to be made any noises or sounds in such manner so as to unreasonably disturb the peace, quiet and comfort of persons of normal sensitivity within the area of audibility or which are so harsh or prolonged or unnatural or unusual in their use, time or place as to cause physical discomfort to any person of normal sensitivity within the area of audibility.', 'The neighborhood is within Noise Zone 1, which restricts maximum daytime exterior noise standards (SMMC 4.12.060) to exceeding 60 dBA for a 15-minute continuous period and prohibits noises that exceed 65 dBA from continuing for more than 5 minutes. (For scale, 55 dBA measures a normal conversational level at close proximity and 60 dBA compares to being in the same room with a television on.)', 'The sound of children playing in their yards is a typical occurrence in a residential neighborhood, and the sound of children playing in a childcare setting is a similar type of normal, usual noise. Although sounds of children playing at the childcare would be more consistent during the daytime than at a typical single-family home, the premises would be quiet at night and on the weekends. The noise potential from the normal patterns of children’s play would not constitute the type of noise referred to above. Nevertheless, the conditions of approval specify compliance with the Noise Ordinance, and prohibit organized outdoor activities before 8:00 a.m. and after 6:00 p.m. or after sunset, whichever comes first, consistent with SMMC Section 9.31.120. Should noise reach a level that disturbs nearby neighbors, the on-site contact person (Condition #13) is required to be available to resolve conflicts during all hours of operation.', 'General Plan Consistency', 'LUCE goals and policy objectives seek to balance community priorities to achieve a vision of a sustainable city that promotes health and well-being for residents and non-residents who work, study or play in Santa Monica. In evaluating whether this project is consistent with the General Plan, it is necessary to look at policies for residential neighborhood preservation and for provision of an educational continuum that supports a healthy community, as both are LUCE goals. The CUP findings for General Plan consistency require considering how these goals, which address differing components of creating strong communities, are achieved.', 'The subject property is located within the Single Family Residential land use designation of the LUCE. LUCE Goal N1 aims to “protect, preserve and enhance the residential neighborhoods.” This goal’s policies aim to respect and preserve existing housing stock (N1.1), connect residents with local services within walking distance (N1.2), create places that promote sociability and human interaction (N1.3), and other policies to protect and adapt neighborhoods over time.', 'The LUCE emphasizes preservation of neighborhood character and scale, promoting the rehabilitation and long-term maintenance of existing structures and allowing only new development that is of a scale and character consistent with the existing neighborhood. The LUCE also strives to retain tree-lined streetscapes to conserve the character of the City’s neighborhoods.', 'This application demonstrates sensitivity to its location in a R1 single-unit residential zone through the preservation of the existing residential structure, design of the fence with transparency, the proposed limitation on the number of children, the drop-off and pick-up plan and the programming and design of indoor and outdoor play spaces for small groups of children to distribute activity and reduce noise levels.', 'The LUCE description of Single-Family Residential Districts does not specify childcare facilities as a typical use, as childcare centers were not previously allowed as a free-standing use. However, Policy CE9.1 LUCE, page 3.5-17) provided a policy foundation for Council to evaluate whether to permit such uses in all City neighborhoods:', 'CE9.1: Support the development of high quality child care and early education facilities and small and large family child care in homes to meet the needs of those who work or live in Santa Monica. Maintain streamlined processing and permit regulations, encourage harmonious integration with the neighborhood, and fee reductions as incentives.', 'A finding of consistency with the General Plan is also supported by the project’s consistency with LUCE and Child Care Master Plan goals to nurture the optimal growth, development and education of children and to support families. The Master Plan states that childcare and early education continue to be one of the most pressing concerns of contemporary family life and acknowledges the importance of quality, affordable and accessible child care and early education by committing to protect existing resources and expand their supply. LUCE Goal CE9 strives to integrate the childcare and early education needs of those who live or work in the community into the City’s land use planning process. This goal is implemented through Policy CE9.1 (above). Providing a safe place for children to spend their days learning and growing in a stimulating environment during hours that support working parents, implements City policies that aim to provide nurturing facilities for every baby born in Santa Monica “from cradle to career.”', 'The Planning Commission approval, as conditioned, is consistent with the LUCE objectives to encourage and prioritize childcare and to maintain the integrity of existing single-unit residential neighborhoods.', 'Appeal Summary', 'On September 20, 2017, Nada Shamonki, a Delaware Street resident who testified at the hearing and submitted written comments, filed an appeal of the Commission’s decision. Ms. Shamonki’s appeal notes that she represents “Residents for the Preservation of Gandara Park Neighborhood.” In an e-mail to staff, Ms. Shamonki described this group as “formed by a group of neighbors in the Gandara Park Neighborhood to inform and advocate for issues related to our neighborhood. We have not filed any formal formation documents and have relied on neighbors signed up. We currently have over 100 members that all live within our neighborhood. Members have all signed on in support of our appeal.” In the following language from the appeal statement (Attachment C), the appellant summarizes six primary reasons for requesting that the Council overturn the Commission’s decision:', '“1. Strong Opposition by Entire Neighborhood: The Proposed Preschool is opposed by almost every neighbor in the surrounding neighborhood, including all immediate neighbors. Gandara Park Neighborhood, although recently named, has a long history with some residents, especially those of Japanese-American descent that moved to the neighborhood, as it was one of the few places to allow Japanese-Americans to buy homes following their internment during World War II. Many of most impacted residents are Japanese-American internment camp survivors in their 80s and 90s.', '2. New Traffic: Traffic and parking in Gandara Park Neighborhood have already reached unmanageable levels, with local businesses using this stretch of Delaware for parking for their employees and Waze designating our streets as cut-throughs to avoid traffic on the 10 freeway, Olympic, Exposition and Centinela. Introducing at least 50 new car trips during peak hours on our small residential street will push it over the tipping point.', '3. Violates the LUCE: The Proposed Preschool violates the LUCE, because it eliminates existing housing stock and allows for the encroachment of commercial uses into quiet residential neighborhoods.', '4. Area is Already Over-Preschooled (sic): According to the 2014 RAND Study, Santa Monica has a "surplus of preschool spaces for city residents." There are already 46 preschools within 2 miles of the Proposed Preschool, 20 preschools, and 15 existing daycares located within a mile or less from the site. A new preschool in a residential neighborhood that already has too many preschools does not make sense and is not good City planning.', '5. Does Not Meet Mandatory CUP Findings: Before a CUP is granted, the SMMC requires that nine mandatory findings MUST be met. These findings are not met, including findings that it would not have an immediate adverse impact on the quality of life of the neighborhood and the fact that the Applicant is asking for changes that are inconsistent with the character of the existing neighborhood.”', 'The Appeal statement supports these points with further explanation in the 20 pages that follow in the appeal statement. A sixth point introduced on page 8 states that:', '“(C) The Planning Commission relied on inaccurate and unsubstantiated claims within the Report and did not perform its duty to properly investigate valid legal challenges and concerns raised by Gandara Park Neighborhood residents.”', '(Note that (A) and (B) on Page 8 of the appeal statement further detail points #3 and #5 above). The appeal analysis below responds to these six points to address all topics raised in the appeal narrative.', 'The Council’s hearing on the appeal is de novo, and as such, the Council may consider all aspects of the proposed project in rendering its decision, including the points of appeal, additional evidence presented by the applicant, appellant, staff and the public, and the draft findings and conditions.', 'Appeal Analysis', 'The following states and responds to each of the six points summarized above.', '#1: Strong Opposition by Entire Neighborhood:', 'The appellant states that she speaks for the entire neighborhood, which the appeal refers to as the Gandara Park Neighborhood. She references a number of elderly neighbors and states: “All of them strongly oppose the proposed preschool.” She also references families in the neighborhood with small children that are opposed and states: “All of us - regardless of race, ethnicity or socio-economic background - strongly oppose the Proposed Preschool…”', 'Response: The public hearing process is structured to allow an applicant to propose an allowed use on a property that requires a discretionary permit, subject to compliance with specified Code standards and findings. As a conditionally permitted use, findings for compatibility test whether the application meets the intent of the Code section that allows its use, is consistent with the general plan, and is compatible with the neighborhood. Decision-makers and the public receive all information in a transparent manner. In this case, variances and a fence modification were also requested, requiring consideration of additional findings. In addition to staff’s analysis, the hearing process provides opportunities to consider all points brought up by the applicant and any member of the public with an interest in the outcome of the decision. Often, there are both opponents and supporters of a project, as there were in this case, and all are given an opportunity to be heard, whether in writing prior to the hearing, in person at the hearing, or both.', 'In this case, the appellant’s opposition to the proposal and the testimony of many in the neighborhood objecting to the preschool were articulated both in writing and in person at the hearing. The Planning Commission was aware of this opposition when it made its decision. Weighing public testimony against other considerations of the project’s merits and compliance with the Code and General Plan, as well as justification of the variances and fence modification, the Commissioners used their discretion and voted to approve the use.', 'As a de novo hearing, the Council, like the Planning Commission, will hear all input, and will consider the statements of opposition together with the merits, findings and recommended conditions for approval. The Council must weigh the considerations of the application to provide a preschool on the applicant’s property against the appellant’s evidence of strong neighborhood opposition to this new use. The Council is often required to make difficult land use decisions and weighs all evidence before doing so. In terms of legal responsibility, the appellant’s statement that all neighbors oppose the application does not necessitate the reversal of the Planning Commission’s approval of the project.', '#2: New Traffic:', 'The appellant states: “Traffic and parking in Gandara Park Neighborhood have already reached unmanageable levels, with local businesses using this stretch of Delaware for parking for their employees and Waze designating our streets as cut-throughs to avoid traffic on the 10 freeway, Olympic, Exposition and Centinela. Introducing at least 50 new car trips during peak hours on our small residential street will push it over the tipping point.”', 'Response: A discussion of existing and anticipated traffic issues brought up by the appellants is provided below in response to #6. The 50 new car trips referenced is over the full day, not during each peak period, as the proposed childcare facility is estimated to introduce a maximum of 26 trips in the a.m. period and 26 in the p.m. period. These trips would be staggered, with employees arriving at different times based on schedule and children arriving in a controlled pattern based on assigned loading place and time. Unfortunately, the City does not have recent data on this street to compare this number to the current daily trip count.', 'Staff does not have any evidence to confirm the claim that Delaware Avenue is used for parking by nearby businesses. However, the street does have preferential parking restrictions, and is limited to two-hour parking during the day. Staff’s observations of the street during the daytime have indicated a great deal of available street parking.', '#3: Violates the LUCE:', 'The appellant states: “The Proposed Preschool violates the LUCE, because it eliminates existing housing stock and allows for the encroachment of commercial uses into quiet residential neighborhoods.”', 'Response: The proposed preschool will utilize the existing house and adapt the interior for compliance with State requirements for early education facilities. As such, it does not eliminate existing housing stock, although it does change the use. While a preschool is a business, it is qualitatively different from typical commercial businesses. The Zoning Code includes Child Care and Early Education Facilities within the “Public and Semi-Public” use classification, implying that its character is similar to a public use, such as a school. Preschools are conditionally permitted in the R1 zoning district while other commercial uses are not permitted. As such, approval of a preschool is not a harbinger of commercial encroachment. Furthermore, preschools have enrollment processes and admit a specific group of children who come regularly to the location. The use does not invite walk-in traffic or transient customers into the neighborhood.', 'LUCE policies for the Pico Neighborhood focus on neighborhood character through maintenance of existing structures and adoption of development standards. (Policy N11.5, p. 2.2-27). This is consistent with the citywide land use policy (LU1.4, p. 2.1-11) of “Retention of Existing Structures” to conserve neighborhood character. The proposed project maintains the existing structure, which is currently vacant and in need of maintenance to become habitable again. By conserving the existing home, and using it to provide a community service for the Pico Neighborhood, the proposed project is consistent with the LUCE approach to neighborhood conservation. Support for the finding of General Plan consistency for this project is also discussed earlier in this report.', '#4: Area is Already Over-Preschooled', 'The appeal cites a 2014 RAND Study that stated that Santa Monica has a surplus of preschool spaces for City residents. “There are already 46 preschools within 2 miles of the proposed preschool and 20 preschools and 15 existing daycares located within a mile or less from the site. A new preschool in a residential neighborhood that already has too many preschools does not make sense and is not good City planning” (p. 2).', 'Response: The RAND Study sought “to provide the City and SMMUSD with the data and analysis required to deliver effective and sustainable early and school-age care programs…” (Rand Report, page 3, included in Attachment C) The report was based on 2011 data, and cited a population of approximately 3,600 children under the age of five. The most current available data on the US Census site (www.census.gov/quickfacts <http://www.census.gov/quickfacts>) for July 2016 estimates that this number has grown somewhat since this time to 4.1% of the population of 92,478, or 3,800 children under five years old.', 'In noting a “surplus of preschool places for city residents,” the RAND study did not infer that there were too many preschools in Santa Monica, but rather that at that particular point in time, the available preschool age childcare facilities met resident needs and still had some room for nonresidents seeking childcare near their jobs in Santa Monica. The context of the statement in the RAND study was to note that high quality childcare is an important economic development tool in terms of attracting a skilled workforce. The report also contrasted the availability of preschool places with the City’s lack of toddler places for ages 0-2 and suggested ways to improve access and participation as well as support development of high quality facilities.', 'The significance of the two-mile radius noted in the appeal statement is unclear, as that distance encompasses most of Santa Monica and extends into the City of Los Angeles. According to State Community Care Licensing database (as of 10/12/17), there are 54 preschool centers (ages 2-5), 12 infant/toddler centers (0-2 years), 19 large family day care homes, and 11 small family day care homes in Santa Monica. Of the preschool centers, 18 are located in 90404. The two closest centers to the proposed preschool are located just south of the 10 Freeway on Virginia Avenue and Pico Boulevard.', 'It is generally difficult to provide accurate estimates for total childcare need as there is no central mechanism that gathers this data for the entire community. Connections for Children (CFC), a regional child care resource and referral agency that is funded through the City’s Human Services Grants Program to improve access to quality early care, keeps an eligibility waiting list of lower income families looking for subsidized childcare. This list changes constantly, even daily, reflecting family circumstances for parents and many other factors. Working families eligible for subsidy often have a hard time locating providers that will accept this subsidy and offer full-time care. Of those waiting to place children ages 0-5, generally about 60% reside in the 90404 zip code, according to CFC. The City’s Human Services Division, which administers City programs in support of childcare and staffs the Childcare Task Force agrees that there is a clear need for more childcare centers, such as the proposed facility, that offer full-time slots and accept subsidies.', 'Notwithstanding the above discussion of childcare supply and demand, establishing that a childcare facility is “needed” in the City is not a criterion for its approval. While the City adopts general plan goals and zoning regulations, individual property owners, businesses and developers initiate projects and implement development on their properties within the framework of the regulations. In doing so, applicants indicate their assessment that there is demand for the service they propose to provide. The Zoning Code may incorporate incentives for desired uses and it may prohibit or limit less desired uses. The zoning process assumes that the market will generally balance supply and demand. If an application complies with Code requirements and the findings can be made in a positive manner, the demand or need for the use is not a review criterion unless the Code contains a quota for a particular use. There is no such limitation on childcare facilities.', '#5: Does Not Meet Mandatory CUP Findings:', 'The appeal statement states that findings were not made to support the issuance of a CUP, and in one place, on page 19, states that findings were not provided to support the Variances. The appeal finds fault with the report, which focused on key variance findings and summarized CUP findings and did not further elaborate on other required findings. The statement claims that the Commission “did not perform its duty to properly investigate the valid ethical, moral and legal objections raised by Gandara Park Neighborhood residents to the Preschool.”', 'Response: The staff report narrative summarized the approach to analyzing the request in terms of the mandatory findings of fact and highlighted key issues for Commissioners to consider, including neighborhood compatibility. The narrative discussed issues of compatibility such as noise, trips and parking, the proposed fence, and site design matters. The staff report also included attachments with more detailed information and application materials, which are also considered an integral part of the staff report. Attachment B to the staff report, the draft Statement of Official Action (referred to as the STOA), contained language for making all findings for the CUP, variances, and modification in a positive manner for the Commission’s consideration. By adopting those findings with small adjustments that were read into the record, the Commission performed its legal duty to make all findings required in the Zoning Code. The final signed STOA, reflecting the decisions made on September 6, 2017, was approved at a subsequent meeting on October 4, 2017 and accepted by the applicant (Attachment F).', 'The appeal statement does not specify which findings the appellant believes were not made, but the narrative indicates particular disagreement with findings of neighborhood compatibility (CUP finding #5 and Variance finding #5). The appellant indicates that a childcare use located in one of the single-family homes on the street is fundamentally incompatible with the residential uses that occupy all other properties. The appellant states that “this tiny neighborhood cannot stand to lose its right to retain its strictly R1 zoning” (Appeal, p. 6), and that “the Proposed Preschool cannot be designed, located and operated in a manner that will not interfere with the use and enjoyment of the surrounding properties as required by applicable law (p. 13). These statements, and other statements opposing the project made during the Planning Commission review process, appear to indicate the appellant’s contention that any childcare facility in one of the homes on this street or within the neighborhood would be incompatible and would impair the integrity and character of the district.', 'While the appellant asserts that a childcare facility is fundamentally incompatible in a R1 residential district, the Council has determined that childcare and early educational uses can be compatible in a R1 District when it revised the Zoning Ordinance in 2015 to allow the use through the CUP process, and established specific use standards. Once established as a conditionally permitted land use, the finding is properly made by examining the individual request and characteristics of the proposed site development and operations to ensure that it meets the standards and intent of the Code. In this particular case, the Planning Commission considered the proposed operation serving 20 children in the existing structure, with a drop-off/pick-up plan and restrictions on hours and outdoor play in the early morning along with other specific conditions of approval and found that, as conditioned, the proposed project meets all the findings of compatibility for the CUP, variance and modification.', '#6: The Planning Commission relied on inaccurate and unsubstantiated claims within the Report and did not perform its duty to properly investigate valid legal challenges and concerns raised by Gandara Park Neighborhood residents.', 'The appellant claims that the report was deficient in the following way (p. 18 of appeal statement):', "§ The Report mischaracterizes the neighbors' knowledge of the Proposed Preschool before the August 20 informational meeting hosted by the Applicant. The Report also omits or minimizes the negative reactions of residents to the Proposed Preschool.", 'o Response: The report provided information about neighborhood outreach efforts that the applicant documented in the application and about the neighborhood meeting at which staff was present.', 'In terms of notification of this request prior to the August 20th meeting, staff can confirm that the application, submitted on May 18, 2017, included proof of the required site notice posted on the property, and staff received some phone calls around the time that it was posted. The hearing date was added on June 27, 2017. Although callers expressed concern and had questions, and concerns expressed at the August 20th meeting were noted in the staff report along with one letter of opposition that had been received, the level of vocal neighborhood concern increased significantly after the report was released and at the hearing. There was no intent to mischaracterize opposition to the proposal.', '§ The Report fails to provide any credible evidence for its purported justification for the school.', 'o Response: Although the appellant clearly disagrees with the analysis in the staff report, the report does cover all relevant topics associated with analysis of potential impacts that may be attributable to the use. The report and findings, taken together, provided sufficient justification to support the Commission’s conclusion that the application may be approved.', '§ The Report makes conclusory statements minimizing the impact of the Proposed Preschool on the traffic and safety of the neighborhood… Despite the obvious disruption that this business will bring to the neighborhood, the Report casually dismisses those disruptions and concludes - without any evidentiary support and often by relying on the “evidence” provided by the Applicant - that the disruptions will be minimal to neighborhood or solved by the “solutions” suggested in the Report…', 'o Response: Staff analysis focused on this project’s potential trip generation and its effects on the neighborhood and does not either minimize or inflate the expected trips to the street from up to 20 children being dropped off and picked up five days a week, and up to six staff arriving as scheduled. The project provides the Code-required number of parking and loading (or short-term) spaces, and the conditions of approval require transit subsidies and encouragement of non-driving alternatives. Because the use is not residential, childcare staff will not be eligible for permit parking placards, so staff will not be able to use street parking for more than two hours. Street parking by parents will be for short periods that will not impact the parking supply for the neighborhood because in the mornings the neighborhood residents will be parked first and in the evenings, if loading spaces are taken, parents will use street parking for short stays only. After 6:00pm and on weekends, there will be no change from the present conditions on the street.', 'To address neighborhood concerns and distribute these trips, a drop-off and pick-up plan is required as a condition of approval. With optimal utilization of front and rear loading spaces, considering the facility’s maximum enrollment of 20 children, adhering to this plan can ensure that trips to the childcare avoid overwhelming the street and alley. Parents will have specific assignments and will sign binding agreements as a condition for sending the children to Untitled #1.', '§ The Report completely ignores the already impacted condition of the neighborhood … and (fails) to even mention the Traffic Plan implemented in the past by the City to keep traffic out of our R1 neighborhood.', 'o Response: Staff analysis does not minimize or ignore resident concerns regarding cut-through traffic in the neighborhood. The Traffic Engineering Division has not yet studied these impacts and thus no data exists to substantiate the claims of cars using the street in the mornings and evenings that did not exist prior to the Expo Line.', 'The appeal cites large projects in the pipeline in the area north of Exposition Boulevard (the Bergamot Area Plan area) as another justification to deny the preschool and states that the approval did not consider these projects. Staff disagrees that current traffic and anticipated traffic that may be generated by new commercial projects north of this neighborhood are factors for consideration in this application, which is a small-scale reuse of an existing building that is categorically exempt from CEQA and thus does not require a traffic study.', 'The City’s Traffic Engineering Division has confirmed that it does not have a “Traffic Plan” for this neighborhood. Traffic-calming measures referenced by the appellant were implemented as part of the 2004 Lantana Development Agreements, including bulb-outs and turning restriction signs that were installed in 2008. However, the Expo Line extension project did not introduce new traffic measures. At this time, further study or development of a Traffic Plan in this neighborhood is not in the division’s approved budget and work plan.', '§ The Report concludes, without any evidentiary support, that the significant increase in noise from this business will not impact the neighborhood. However, a large percentage of the residents on Delaware are elderly retirees who will be home during day when this business is operating. All our elders oppose the Proposed Preschool. Our elders crave and cherish what calmness and tranquility remains in our neighborhood after years of watching new developments spring up around their home.', 'o Response: The appellant does not substantiate claims that elderly residents will suffer from the sounds of children playing. The Commission staff report did state that the sound of children playing is not incompatible in a residential area, and staff reaffirms this analysis because residential neighborhoods are places for children to live, gather and play. At the Planning Commission hearing, there were seniors who voiced concern about the potential noise from children’s play, and the approval is conditioned to require compliance with the Noise Ordinance, and more importantly, for the applicant to maintain a Good Neighbor policy with a contact person to address any nuisance of which they are made aware.', 'Many of these same concerns were included in a 21-page letter emailed on the evening of September 5, 2017, to the Planning Commissioners and staff. Although the timing precluded inclusion of the letter’s points in the Planning Commission staff report, which had already been released, Commissioners received the information and thus were able to review that information as part of their deliberations. If the Commissioners had determined that the information presented in the letter warranted additional investigation, the hearing could have been continued with direction to staff. The Commission chose not to take up appellant’s suggestion to conduct further study and declined to delay their action.', 'In conclusion, the Planning Commission and the public received full information about the application, the Zoning Code and General Plan, the conditions proposed to ensure compatibility between the use and surrounding neighborhood and the public hearing. Neighborhood opposition and community support were expressed using the transparent public hearing structure and a decision was made. The appellant, representing a large group in the neighborhood, has expressed ongoing opposition to allowing this type of use in an R1 neighborhood, and the above discussion has responded to the specific points, concluding with staff’s recommendation to approve the application, upholding the Commission’s decision.', 'Community Outreach and Comments', 'In the application materials, the applicant provided documentation of her communications with neighbors about proposing a new childcare center prior to purchasing the property and submitting the application (see Attachment D).', 'Soon after the site was posted for the Planning Commission hearing, staff received three phone calls from neighbors expressing concerns that the proposed center would lead to loss of residential stock in this relatively small neighborhood and increase car trips on Delaware Avenue. These neighbors noted that since the establishment of the Expo Line and delays on Stewart Street when the gates close to allow trains to pass, Delaware Avenue has experienced increased cut-through traffic at certain times of day. Callers expressed concern that the facility would add trips to the street’s current traffic flow at times that they stated are already becoming problematic.', 'On the afternoon of August 20, 2017, the applicant, Laila Taslimi, held a neighborhood meeting at the subject site attended by 29 neighbors, as well as her design team and the co-chair of the Childcare Task Force. City staff was also present and answered technical questions about the application and hearing process. At the meeting, Ms. Taslimi and her team provided details of the site, building and operational plans and then opened the meeting to questions and comments. Ms. Taslimi explained her plan to open the center as a registered non-profit organization next year with 12 children of mixed economic backgrounds, expanding gradually to reach the maximum of 20 children.', 'Meeting participants, some of whom had previously spoken with staff as discussed above, brought up several concerns about the proposed childcare facility. Some stated that they oppose the use entirely and are concerned that it would set a precedent for the replacement of single-family homes with business uses. They were concerned about neighborhood traffic and additional use of the street in the mornings and evenings. Some cited recent increasing crime, and stated that bringing the families of children served by the use would introduce more people to become familiar with the neighborhood, which may lead to more crime on their quiet street. Furthermore, they expressed that they were not favorable toward the applicant’s plans to take small groups of children to Ishihara Park, which they viewed as belonging to the nearby residents. The applicant and others present noted that Ishihara Park is a public park and not highly utilized on weekdays.', 'Other neighborhood participants at the meeting expressed support for having this childcare in the neighborhood to meet the needs of working parents and create a sense of community through the concept of a preschool based on economic integration and pluralistic education.', 'To reduce the impact on morning and evening traffic volumes, the applicant suggested at the meeting that it would be reasonable and feasible to assign parents to specific drop-off/pick-up locations, balancing use of the front and back parking spaces. She stated that employees would park in the three on-site spaces and that she planned to provide transit passes to those who would commute by transit rather than drive. Condition #10 includes distribution of child drop-off and pick-up, and Condition #15 requires the applicant to offer rideshare incentives to employees.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The proposed change of use from a single-family home to a childcare facility is exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act pursuant to CEQA Guideline Section 15303(a). This Class 3 exemption applies to the construction of small structures including single-family homes or to the conversion of existing small structures from one use to another where only minor modifications are made in the exterior of the structure.', 'The property is not listed on the City’s Historic Resources Inventory.', 'Alternative Actions', 'As an alternative to the staff recommendation, the Council may choose to grant the appeal based on revised findings and deny the CUP (17ENT-0075), Variance (17ENT-0147) and Fence Modification (17ENT-0148).', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2829'}], [{'Title': 'Introduction for First Reading of an Interim Ordinance Establishing Interim Development Standards in the R1 Zoning District Pending Adoption of Permanent Revisions to the R1 Development Standards', 'Department': 'City Planning (PCD)', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading an interim ordinance establishing interim development standards in the R1 zoning district.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'A core principle of the City’s adopted Land Use and Circulation Element, as stated in LUCE Goal LU1, is that the diversity and uniqueness of the City’s residential neighborhoods are protected by a policy framework under which the existing housing stock and character is respected, conserved, and enhanced. The LUCE identifies retention of the existing single-unit housing stock and design standards that allow for compatible development as important tools that promote the long-term stability of existing R1 neighborhoods. As stated in Policy LU1.1, the protection of neighborhoods is part of a balanced land use strategy that redirects investment pressure away from existing neighborhoods by providing opportunities for housing production and local-serving uses on commercial boulevards and transit-adjacent areas. Policies LU1.2 and N4.1 also call for establishing conservation strategies that manage and control the scale, type, rate, and compatibility of change occurring in existing neighborhoods. Reducing the development potential, as proposed by this interim ordinance, may discourage land speculation.', 'Drawing from the policy framework set forth in the LUCE, a key purpose of the R1 zoning district is to ensure that the scale and design of new development and alterations to existing structures are consistent with the scale, mass, and character of the existing residential neighborhood. Recent trends in permit activity in R1 neighborhoods show that new home construction is often double or triple the size of existing homes, resulting in substantial changes in the existing character of R1 neighborhoods.', 'As part of Council’s discussion on City Planning Division priorities, on January 9, 2018, City Council directed staff to bring back interim zoning standards in the R1 zoning district that would temporarily reduce the size and scale of new single unit dwelling construction in order to ensure the character of existing R1 neighborhoods is preserved. Council specifically directed staff to consider reducing maximum parcel coverage by 20%, limiting maximum building height to 25 feet, and excluding accessory dwelling units from parcel coverage calculations. Staff has considered the Council direction, the public input received, and completed their own analysis. In keeping with the Council’s interest to reduce the size of new single unit dwellings and for consistency in implementation of the interim standards, staff has added associated changes to upper level stepback requirements.', 'Background', 'As part of Council’s discussion on City Planning Division priorities, Council determined that a revision to the R1 standards was of high importance. Council directed staff to prepare an interim ordinance that would temporarily reduce the size and scale of new homes pending a public process to study revisions to the R1 zone development standards.', 'In addition to the input at the January 9, 2018 City Council meeting, staff has received numerous inquiries from concerned community members regarding the size of new home construction and the redevelopment of older housing stock. There is overall concern that the sizes of new single-unit dwellings are changing the character of existing R1 neighborhoods. On October 5, 2016, in response to public correspondence and testimony, the Planning Commission held a discussion about the rapid change occurring in the R1 zoning district citywide. At the time, the Commission had previously reviewed Variances for homes 9,000-11,000 square feet in size. On December 1, 2016, the Planning Commission submitted a letter to the City Council requesting that Council direct staff to prepare a comprehensive review of citywide R1 zoning standards. A comprehensive review of R1 development standards has not occurred since selected amendments were made approximately 20 years ago.', 'In a review of permit data from the last five years, staff has found that the number of  permits issued for new home construction has remained relatively consistent. The average floor area of new homes has been approximately 5,000 square feet. The average parcel coverage has been approximately 55%. In a comparison of new home size compared to existing homes over the past three years, staff found that new homes have been approximately two to three times larger than existing homes (while 2013-2014 data is available for average existing home size, due to time limitations in preparing this staff report, staff was only able to compile 2015-2017 data). In looking at demolition data over the past three years, the City has received approximately 70 applications per year. The number of demolition permits issued regardless of when the applications were submitted has remained relatively consistent at approximately 40 per year. As of the writing of this staff report, there are currently 33 pending demolition permit applications. Table 1 summarizes permit activity for new single-unit dwellings.', 'Table 1: Summary of Permit Activity for Single Unit Dwellings in R1 Zone 2013-2017', 'No. of Building Permits Issued', 'Average New SUD Size', 'Average New Parcel Coverage', 'No. of Demo Permits Issued', 'Average Existing SUD Size', '2013', '34', '5,480 SF', '52%', '36', '-', '2014', '51', '5,386 SF', '54%', '35', '-', '2015', '34', '4,735 SF', '55%', '36', '1,588 SF', '2016', '30', '4,828 SF', '59%', '41', '2,140 SF', '2017', '38', '4,809 SF', '55%', '36', '1,835 SF', 'As put forth in SMMC Section 9.07.010, the relevant key purposes of the R1 zoning district are to:', '“B. Preserve and protect the existing character and state of the City’s different residential neighborhoods and the quality of life of City residents against potential deleterious impacts related to development—traffic, noise, air quality, and the encroachment of commercial activities.', 'C. Ensure adequate light, air, privacy, and open space for each dwelling.', 'E. Ensure that the scale and design of new development and alterations to existing structures are consistent with the scale, mass, and character of the existing residential neighborhood.', 'G. Promote the rehabilitation and long-term maintenance of existing structures.”', 'The number of demolition permits has kept pace with building permits issued for new home construction. Based on research of redevelopment that has occurred in R1 neighborhoods over the past five years, the average size of new homes is at least double the size of the demolished homes that they replaced. In these instances, the parcel coverage, mass, and scale of the new home were increased compared to the prior home. As shown in Figure 1, mapping the locations of building permits issued for redevelopment in R1 neighborhoods demonstrates that there are areas where entire blocks of neighborhoods are undergoing irreversible change in character due to the size and scale of new homes. If prior trends continue, the existing character of existing R1 neighborhoods would be permanently changed, inconsistent with the stated purpose of the R1 zoning district.', 'Figure 1: Building and demolition permits issued in R1 neighborhoods 2013-2017', 'Discussion', 'The proposed interim zoning ordinance includes changes to development standards that are intended to reduce the overall building envelope including parcel coverage, building height, and upper story stepbacks. In order to ensure that accessory dwellings units are not inadvertently affected by the parcel coverage limitations, detached accessory dwelling units would be excluded from parcel coverage.', 'Parcel Coverage', 'Maximum parcel coverage is a ratio of building footprint to parcel size. The interim ordinance proposed that parcel coverage be reduced by 20% from existing standards. In the North of Montana and Sunset Park R1 neighborhoods, maximum cumulative parcel coverage is currently 61%, which is allocated to a maximum of 35% on the first floor and 26% on the second floor. Second floor parcel coverage may be increased to 30% with a corresponding decrease in first floor parcel coverage. As a general standard that is applicable citywide unless specified in particular geographic areas, maximum parcel coverage is currently 50%. In the Expo/Pico R1 neighborhood, maximum parcel coverage is currently 40%, except that parcels between 3,001 and 5,000 square feet in area may have a parcel coverage of no more than 50 percent, and parcels of 3,000 square feet or smaller may have a parcel coverage of no more than 60 percent.', 'The proposed interim ordinance would reduce overall maximum parcel coverage and maximum first and second floor parcel coverage by 20%, consistent with Council’s direction. Table 2 outlines the existing parcel coverage and the proposed parcel coverage with the 20% reduction applied.', 'Table 2: Comparison of Existing and Proposed Parcel Coverage', 'General Standard (citywide)', 'North of Montana', 'Sunset Park/', 'North of Wilshire', 'Expo/Pico', 'Existing', 'Proposed', 'Existing', 'Proposed', 'Existing', 'Proposed', 'Existing', 'Proposed', 'One-story structure not exceeding 18 feet in height', '50%', '40%', '50%', '40%', '50%', '40%', '--', '--', 'Maximum Cumulative Parcel Coverage', '--', '--', '61%', '48%', '61%', '48%', '40%', '3,001-5,000 sf parcel – 50%', '3,000 sf or smaller – 60%', '32%', '3,001-5,000 sf parcel – 40%', '3,000 sf or smaller – 48%', 'Ground Floor', '--', '--', '35%', '28%', '35%', '28%', '--', '--', '2nd Floor', '--', '--', '26%', '20%', '26%', '20%', '--', '--', 'Maximum 2nd Floor Increase (Resulting Ground Floor Max)', '--', '--', '30% (31%)', '24% (24%)', '30% (31%)', '24% (24%)', '--', '--', 'Maximum Ground Floor Increase (Resulting 2nd Floor Max)', '--', '--', '40% (21%)', '32% (16%)', '40% (21%)', '32% (16%)', '--', '--', 'Maximum Building Height', 'Maximum building height is generally 28 feet citywide. An exception is in the North of Montana neighborhood where maximum building height is currently 32 feet.', 'The proposed interim ordinance would reduce maximum building height in all R1 zoning districts to 25 feet. This revised building height would still permit two-story homes but would reduce the scale and mass of new buildings, particularly from neighboring properties.', 'Additional Minimum Stepbacks for Upper Stories', 'This development standard is intended to require modulation on the front, rear, and sides of upper portions of new buildings. An upper story stepback is currently required above 14 feet in height on all sides.', 'In order to make this requirement consistent with the reduced building height in the interim ordinance and relevant to the upper portions of new buildings, the upper story stepback would apply starting at the second story, instead of commencing at an arbitrary 14-foot height. This change is necessary to be consistent with the reduced maximum building height, should the second story start at less or greater than 14 feet.', 'Detached Accessory Dwelling Units Parcel Coverage Exemption', 'Accessory Dwelling Units (ADUs) are encouraged by State law. In order to ensure that ADUs continue to be encouraged, Council directed that ADUs be exempted from parcel coverage calculations. ADUs may either be attached (i.e. included within the envelope of the primary dwelling) or detached (i.e. separated from the primary dwelling). In reviewing this direction more carefully, staff found that it would be prudent to limit the parcel coverage exemption to only detached ADUs or portions of detached accessory buildings that contained ADUs. If attached ADUs were exempted from parcel coverage calculations, it could subvert the intent of the interim ordinance to reduce the sizes of primary residences.', 'Applicability of Interim Ordinance', 'An interim ordinance is effective 30 days after second reading of the ordinance. However, the applicability of the ordinance is a Council policy decision. Since Council’s direction to staff to prepare an interim ordinance on January 9, staff has received numerous public inquiries regarding the applicability of the interim ordinance. The greatest concern has been expressed by property owners who have been working on plans for some time and are preparing to submit plan check applications but would be significantly impacted with re-design if the interim ordinance were applied retroactively. Staff is unable to speculate as to how many homeowners are in the situation of having invested significant time and expense in preparing plans based on existing standards. However, at present there are currently 23 pending plan checks for new single unit dwellings in the R1 zone. All projects that have obtained a building permit, are currently under construction, or are in plan check would not be subject to this interim ordinance. Council could consider the following options for applicability of the interim ordinance:', '· Option A (Staff’s Recommendation) – “Reachback”: The interim ordinance would apply to all development projects located in a R1 zoning district that have not submitted complete plan check applications as of January 23, 2018, as that will be the first date that Council holds a public hearing on the interim ordinance.', '· Option B – “Regular Applicability”: The interim ordinance would apply to all development projects located in a R1 zoning district that have not submitted complete plan check applications as of 30 days from second reading of the ordinance. The concern of delaying the applicability date of the interim ordinance is that there would likely be a rush to file plan check applications before the interim standards could take effect. This could have the effect of undermining the opportunity to study revised standards in the R1 zone.', 'Comprehensive Update to the R1 Development Standards', 'The proposed interim ordinance would represent a temporary measure to reduce the maximum allowable size of new single-unit dwellings in the R1 zoning districts. A more comprehensive update to the R1 Development Standards, which was identified as a high City Planning priority by Council on January 9, 2018, will require a significant public engagement process regarding the appropriate character and scale of new construction and additions in R1 neighborhoods which could begin in the second half of FY2018-19.', 'Environmental Analysis', 'The proposed interim ordinance is categorically exempt from the provisions of California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to 15061(b)(3) of the State Implementation Guidelines (common sense exemption). Based on the evidence in the record, it can be seen with certainty that there is no possibility that the proposed interim ordinance may have a significant effect on the environment. The recommended interim ordinance represents a temporary change to regulatory standards and would not allow more mass or floor area within the Zoning Ordinance than existing regulations. Therefore, no further environmental review under CEQA is required.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. The proposed interim ordinance has the potential to impact property tax revenue, however staff is unable to predict the exact impact at this time.'], 'MeetingID': '1133', 'ID': '2854'}]]
[[{'Title': 'Proclamation: 2018 Homeless Count Week', 'Department': '2: Special Agenda Items', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2843'}, {'Title': "Recognition of Santa Monica Fire Fighters' Fortitude, Dedication, and Valor in Fighting the Skirball, Creek, and Thomas Fires", 'Department': "City Manager's Office, Administration", 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '02. Special Agenda Items', 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2847'}], [{'Title': 'Authorization for final payment to the City of Los Angeles for the Cost-sharing Monitoring Plan Memorandum of Agreement for the Santa Monica Bay Beaches Bacterial Total Maximum Daily Load', 'Department': 'Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to approve the cost-share payment in the amount of $75,485.30, including $66,888.62 for Fiscal Year 2016-17 and exceedances of $8,596.68 for Fiscal Year 2015-16, to the City of Los Angeles to comply with the cost-share monitoring plan with the Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board’s Bacterial Total Maximum Daily Load requirements for the Santa Monica Bay Beaches.2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'As a municipal agency within the boundaries of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit system of Los Angeles County, the City of Santa Monica is part of a regional partnership of cities responsible for improving water quality for Santa Monica Bay. As a partner, the City is obligated to comply with requirements of a Total Maximum Daily Load (TMDL) to reduce pollution from urban runoff into the Bay. A TMDL requires a monitoring plan to collect data on water quality prior to and after a TMDL is implemented to demonstrate compliance with water quality objectives. As a member of the jurisdiction that drains into the Bay watershed, the City is responsible to share the costs of implementing a water quality monitoring plan for the Santa Monica Bay Beaches Bacterial TMDL that has been established for this watershed. Thus, the City has had a three-year renewable Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) with the City of Los Angeles since 2003 to share these costs.', 'The most recent Santa Monica Bay Beaches Bacterial TMDL cost-sharing MOA 2013-17 expired on June 30, 2017. Unlike past three-year MOAs, the 2013 MOA was a four-year term. However, when Council approved the 2013 MOA, funds were encumbered to cover the costs for the first three years, but not the fourth year. Therefore, staff is asking Council to approve the recommended action to increase the budget, and allow the City to pay the charges incurred during the fourth year (FY 16-17) of the MOA. The one-year FY 16-17 cost, to be paid during FY 17-18 from the Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax Fund, is not to exceed $75,485.30.', 'Background', 'The Federal Clean Water Act (CWA) requires the California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region (Board), to develop water quality standards that identify beneficial uses, and criteria to protect beneficial uses, for each water body found within its region. Beneficial uses include swimming, fishing, drinking water, navigability, and wildlife habitats and reproduction. Section 303(d) of the CWA requires states to prepare a list of water bodies that do not meet water quality standards and establish for each of these water bodies pollutant load allocations known as total maximum daily loads (TMDLs), which will ensure attainment of water quality standards. A TMDL represents an amount of pollution that can be released by anthropogenic and natural sources of a watershed into a specific water body without causing a decline in water quality and beneficial uses.', 'The Santa Monica Bay watershed is listed on California’s 2006 Section 303(d) list due to impairments by bacteria, and its beaches are subject to postings and closures due to elevated concentrations of this pollutant. The Board adopted bacterial TMDLs for wet and dry weather runoff into the Bay in 2003. These TMDLs regulate the amount of bacteria found in discharges of runoff from the cities within the Bay watershed.', 'In accordance with the Bacterial TMDLs, the City of Los Angeles submitted a Coordinated Monitoring Plan (CMP) for compliance with the TMDLs on behalf of the agencies within the Bay watershed. The City of Los Angeles currently performs all required monitoring and reporting to the Board, and annually invoices the City of Santa Monica for its share of monitoring costs.', 'The City Council approved the initial Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) for cost-sharing bacterial monitoring on July 8, 2003 (Attachment A). The last MOA renewal was approved by Council on August 13, 2013, and included a three-year term and a provision allowing for a fourth year (Attachment B). However, when Council approved that agreement, funds were budgeted to cover the costs for the first three years, but not for the fourth year. Staff inadvertently failed to allocate the fourth year funds during the 2013 staff report process.', 'Discussion', 'On November 28, 2012, the California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region approved a new National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit with additional monitoring requirements beyond the previous permit. Though a new cost-sharing MOA was approved by City Council on August 13, 2013, the City only budgeted for the three-year term of the MOA. Article V, Section 4 states, “This MOA shall continue on a month to month basis after expiration date as stated in Article V, Section 1 . . . not to exceed 12 months.” The City of Los Angeles sent the City an invoice for $75,485.30 for the month-to-month term covering FY 2016-17, which includes $8,596.68 for exceedance monitoring in FY15-16. Staff is requesting to appropriate the necessary funds to pay this invoice. A new cost-sharing MOA was approved by the Santa Monica City Council July 11, 2017, for FY 17-18 and beyond; this MOA is going through the signature phase, at this time (1/2/2018) with the City of Los Angeles, before it can be executed (Attachment C).', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Santa Monica’s share of the monitoring costs for the fourth year of the Memorandum of Agreement is not to exceed $75,485.30, which includes additional costs for exceedance monitoring. Payment of the invoice requires a FY 2017-18 appropriation of $75,486 to the Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax Fund (account 06402.555170).'], 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2743'}, {'Title': 'Adoption of Resolution Authorizing the City Manager to execute Memorandum of Understanding with The International Association of Sheet, Metal, Air, Rail, and Transportation Workers - Transportation Division, Local 1785', 'Department': 'Human Resources Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1.  Adopt the attached Resolution authorizing the City Manager to execute a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) between the City of Santa Monica and the International Association of Sheet, Metal, Air, Rail, and Transportation Workers – Transportation Division, Local 1785 (SMART-TD).2. Approve the attached revised salary schedule effective as a result of the agreement reached for the classifications represented by SMART-TD.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The agreement with the International Association of Sheet Metal, Air, Rail and Transportation Workers – Transportation Division, Local 1785 (SMART-TD) expired on June 30, 2017. SMART-TD includes the Motor Coach Operator and Motor Coach Operator Trainee classifications. The City currently has 351 employees who are members of SMART-TD. With the direction from City Council to continue Santa Monica’s commitment to competitive compensation for the City’s workforce while keeping costs within the City’s Five Year financial forecast, the City and SMART-TD, have met and conferred in accordance with the Meyers-Millias Brown Act (MMBA). The terms of the tentative agreement are summarized below.', 'Background', 'The Meyers-Millias Brown Act requires that local public agencies negotiate with their respective bargaining units regarding wages, hours and working conditions. Agreements with ten of the City’s eleven bargaining units expired at the end of June 2017 and, under direction from the City Council, staff negotiated for new terms.', 'On June 27, 2017, Council approved agreements with the Executive Pay Plan (EPP) and set the terms and conditions for medical insurance for most City employees (Attachment A). On July 11, 2017 Council approved the terms for the agreements with the Police Officer’s Association (POA) (Attachment B). On August 8, 2017 Council approved agreements with Administrative Team Associates (ATA), Municipal Employees Association (MEA), the Public Attorneys Union (PAU), the Santa Monica Firefighters Local 1109 IAFF, Supervisory Team Association (STA), the Management Team Associates (MTA), and the Confidential Unrepresented Employees (CUE) pay plan whose contracts expired June 30, 2017 (Attachment C). On October 24, 2017 Council approved agreements with Fire Executive Management Association (FEMA) and California Teamsters Local 911 (Attachment D).', 'Discussion', 'The overall policy of the City of Santa Monica has been to maintain competitive wages, hours and working conditions in a high-cost geographic labor market in order to retain and attract a dedicated, high-quality workforce to serve our community across a wide range of specialized services. Since most, though not all, City jobs are comparable to other municipalities, the City has traditionally looked to full-service cities in our region of similar size and financial strength for labor market comparisons. Market competitiveness in recruitment, the increase in the Consumer Price Index, internal equity, and offsetting contributions to pension and medical benefits may also be factors that contribute to the setting of compensation during the negotiations process.', 'Generally, the City finds itself in first or second position among comparable cities. As a result, the City has maintained competitiveness through modest cost of living adjustments. The Council is undertaking a compensation review overseen by the City Council Audit Subcommittee that will provide a comprehensive analysis for future policy direction. The tentative agreement with SMART-TD is as described below:', '· The three-year agreement between the City of Santa Monica and SMART-TD is effective July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2020.', '· SMART-TD employees will receive at 1.7% increase effective the first pay period following City Council approval. Council policy precludes retroactive pay when contract negotiations extend beyond the expiration of a Memorandum of Understanding. In this case, the agreement includes a one-time catch-up lump sum payment that addresses the time lag between tentative agreement and final ratification.', '· The City will contribute to a 457 deferred compensation account in the amount of $50 per month effective January 1, 2018.', '· The second and third years of the agreement each include a 1.5% salary increase.', '· Employees will be eligible to receive Tuition Reimbursement up to $2750 per fiscal year effective January 1, 2018.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'The total cost of the negotiated changes contained in the agreement is approximately $455,000 for FY 2017-18. The budget impact of these changes was included in the FY2017-18 through FY 2021-22 Five-Year Financial Forecast. An appropriation for the Big Blue Bus Fund will be included in the FY 2017-18 Midyear Budget for Council approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2812'}, {'Title': 'Adoption of Big Blue Bus Resolution for Transit Funds', 'Department': 'Big Blue Bus, Finance & Administrative Services', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Adopt the resolution authorizing the City Manager to: a. Apply for and execute grant agreements and execute related certifications and assurances with the Federal Transit Administration (FTA), L.A. Metro, or other federal, state, regional or local agencies; b. Enter into agreements for transit funds for the pass-through of funds and agreements for planning, programming, and implementing transit services and capital projects during Fiscal Year (FY) 2017-18 through FY 2019-20; and,c. Enter into agreements for transit program revenue with institutions, local agencies, and businesses for funds generated during FY2017-18 through FY 2019-20. 2. Adopt the resolution authorizing the application for grant funds from the California Department of Transportation for State Transit Assistance State of Good Repair funds. 3. Adopt the Big Blue Bus Title VI Program.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Big Blue Bus (BBB) requests that City Council adopt a resolution authorizing the City Manager to file grant applications, execute grant agreements, and enter into agreements associated with funding, planning, programming, and implementation of transit services, transit programs, and capital projects; and adopt a resolution authorizing the application for grant funds from the California Department of Transportation for State Transit Assistance State of Good Repair funds. This is an annual request for resolution adoption, as BBB’s grant funds need unique resolutions for various federal, state and local grant fundings.', 'BBB also requests that City Council adopt its Title VI Program. Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 protects people from discrimination based on race, color, and national origin in programs and activities receiving federal financial assistance. Federal Transit Administration (FTA) requires the governing body of a transit agency to adopt its Title VI Program in order to be eligible for federal grant funds. Big Blue Bus’ Title VI Program has been updated to include the adopted service standards and a Limited English Proficiency (LEP) plan.', 'Background', 'Each year, Big Blue Bus requests that City Council adopt a resolution authorizing the City Manager to file grant applications, execute grant agreements, and to enter agreements associated with funding, planning, programming, and implementation of transit services, transit programs, and capital projects. The most recent said resolution was adopted by City Council on January 24, 2017. In addition, staff requests that City Council adopt a resolution authorizing the application for grant funds from the California Department of Transportation for State Transit Assistance State of Good Repair funds. Finally, Big Blue Bus requests that Council adopt its Title VI Program, which has been updated to include the adopted service standards and a Limited English Proficiency (LEP) plan.', 'Discussion', 'Staff requests that Council authorize the City Manager to file grant applications as transit-related funding opportunities become available; to execute grant agreements to accept federal, state, regional, and local transit-related funds, as funds are approved or programmed; and to execute and file certifications and assurances as they relate to grant programs, compliance, and project implementation. These authorizations would allow the City to expedite its annual grant applications and participate in unanticipated one-time grant opportunities in a timely manner. Potential funding agencies include, but are not limited to, the Federal Transit Administration (FTA) and other federal agencies, Metro, the South Coast Air Quality Management District (SCAQMD), California Office of Emergency Services (CalOES), California Department of Transportation (CalTrans), and other state and regional agencies.', 'Staff also requests that the City Manager be authorized to enter into agreements, including but not limited to: Memorandums of Understanding (MOUs); Letters of Agreements (LOAs); Cooperative Procurement Agreements; Payment and Services Agreements and sub-grantee agreements for transit funds; pass-through funds; and other transit program revenues. Agreements may include, but are not limited to: agreements by and between the City of Santa Monica and L.A. Metro, SCAQMD, FTA, the Southern California Association of Governments (SCAG), Access Services, Playa Vista Parks and Landscape Corporation, St. John Hospital, UCLA, SMC, nonprofits, and other federal, state, local, and regional entities for the purposes of planning, programming funds, and implementing transit services and capital projects for the residents of the City of Santa Monica and greater Los Angeles area.', 'State Transit Assistance – State of Good Repair', 'In April 2017, Governor Brown signed Senate Bill 1 (SB 1), which generates new revenues from various taxes and fees and is designed to support public transit. As a result of SB 1, Santa Monica’s Big Blue Bus is an eligible recipient for State Transit Assistance (STA) State of Good Repair funds, which are managed by the California Department of Transportation. Funds will be used toward, but not limited to, bus replacements and/or preventive maintenance. As a requirement to secure the funds, an adopted resolution and an allocation request to claim the funds is required.', 'Title VI of the Civil Rights Act', 'FTA requires the governing body of a transit agency to adopt its Title VI Program in order to be eligible for federal grant funds. Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 protects people from discrimination based on race, color, and national origin in programs and activities receiving federal financial assistance. Federal Transit Administration (FTA) requires the governing body of a transit agency to adopt its Title VI Program in order to be eligible for federal grant funds. As a requirement, the program must include a Language Assistance Plan and service standards.', 'BBB has updated its program to include the adopted service standards and Limited English Proficiency (LEP) plan to meet the new requirements of the Title VI program. The original service standards were adopted at its council meeting in August 2015.  BBB now requests that City Council adopt its updated Title VI Program.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions. Local programming and transit subsidies are in the approved Big Blue Bus department budget.', 'The new funding from STA State of Good Repair will be included in the FY 2017-18 Year-End Budget review, once the final amount is released.'], 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2798'}, {'Title': 'Contract Modification for IPS Group, Inc.', 'Department': 'Finance Department, Revenue Division', 'Sponsors': 'Director David Martin', 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to agreement #9496 (CCS) in an estimated amount of $4,050,000 with IPS Group, Inc., a California-based company, to add merchant processing services for parking meter transactions for the Finance Department. The ten-year term of the contract will remain unchanged. This will result in an amended agreement with a new total estimated amount of $21,594,169, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'Since 2011, IPS Group, Inc. (IPS) has provided ongoing maintenance for the City’s parking meters and sensors, battery replenishment, miscellaneous parts, credit card processing communication services, and a web-based management system. Since 2003, TransFirst Health and Government Solutions, LLC (TransFirst), has provided merchant processing services, including for the City’s parking meter credit card transactions. In 2016, Council authorized staff to work with IPS in reducing the City’s significant and growing parking meter credit card transaction costs. IPS proposes a process through which the City could access IPS’s preferred interchange rate with Visa and Master Card for regulated debit transactions. This would lower transaction fee costs for parking meter transactions by an estimated $120,000 annually. The City would retain TransFirst for merchant processing services related to other parking and non-parking transactions.', 'Staff recommends a fourth modification to agreement #9496 (CCS) with IPS to add merchant processing services for parking meter related transactions. The amended contract would be for an estimated amount of $4,050,000 for the remainder of the contract, for an estimated amended total of $21,594,169. The ten-year term of the contract would remain unchanged.', 'Background', 'IPS has provided ongoing maintenance for meters and sensors, battery replenishment, miscellaneous parts, credit card processing communication services and a web-based management system since 2011. TransFirst has provided merchant processing services since 2003.', 'On October 25, 2011 (Attachment A), Council awarded contract no. 9496 to IPS Group, Inc. (IPS) to purchase and operate parking meters and in-ground sensors. The contract was for $7,560,000 for a five-year term with one five-year option to extend.', 'On March 19, 2013 (Attachment B), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification for a Battery Replenishment Program, miscellaneous parking meter parts, and increased credit card transactions processing. The modification resulted in a total not to exceed amount of $9,694,345 with no change to the five-year term.', 'On April 22, 2014 (Attachment C), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification for a one-time purchase of 350 additional parking meters with in-ground sensors for a total not to exceed amount of $10,296,950 with no change to the five-year term.', 'On April 28, 2015 (Attachment D), Council awarded Contract No. 10053 to TransFirst to provide merchant processing services, for an estimated total amount of $12.4 million over a five-year period. The contract does not require that all City credit card transactions be processed through TransFirst.', 'On May 24, 2016 (Attachment E), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a third modification to extend the term of the IPS agreement for an additional five years and to increase the contract total accordingly, for a not to exceed amount of $17,544,169. This modification also provided the authority for the City to work with IPS to find ways to reduce credit card transaction fees (merchant processing fees).', 'Discussion', 'The City currently operates approximately 6,000 single space parking meters with varying enforcement hours and rates. All meters are credit/debit card enabled and are predominantly used to manage demand and ensure turnover.', 'The City currently pays approximately $1.1 million per year to process over 5.3 million parking meter credit/debit card transactions. An estimated total of $15.6 million in parking meter revenue is collected per year. Most parking meter transactions (approximately 58%) are through credit/debit cards, and these costs represent approximately 40% of all the City’s credit card processing fees.', 'Under the City’s current contract with TransFirst, merchant processing fees consist of interchange fees assessed by the credit card companies (Visa, MasterCard, Discover) and a TransFirst fee. Small value transactions such as those made for metered parking incur a higher fee as a percentage of the actual transaction amount than other credit card transactions. For example, fees paid for metered parking equate to about 7% of the value of the transaction as compared to 2.1% for non-parking transactions. Through IPS, the City could take advantage of a preferred rate for certain debit/credit card transactions through their merchant processing services provider because of their high volume of transactions. TransFirst is not able offer the same rate for meter parking transactions.', 'Council has previously directed staff to search for ways to reduce the City’s overall merchant processing fee costs, which were $2.5 million in FY 2016-17 and which have increased an average of 10-12% annually for the past four fiscal years as the city has added more credit card enabled payment services. Staff estimates that switching to IPS for parking meter credit/debit card transactions would save approximately $120,000 annually. While this amount is small, it is a step in the right direction to ensure that city operations are as cost effective as possible.', 'Vendor/Consultant Selection', 'In January 2011, the City initiated a trial program to test new single-space on-street parking meters with electronic payment options. All companies that produce credit-card enabled single or multi-space parking meters were invited to participate, and one took part in the trial. Based on customer feedback and functionality, staff recommended a single-space meter solution. IPS, a California-based company, was the only company that could deliver a functional single-space product at that time. IPS single-space meters have been widely deployed in Los Angeles, Beverly Hills, and West Hollywood and are commonly accepted and known by on-street parkers in the Los Angeles area.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'Fees for merchant processing services are based on credit card usage. Staff estimates the cost for merchant processing services over the remaining 4 years of the 10-year term of the IPS contract to be $4,050,000, or $1,012,500 per year, for an amended estimated contract amount of $21,594,169. The City currently pays approximately $2.5 million annually in merchant processing fees for all transactions. Use of IPS to process debit/credit card transactions related to parking would result in a decrease in costs associated with the TransFirst contract and would save the City an estimated $120,000 per year in merchant processing fees.', 'Funds for merchant processing services are available in the FY 2017-19 Biennial Budget in the Finance Department in account 012241.522230 (credit card processing fees). Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.'], 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2791'}, {'Title': 'Award RFP# 144 for Emergency Medical Patient Transport and Billing Services', 'Department': 'Fire Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP#144 to Westmed Ambulance INC. DBA McCormick Ambulance, a Colorado based company, to provide emergency ambulance and billing services for the Fire Department;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a cost recovery agreement with McCormick Ambulance, for three years, with two additional one-year renewal options, on the same terms and conditions over a five-year period.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'A private ambulance contractor has provided emergency ambulance transport and billing services for the Fire Department since 2004. Following a competitive bidding process, staff recommends a contract with McCormick Ambulance to provide emergency ambulance and billing services for a three-year term beginning February 1, 2018. McCormick Ambulance bills the patient directly for transported services resulting in the Fire Department’s anticipated annual cost recovery of $800,000, as reflected in the FY2017-18 Budget.', 'Background', "On April 10, 2017, the City posted a Request for Proposals(RFP)for Emergency Ambulance Services and Patient Billing, seeking proposals fromambulance service contractors interested in providing emergency (911) ambulance transportation and patient billing services for the Santa Monica Fire Department (SMFD). One potential proposer notified the City that they would not submit a proposal due to their inability to comply withtheCity's Living Wage Ordinance (LWO). City staff subsequently reached out to other service providers and concluded that industry standard pay, including that of the City’s current provider, does not comply with the City’sLWO. In light of theinformation received, staffcancelled that RFP.", 'Staff identified that emergency ambulance services providers have specific challenges that differentiate themfrom other City contractors. Additionally, the City is not currently prepared to provide emergency transport services. As a result, on July 11, 2017, Council adopted Living Wage Ordinance amendment 2458 CCS that exempted ambulance services from the living wage for a limited time which sunsets on June 30, 2020. This action has ensured continuous provision ofeffective emergency services. Impacted vendors must still comply with the City’s minimum wage law.', 'Contractors who provide emergency ambulance services to the City aredifferent from other Citycontractorssubject tothe LWObecause emergency ambulanceproviders do not control rates for the services they provide.Rather, theLos Angeles County Board of Supervisors sets rates for all emergency transport services. The Board adjusts rates annually based on changes to the medical care and transportation line items of the Consumer Price Index forAll Urban Consumersand, starting July 1, 2017, the percentage change of the Los Angeles County minimum wage change. The County rates are the maximum allowable ambulance rates chargeable to the general public. Thus, while there is an established methodology for increasing rates that takes into account some wage changes, these factors do not include the higher Santa Monica living wage.Additionally, revenue collected by ambulance companies is dependent on the insurance payer mix of the patients transported. Payer mix varies from community to community, and in Santa Monica, approximately one third of payers are Medicare and another third MediCal recipients. These payers pay considerably less to the ambulance company than what is billed. All of these factors, in addition to employee wages, influence the bottom line of any ambulance company providing services in this community.', 'The City is currently under contract until January 31, 2018, with Ameri-Care Ambulance as its ambulance provider and ambulance-related billing services provider. Ameri-Care has successfully provided ambulance services for the past five years.However, they are not recommended as the best qualified firm based on their proposal but will continue to provide their high-level of service until the completion of their contract and until their billing services are complete.', 'Discussion', 'The City has utilized an emergency ambulance and billing service company since 2004 to provide emergency medical transport and billing services for the response, assessment, treatment and/or transportation of members of the public by Fire Department paramedics. Charges are assessed based on the Advanced Life Support Assessment Fee adopted by City Council on June 15, 2004. The Advanced Life Support Assessment Fee is the difference between the Los Angeles County approved Advanced Life Support (“ALS”) rate and the Los Angeles County approved Basic Life Support (“BLS”) rate as set forth in the most current Los Angeles County Emergency Services Agency General Public Ambulance Rates. On the City’s behalf, McCormick Ambulance will bill approximately $796.00 per transport based on the current fee structure, excepting Medi-Cal and Medicare patients.', 'The Fire Department responds to over 16,000 emergency medical calls annually and calls for patient transport have increased 5% as compared to the previous year. Currently approximately 7,500 patients are transported annually to local hospitals. The Fire Department’s response model includes six paramedic engine companies, two rescue ambulance paramedic non-transport unit, and other support units deployed as needed. The department also maintains two additional rescue ambulances that are mainly used for special events and non-transport responses. Contracted emergency ambulances are used to transport patients on behalf of the Fire Department with Santa Monica Fire Department paramedics on-board to provide patient treatment in the ambulance while en route to a medical facility.', 'Contractor Selection', 'In October 2017, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for an emergency ambulance and billing services. The RFP was posted on the City’s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code 2.24.072 Best Bidder provisions. Two Los Angeles County approved ambulance providers submitted proposals. Proposals were evaluated on experience, technical competence, training and continuing education of staff, billing and collection systems, business stability and references, value added and breadth of service, fleet and equipment quality and maintenance, capability and completeness of proposal to meet request for proposal requirements, and operational systems. After a thorough review, the five member selection committee comprised of representatives from the Fire Department and Finance Department recommended McCormick Ambulance as the best qualified firm based on the evaluation criteria. McCormick Ambulance’s proposal demonstrated their depth and breadth of experience and their organizational structure displayed their highly qualified personnel. McCormick’s fleet is expansive including 83 ambulances, 3 specialty disaster units, 2 high-risk ambulance units which can serve as isolations units for chemical exposures or suspected infectious diseases, a mobile command and communications trailer, and a mobile generator and fuel tender all of which could be utilized by the City in the event of a large-scale emergency or for special events.  McCormick also operates an in-house, full service and fully accredited maintenance facility in Los Angeles County. McCormick currently meets all applicable minimum wage laws including the City’s Minimum Wage Ordinance (MWO), Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 4.62. McCormick’s proposal also identified their extensive employee training and continuing education program. The Fire Department is presently working with the current and prospective ambulance transport providers to ensure a smooth and seamless transition.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate budget or financial impact related to this staff report. McCormick Ambulance’s compensation is not a direct payment from the City; the provider bills the patient directly. McCormick Ambulance will also bill the patient on behalf of the Santa Monica Fire Department for services provided by the Fire Department; $800,000 in cost-recovery has been included in the Fiscal Year 2017-18 Budget.'], 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2779'}, {'Title': 'Approval of Minutes for the Redevelopment Successor Agency for the June 27 and October 24, 2017 meetings', 'Department': 'Records & Elections Services Department', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the Redevelopment Successor Agency approve the minutes for the June 27 and October 24, 2017 meetings.', 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2316'}, {'Title': 'Adoption of the 2018-19 Annual Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule', 'Department': 'Housing and Economic Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '03. Consent Calendar', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the Redevelopment Successor Agency adopt resolutions approving the Agency’s draft recognized obligation payment schedule and administrative budget for July 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In compliance with the statewide elimination of all Redevelopment Agencies in 2012, the Redevelopment Successor Agency is required to prepare a recognized obligation payment schedule (ROPS) and corresponding administrative budgets to be implemented in yearly increments. The ROPS ensures that all of the obligations of the former redevelopment agency are fulfilled. The ROPS 2018-19 includes Successor Agency enforceable obligations of $29,301,630 and an administrative budget of $639,873 covering July1,2018 to June 30, 2019.', 'Background', 'Under the governing statutes that implemented the dissolution of redevelopment agencies statewide, each redevelopment successor agency is required to prepare a recognized obligation payment schedule (ROPS) on a yearly basis. The ROPS identifies a former redevelopment agency’s enforceable obligations within the following categories: 1) bond payments; 2)indebtedness obligations (including loans, housing agreements, and similar obligations); 3) contracts or agreements necessary for continued administration or operation of an agency; and 4) an allowance for an agency’s administrative costs.  The ROPS also identifies the sources of payment for the obligations, including bond proceeds, interest income, and distributions of tax increment revenue from the State’s Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund (RPTTF). Each successor agency is required to submit an approved ROPS to the California Department of Finance and the relevant county auditor-controller for the period ending June 30, 2019 (ROPS 18-19) by February1,2018.', 'Discussion', 'The ROPS 2018-19 for the period of July 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019 includes all Successor Agency enforceable obligations. All proposed ROPS2018-19 enforceable obligations have been previously listed and approved for payment on a previous ROPS.', 'Under AB 26 and SB 107, the Agency may receive an administrative cost allowance of up to three percent of the property tax allocated to the Agency each fiscal year, based upon an approved administrative budget which justifies the administrative cost allowance. Based on estimated property tax allocation to the Agency for fiscal year 2017-18, the administrative cost allowance cap would be $222,201. As a result, $417,672 of the Agency’s administrative costs would not be reimbursed. Theadministrative budget is included as an enforceable obligation on the ROPS 2018-19 (see Attachment A, Exhibit 1, Line Item 30).', 'Next Steps', 'Copies of the ROPS 2018-19, as approved by the Oversight Board, must be sent to the State Controller’s Office and the Department of Finance and posted on the Agency’s website no later than February 1, 2018. The Department of Finance must make its determination regarding the ROPS 2018-19 no later than April 15, 2018.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'On June 1, 2018 and January 2, 2019, the Los Angeles County Auditor-Controller will transfer property taxes into the Agency’s cash account from which the Agency will pay enforceable obligations listed on the approved ROPS 2018-19. Before the distributions take place, the DOF must issue a determination letter with the total RPTTF revenues to be disbursed for enforceable obligations along with a final administrative cost allowance cap amount. The administrative cost allowance, estimated at $222,201, would then be transferred to the General Fund. It is staff’s practice to share a draft ROPS with DOF staff prior to final submittal to ensure that all DOF questions are answered prior to formal review and approval.', 'There are no other budgetary impacts associated with the adoption of the resolutions approving the ROPS 2018-19 and administrative budget. The ROPS 2018-19 simply sets forth the Agency’s existing financial obligations and administrative costs for the period July 1, 2018, to June 30, 2019.'], 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2698'}], [{'Title': 'Amendment to the Ordinance for Vehicle Weight Restrictions on the Santa Municipal Pier', 'Department': 'Public Works, Civil Engineering', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '07. Ordinances', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Introduce for First Reading the attached Ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 10.08.560 (Municipal Pier—Vehicle Weight Restrictions) updating load limitations for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier.2. Conduct a public hearing, on behalf of Los Angeles County and at the County’s request, to determine the appropriate load limitation for the Pier Bridge.3. Direct staff to seek authorization from the County of Los Angeles to set the Pier Bridge load limit.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'In compliance with federal and state laws, the County of Los Angeles Department of Public Works (LACDPW) works with local agencies to set weight limits for bridges, such as the Pier Bridge. Following a recent inspection, LACDPW recommended posting a weight limit sign for the Pier Bridge; currently, weight limit signs are posted only for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and Newcomb Pier, both of which are entirely under the City’s jurisdiction. Upon researching the lack of a weight limit sign for the Pier Bridge and the current weight limit signs of 10 tons and 3 tons for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and Newcomb Pier respectively, staff determined that local law governing the weight limit on the Santa Monica Pier should be revised, and a weight limitation for the Newcomb Pier should be codified. Staff recommends amending local law to increase the posted weight limit for the Santa Monica Pier to 15 tons, and to set a weight limit of 3 tons for the Newcomb Pier. Staff further recommend that the Council conduct a public hearing, on behalf of Los Angeles County and at the County’s request, to determine the weight limit for the Pier Bridge. At the conclusion of that hearing, staff will forward the City’s weight recommendation to the County and seek authorization from the County to set the bridge weight limit, as required by state law.', 'Background', 'On September 19, 2017, LACDPW contacted the City requesting a copy of the load limit ordinance for the Pier Bridge. Staff clarified that load limits are not currently posted for the Pier Bridge Structure. Load limits are posted only for the Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier to protect the Pier structures from the wear and tear brought about by heavy vehicles. The signs are posted at both the top and bottom approaches to the Pier Bridge, and by inference, limited the loads for the Pier Bridge. Notwithstanding the load limits posted for the Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier, LACDPW noted that their structural analysis required a load limit to be posted for the Pier Bridge itself. In order to legally post a load limit for a bridge, the California Vehicle Code requires that a public hearing be held and an ordinance be adopted under the County’s direction.', 'Discussion', 'The LACDPW performed load rating calculations for the Pier Bridge which indicated the safe load capacity of the structure to be:', '· 22 tons per truck;', '· 22 tons per truck and semi-trailer combination;', '· 30 tons per truck and full trailer combination.', 'The LACDPW recommends that the bridge be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 22 tons. However, this exceeds the load capacities of the Santa Monica Municipal Pier (outlined in blue below in Figure 1) and the Newcomb Pier (outlined in orange below in Figure 1). The sole purpose of the Pier Bridge is to provide vehicle and pedestrian access to the Santa Monica Municipal and Newcomb Piers. There are no other adjoining structures or access points to the Pier Bridge. Despite the bridge’s structural capacity as determined by LACDPW, it is the structural capacity of the Santa Monica Municipal Pier that would dictate the operational weight limit for the Pier Bridge.', 'Vehicle Weight Restrictions', 'Traffic flows through the different sections of the piers, and the lowest rated section of each pier is the controlling limit for allowable vehicle weights. The Santa Monica Pier and Pier Deck Parking Lot have been posted for maximum weights of 10 tons and 3 tons, respectively, for nearly a decade or longer. Staff researched as-built plans and records for past upgrade and maintenance projects for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and concluded that the lowest rated section, a 200-feet-long concrete waffle structure at the west end, could support a 15-ton vehicle. The rest of the structure is rated for a 20-ton vehicle. Based on the controlling capacity of the waffle structure, staff recommends that the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and the adjoining Pier Bridge be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 15 tons.', 'The 2008 Pier Infrastructure Assessment Study by Moffatt & Nichol (Study) examined the Newcomb Pier and subdivided it into sections based on the varying substructure types and corresponding load limits. The Study further identified that the lowest rated section was capable of supporting a 3-ton vehicle. Therefore, staff recommends the Newcomb Pier, where the pier deck parking lot is located, be posted for a weight limit not to exceed 3 tons.', 'The City has exclusive jurisdiction to regulate Pier weight limitations. Accordingly, the proposed amendment (attached) codifies weight limits for the Santa Monica Municipal Pier and the Newcomb Pier.', 'Pier Bridge', 'Unlike the Piers, which are under the City’s exclusive jurisdiction, California Vehicle Code section 35751(a) grants only Los Angeles County the authority to set weight limitations on the Pier Bridge. Consistent with Section 35751 and longstanding practice, the County has cooperated with Santa Monica and other cities within the County to set bridge load limits. Additionally, section 35751 requires a public hearing be held before the Pier Bridge’s weight limit could be reduced beyond what the Vehicle Code otherwise requires. The County has requested that the City conduct this hearing on the County’s behalf. Upon conclusion of the hearing, Staff will transmit the City’s weight recommendations to the County and work with the County to set the correct weight limit. Once that limit is set by the County, staff will return to the Council to codify the new limit.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. The removal of existing signs and installation of the new signs will be performed by Public Works staff within the existing operating budget.'], 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2803'}], [{'Title': 'City Planning Division Priorities', 'Department': 'Planning and Community Development', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '08. Administrative Item', 'Recommendations': 'It is recommended that the City Council review and provide guidance on setting the upcoming City Planning Division priorities.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The adoption of the Downtown Community Plan in 2017 marked a major milestone and added to the list of significant implementation efforts completed since the adoption of the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) in 2010. These efforts include the completion of the Bergamot Area Plan, the Bike Action Plan, the Pedestrian Action Plan and the Zoning Ordinance Update. While substantial progress towards LUCE implementation has been made over the last seven years, there are additional Area Plans and ordinance updates that are necessary to fulfill the vision of the LUCE. In addition to the implementation projects recommended by the LUCE, there are new initiatives directed by City Council as well as major Development Agreement projects that are pending Planning Commission and City Council review.', 'This report summarizes pending policy and development projects, provides a general timeline of when these projects can be completed (Attachment A), and presents a recommended prioritization of these work items for Council discussion. While these projects involve collaboration between various City Divisions and Departments, they are primarily led by the City Planning Division within the Planning and Community Development Department. In addition to staffing the policy and implementation projects in this report, the City Planning division is also responsible for the processing of all development permit applications including Planning Commission review, Landmarks Commission review, Architectural Review Board, Zoning Administrator and building permit plan check. Therefore, it is necessary to consider these priorities and schedules in the context of the “day to day” work of the City Planning division and the capacity of the division to complete these projects while also maintaining its significant administrative functions and processing of numerous Development Review permits, Administrative Approvals and plan checks. Further, after approval of projects, there are typically three rounds of plan check followed by managing issues that arise through construction and occupation of new buildings. With a handful of staff assigned to the strategic planning and design and historic preservation function, there are approximately eight planners assigned full-time to development review, which includes processing planning applications, plan checks, staffing the counter, responding to phone inquiries, and reviewing business licenses. Due to volume and emerging division needs, small teams of planners normally assigned to development review are assigned to augment strategic planning and design/historic preservation projects.', 'It should also be borne in mind that planning is not an end in itself. The goal of land use and transportation planning is to help shape great places, whether they be districts, neighborhoods or streets. The identification of ambitious and laudable goals does not automatically produce results. It is critically important that planning be grounded in the capacity of City government and private real estate market forces and property owners to actually implement adopted policies. The City of Santa Monica already has a backlog of implementation activities, projects and initiatives. By focusing on the highest priorities for future land use planning and mobility enhancements, the City can produce practical, achievable policy guidance for public and private investment in the years ahead. This is the highest and best use of limited staff and financial resources.', 'This report divides the Division’s upcoming priorities into three sections, and provides a fourth section on alignment with citywide priorities:', 'I) Policy Plans and Ordinance Updates: The first section consists of major policy implementation efforts that were called for in the LUCE or subsequent policy documents, or are necessary due to legal requirements or outdated ordinances. These include the Pico Neighborhood Plan, the Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan, the Local Coastal Program Update, the Gateway Master Plan, the Landmarks Ordinance Update, and an update to the City’s Travel Demand Forecast Model and adoption of CEQA thresholds compliant with CA Senate Bill 743.', 'II) Council Directed Research: The next section includes five items that have been directed by City Council, primarily through the approval of “13 Items,” for staff and Planning Commission review and possible action by the Council. These include review of the R1 Development Standards, review of the Bergamot Area Plan to consider the percentage of housing required in specific developments, amendment of the Zoning Ordinance to prohibit the conversion of hotel rooms to residential units in the Proposition S Overlay area, and review of the development standards and entitlement processes for housing projects on the commercial boulevards and in the Bergamot area to incentivize housing over commercial development.', 'III) Major Development Agreements: The third section of this report provides a summary and status update of four major Development Agreement projects currently pending. These include the Phase Two Master Plan for Providence Saint John’s Health Center, the proposed mixed-use project at 4th/5th and Arizona, the redevelopment of the Miramar Hotel, and the proposed Ocean Avenue Hotel project located on the northeast corner of Santa Monica Boulevard and Ocean Avenue.', 'IV) Alignment of Division Workplan with Council Priorities: The final section of this report demonstrates how the City Planning Division’s ongoing work efforts align with the five strategic goals of the City Council. This section also looks at the Council-directed research through the lens of citywide priorities as a means to help the Council provide feedback on The City Planning Division’s proposed workplan priorities.', 'Planning Commission Discussion', 'On December 13, 2017, staff presented these priorities to the Planning Commission. The Commission voted 6-0 to prioritize the following:', '1) Pico Neighborhood Plan', '2) SB743 CEQA implementation', '3) Landmarks Ordinance update', '4) R-1 Interim Zoning Ordinance standards', '5) Options for housing on the boulevards and in the Bergamot area', 'The Commission identified these as key areas of focus given competing demands. The Commission also based its recommended priorities on the principle of preservation, which is why the Pico Neighborhood Plan, Landmarks Ordinance update, and review of R-1 standards rose to the top. Staff had originally proposed only a very targeted zoning effort for the Pico Zoning District that would directly address recent requests from the Pico Neighborhood Association. However, in their discussion and in response to public testimony at the meeting, the Commission indicated a broader scope to the Pico Zoning District would be appropriate. This discussion drew from the Commission’s prior review of Pico Neighborhood goals in June 2016 and LUCE Goal N11, which calls for protections for Pico Neighborhood and the Boulevard through an area planning process. This would mean that staff could proceed with the Pico Neighborhood Plan in two phases – immediate zoning changes as Phase 1 and a broader interdepartmental implementation effort as Phase 2 that would include a more intensive public engagement process. This is described in more detail in the next section of this report. SB743 is required and the production of housing remains a City priority. In order to ensure that there is sufficient capacity for these priorities, the Commission recommended delaying the Gateway Master Plan.', 'I. POLICY PLANS/ORDINANCE UPDATES', 'Pico Neighborhood Plan', 'The Pico Neighborhood Plan is a budgeted planning effort ($150,000) intended to address concerns within the Pico neighborhood. Bounded by the I-10 Freeway to the north, Pico Boulevard to the South, Centinela to the east, and 7th Street to the west, this planning area integrates the residential neighborhood of R2 and R1 District households with the commercial Boulevard. While there is a desire for a comprehensive approach to addressing concerns about enhancing quality of life, minimizing displacement of longtime residents and retaining neighborhood character through a range of activities that may include housing policies, cultural-based planning initiatives, economic development incentives, crime and safety interventions, circulation enhancement recommendations and environmental/landscaping improvements, experience has shown that land use planning tools are not ideal for tackling such challenges. The staff recommend a narrower approach led by PCD to address zoning issues related specifically to protection of neighborhood character and retaining affordable housing. If the Council wishes to pursue a more comprehensive approach, staff recommends this be a multi-departmental effort outside the scope of setting PCD priorities.', 'To ensure community participation in the land use planning effort, the bulk of the budget will be used to conduct multi-lingual outreach. Planning staff is already at work organizing and conducting dozens of meetings with staff from across many City departments to understand the context of current City services offered to Pico residents and businesses. Future outreach will involve various neighborhood organizations, residents, community groups, places of worship, cultural associations, business improvement districts and other stakeholders. Outreach and technical analysis will help staff to develop zoning revisions.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff intends to expedite analysis and recommendations for land use planning changes beginning with an in-house evaluation of potential zoning ordinance updates to provide a context-specific framework for development in Pico similar to standards that were established for the Ocean Park neighborhood. These may include revisiting the Mixed Use Boulevard Low zoning on Pico Boulevard, evaluating rules for combining residentially-zoned lots in the Pico Neighborhood, and a review of the appropriateness of Parking Overlay 2 parking requirements between Lincoln and 11th Street. Staff expects to bring forward this Zoning Analysis to Planning Commission in the second half of 2018. Community outreach for the Pico Plan will begin in early 2018.', 'Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan (MPNP)', 'The Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan was launched in 2013 to design a framework for the rezoning of approximately 70 acres of formerly industrial land centered on the Expo Light Rail station at 17th Street and Colorado. Several outreach events were conducted in 2013-2014, and a presentation was made to the Planning Commission in July 2014. A planning framework was drafted in late 2014, which ties together a desire for additional housing in this area, as well as new streetscape concepts that address permeability, landscaping, and the presence of a regional transit connector in close proximity to Santa Monica College and the city’s two hospitals. Due to competing priorities for staff time on the Downtown Community Plan, a public draft of the Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan was not completed.', 'The appropriate level of environmental review necessary to address potential changes in land use proposed by the MPNP is currently being evaluated.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff anticipates the need to rework and enrich the draft document to make it relevant to today’s regulatory environment, and to work closely with the Community and Cultural Services Department throughout the re-design process of Memorial Park, which will begin in early 2018. Outreach to re-establish communications with area stakeholders and the community at large about the MPNP can begin simultaneously. It is anticipated that the Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan and required environmental analysis will be completed in the first half of 2019.', 'Local Coastal Program Update', 'The Local Coastal Program Update is being funded through a combination of Coastal Commission grants and local funds and consists of two parts – a Land Use Plan (LUP) and Implementation Plan (IP). Over the past two years, staff has been working closely with Coastal Commission staff to discuss and resolve key policy issues with respect to coastal access, new development, and the new science of sea level rise.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'It is expected that a public draft of the LUP will be released for public review in early 2018, followed by Council review and an application to the Coastal Commission for final plan adoption. Once the LUP has been substantially completed, staff will start the IP, otherwise known as the “coastal zoning ordinance.” It is anticipated that it will take up to 24 months to complete City review of the IP.', 'Gateway Master Plan', 'The Gateway Master Plan is a funded planning effort that will address comprehensive planning for the area adjacent to the I-10 Freeway that links Downtown to the Civic Center and Samohi. There is a unique opportunity for strengthening connections over the freeway right of way. This would provide multiple benefits, including:', '· Seamlessly link the historic Downtown and historic Civic Center, removing a visual and physical divide', '· Allow for better freeway entry and exiting in the often congested traffic bottlenecks', '· Provide access to peripheral parking opportunities that could reduce vehicular impacts on the Downtown core', '· Provide a framework for design and access for adjacent properties', 'Development of the Gateway Master Plan will be an open process facilitated by staff, and include participation from the community, land owners and decision-makers as priorities for the area are refined. This key location should become an experience that reflects the city’s values of community, sustainability and pride of place.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'As established in the Downtown Community Plan, properties within the Gateway Master Plan boundaries may only request Tier 2 height and FAR until the earlier of 2021 or the completion of the Gateway Master Plan. In order to meet the timeline established in the DCP, staff would need to initiate the process for the Gateway Master Plan in the first half of 2018.', 'Landmarks Ordinance Update', 'The Landmarks Ordinance was adopted in 1976 and has not been comprehensively updated since its inception. Since that time, application of the ordinance to a variety of preservation projects has revealed some ambiguities in language that would benefit from clarification. The Landmarks Commission has long advocated for a comprehensive update to the ordinance to provide clarity on implementation and to also explore new directions, such as the potential for a second tier of designation. The Commission has identified a list of issues over a number of years that would be the starting point for the ordinance update.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Given other priorities, staff will likely start work on a comprehensive update to the Landmarks Ordinance in the second half of FY2018/19. The ordinance update will be a joint effort between City Planning and the City Attorney’s office.', 'SB743 Implementation', 'In the next coupleofyears, transportation review required under CEQA will change as a result of the adoption of California Senate Bill 743 (SB743). SB743 will require the City to adjust the way it conducts CEQA-mandated transportation analysis. The State’s publishedCEQA Guidelinesindicate thatthe City will be required to usevehicle miles traveled (VMT)as the metric for transportation analysis under CEQA. VMT measures the total distance traveled (in miles) between the origin and destination ofatrip and as such, captures the full extent of vehicle travel on the roadway network (VMT = Trip Rate x Trip Length). VMT is a more appropriate metric for assessingtransportationimpacts on the environment,because it is related togreenhouse gas emissions, the development of multimodal transportation networks, and a diversity of land uses.', 'Currently, output data of the City’s Travel Demand Forecast Model (TDFM) is used to generate Level of Service(LOS)analysis asformerly required under CEQA. Since 2008 the Model also has calculated VMT for informational purposes, but not as a threshold of significance for transportation impacts under CEQA. To comply withtheanticipated CEQA Guidelines under SB743, the TDFM will need to be calibrated to use VMT to assess transportation impacts. Furthermore, the Citywillhave to establish new transportation review procedures andadopt new VMT-based traffic impact thresholds to replace the existingLOS impact thresholds.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'City Council approved a contract with Fehr + Peers in October 2017 to update the TDFM with the 2017 citywide transportation counts, and to recalibrate the model based on network changes and horizon year land uses. Fehr + Peers will also assist with development of some of the SB743 review guidelines and thresholds. Community engagement is anticipated to educate the public regarding this change and establishing new transportation analysis thresholds, including a public workshop, focus groups and a number of public hearings.', 'The project will begin with updating and recalibrating the Model from January to September 2018. This work includes steps to complete traffic counts and quality assurance, develop horizon year forecasts, update the physical network, update and calibrate, and to evaluate TDM and VMT Performance.', 'Following the Model update, staff will work on developing transportation review guidelines and thresholds from July 2018 through April 2019. This phase will include tasks to develop CEQA significance thresholds, develop planning-level transportation metrics, and develop guidelines for transportation review of projects.', 'II. COUNCIL DIRECTED RESEARCH (“13 ITEMS”)', 'R1/Single Family Residential Development Standards', 'As part of the adoption of the zoning ordinance update, Council directed staff to further research neighborhood-specific zoning changes that would address the unique character of neighborhoods. The Planning Commission wrote a letter to the City Council requesting review of the R1 zoning standards. Staff has received complaints from neighborhood groups and individual residents expressing concern about the size of new homes. In nearly all cases, staff has found the new homes of concern to comply with existing zoning regulations for single-unit dwellings. A previous update to the R1 standards addressed “mansionization” concerns in 2000. Staff has received complaints regarding recent renovations/additions and the redevelopment of older housing stock. These have raised questions regarding the appropriateness of the existing R1 zoning standards. While the R1 standards have been in place for many years, existing homes typically do not represent the maximum buildable envelope resulting in a mismatch between new homes and existing homes. An update to the R1 zoning standards would require a significant public engagement process regarding the appropriate character and scale of new construction and additions in R1 neighborhoods.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'It is expected that staff could begin work on a comprehensive update to the R1 standards in the second half of FY2018/19. In the meantime, if directed by Council, an interim zoning ordinance that takes a more surgical approach to strategically address specific R1 zoning standards that would regulate the size of new home construction pending completion of a comprehensive update could be completed in the first half of 2018.', 'Amendment of Bergamot Area Plan to Increase Percentage of Required Housing', 'The Bergamot Area Plan (BAP) encompasses an area that includes a large amount of the city’s office space and includes the heart of the city’s creative industries with approximately 8,000 workers. The BAP established a required land use mix in the Mixed Use Creative zoning district of 40% residential and 60% non-residential with an allowance to vary by 10% in either direction. Since the adoption of the BAP, completed or under construction projects include the following:', 'Project', 'Address', 'Land Use', 'Entitled By', 'Agensys DA', '1800 Stewart Avenue', 'Research and Development', '1988 Zoning Ordinance', 'Village Trailer Park DA', '2930 Colorado Avenue', '362 units housing', '24,893 sf retail and creative office', '1988 Zoning Ordinance', 'Colorado Creative Studios DA', '2834 Colorado Avenue', '192,000 sf creative office', '1988 Zoning Ordinance', 'Pen Factory', '1681 26th Street', '203,816 sf creative office', '2013 Bergamot Area Plan', 'As demonstrated by the above table, only one of the mentioned projects was approved under BAP regulations. However, the DA’s approved under the 1988 Zoning Ordinance did provide some of the infrastructure enhancements identified in the BAP for those sites as negotiations were ongoing simultaneously with the development of the Plan. The Pen Factory project was entitled as a Tier 1 addition of 7,499 square feet converting the vacant industrial space to creative office. The only other project to have been approved (but not constructed) since the adoption of the BAP is an approximately 600-space private parking structure at 2941 Michigan Avenue.', 'In the years subsequent to the adoption of the Bergamot Area Plan, staff has heard from the development community that the BAP does not contain sufficient height and FAR incentives to attract housing or commercial development, and that uncertainty and project risk weigh heavily on larger projects. Minimal differences in the FAR allowance between Tier 1 and Tier 2 do not provide incentives to produce housing or projects that could contribute community benefits to the area’s transformation. And, while the BAP did identify certain properties as ripe for Tier 3 mix-use development projects, the uncertainty of the development agreement process has led many owners to maintain their properties “as-is.” To the extent that there is interest in creating housing incentives similar to those created in the DCP, further study and environmental analysis is required in order to determine necessary amendments.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff expects to be able to initiate work in the first half of FY2018/19. This effort would likely be folded into any options brought forward to encourage housing production on the boulevards.', 'Explore Tools to Encourage Housing Production on the Commercial Boulevards and in the Bergamot Area and Disincentivize 100% Commercial Projects', 'As part of the adoption of the Downtown Community Plan, Council gave further direction to also study incentives for housing production citywide on the commercial boulevards and the Bergamot area. It is likely that work on this item would be combined with any updates to the BAP designed to encourage housing production discussed above. It is likely that fully exploring this direction would also precipitate amendments to the Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP) ordinance if not a comprehensive update to the AHPP. Establishing a framework similar to the DCP will require additional economic feasibility analyses in addition to outreach. In relation to the issue of housing on the boulevards, staff has included a map (Attachment B) showing the under construction, approved, and pending housing projects throughout the City.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff expects to be able to initiate work in first half of FY2018/19.', 'Amendment of Zoning Ordinance to Prohibit Conversion of Existing Hotel Rooms to Residential Uses in the Proposition S Overlay Area', 'A recent change in ownership of one of the hotels in the City prompted inquiries from Council and the community as to the intentions of the new owners, who converted a hotel to for-sale condominiums in another city. New hotels are prohibited in the Prop S overlay area and therefore, the importance of preserving existing hotels has been underscored. There has been no indication of any interest in converting existing hotel rooms to residential uses nor are there any pending applications for such a conversion.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff proposes to bring this forward with the “Bucket 3” package of zoning ordinance discussions in the third quarter of 2018.', 'Explore Ordinance Denying New Discretionary Permits of Entitlements on Properties Where Ongoing Violations Remain Unresolved', 'There have been occasional instances where a property has outstanding Municipal Code violations but the property owner/applicant submits an application for a new permit. In these situations, Council has expressed concern that by issuing new permits, the applicant is not incentivized to abate the Code violation.', 'Anticipated Timeline', 'Staff proposes to bring this forward with the “Bucket 3” package of zoning ordinance discussions in the third quarter of 2018.', 'III. MAJOR DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENTS', 'Providence Saint John’s Health Center Phase Two Master Plan & Development Agreement Amendment (2121 Santa Monica Boulevard)', 'The Providence Saint John’s Health Center (PSJHC) Phase Two Project development agreement amendment includes a master plan process that will comprehensively review the circulation, land use, parking, and development potential for the Health Center’s north and south campuses located on Santa Monica Boulevard between 20th and 23rd Streets. A procedural amendment to the development agreement was approved on April 25, 2017 and established a framework that resulted in the following:', '· Changed the South Campus Master Plan to a Phase Two Project Master Plan encompassing all of Phase Two development, on both the North and South Campuses.', '· Changed the Development Agreement to require approval of the Phase Two Project Master Plan prior to approval of the individual Development Review Permits for Phase Two Project buildings.', '· Required a phasing plan and performance schedule for significant project components such as infrastructure, circulation improvements, and community benefits.', '· Established the City Council as the decision-making body for the Phase Two Project Master Plan.', '· Required that all Phase Two development be consistent with the approved Phase Two Project Master Plan.', 'Staff and the applicant team have completed their first-round review and discussion of the Phase Two Project circulation plan and started the Environmental Impact Report (EIR) for the Phase Two Project with release of a Draft EIR for public review anticipated at the end of 2018.', 'Anticipated Project Review Timeline', '· Substantive Master Plan Review and Community Benefits Negotiations – 2018', '· EIR Public Review Draft – 4th quarter 2018', '· Planning Commission Hearings – 1st quarter 2019', '· City Council Hearings – 3rd quarter 2019', '· Development Review Permits for new John Wayne Cancer Institute, Child & Family Development Center, and replacement housing (Scenario A) or West Ambulatory & Acute Care Building and replacement housing (Scenario B) – 4th quarter 2019', 'Plaza at Santa Monica (4th/5th and Arizona)', 'The proposed Plaza at Santa Monica project is a public/private partnership located on City-owned land. The current project proposal conforms to the limitations in the DCP at a height of 129’ and consists of office, hotel, retail, and cultural uses. A large public plaza intended to provide space for a seasonal skating rink and other year-round programming is a key feature of the project.', 'The site is identified as one of three Established Large Sites in the Downtown Community Plan. The project requires both negotiations on terms of the ground lease with the developer and a development agreement. The project is currently in the environmental analysis phase with the Draft EIR anticipated to be released for public review in 2nd quarter 2018. Per Council direction, the Draft EIR will be studying a range of eight project alternatives that include significantly different configurations for development of the site, particularly ones that envision a larger component of public space in the form of a central park or plaza for Downtown. Complimentary circulation alternatives are also part of the environmental analysis, including consideration of partial or periodic closure of Arizona. Formal hearings are anticipated to commence at the Planning Commission towards the end of 2018.', 'Anticipated Project Review Timeline', '· EIR Public Review Draft – 2nd quarter 2018', '· Planning Commission Hearings – 4th quarter 2018', '· City Council Hearings – 2nd quarter 2019', 'Miramar Hotel Mixed-Use Project (1133 Ocean Avenue)', 'The proposed Miramar Hotel Mixed-Use Project Development Agreement application was originally submitted in April 2011 to comprehensively redevelop the existing Santa Monica Fairmont Miramar Hotel as a new approximately 550,000 SF (2.9 FAR) mixed-use hotel with the following key components:', '· 265 guest rooms', '· food, beverage, meeting, and spa facilities', '· retail space along Wilshire Boulevard', '· approximately one-acre open space area at the corner of Wilshire Boulevard and Ocean Avenue', '· up to 120 condominiums', '· up to 40 affordable housing units at 1127 2nd Street', '· approximately 484 on-site subterranean parking spaces', '· Preservation of the site’s Landmark Moreton Bay Fig Tree', '· Preservation/rehabilitation of the Landmark Palisades Building', 'Following Planning Commission’s review of the conceptual plans in February 2012, the City provided direction regarding desired design parameters for the site and potential priority community benefits to be negotiated, and authorized staff to initiate development agreement negotiations with the applicant for the proposed project in April 2012. The project design was revised by the applicant team and resubmitted in 2013. At that time, the design strategy for the site focused on constructing a significantly taller, new building at the center of the site (approximately 262’ tall) with open space and reduced building heights on the perimeter of the property. While City staff initiated work on the EIR for the project in 2013, that work along with City review of the revised project design was put on hold pending completion of the Downtown Community Plan (DCP).', 'The Council adopted the DCP in August 2017 and included an Established Large Sites Overlay for three individual project sites in the Downtown. The DCP requires that projects for these three sites be processed as a development agreement and comply with specific development parameters (building height, floor area, and open space). For the Miramar Hotel site, the maximum building height for the project site is 130’ and a maximum floor area ratio of 3.0.', 'It is anticipated that the applicant will submit revised project plans during the first quarter of 2018 that address programmatic changes and design concept revisions compliant with the DCP’s Established Large Sites Overlay regulations. Following initial review of these revised plans, City staff will resume its preparation of the Draft EIR for the project, including hosting a second EIR Scoping Meeting for the new project design.', 'Anticipated Project Review Timeline', '· Submit Revised Project Plans – 1st quarter 2018', '· EIR Scoping Meeting for Revised Project – 1st quarter 2018', '· Substantive Project Review and Community Benefits Negotiations – 2018 through 1st quarter 2019', '· EIR Public Review Draft – 1st/2nd quarter 2019', '· Planning Commission Hearings – 3rd quarter 2019', '· City Council Hearings – 1st quarter 2020', 'Ocean Avenue Hotel (101 Santa Monica Boulevard)', 'A Development Agreement application was submitted in February 2013 for a proposed mixed-use hotel, cultural, retail, and residential development at the northwest corner of Santa Monica Boulevard and Ocean Avenue (“Ocean Avenue Project”). The applicant hosted a Community Meeting to introduce the proposed project in March 2013 which was followed by the Architectural Review Board’s conceptual discussion of the proposal in August 2013. Following completion of the Community Meeting, City review of the project was put on hold pending completion of the Downtown Community Plan. For the Ocean Avenue Hotel site, the adopted DCP specifies a 130’ maximum building height for the site and a maximum floor area ratio of 4.0.', 'The applicant submitted revised project plans last month that address programmatic changes and design concept revisions compliant with the DCP’s Established Large Sites Overlay regulations. Key components of the revised project include:', '· 115-room hotel with meeting room and banquet space;', '· 79 residential rental units, comprised of 19 new rent-controlled units to replace existing on-site units, 42 market rate units, and 18 affordable units;', '· Ground-floor restaurant and retail space;', '· Cultural/museum campus with open space;', '· Publically-accessible roof-top observation deck;', '· Subterranean parking;', '· Retention and rehabilitation of two, on-site designated City Landmark structures.', 'The applicant is scheduled to host a second Community Meeting to introduce the revised project design on January 11, 2018. Following initial review of the project plans, preliminary conceptual review will be scheduled at the Landmarks Commission and/or the Architectural Review Board during the first quarter of 2018. It is anticipated that Float-Up Discussions at Planning Commission and City Council will be completed by the third quarter of 2018 followed by initiation of environmental review for the project.', 'Anticipated Project Review Timeline', '· Community Meeting – 1st quarter 2018', '· ARB/Landmarks Conceptual Review – 1st quarter 2018', '· Planning Commission Float-Up Discussion – 2nd quarter 2018', '· City Council Float-Up Discussion – 3rd quarter 2018', '· EIR Scoping Meeting – 4th quarter 2018', '· Substantive Project Review and Community Benefits Negotiations – 2019', '· EIR Public Review Draft – 4th quarter 2019', '· Planning Commission Hearings – 3rd quarter 2020', '· City Council Hearings – 1st quarter 2021', 'IV. ALIGNMENT OF WORKPLAN WITH COUNCIL PRIORITY AREAS (STRATEGIC GOALS)', 'In order to connect desired outcomes to the day-to-day work of city government, the City Council identified five council priority areas, or Strategic Goals, that are expected to have short-term impact on community safety, quality of life, and prosperity.', 'Based on best practices from municipalities across the country, Santa Monica is now using an approach to workplan development and budgeting that connects the work of City Departments to a new Framework and SaMoStat. This process aligns departmental work efforts, measures outcomes, and ultimately ensures that the City delivers these services effectively and a transparent manner. The Framework is built around its long-term commitment to sustainability infused with its new Wellbeing Index, Santa Monica’s custom measurement tool that provides an understanding of wellbeing in our community. The Framework is built on the core beliefs, visions, and structures of these two exciting and groundbreaking approaches. The five strategic goals connect to these outcome areas through a matrix. They are the key drivers that will allow us to achieve outcomes for residents of and visitors to Santa Monica.', 'Based on these descriptions of the five priority areas, the following matrix has been developed to guide the Council’s discussion on focus areas for the City Planning Division. The matrix demonstrates where individual planning efforts or Council directed research aligns with Council priorities.', 'Council Strategic Goals', 'INCLUSIVE AND DIVERSE COMMUNITY', 'MOBILITY', 'THE AIRPORT', 'HOMELESSNESS', 'LEARN AND THRIVE', 'Policy Plans', 'Pico Neighborhood Plan', 'X', 'X', 'X', 'Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan', 'X', 'X', 'X', 'Local Coastal Program Update (Required by law)', 'X', 'X', 'Gateway Master Plan', 'X', 'Landmarks Ordinance', 'SB743 Implementation (Required by law)', 'X', 'Council Directed Research', 'R1 Standards', 'Bergamot Housing and Use Mix', 'X', 'Housing Production on Boulevards', 'X', 'Hotel/Condo in Prop S Overlay', 'Denying Permits for Properties with Unresolved Code Violations', 'The Council’s strategic goals formed the basis for how staff prioritizes the work of the City Planning Division, especially those that require staff and funding resources. A second framework for organizing priorities is based on ongoing legal requirements. This would allow projects such as the Local Coastal Program Update, Housing Element, and SB743 guidelines to be brought forward. A third framework is based the urgency of issues to be addressed. For example, staff has been bringing forward clarifications to the zoning ordinance in response to questions raised in the course of project review and implementation. As these changes directly affect the daily work of the division, these have been prioritized.', 'CONCLUSION', 'This report presents an overview of the strategic plans, land use policies, and major development agreements that are the City Planning Division’s priorities for the next two years. The significant volume of “day to day” work requires the majority of staff to be devoted to the Division’s development review function. Similarly, each of the projects in this report requires a significant investment in staff time, consultant time, and public engagement. Therefore, some of the strategic plans and comprehensive ordinance updates in addition to the major development agreements have been prioritized so that projects can be completed in a timely manner responsive to Council’s direction. Council directed-research is incorporated into the workplan as appropriate, but based on the Council’s strategic goals, staff would prioritize work on the creation of housing incentives on the boulevards and within the Bergamot Plan area. Due to the ongoing construction in R1 neighborhoods that continues to generate community concern, if directed by Council, staff could prepare an interim zoning ordinance in short order that could put in place temporary regulations pending a comprehensive update.', 'As noted in this report, staff has organized priorities based upon the following framework:', '1. Council adopted Strategic Goals', '2. Legally required policy documents', '3. Urgency of issue and impact on daily work', 'Based on this framework, staff has prioritized the Division’s work as described in the table below, which has been formatted to show a comparison of the Planning Commission’s recommended priorities. As this table demonstrates, the Pico Neighborhood Plan is the division’s top strategic planning priority, followed by the required SB743 Implementation.', 'City Planning Staff Recommendation', 'Planning Commission Recommendation', '1. Pico Neighborhood Plan', '1. Pico Neighborhood Plan', '2. SB743 Implementation', '2. SB743 Implementation', '3. Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan', '3. Landmarks Ordinance Update', '4. Local Coastal Program Update', '4. R1 Standards', '5. Gateway Master Plan', '5. Options to Encourage Housing on the Boulevards', '6. Options to Encourage Housing on the Boulevards and in the Bergamot area', '7. Landmarks Ordinance Update', 'The remainder of the strategic plans and Council-directed research will be included in the work plan as capacity allows. In these instances, staff has been reviewing interim options that might allow bringing forward changes sooner while reserving a larger effort for subsequent years.', 'Major developments projects also have a natural stagger however, processing of these applications requires a significant investment of interdepartmental staff time, time for environmental review, and community engagement. As all the development agreements are anticipated to generate public interest, it should be noted that staff devoted to processing the projects will not be able to devote attention to other potential priorities, such as the Landmarks Ordinance update.', 'Financial Impacts & Budget Actions', 'There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.'], 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2737'}], [{'Title': 'Calendar Year 2018 Water Rate Adjustment', 'Department': 'Public Works, Water Resources', 'Sponsors': None, 'Category': '09. Public Hearings', 'Recommendations': 'Staff recommends that the City Council:Suspend the 9% water rate increase authorized to go into effect on January 1, 2018 and authorize a 5% increase to be in effect until December 31, 2018; andAuthorize the budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.', 'Body': ['Executive Summary', 'The City of Santa Monica has historically provided water service to our residential and business customers. Given the statewide challenges surrounding safe and reliable water supply in recent years, Santa Monica has been a leader in efforts to conserve, reuse and safeguard our local water resources. This report addresses the annual water rate recommendation for calendar year 2018 and provides a progress update on various efforts undertaken to meet the City’s ambitious goal of eliminating use of imported water and becoming water self-sufficient by 2020.', 'On February 24, 2015, Council approved a series of five annual 9% water rate increases for the period of March 1, 2015 through December 31, 2019 (Attachment A). The resolution adopting the water rates provided City Council with flexibility to suspend all or a portion of each 9% annual rate increase during the five-year rate period, depending upon circumstances which demonstrate that such increases are unnecessary due to greater than anticipated revenues, decreased operating expenses or decreased capital projects expenditures. The first 9% increase went into effect on March 1, 2015. On February 23, 2016 and November 22, 2016, due to better than expected financial results, Council approved 5% increases for calendar years 2016 and 2017, respectively, partially suspending scheduled 9% increases (Attachments B and C). Review of Water Fund performance for Fiscal Year 2016-17 indicates that revenues were $0.6 million greater than anticipated and expenditures were $8.6 million less than anticipated, leaving the Water Fund with a $36.7 million fund balance. Staff therefore recommends that City Council adopt a 5% water rate increase for 2018 instead of the previously approved 9% increase. Better than expected financial performance in Fiscal Year 2016-17 has allowed for this reduced rate adjustment while still providing sufficient funds to conduct studies necessary to inform the Sustainable Water Master Plan update and future rate recommendations.', 'The recommended rate adjustment would be sufficient to allow the City to:', '1) Deliver potable water to Santa Monica customers reliably, safely and sustainably in compliance with federal and state regulations; and', "2) Fund operating and capital budgets that are necessary to implement the City's self-sufficiency goals to encourage water conservation and sustainability, as contemplated in the City's 2014 water rate analysis. Such projects include five FY 2017-18 capital projects to improve reservoir chlorination ($900,000), perform pilot reverse osmosis upgrades at the Arcadia Water Treatment Plant ($250,000), commence preparation of a Groundwater Sustainability Plan for the Santa Monica Basin ($150,000), conduct a supplemental study to refine the Sustainable Yield Analysis ($100,000), and complete a flow modelling study required for future reuse of recycled water ($300,000).", 'The recommended 5% water rate increase would be effective for calendar year 2018 on bills issued on or about March 1, 2018. Proposed and current water and fire line service rates are listed in Attachment D. Council may take action to adjust future rates at the next annual review.', 'The 2014 water rate study was prepared in conjunction with the preparation of the Sustainable Water Master Plan (SWMP). In 2014, City Council adopted the SWMP with the goal of eliminating reliance on imported water from Metropolitan Water District and achieving water self-sufficiency by 2020. Since the adoption of the SWMP and as a result of new water conservation programs/policies implemented in 2015 and 2016, the City has seen a 16 percent reduction in water use while the residential population has grown from 92,321 to 93,282 over the same period. Overall, through its efforts to address the drought, the City has achieved and continues to maintain a nearly 20% reduction in water use relative to its 2013 baseline. This reduction has allowed the City to further reduce its use of imported water by 11 percent. Currently, the City’s water supply consists of approximately 25 percent imported water and 75 percent local groundwater. Per capita water use has maintained steady at 110 gallons per capita per day (GPCD) in 2016 versus record low usage of 109 GPCD in 2015.', 'Staff initiated a comprehensive update of the Sustainable Water Master Plan earlier this year. Significant progress has been made on the completion of that plan, including completion of a preliminary Santa Monica Basin sustainable yield analysis, which evaluated the rate (volume) at which groundwater can be pumped on a perennial basis without depleting the resource, a key element in achieving the water self-sufficiency goal', 'Based on the work completed to date, staff believes further analysis is needed in order to assess whether the City will meet its water self-sufficiency goal by 2020, including what added measures are needed to eliminate reliance on imported water. . Specifically, analysis to validate the sustainable yield estimates, determine availability and costs to access potential additional local groundwater resources, and evaluate the cost and viability of additional water conservation programs as requested by the Task Force on the Environment are required. This work is currently underway and is expected to be completed in late spring 2018 and will be incorporated into an updated SWMP. The updated SWMP will be presented to Council in mid-2018 and will include a detailed progress report and timeline for achieving the water self-sufficiency goal and maintaining an ongoing sustainable local water supply.', 'Background', 'On February 24, 2015, Council approved the following schedule of water rate increases via resolution subject to an annual State of the Water Fund review analyzing fiscal performance and projected fund balances over a five-year period:', 'Calendar Year', '2015', '2016', '2017', '2018', '2019', 'Effective Date', 'March 1, 2015', 'January 1, 2016', 'January 1, 2017', 'January 1, 2018', 'January 1, 2019', 'Maximum Authorized Increase', '9%', '9%', '9%', '9%', '9%', 'Actual Increase*', '9%', '5%', '5%', '*Actual Increase adopted by Council based upon review of Water Fund performance', 'Rate increases go into effect automatically on an annual basis unless suspended, all or in part, by Council. On February 23, 2016, based on an improved financial outlook, Council partially suspended the full 9% increase and approved a 5% increase for calendar year 2016. On November 22, 2016, based on better than expected financial performance, Council partially suspended the full 9% increase and approved a 5% increase for calendar year 2017. The rate increase for 2017 provided funding to increase the City’s water main replacement budget from $2 million to $4 million per year in order to meet a 100-year replacement schedule which will increase the resilience of the water system and help to prevent water main breakages.', 'For financial stability, the Water Fund strives to maintain a $7 million minimum reserve balance with revenues sufficient to cover all operating and capital expenditures while meeting various water-related requirements and goals including:', '· 20% reduction in water use from 2013 levels mandated by the State from May 5, 2015 through May 2016, and current City Stage 2 Water Supply Shortage conditions adopted by Council on August 12, 2014 in accordance with the City’s Water Shortage Response Plan;', '· Meeting a State-required 123-gallon per capita per day usage standard per the Water Conservation Act of 2009 also known as SBx7-7;', '· Federal & State water quality and treatment requirements;', "· Achieving Santa Monica's goal of reducing the City's reliance on imported water and attaining 100% water self-sufficiency by 2020;", '· Managing Santa Monica basin groundwater contamination and utilizing groundwater resources in a sustainable manner; and', '· Maintenance and construction of water treatment and distribution systems including facilities, meters, pipelines, pump stations, reservoirs and well fields for reliable and efficient delivery of potable water for customer use.', 'The approved 9% annual increases may be suspended in whole or part if revenues are greater than anticipated or expenditures are less than expected, while maintaining a $7 million minimum reserve Water Fund balance at the end of the five-year planning horizon.', 'Any 2018 rate increase would go into effect for water consumption beginning on January 1, 2018, effective on water bills prepared on or after March 1, 2018 as water meters are read approximately every two months (e.g., a bill issued for a meter read on March 1, 2018 would reflect water usage from January 1 to February 28, 2018).', 'Water Units of Measure, as the City uses, are in units of hundred cubic feet (HCF) for water billing purposes, where 1 HCF = 748 gallons. Discussion in the first portion of the staff report related to water rates, individual customer bills, and Water Fund financial performance will reference quantities in HCF units. As the City imports water from the Metropolitan Water District (MWD) of Southern California in units of acre-feet (AF), where one acre foot = 325,851 gallons or 435.6 HCF, discussion in the second portion of the staff report related to the City’s overall progress towards water self-sufficiency will reference quantities in acre-feet.', 'Discussion', 'State of the Water Fund and Rate Recommendation', 'Fiscal Year 2016-17 Financial Performance', 'In considering whether to suspend all or part of the scheduled 9% rate adjustment for calendar year 2018, staff analyzed the FY 2016-17 actual performance of the Water Fund. The Water Fund ended Fiscal Year 2016-17 with a fund balance of $36,727,423, $9.2 million better than expected primarily due to lower than expected capital and operating expenditures while achieving revenues just above expectations. The fund balance includes the one-time infusion of $33.4 million in Charnock Fund MTBE settlement funds at the end of FY 2012-13 which is being used to fund increased capital and conservation programs; and ongoing monitoring, remediation and permitting activities for the Charnock Well Field.', '· Revenues – FY 2016-17 potable water sales of 4,991,022 hundred cubic feet (HCF) increased by 2.5% versus record low usage of 4,870,900 HCF in FY 2015-16, resulting in sales revenues exceeding budget by $0.4 million and total Water Fund revenues exceeding expectations by $0.6 million. Although overall water usage remains approximately 20% below the City’s 2013 baseline, modest year-over-year increases were observed for the three customer classes which account for approximately 93% of City usage: Multi-Family Residential (+1.7%), Commercial (+2.6%) and Single Family Residential (+2.8%).', '· Expenditures – FY 2016-17 capital and operating expenditures were $8.6 million less than expected. Key line items include:', 'o Capital Expenditures were $3.6 million less than projected – virtually all of these funds are for ongoing projects and programs which will be rolled over into FY 2017-18 and spent pending bids and completion of design work for projects related to water main replacements ($1.5 million), facility repairs ($1.25 million), irrigation controllers & turf removal at City sites ($540,000), and software and control systems ($312,000).', 'o Expenditures for Water Conservation Programs were $1.7 million less than projected – turf removal rebates ($585,000 of $1.5 million budgeted) and multi-family toilet installation program ($80,000 of $678,000 budgeted) expenditures were significantly lower than expected due to staffing vacancies and contracting delays.', 'o Water Treatment and System Maintenance Materials & Services were $900,000 less than projected – expenditures for water treatment chemicals, maintenance supplies and professional services were less than expected.', 'o Charnock Well Field Operations were $850,000 less than projected –purchases of activated carbon required to treat groundwater to remove Methyl Tertiary Butyl Ether (MTBE) and other contaminants continued to drop as clean-up of the Charnock Sub-basin continues. Only twenty-one 20,000-lb deliveries of activated carbon were required in FY 2016-17 compared to 40 deliveries in FY 2013-14, which was the highest year of carbon use.', 'o Salaries & Wages were $600,000 less than projected – the Water Resources Division experienced several key staff vacancies in FY 2016-17, including four positions vacant for longer than six months.', 'o The Cost to purchase water was $300,000 less than projected.', 'Rate Recommendation', 'Due to an improved financial outlook and the need to do additional analysis to determine the project and financial needs to achieve water self-sufficiency, staff recommends Council partially suspending a portion of the 9% water rate increase authorized by Council and authorize a 5% increase for calendar year 2018. Comparing rates with the 15 other Metropolitan Water District (MWD) of Southern California member cities, Santa Monica’s tiered rate structure would continue to offer close to the lowest costs in the region for the average user. For a single-family residence using the City average of 25 HCF (18,700 gallons) over a two-month period, a 5% increase would raise a bi-monthly water bill by $4.63 from $91.64 to $96.27, which works out to about a half-cent per gallon ($0.00515). Anaheim currently offers the best pricing at $84, followed by Fullerton at $89 and El Segundo at $95 as indicated in the following chart:', 'The 5% rate adjustment would provide for continued delivery of water service, including:', '· Sufficient funding to maintain safe and reliable water deliveries for Santa Monica customers at a reasonable cost while meeting federal and state regulations and City water usage restrictions;', '· Continued funding toward projects and programs needed to continue progress toward the City’s water self-sufficiency goal', '· Continued investment in infrastructure and conservation programs; and', '· Meeting or exceeding bonding capital requirements; and the financial stability to allow for fluctuations in water usage and to address unforeseen operating and capital budget requirements.', 'The following anticipated costs and budgeted projects are included in the Water Fund’s 5-year fund balance projection (Attachment E):', '· Metropolitan Water District (MWD) of Southern California – $5.4 million from FY 2019-20 to FY 2021-22 to ensure sufficient funding for imported water deliveries prior to achieving water self-sufficiency and ongoing access to imported water if needed in case of emergency. After 2020, the City anticipates costs for continued access to MWD water (including fixed “Readiness to Serve” and “Capacity” charges which have totaled $1.0 million to $1.2 million per year in addition to per acre-foot charges for water imported) to serve as a backup source in case of City water production interruptions or to meet peak demand requirements.', '· Coastal Sub-Basin Exploratory Borings and Well SM-7 Replacement Project –$4.2 million in FY 2017-18 to evaluate groundwater availability and quality in the Coastal sub-basin by drilling three borings/production wells at the Santa Monica Airport, Colorado Yards and 2018 19th Street; and replace an inactive well (SM-7) located near Olympic / Stewart with a new production well.', '· Water Neutrality Ordinance – added $2.1 million in FY 2017-18 costs for contractor services to implement the ordinance for new development permits and to identify/ensure compliance with water usage offsets. Staff anticipates that Water Neutrality fees effective for permit applications submitted on or after July 1, 2017 coupled with the cessation of Water Demand Mitigation fees ($3 per gallon per day of estimated new net water use collected to fund water conservation programs at municipal sites) will lead to revenues that are approximately $560,000 less than total program costs, which is due to one-time non-recoverable program start-up costs for implementing this water conservation program.', 'Staff also recommends Council approve funding for five Capital Improvement Program (CIP) projects, which would commence in FY 2017-18, and reduce budgets for two projects for a total of $549,982:', '· Potable Water Reservoir Improvements ($900,000) – To improve chlorination and reduce nitrification at the City’s three reservoirs (Mount Olivet, Riviera and San Vicente), additional mixers, chemical dosing and analyzer equipment would be installed.', '· Arcadia Water Plant Enhanced Reverse Osmosis Recovery Pilot ($250,000) - To increase the efficiency of the City’s water treatment process from the current 82% (82 gallons of finished water are produced from 100 gallons of raw water) to approximately 90%, which could yield an additional 672 acre-feet per year (AFY) from the same amount of groundwater, the City would pilot a new full-scale treatment skid on a rental basis including membranes, pumps and analyzer equipment to process reject water currently disposed into the sewer. Depending on the success of the pilot, staff would return to Council to consider purchasing the rental equipment (estimated at $2 million), with full cost recovery possible within two to four years due to savings from reduced MWD water purchases.', '· Santa Monica Basin Groundwater Sustainability Plan ($150,000) - To develop a state-required Groundwater Sustainability Plan by January 2022 to manage Santa Monica Basin groundwater in concert with the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power, the County of Los Angeles, the City of Beverly Hills and the City of Culver City, an additional $150,000 in FY 2017-18 would be added to the City’s current $50,000 budget for plan development and facilitation of regular interested party meetings. Actual costs may be higher or lower dependent on the cost-sharing agreement negotiated with the other signatory agencies of the Santa Monica Basin Groundwater Sustainability Agency.', '· Supplemental DInSAR Study ($100,000) - This study will supplement data collected as part of the preliminary Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar or DInSAR subsidence study completed earlier this year. The study is intended to better assess how the local groundwater basins and sub-basins are recharged and will allow further refinement and finalization of the Sustainable Yield Analysis (SYA) for the basin.', '· US Geological Survey (USGS) Numerical Flow Model ($300,000) – Completion of this model is required for the City to obtain a recharge permit that would allow future injection of treated recycled water from the Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP) into local aquifers for reuse. USGS has completed a detailed groundwater flow model for most of the LA Basin. Staff has met with the USGS to begin the process of working cooperatively to extend the USGS model into the Santa Monica Basin by sharing our existing modeling with the agency. These activities would utilize the City’s currently contracted modeling expert (ICF Engineers) to interface with the USGS modeling team. Work would initially focus on the Charnock and Olympic sub-basins. The objective of the modeling program is to have a preliminary calibrated model for the sub-basins the City currently pumps by 2020.', '· Arcadia Water Treatment Plant Reverse Osmosis Membrane Replacement Project ($700,000 budget reduction) – in November 2017, the City completed replacement of 1,608 reverse osmosis membranes used in the treatment of potable water. Initially budgeted at $1.5 million, actual costs were $800,000, yielding $700,000 in savings available to defray the project costs above.', '· Water / Wastewater Tenant Improvement Projects – to reflect the deferral of Water / Wastewater building modifications at the City Yards to accommodate staff currently located at 1212 5th Street not included in Phase I of the City Yards Master Plan, staff also recommends Council approve FY 2017/18 CIP reductions $450,018 for the Water Fund and $1,950,017 for the Wastewater Fund originally slated for design and construction. Pending further City Master Plan design and planning work, these modifications will be taken to Council as part of the FY 18-20 Biennial CIP budget submittal with updated cost and timing estimates (currently, approximately $3.9M apiece has been included in the 5-year budget forecasts for both the Water and Wastewater Funds).', 'Alternatives', 'As currently modeled, an increase lower than a 5% increase for calendar year 2018 would cause the Water Fund to drop below the $7 million minimum recommended reserve balance by the end of FY 2021-22. If rates are not increased at all, the fund balance would be projected to drop to $1.6 million at the end of FY 2021-22.', 'While an increase greater than 5% might provide additional resources for accelerating progress toward the 2020 water self-sufficiency goal, the completion of the ongoing studies will provide a clearer roadmap for making those decisions in the years ahead.', 'Similarly, diverting from the recommended capital investments by adding or deleting proposed projects could either delay or accelerate progress toward the City’s goal of providing safe water, meeting its water self-sufficiency goal and/or meeting the State’s Groundwater Sustainability Plan requirement by 2022. Again, the completion of the current analyses will provide a better guide for future investments beyond the ones recommended in this report.', 'Despite having a larger than normal $36.7 million Water Fund balance primarily due to the one-time infusion of $33.4 million in Charnock Well Fund MTBE settlement funds at the end of FY 2012-13, it is anticipated that significant investments in capital ($42 million) and conservation ($17 million) programs will cause expenses to outpace revenues in each of the next few years. The five-year Water Fund forecast currently models in an approved 9% rate increase for calendar year 2019, with any future changes in future years to be determined by a future rate study. However, actual rate adjustments will be set by Council for 2019 based on an annual financial performance review, which has been better than expected over the past three years leading to reduced rate increases; and for 2020 to 2024 based on an upcoming Water/Wastewater rate study to be considered by Council in 2019 and subject to Proposition 218 notifications to all rate payers and public hearing requirements.', 'Progress Toward Meeting Water Self-Sufficiency Goal', 'In 2014, City Council adopted the Sustainable Water Master Plan (SWMP) with the ambitious goal of eliminating reliance on imported water from Metropolitan Water District (MWD) and achieving water self-sufficiency by 2020. Since the adoption of the SWMP and as a result of new water conservation programs and policies implemented in 2015 and 2016, the City has seen a 16 percent reduction in water demand while the residential population has grown about 1 percent over the same period. Overall, through its efforts to address the drought the City has achieved and continues to maintain a 20% reduction in water use relative to its 2013 baseline. This reduction in water demand has allowed the City to further reduce its use of imported water by 11 percent. Figure 1 below indicates the continuing reduction in the City’s imported water supply over the five-year period from 2012 to 2016.', 'Figure 1', 'From 2007 to 2016, the population increased from 87,860 to 93,282. Nevertheless, as a result of long-standing successful conservation efforts by the City of Santa Monica, per capita water use (total city water use divided by population) has continued to decrease, as indicated in Figure 2 below.', 'Figure 2', 'Water Conservation Program Update', 'The City’s past and current water conservation efforts include a combination of incentive programs, regulations, enforcement, and outreach and education programs. For the 2014-2017 time period, the programs and policies that the Water Conservation Unit within the City’s Office of Sustainability and the Environment (OSE) has implemented and executed can be categorized as follows:', '· 2014 Sustainable Water Master Plan programs', '· New program enhancements to existing programs', '· Ordinances for new developments and water waste', 'Of all the factors shaping Santa Monica’s water conservation programs since the initial SWMP, the most significant have been the recent five-year (2012-2017) California drought and the resultant mandatory water use reductions and water conservation requirements issued by both the State and the City.', 'Although Water Conservation Unit staff resources were devoted primarily to new water conservation efforts in response to the 2012-2017 California drought, 10 of the programs defined in the 2014 SWMP were initiated with significant progress.', 'Water conservation programs implemented by the Water Conservation Unit have significantly reduced water demand since the 2014 SWMP:', '· Total annual demand shrank by 1,578 acre-feet (AF) from 2014 to 2016. Because the SWMP water conservation programs implemented to date have an estimated 317 acre-feet per year (AFY) savings, the additional 1,261 AFY in savings can be primarily attributed to new water conservation programs along with enhancements to long-standing legacy programs.', '· Drought response reduction targets of 20% mandated by the State and the City were consistently met.', '· The City’s Stage 2 Water Supply Shortage and the requirement for 20% reduction in water use remains in effect (via Water Use Allowances and Exceedance Citations), and the City continues to meet this target even with the Drought State of Emergency rescinded and the media spotlight no longer on the drought.', '· The City surpassed the State of California Water Conservation Act of 2009 (SBx7-7) target of 123 gallons per capita per day (GPCD) in 2014 and by 2016 had achieved a water demand of 110 GPCD. In September 2017, the Task Force on the Environment recommended that the City commit to further reductions in water demand to achieve a goal of 90 GPCD by 2025. As discussed later in this report, a detailed work plan for achieving this goal is being evaluated as part of a comprehensive update of the SWMP, which will be presented to Council in mid-2018. However, staff expects that increased water conservation necessary to meet this goal could be achieved in part by focusing on untapped areas such as:', 'o Yet to be implemented programs from the 2014 SWMP (most notably the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District retrofits, St. John’s fixture retrofits and coin-operated laundry machine retrofits).', 'o Increased focus on the commercial sector for rebates on water-saving devices (especially flush-o-meter toilets and urinals).', 'o Continued aggressive water-waste enforcement.', 'o Additional sustainable landscape conversions.', 'o Outreach program assisting customers to properly adjust their irrigation timers.', 'o New marketing and outreach campaign focusing on permanent conservation in line with the State’s forthcoming framework for “Making Water Conservation a California Way of Life.”', 'Additional Progress on 2014 SWMP Implementation and SWMP Update', 'Preliminary Sustainable Yield Analysis', 'As noted above, the City’s water supply currently consists of approximately 25 percent imported water and 75 percent local groundwater. Given the significant City-wide reductions in water use over the past three years and the identification of new opportunities to cultivate local water resources, the City hired Black and Veatch Corporation to complete a comprehensive update to the 2014 Sustainable Water Master Plan. Work began on this update in July 2017. To inform this effort staff also hired Richard Slade and Associates to complete a Preliminary Sustainable Yield Analysis (SYA) of the various groundwater sub-basins from which the City is pumping groundwater in the larger Santa Monica Basin. The Preliminary SYA has been completed and is included as (Attachment F) to this report.', 'The term “sustainable yield” is generally defined as the rate (volume) at which groundwater can be pumped from an aquifer or basin on a perennial basis under specified operating conditions without producing an undesirable result. Undesirable results include, among other things, the unsustainable reduction of the groundwater resource, degradation of groundwater quality, land subsidence and uneconomic pumping conditions. Groundwater in the Basin is replenished primarily from precipitation falling on the entire Basin and along the approximately 36-square-mile front of the Santa Monica Mountains adjacent to the northern boundary of the Basin. Since the Basin is heavily developed and a large portion of the available ground surface has been paved to construct roads and other infrastructure, only a limited portion of exposed soils are impervious and capable of allowing infiltration of surface water into the subsurface water-bearing geologic formation.', 'The Preliminary SYA study estimated sustainable yields for the Arcadia, Charnock and Olympic sub-basins, which are the only sub-basins currently pumped by the City. These are presented below in Table 2:', 'Table 2', 'GROUNDWATER SUBBASIN', 'CURRENTLY CALCULATED', 'SUSTAINABLE YIELD', '(AFY)', 'Arcadia', '600 to 800', 'Charnock', '4,600 to 5,900', 'Olympic', '1,600 to 1,700', 'TOTALS:', '6,800 to 8,400', 'Coastal', 'Assessment in Progress', 'Crestal', 'Yet To Be Determined', 'Previous estimates of sustainable yield of the combined Arcadia, Charnock and Olympic sub-basins by various experts retained by the City have ranged between 9,695 -13,475 acre-feet per year (AFY). These previous estimates relied heavily on literature searches and localized data. The current study provides an analysis based on actual pumping and recharge data over a period of 30 years. The information is preliminary, and conservative, based solely on the three basins from which the City currently draws water. As detailed below, additional work is currently underway to refine the preliminary SYA results. This work involves completing exploratory borings in the Coastal sub-basin, digital land mapping and remote sensing efforts; staff anticipates the safe yield estimates will be adjusted once the additional work is completed in Spring 2018.', 'Exploratory Borings', 'The City currently has no wells in the Coastal sub-basin and little reliable geologic data is available. However, based on a test well drilled adjacent to City Hall in 2017 it is anticipated that the sub-basin could hold significant groundwater reserves. To assess the availability and quality of groundwater that might be present, the City is drilling three deep (600 ft.) exploratory borings in the sub-basin to document hydrogeological conditions (Council action July 11, 2017, Attachment G). This project began in September 2017 and will be completed in early 2018. Initial results indicate that at least one of the drilling locations may be suitable for installation of a future production well. Full results and future recommended actions will be presented to Council as part of the updated Sustainable Water Master Plan in mid-2018.', 'Digital Elevation Mapping', 'A supplemental study related to the SYA addresses how surface water runoff becomes available for recharge (replenishment of the groundwater supply) and consequently, how water in storage is calculated. The recharge rates used in the preliminary SYA include a simple calculation of recharge from the mountain areas, which likely underestimates recharge to the basin. Staff has initiated a study utilizing computer-assisted modelling of irregular elevation data to provide a more accurate estimate of available runoff.', 'Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar Studies (DInSar)', 'Differential Interferometry Synthetic Aperture Radar (DInSAR) is a satellite-based remote sensing technique capable of detecting minute variations (deformation) of surface topography over time. In order to evaluate if historic and ongoing groundwater withdrawals by the City may have resulted in large scale sediment compaction (land subsidence) which could adversely affect the amount of groundwater storage in the basin, a preliminary DInSAR study (Attachment H) was conducted as part of the Preliminary SYA. The study determined that historic or ongoing Basin-wide sediment compaction (land subsidence) was not evident, and also identified previously unknown groundwater recharge pathways in the basin. Two additional remote sensing studies will be completed to further evaluate this preliminary information and refine the preliminary SYA study.', 'Current and Planned Efforts to Increase Local Supply', 'In addition to water conservation programs staff have initiated or are planning several projects intended to increase local water supplies and further reduce the need for imported water in order to meet the City’s water self-sufficiency goal. These are summarized below.', 'Clean Beaches Project', 'In June 2017, Council approved a contract for construction of the Clean Beaches Project for the Pier watershed (Attachment I). The Project involves construction of a below ground stormwater harvesting tank, which will improve beach water quality by collecting stormwater discharges to the ocean at the Pier outfall. The Project will harvest up to 1.6 million gallons (MG) of storm water from any single storm event for advanced treatment, recycling and reuse. The harvested water will be treated at the Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF) for non-potable uses such as irrigation and toilet flushing. Construction began in September 2017 and is expected to be completed by August 2018.', 'Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP)', 'The SWIP is composed of three integrated project elements to help improve drought resiliency, increase water supply and enhance flexibility in the management of the City’s water resources. SWIP Element 1 involves the installation of a containerized brackish/saline reverse osmosis and enhanced disinfection treatment system at the SMURRF. When operational, the reverse osmosis/disinfection unit would be utilized to advance treat non-conventional water resources such as urban and wet weather runoff harvested by the Clean Beaches Project for later reuse. SWIP Element 2 includes the construction of a below ground Advanced Water Treatment Facility (AWTF) at a location beneath the Civic Center parking lot.The AWTF would advance treat approximately 1.0 million gallons per day (MGD) of municipal wastewater for reuse.SWIP Element 3 consists of two below-grade stormwater harvest tanks. One tank (3.0 MG) would be constructed beneath Memorial Park. The other below-grade tank (1.5 MG) would be located adjacent to the AWTF beneath the Civic Center parking lot. Together, the Project elements would produce approximately 1.5 MGD (1,680 acre-feet/year) of new water for immediate non-potable reuse, and when appropriately permitted, for indirect potable reuse via aquifer recharge.City Council approved a funding agreement for the SWIP project on September 12, 2017 (Attachment J). Following completion of all required permitting approvals construction is expected to begin in Spring 2019 and the project is expected to be operational by late 2020.', 'Enhanced Reverse Osmosis (RO) Recovery', 'Staff is exploring the use of new technologies that could cost effectively increase the production of the City’s existing Arcadia treatment plant by re-treating brine that is currently discharged to the sewer. Current recovery rates for water processed through the existing reverse osmosis treatment system stand at about 82%. In early 2018, staff will begin a feasibility study which includes a pilot test to assess the effectiveness of an emerging technology which may increase the recovery rate to 90%, and possibly beyond. Preliminary estimates are that an additional 672 AFY may be produced from the brine currently being disposed. The feasibility study that would evaluate the technology, costs, and water savings will be completed by the end of the fiscal year.', 'Numerical Groundwater Flow Modeling', 'In order to more effectively manage its groundwater resources, the City has completed numerical flow modeling of its Olympic and Charnock well fields. Numerical groundwater flow models are based on detailed hydrogeologic data which are compiled into a sophisticated modeling software program that is used by numerous government agencies and other municipalities throughout California. Once calibrated, flow models can be used to identify and plan future groundwater development, better control contamination plumes, and most importantly, provide for adaptive pumping that would allow individual wells or entire supply fields to be better managed in order to sustainably recharge without affecting the City’s overall groundwater production rates.', 'The US Geological Survey (USGS) has completed a detailed groundwater flow model for most of the LA Basin. Staff has met with the USGS to begin the process of working cooperatively to extend the USGS model into the Santa Monica Basin by sharing our existing modeling with the agency. These activities would utilize the City’s currently contracted modeling expert (ICF Engineers) to interface with the USGS modeling team. Estimated costs for these activities over the next 12 months are approximately $300,000. Work would initially focus on the Charnock and Olympic sub-basins. The objective of the modeling program is to have a preliminary calibrated model for the sub-basins the City currently pumps by 2020.', 'Advanced Metering Infrastructure (AMI) Pilot – Smart Meters', 'AMI is an integrated system of smart meters, communications networks, and data management systems that enables two-way communication between the water utility and customers and provides real-time collection and evaluation of water use data. Currently, water meters throughout the city are manually read once every two months. This infrequent and staff intensive process provides very limited data regarding actual water use patterns at individual sites and throughout the city. The real-time continuous data provided by AMI allows for the timely identification of leaks and excessive water use, allows customers to accurately budget their water use in order to meet conservation goals, provides more accurate water billing, and can help to improve customer service. In March of 2016 the City partnered with Southern California Gas Company (SCG) and Aclara Technologies (Aclara) to run a proof of concept AMI pilot. The pilot involved retrofitting some 200 City water meters (single family, multi-family, commercial) and using SCG’s network infrastructure to transmit the meter reading data to a network management database and software hosted by Aclara. Subsequently, an additional 500 meters (roughly all City of Santa Monica municipal accounts and some locations that were challenging for City crews to perform manual meter reads for billing) were retrofitted with AMI technology. The pilot will run until March 2018.', 'Preliminary indications are that 99.2% of the hourly data transmitted from the meter to the Data Management System has been received without error; the outlier may have been signal interference at one of the SCG’s data collection units. During the pilot active response to anomalies in the data received (high consumption alerts) have allowed customers to be notified of potential leaks in time to reduce significant water loss. The continuation of the pilot will address the effectiveness of those services with both smart meters and a consumer engagement overlay called WaterSmart, which helps customers manage their water usage and assists the City to comply with State mandates. The full findings of the AMI pilot will be presented to Council in 2018 along with recommendations for possible expansion of the AMI system to all Santa Monica customers.', 'Summary of Next Steps', 'As previously noted in this report, staff initiated a comprehensive update of the Sustainable Water Master Plan (SWMP) earlier this year. It is too soon to tell whether the City will meet its water self-sufficiency goal by 2020. Significant progress has been made on implementing and updating that plan, including completion of the preliminary sustainable yield analysis (SYA) and integration of new projects such as SWIP, the Clean Beaches Project and improvements in water treatment efficiencies. However, additional work is required to validate the sustainable yield estimates, determine availability and costs to access potential additional local groundwater resources, and evaluate the cost and viability of additional water conservation programs as requested by the Task Force on the Environment. As detailed above, the additional work required to update the SWMP is currently underway and is expected to be completed in late spring 2018. The results of that additional analysis will be incorporated into an updated SWMP, which will be presented to Council in mid-2018 and will include a detailed progress report and timeline for achieving the water self-sufficiency goal.', 'Upcoming Water Studies', 'Water/Wastewater Rate Study & new 5-year rate adjustment schedule (2020 to 2024)', 'The current rate schedule was approved in early 2015 and provides potential rate adjustments for calendar years 2015 to 2019. Staff is preparing to begin a water and wastewater rate study by midyear 2018 in order to bring rate recommendations to Council in the fall of 2019.', 'Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (SGMA)', 'In May of 2017, Council approved a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) and the City’s participation in the formation of the Santa Monica Basin Groundwater Sustainability Agency (SMBGSA). At approximately the same time, Los Angeles County and the cities of Los Angeles, Beverly Hills, and Culver City also executed the MOU to form the SMBGSA. After the required 90-day posting period to allow public review of the MOU, no challenges to the MOU were received and the SMBGSA was designated the exclusive Groundwater Sustainability Agency (GSA) for the Santa Monica Basin. Milestone deadlines for the SMBGSA now include:', '· Preparation and submittal of a Groundwater Sustainability Plan (GSP) for the basin, January 31, 2022', '· Following the adoption of the GSP, and annually thereafter, the GSA must submit a GSP Monitoring Report, April 1, 2023', '· The GSP must include measurable objectives and milestones in increments of 5 years to achieve sustainability within 20 years of GSP adoption, January 31, 2042', 'The SMBGSA has initiated monthly meetings, led by Santa Monica, to address moving forward expeditiously to retain consultant(s) to assist with the preparation of the GSP, as well as to identify necessary amendments to the MOU as they relate to the potential development of bylaws and cost-sharing issues. Any amendments to the MOU agreed upon unanimously by the member agencies will be brought to the respective agencies’ governing bodies for approval.', 'Task Force on the Environment and Water Advisory Committee Actions', 'Findings of the preliminary SYA, progress on the update to the Sustainable Water Master Plan, and the Rate Adjustment recommendations were presented to the Environmental Task Force on September 18, 2017 and October 16, 2017. The same information was presented to the Water Advisory Committee on October 2, 2017, and November 6, 2017. No action was taken by either body; however during discussions of funding for sustainability projects, the Task Force passed the following two motions:', 'September 18, 2017', 'The City of Santa Monica Task Force on the Environment reinforces the position that all of the water settlement funds should be used to help the City get to and maintain water self-sufficiency and water perpetuity.', 'October 16, 2017', 'WHEREAS, there is $120 million from previous settlements.', 'WHEREAS, Water Fund capital improvement program (CIP) projects are estimated at $42 million over the next five years.', 'WHEREAS, the City is borrowing $56 million from the State of California to fund the Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP) to assist in achieving water self-sufficiency by 2020. The total cost of the project is estimated at $69.9 million.', 'THEREFORE, the Santa Monica Task Force on the Environment strongly supports the projects recommended by staff, but we are not currently recommending the proposed rate increase.', 'With regard to the water settlement funds referenced in the motions from the Task Force, staff prepared an information item dated December 19, 2017 (Attachment K), which outlines the sources and uses of those funds and the remaining balance of unrestricted funds that have been set aside in the General Fund to assist with funding of other priority projects as identified by Council.', 'To date, Council has made the determination to use both pay-as-you-go and debt financing to fundSustainable Water Master Planprojects. The pay-as-you-go funding comes from a combination of ratepayer-generated revenues and the $33.6 million balance of MTBEsettlement funds after thecompletion of remediation work atthe Charnock facility. These funds have been budgeted to pay for capital projects included in the last Water Rate Study approved in February 2015. For Fiscal Years 2014-15 through 2018-19, capital projects included and will include general system improvements such as emergency generator enhancements, water main replacements, and treatment plant pressure vessel repair, among others.  In September, 2017, the City entered into an agreement with the State Water Resources Control Boardto receive a very low interest (1.8%), 30-year loan in the amount of$56.9 million, with $4 million in debt forgiveness, to fund the SWIP projects. With this loan, the City was able to leverage funds at a lower rate than would be possible through other financing, and the $4 million in principal forgiveness further lowered the price of the financing. In the current economic climate, bond financing for lease revenue bonds or revenue bonds, whether in the General Fund or enterprise funds, is approximately 4-5%. As a result, the use of a Clean Water State Revolving Fund (CWSRF) loan leveraged funds at a lower price.', 'Staff proposed to transfer $11.1 million in FY 2017-18 from General Fund reserves for the 2009 Gillette water mediation settlement funds to the Water Fund reserves in order to cover ongoing and future costs for remediation of polluted groundwater in the Olympic Well Field / Sub-basin. $6.5M would be reserved for annual ongoing remediation costs for a ten-year period including monitoring, permitting and reporting required by the State; and $4.6M would be reserved as a contingency for other Olympic remediation-related costs.', 'The larger policy issue of the mix of financing between rate payer and water settlement resources will be addressed in the upcoming Capital Improvement Plan adoption process after the completion of the currently ongoing technical studies.', 'Financial Impacts and Budget Actions', '1. FY 2016-17 water sales increased 2.5% versus FY 2015-16, slightly above the 2% increase projected by staff, resulting in sales revenue $379,440 greater than budgeted. Although the State has discontinued its mandatory conservation requirement, the City has remained at Stage 2 of its Water Shortage Response Plan (mandatory 20% reduction versus 2013 levels) and implemented the Water Neutrality Ordinance for new developments effective July 1, 2017. As of October 2017, FY 2017-18 water sales of 1,786,912 HCF are down by 1% versus the same period in FY 2016-17 (1,807,373 HCF); therefore, staff projects water sales to finish FY 2017-18 1% lower than FY 2016-17. Based on a 5% water rate increase for calendar year 2018, increase revenue budget at account 25671.402310 in the amount of $161,660.', '2. Approval of the recommended action requires the following FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget appropriations and reductions in the Water Fund:', 'Account Number', 'Amount', 'C259078.589000 – Groundwater Management Plan', '$150,000', 'C259219.589000 – Arcadia Enhanced RO Recovery', '$250,000', 'C259220.589000 – Reservoir Improvements', '$900,000', 'C259223.589000 – DInSAR Study', '$100,000', 'C259224.589000 – City/USGS Numerical Flow Model', '$300,000', 'C250162.589000 – Water Resources Tenant Improvement', '($450,018)', 'C259209.589000 – Arcadia Water Plant Membrane', '($700,000)', 'Total', '$549,982', '3. Approval of the recommended action requires a FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget reduction in the Wastewater Fund in account C310162.589000 in the amount of $1,950,017.', '4. Approval of the recommended action requires an interfund transfer of $11,100,000 from Gillette-Boeing water mediation settlement funds in account 01695.570080 to the Water Fund in account 25695.570080. This also requires a release of fund balance 1.380237 in the amount of $11,100,000.'], 'MeetingID': '1132', 'ID': '2596'}]]
